Hong Kong is a city of extreme landscape conditions in which the majority of the land is defined as high steep terrain. Due to this condition there is a complex infrastructure of trains and escalators for the mobility of the pedestrians. This type of infrastructure accounts for more than 50 percent of the available land. The remaining areas are clustered with isolated skyscrapers surrounded by heavy vehicular and pedestrian traffic. Because of this phenomenon, we think that Hong Kong doesn’t need another skyscraper but a building that will offer public areas for the inhabitants.Causeway Bay, one of the most heavily populated areas in the world, is defined by a large public park to the east and a major traffic route to the north. An entrance to the Cross Harbor tunnel is also located in this area. Slow moving traffic is a constant all-day long, causing intense noise and pollution. The traffic spreads to the surrounding streets and heavily suffocates the neighborhood. The only access to the harbor front is through a pedestrian tunnel, which was originally built as water infrastructure. This has lead to a deserted waterfront with a lot of residual spaces. By identifying this land we come up with an interesting development proposal that would provide a large number of public areas, as well as housing and office spaces. This proposal is designed in phases and will grow through the years. It will also regenerate the harbor and will bring back life to this area of Hong Kong.
Rather than looking at the city as an extension of architectonic space, the Shanghai market is here reinvented as an internal extension of a fluid landscape. Operating under this axiom, the vertical market changes the previous horizontality of the urban activity by pulling the city fabric upwards, enabling a further densification of the city. While modeling the existing economic flows of the city there was revealed a potential for a systemic expansion of the streetscape skyward. This move enables an accretion of market functions, pulling the chaotic action to a single site. Formally and theoretically, the degradative nature of fluid market economics define the building architecture, the thickness of circulatory structure responds to the predicted expenditure of capital as one moves through the building, and space is allocated for market activity accordingly. After initial studies into fluid tendencies of market vectors and their formal potentials, the spatial needs for a market were investigated using a dynamic technique reliant upon the structural generator of the fluid form, a typological skyscraper was deformed. The resultant change in topology was then used to define the spatial and formal conditions of the market itself.
In nature, organisms try to respond to the impact of various forces with minimum energy consumption. Similarly, materials are subject to a process of self-organization/adaptation in relation to the action of intrinsic as well as extrinsic forces acting upon it, aiming to fulfill a state of equilibrium. Exploring the inherent properties governing the behavior of a given material and its effects on the surrounding environment, represents the starting point for a broader understanding of material forms as a mutable, multi-performing, and generative design tool. The bottom-up approach towards the research onto a given material system discloses the opportunity to deeply investigate the proprieties of such a material, as well as opening unexpected potentials for inclusive performances and effects. The aim of the research is to unfold a set of extensive investigations on catenary structures developing a generative tool-set for architectural design and overcoming the traditional notion of programmatic determinism and building types. The analysis of the properties of catenaries, the inherent relationship between geometry and structure, and the behavior of the material under the application of a set of experiments, represents the core of the research. The hypothesis of the research is to develop an extensive set of investigations and trigger new speculations about the way catenary can nowadays be used, not only as global load bearing system to support vertical loads, but also as a geometry that can provide spatial arrangement for vertical structures. The parallel study on the physical and the digital realms constitutes the method of research.
Historically loaded and about to be demolished, the centrally located Hotel Rossija constitutes an exemplary terrain for an architectural operation. Starting with Lissitzky’s Wolkenbügeln in the 1920’s, followed by Stalin’s 7 Sisters, and the Palace of the Soviets in the 1940’s, there is a long history of skyscrapers in the city of Moscow. Contrary to planning of the new suburban business district “Moscow City”, we propose our building to be located in the heart of Moscow. Due to the lack of space a vertical arrangement of the program must be proposed within the perimeter of the Hotel Rossija. Relationships and dependencies between the different capitals resulted in the vertical configuration of the programs. The stacking of entire program typologies (e.g. soccer stadium, office blocks) resemble a vertical city rather than a conventional high-rise building. The intensity of programmatic interaction expresses itself in the different degrees of spatial connectivity. The more a program depends on its opposite the closer it moves towards it. Consequently, the two towers rise separately and clash according to the climaxes of interaction. Horizontal infrastructure layers are inserted at every clash node to distribute the inhabitants. These infrastructure nodes function as public spaces comparable to squares and streets in the traditional city.
Questioning what possibly is or will be the skyscraper for the XXI Century… It must not be singularly definable, but instead, in a multiplicious manner. A skyscraper for the XXI Century should act and react within itself as well as its context: both locally and globally, reconsider program and activity, generate new appetites, question standard fabrication techniques, create abundant spatial possibilities, and most of all, it must aim to redefine social identity and cultural conditions. For instance, the proposal reacts to the forthcoming of an international train station aiming to decentralize Rome. The physical and cultural implications of such a project are immense, and the question is: how does a city prepare for such an abrupt change in its current fabric so that it will fully utilize this new transportation asset and flourish? In this case, it reaches out to international organizations and aspiring companies to become a hub in its international context. With an objective to facilitate conception and development of small seed companies, it strives to standardize procedures, strengthen Italy in Europe’s existing biomedical field, and utilize local resources. By involving local resources, including but not limited to universities, hospitals, medical schools, businesses, and retailers; the skyscraper assists in generating an enduring presence within its local fabric, but more importantly connect itself and immediate context to international bodies. Within itself, it acts and reacts through a program proposal to standardize procedures. Programmatically, the tower establishes a feedback loop. Initiating this is its connection with international bio-facilities to standardize procedures. By introducing these procedures and opportunities to small rising companies, acting as a host, companies grow; which later will affect the hub’s procedural training and influence future small companies as well as those bodies that are internationally connected. Spatially, as a company develops, more facilities are available for their development. Within the tower, spatial possibilities provide for varying laboratories, freezer areas, lab support, holding rooms, and sample storage. All of which are possible through an open infrastructure.
The site selected for the skyscraper is located on the Mediterranean Sea, off the Barcelona Waterfront, creating a grand vertical visual icon at the end of the Diagonal Avenue, in Barcelona; an urban axis, cutting the city grid on NE-SW angle, and finishing on the sea shore. It is erected on an artificial man-made peninsula, on which three intertwined towers would be built. They are entering a marine dominion, maybe representing utopia, extending the city, using a vertical element in a metropolis (Barcelona), while simultaneously turning toward the sky. It fulfills an old desired intention in an unconventional manner. We were inspired by deep-sea sponges to create a complex glass structure beneath the sea. We tried to apply our findings from this organism on a high-rise building, to create vertical marine structures, looking as garden towers, using a skin made of optical fiber and fiberglass. The three skyscrapers intend to be a new type of bioclimatic buildings, in total mimesis with natural organisms, inhabitants of the deep sea around them. The double skin is composed by two layers, and contains a third layer of suspended vegetation, which becomes a new type of urban vertical agriculture. The Venus BCN skyscraper structures will also be ecological and energy self sufficient, having highly positive, repairing and productive results for the saturated urban environment, a sustainable design. For this reason, we propose an intelligent use of energy, water, and waste. This will be accomplished with a green bio-climatic envelope, which controls temperature, sun exposure, and ventilation, so the use of cooling and heating is kept to a minimum. The atmosphere water collector systems are implemented over the outer skin, and the use of bio-gas from the nearby purification plant would be implemented, having this as an energy resource, stored at the sky lobbies of each module.
Although it is impossible to imagine contemporary life without car-based mobility, the car is frequently barred from the public space. In European inner cities, where pedestrians rule, the car is viewed as a threat to the city. This is rather strange because, in general, we spend a lot of money on cars and many car owners derive their social status from their possession, to a greater or lesser degree. In addition, sooner or later, most pedestrians become car users forced to descend into dark parking basements. Multi-storey parking facilities are an answer to the ever-growing demand for parking space, particularly where the concentration of activities requires the well-conceived use of space available. The design is a 100 meter-high tower, with a capacity for approximately 450 cars, with an entry and exit station at the base of the building. This station has been designed with the users, both motorists and pedestrians, in mind. Spacious platforms for getting in and out and comfortable waiting rooms characterize the design. The entry, transfer, and garaging of vehicles is automated and takes place behind the station. The horizontal transfer is carried out by a traverse robot, whereas the vehicles are transported vertically in the tower by six car lifts. By uncoupling the cycle of getting in and loading the car, transporting it and parking it and the reverse process, a high rate of arrivals and departures is achievable. In principle, nobody is allowed behind the platforms and this has many advantages regarding efficient space usage. This separation is also advantageous in terms of safety and security for both motorists and their cars. The tower is flanked by a fire-escape stairwell for technical maintenance purposes.
Let us think of a city that is constrained by a complex urban structure. An ordered grid, the compulsory maximal height and density of the imposed vellums, as well as the need for balanced perspectives and visual openings. Every new modification of the city must abide by a strict global composition. The city is also centralized, its urban layers are superimposed, add to each other, organize and stabilize disparities and dis-equilibria. The city can be seen as an ecosystem made of built components, equipments, infrastructures, sport fields, empty spaces, squares, parks, and gardens. The site and placement of each of them is conditioned by a global equilibrium which allows every single element to exist on its own, as well as within a global system. It is a balanced composition. Now, let us think of this city as a finished ensemble, in which urban logic might be enriched by a new, unexpected, dimension. What if its current equilibrium is not complete, but, instead, a living body, which could be enriched and even improved by the addition of a new dimension? What if this new dimension is a vibration that would allow the whole city to live and function differently?. New levels of connection, new links within a city, a city that did not think it had any room for them. This role would by played by high buildings, which would inject a density of life in areas that were thought to be complete: in-between a courtyard and a street, amidst towers and offices, topping an empty tooth, to give a meaning to a district that used to lack it. Each tower is conceived as a new complex object. Rich in links, connections, public and private spaces, they are thought of as jigsaws of habitation spaces, working quarters, and areas of life and human interaction. Each element finds its place in a network of pillars and develops its own specific architectural vocabulary. The apartments are inserted like cabins on groups of pillars. The habitation areas spread over a height of 17 metres. Within the volume of the building, plateaus of 5.25m x 7.60m are superimposed, creating duplex and triplex apartments as well as aerial gardens. This mixture of lodgings, gardens, and axes of circulation create a complex system of public and private spaces, full and empty elements, where transparencies open, focus, and direct the views within the tower and to the outside.
In their search for light, space, balance, and keeping up with the environmental forces, trees are their own architects. A tree’s shape is a fascinating question. One part of its development is generated by its genetic code and the other part by its adaptation to the environment. We think these two factors are the key to understanding architectural design. Hong Kong is built next to the China Sea; viewed from the open sea, skyscrapers resemble the edge of a forest. In high-density areas, skyscrapers act like a forest, where buildings compete for light and space. The dynamism of the forest originates in the chemical exchanges with the ground, while that of the city derives from the interaction of economic and demographic forces. Paradoxically, trees which are the major structures in nature, can become dwarfed in an urban setting. The aim of this project is to return trees to their central role, in the way they dominate the natural environment. Like a tree, this building aims to be self-sufficient. It produces its own energy using sun and wind power. The tower is designed according to the principles of sustainability in terms of both its shape and its use of materials and renewable energy. The quasi-cylindrical shape offers less wind resistance and the circular floors are radially shifted in six different positions to allow better lighting at each level. The building is designed based on the construction principles used in oil rigs, namely a primary structure composed of three large pillars supporting circular floors (66m in diameter), open in the middle to incorporate multiple spatial modules with various functions. The first floor rises 40 meters above the ground, freeing up a large amount of space and giving access to the street. Accordingly, the lobby is located in the basement along the parking and it is naturally lit from the top by a system of circular skylights.
The Genotower05 was an investigation of the potential of 7+ dimensional digital space-time, established through an ever-changing search space which uses a stratification of sculpted numeric and geometric randomness in a resonant eugenic single-celled generative automaton. This stem-cell recursively duplicates, splits and mutates under multi-dimensional distortion. While self-mutilating to isolate regional topological growth, it eventually sheds aged generational cells and produces individualized but intelligent organs, situated in an overall organic structure on multiple transgenic levels. In other words, it was to grow intelligent vertically oriented organs in an intelligent transgenic body from identical digital stem cells, without linear array sets or post-processing. When dealing with the antiquated topological organ assembly, which may be laterally-transgenic and operating to develop mutation on different affective and performative levels, it remains still a tapeworm, missing core elements of an architectonic assembly. This assembly establishes skin, interior conditions, and nascent organ development individualization, but it remains confined to the longitudinal direction prescribed in the geometry or number set. There is little opportunity to describe clear organ isolation nor to establish formal splitting and return, without disrupting the skin/scale membrane or interior network structure. The Genotower05 does not operate in this confined linear topological fashion. It grows, lives and dies from a cell that recursively develops in many directions to construct a body of living cells communicating with each other. These systems were infused with the individual cellular locomotion, at first randomly, to allow for multi-celled formal arrangements. To better isolate future “heart” or “lung” or “nerve” cells, the initial stem-cell’s locomotion is allowed extreme degrees of freedom. As each generation progresses, the intermediate vector becomes more localized so that the cells remain near their cousins and siblings, not to cause intermingling of individual organs. Viewers should understand that this research is not trying to use a breeding algorithm to create complexity in a system that is actually asexual. There is no multi-partner reproduction and nor would this be plausible construct when dealing with zygotes. This process is not devising a speciation of organisms, but more contributing to a body through the individualization of organs but still assemble the whole on two+ scales of assembly.
The skyscraper for the 21st century must respond to 100 years of evolution in technology and society. New materials and structures allow the construction of buildings which are 700 to 900 meters high. More research will allow rising up to 1200 meters. The skyscrapers are moving from the old North American or European cities to the new Asian and South American cities. They used to be constructed in the city’s downtown, but are changing to the suburbs, with the intention of revitalizing them. In the past, they used to be offices in high-density financial districts, such as Manhattan, London, and Hong Kong. Now, skyscrapers have multifunctional spaces for commercial, living, and working activities. The detached single family house, the “spam”, has infected the earth as a virus, and if we apply this model to the rest of the world, with its actual growth of population, the Earth will soon be over urbanized. Europe and the United States export their image of the family, the house, the garden, the car and the dog, but it has been proven that this model generates insecurity, environmental problems and is not ”sustainable” for all. In the third world countries, the “fabelas” are also common around the urban centers, extending over the territory like the “single family house” model. This project is not a single building, but a group of buildings that resemble the branches of a tree. At one point the building adds more than 1.000.000 sqm of space, with an implantation of just 2500 sqm. It will be located in suburban areas, which will benefit from its multiple services and amenities. This skyscraper could be constructed using the same variables around the world as a strategic solution, but will change in each place depending on the climate, density, and development of the city.
This skyscraper is designed as a vertical city. The structural grid is inspired by a city’s master plan and its infrastructure system. The three cores are used to open up the whole building. The six planes are the horizontal connection between the cores. The cores contain several public spaces like parks, gyms, and meeting rooms. Infrastructure, such as electricity, water, and weather control, is also supplied by the cores. The second part of the building are the pods. Their construction system is similar to cabins in shipbuilding. The primary cover includes all technical links without interior finish. The interior finish is done in a nearby “shipyard” based on the client’s wishes. During the second phase, the module is carried to the skyscraper structural grid by building cranes. Water, electrical supply, and telecommunications are installed by “plug and play”. The skeleton is filled up with modules in this way. Modules could also be combined. It‘s possible to create apartments out of two or more modules by connecting them horizontally and/or vertically. Inhabitants that move out give the module back to the shipyard where the interior finish is removed. The cover is consequently prepared to be sold and refinished for a new inhabitant. Therefore the buildings skin is changing all the time and it is possible to react to clients wishes and technical progress in facade or design technology.
This project is an examination of the skyscraper typology being driven by financial and market forces. Reaching a maximum height of nearly 800 feet, the building performs as a revenue-generating billboard on an urban scale. The envelope of the structure was generated to maximize advertising perception from key cultural and civic nodes throughout the surrounding context of the greater Los Angeles area. The invasive insertion of this massive entity into the downtown area alters or destroys existing sight lines and replaces them with corporately sponsored images. Living rent-free in the towering structure are residents that are participants in the performance of the building as advertising conduit. The entity is composed of a swarm of pod-like enclosures, each creating a single pixel on the surface of the billboard. Essentially, this forms a giant low-res media surface. Each pod is terminated with a dome of electronic smart-glass that has the ability to change opacity and hue.
A skyscraper does not need to be about height, or technological achievement, but should firstly strive to provide healthy and diverse spaces for living and working. Density and vertical programming do not necessitate identical isolated units. The new skyscraper is de-objectified to foster urban connectivity, green space, and community life. It looks not just to fit within the city, but to extend new fits to nearby buildings and public spaces. The building creates new street life in the existing dead space between Michigan Avenue and State Street. The program addresses Chicago’s need for affordable housing. Failure to provide new housing as housing projects are being continually demolished is only increasing the number of people without suitable living arrangements.
 The main aim of this proposal is to question the role of structure within the field of architecture. Can it have multiple roles that integrate other elements, systems, creating mutually beneficial conditions? Can it be modeled like a leaf, in which the very members that hold it together are the same that deliver its nutrients? If so, structure can be a conduit—a physical network of rigid arteries and veins that not only bear load, but also house and perform additional services and operations. This scheme proposes that a research institute become a responsive, working system that utilizes structure and technology to yield agriculture, and effectively contribute to the efforts of reducing energy consumption that results in transporting fruits and vegetables from rural to urban areas. A canopy of hydroponic garden pods is designed to function as a seasonal market for the Philadelphia community. The proposal can be dissected into three interconnected components: stem, core and roots. Structure becomes the overlapping connective tissue that integrates these. The stem is the prominent element in which the others organize. It acts as the water processor. The core becomes a protective wrapper around the stem, benefiting from its branches’ deliveries of water. Collaborative lab space fills the core. Three currently independent research entities within the Pennsylvania region will merge like roots into one stem: urban horticulturalists, environmental scientists and those investigating building performance and diagnostics, will thrive from each others’ efforts and passions concerning future environments. Finally, the roots transfer water back to the ground, completing the natural hydrologic cycle. This scheme assumes it can be constructed above an existing parking garage on 12th and Sansom Street, Philadelphia.
Originating from the Klein Bottle, a non-orientable mathematical surface, it is similar to a Mobius strip in that it is single-sided. Its potential for spatial application is where the Mobius strip falls short, for the Klein Bottle is fully 3-dimensional and flirts with bounding volume with an infinite, single continuous side. It can be perceived as a strange tube which, in an attempt to bend & form a normal torus/loop, self-intersects and rejoins with itself but on the wrong side. The key lies in its strange quality of self-intersection, for the self-intersection provides spatial, typological, programmatic, structural, technological, site, and sustainability opportunities. It represents a new topological family of form, which can spawn a variety of skyscraper designs; the represented ½ Infinity Tower represents only one iteration of a family of architectural explorations. The ½ Infinity Tower provides a third spatial center/focus to the traditionally bipolar (top/bottom) skyscraper, for it creates a new void at the center third which can be programmed as a public or collective space: exhibition, meetings, restaurants, atrium, sky garden. The middle of the tower is, for once, a highly coveted destination within the skyscraper. The planimetric cut plane through the building is constantly evolving. Moving from a continuous floor plate to a two tower configuration, to a C-shaped floor, and finally a reconstituted single floor plate once again, the tower provides multiple shaped floor plates of varying sizes for companies of all sizes to occupy and inhabit. The increase in surface area not only allows for greater natural light and ventilation, but also much greater view opportunities, both outward-looking and inward-looking, at all areas of the skyscraper. The ½ Infinity Tower’s self-intersecting form increases the lateral stiffness and stability of the skyscraper significantly. As most skyscrapers can be perceived as a cantilever from the ground plane with only one point of support, the self-intersection of the tower shortens the cantilever by half and provides an additional point of lateral support at the midpoint for the skyscraper. If one perceives the project as two towers that merge, then each tower effectively braces the other. The self-intersection/void at the center of the building has an opening at the top, allowing wind to pass through the building and reducing wind loading substantially. The gravity loads of the tower are taken up by the triple core and internal columns. A steel lattice, or diagrid, envelopes the entire structure, producing a very efficient and redundant means of resisting lateral load and reducing total tonnage of steel throughout the building, as opposed to a traditional moment-frame. Where the tower cants, transfer trusses two floors deep, coupled with the diagrid lattice, transferring forces back down the vertical towers and into the ground.
Even though we have reached an era of advanced technology, the majority of the skyscrapers are structures that don’t provide sustainability to their social, cultural, and ecological environment. In a contemporary and diverse metropolis, such as New York City, the skyscraper should be a reciprocal organism that interacts with its many different layers. In this case, the proposed skyscraper recognizes New York as a temporal residence for millions of students, artists, and tourists.The proposed scheme analyzes their short-term needs and creates a system of organization around a single geometric unit. The combination of multiple units provides a structural, programmatic, and formal solution to the skyscraper. The proposed algorithm identifies the singularity and plurality of the geometric unit, depending on the location and use of the tower; a reciprocal system that adapts to its environment. The basic shape of this cell is a deformed hexagon that through multiplication, repetition, and deformation creates an open-end and close-end system. Once a linkage technique between the units is established it is possible to explore a suitable reciprocal system for a specific location. A unit generates a basic open-end system by repeating, multiplying, and scaling. It grows upwards and downwards from the center allowing porosity and different programmatic events. The system is complete only when every single requirement is met.
When you visit Manhattan as a tourist you keep the city in your memory as a series of fragments, bodies, perceptions, sounds, and atmospheres. The position of everything is engraved in your memory; a new psycho-geographic map of the city is born. We have chosen seven fragments of Manhattan, (5th Avenue, Broadway, piers, Financial District, Brooklyn Bridge, and Central Park), that could be thought about as individual cities; autonomous bodies, landscapes, and infrastructures. With the use of manipulating and folding mechanisms we look for overlaps that cause hybrid conditions and programmatic impurities. The result is a tapestry of accidents engineered by our memory. When the defined fragments are folded into loops, a new city (skyscraper) full of intersections and possibilities emerges; a vertical three dimensional network. Instead of a conventional pile of floors, each level and section connect with different programs and situations in the upper and lower areas. In that way, all planes could be connected at least by one trajectory. The pile of folded surfaces would create a complex landscape, where program, circulation, and structure are one. A skyscraper as an intensified vertical landscape emerges.
Peristalsis: The rippling motion of muscles in tubular organs characterized by the alternate contraction and relaxation of the muscles that propel the contents onward. The core of the skyscraper, its structural and circulatory conventions, as a central obstacle to tall building design is well known. Should the elevator, of all things, persist as the non-negotiable limit of our vertical habitats? The limit is vexing, for not only does it determine compositional forms but, more significantly, the arrangement of social practices with regards to both our labor and leisure. Elevators stifle more than facilitate our movement by virtue of their rigid planes and fleeting occupations. That is to say, the vast space which the elevator shaft occupies is, temporally speaking, useless. But suppose we involved ourselves with a different interpretation of that inactive, rigid, and sequestered domain which much of this central shaft represents. It would demand a vital shift, or at least a conceptual reworking, towards an active utilization of such space. By employing a dynamic spatial application against the traditional organization of core and space, we dissolved the dichotomy between circulation and habitable environments. We have eliminated typological stacking where experiences are vapidly suggested to be diversified by simply designating floors to particular social practices. Ideation: Circulation = Space An inhabitable pocket is contained within a flexible element. It is a module that flows in a vertical communicative field with the surrounding members. Their positioning is determined and managed by a responsive signaling system.
Alternatives to vertical circulation strategies within high-risesThe phenomenon of the “high-rise” can be read as a result of either high concentration of population or as a symbol of power and wealth. In any case, if we put structural issues out of the equation it is clear that the key element that enabled the birth of the skyscraper was the invention of the elevator. Therefore, it is ironic that the elevator is precisely what has totally limited the evolution of high-rise buildings in terms of programmatic and formal alternatives. Many attempts have been made to try to escape the ubiquitous tower typology. Yona Friedman’s utopian inhabitable porticoes and interconnected towers, Moshe Safdie’s scattered prisms, and Arata Isozaki’s branching tree-like buildings, are a few of the most radical and original alternatives. Nevertheless, despite their seemingly dissimilar nature, they have one common omnipresent condition, the concentration of the vertical circulation, be it in the form of staircases or mechanical devices. The elevator, because of its capability of movement, is mistakenly perceived as a liberating agent. On closer inspection, its range of movement is totally limited by its encasing. It is particularly interesting to see that this encasing not only holds down the elevator form mutating, but by doing so, also constrains the possibilities of evolution of the building. One other interesting example is the case of Plug-in City by Archigram, where the mechanical device that governs the mega structure is a crane set on a railway. The hovercraft is a transportation device that can negotiate almost any terrain and that is totally independent of the structure. Is this exogenous element a form of “architecture”? That question is irrelevant. The important issue is that a mechanical device for moving people within a building could liberate this building from the constraints imposed by the vertical circulation shaft. My proposition is to separate the vertical circulation from the main structure of the building. To do so, I plan to take the idea of the crane and liberate it form the railway by grouping several cranes into an autonomous free moving device that could roam along the exterior of the building by clinging to appendices scattered on its surface while carrying users or items inside capsules. The agents would work as a system that would be governed by a minimal route algorithm (e.g. ant colony optimization algorithm) to improve every users travel time. Power would be provided to these agents through the appendices on the buildings surface. This type of displacement also has the advantage of providing quick evacuation capabilities from every part of the building.
Sentina is an abandoned and degraded place situated in Italy’s west coast. The space dimension of this almost uncontaminated landscape needs a new construction that takes into consideration history and nature. As it meets the line of the sea, the road bends, transforming into a skyscraper, which is one hundred and fifty meters high. It is an element which, without any mediation between the space and the surrounding nature, establishes a pure and decisive contrast between horizontal and vertical, between nature and artifice, between ancient and modern. The skyscraper contains lodging, services, communal and exhibition spaces, shops, and restaurants.
Contemporary urban scenariosThe contemporary urban landscape, with its overlay of extensive freeway systems and infrastructures for mobility, can be viewed as an expanse of built form and its spatial residuum. These territories of voids are not planned in so much as they are generated by the changing morphology of the urban grid. Rather than resist or ‘correct’ these entropic tendencies that occur in the horizontal plane, the project seeks to embody them in a vertical, architectural scenario. As an urban model, the multi-functional high rise, with its mix of commercial, office, and residential programs, has the potential to dynamically engage in the spatial complexities that characterize the contemporary urban grid. By moving away from the notion of the fixed skyscraper, a functionally stratified structure that compartmentalizes program into predictable discrete zones, the proposal presents a systematic methodology for programmatic hybridization. The development of new program typologies, based on centralized or distributed access, establishes a unifying principle that applies to all programs equally. With their radial organization and focus on pathways, the diagrammatic plans for the different typologies can be recombined and, therefore, allow for the evolutionary development of vertical interconnectivity. Structure and formThe primary structure, a bundling tubular system, consists of three tubes, each with a central core that runs from ground to top. Where the circulation distributes into multiple cores (resulting from the introduction of a distributed typology), two tubes merge and two programs are connected. In these areas of programmatic overlap, voids with different levels of interconnectivity emerge; this interconnectivity depends on the program mix. Where two tubes merge, the third remains independent with one central core (thus, maintaining its centralized typology). In the tower, each tube connects with the other two at one or more points. Because the tubes buttress each other, the floor plates can remain relatively small, despite the building’s height. The secondary structure, a transformative system, is articulated differently throughout the building, according to programmatic demands.
While the first skyscraper projects emerge on the circular Parisian highway, with the aim to densify the agglomeration and preserve the historical center, we propose to set up a network of towers which we call biotopes. The smallest ones are higher than the Eiffel Tower. It’s a “building provocation”, or as the artist Tatiana Trouvé would say, “a paradoxical injunction in which different types of urban organization, although incompatible at the first sight, are superposed”. We propose to change the status of historical city centers by renewing their accommodation capacity and their evolution potential, rather than accelerate the « museification » of them. This always generates the decline of the suburbs, which are considered to be ideal for experimenting new urban forms. By doing so, the old town is serving as an enormous network of roots for the above located mega-systems, which are covering it and radically transforming its perception. It is only from that starting point that one can imagine building similar constructions in the suburbs. Rather than being in favor of the uncontrolled expansion of cities – one of the major reasons for the increase in pollution and energy consumption – we propose to make the old city center denser, by superposing several layers which will multiply the actual capacity by ten. We postulate that the old town with its historical diversity, but also with its transportation networks, its energy consumption, and its exclusive relationship with all forms of life, is an obsolete model for the future evolution and is contributing to today’s environmental situation.
Undeveloped land is scarcely available in Hong Kong, the densest urban area in the world. In the Western, Central and Wan Chai districts, this has historically led to the in-fill of Victoria Harbor and the creation of an artificial shoreline. This continued way of development replaces harbor with hardscape, further compounding the negative ecological consequences of unintelligent waterfront development, namely, added water pollution, increased impervious surface area, and reduced light exposure to the channel bottom. The tower’s primary structural system is conceived of as a lattice of alternating space-frame elements (pods) and planar elements (fins). The primary vertical structure oscillates between the interior and exterior of the tower, changing at moments of movement between spatial zones; the primary lateral structure has two components: the structural sleeve of interconnected pods, dealt primarily with rotational stability, and the crisscrossed lateral ‘braid’, dealt mainly with swaying and overturning. The systems are attenuated to their contextual situation, on the northeastern, harbor-facing side of the tower, the surfaces of the lattice multiply and expand vertically to create larger areas of contiguous facade, sheltering the interior open space from the strong prevailing winds. On the southwestern, urban side, the lattice surfaces pull back from each other, exposing the interior gallery and park system, and opening views between the interior of the tower and the city.
Inspired by the Lego blocks, the strategy of Geno-Matrix is to do as much pre-fabrication as possible, under controlled factory conditions. Within a modular building system, large quantity of cubic units are fabricated and assembled into a lattice system. These units can be “pulled”, “pushed” or “combined” in the lattice grid along the axis and form infinite typological features. The characteristic of the skyscraper heavily relies on these units’ location and the internal logic between them. The skyscraper is formed by the same building “blocks” that takes on an organization imposed by the social, economic, and culture requirements of the site. By changing local relationships of individual units, Geno-Matrix can affect an emotional response, similar to that realized by the culture icon or national symbol, though on a much larger scale. For instance, to reflect the social value, an ordinary “tree” pattern can be generated by moving the units along the normal axis. Organization patterns emerge at varying scale and hierarchy. Since Charles Darwin proposed his theory stating that all species are generated via the process of evolution, and genetic approach is now considered not only powerful enough to solve biological puzzles, but also useful in the simulation of creating algorithms and 3D graphics for higher level of complexity and diversity. Within the evolution hierarchy all individual features are condensed and passed to the next generation. Here, variations can simply take place by changing the crossover rule in hierarchy, or introducing a new genotype into the system. With GE, designers could yield novel, creative design solutions based on the mixture of several existing successful cases.
This tower is a case study of a larger housing proposal situated in East London that serves as an example of adaptive architecture. Based on ecological systems, the team investigates how an urban development can be explored as a simulation model of natural growth that negotiates and adapts to the existing urban fabric. Borrowing rules and functions from the natural world, such as growth and phyllotaxis, the project is an investigation of parametric development adapting to different urban needs.
Thinking about the city in two dimensions means a horizontal spreading of the urban mass, an estrangement of the functions and a loss of social cohesion. The urban scattering creates a waste of energy, space, and resources. The compact urban planning in three dimensions, such as the skyscraper, offers a solution to these problems. The project is located on Saya de Malha’s sandbank. For foundation it has a structural grid of nanotubes in geostationary balance. It allows structural and stiffening elements by a semiautomatic assembly platform. The secondary structure is an endo-skeleton that will allow the organization of islands and public areas. The main materials for construction are taken from the site, essentially sand and calcareous substratum. The city is organized as an organism divided in sectors. The first one is the skeleton which houses the energy production and transportation systems. The second one is a skin that covers the entire city with housing, offices, shops and recreational areas. Every sector is an appendix, autonomous but in constant flux with the rest of the city.
The Ritual Towers are multi-purpose structures, challenging wood architecture to produce an iconic and green project. Designed to aid small towns in poverty, the towers are located in the Pentecost Islands.The design generates power and pumps fresh usable water, at the same time it can be used for the Naghol leaping rituals. The iconic shape comes from the idea of energy in the form of a flame. The design is composed by two towers. The first tower is the wind tower, with turbines that generate energy. The second tower is the water tower and reservoir. The skin is made of twisted vine found on the island, which is the same vine used to jump off of the tower. The vine skin will also eventually grow foliage, which will climb and cover the whole tower. In the end, a design for the land diving Naghol ritual.
The complexities and the dynamism of contemporary life cannot be cast into the simple platonic forms provided by the classical canon, nor does the modern style afford enough means of articulation. We have to deal with social diagrams that are more complex when compared with the social programs of the early modern period. Instead of forcing the program to fill spaces of a static typology, a revision and expansion of the skyscraper is considered. The project “Chimera” challenges typological classification. Chimera is a name borrowed from the hybrid mythological creature made of parts of multiple animals. The hybrid acknowledges and celebrates the heterogeneity and complexity of our world. Chimera is based on the idea of intertwined programmatic elements in a consistent whole. It is a dynamic hybrid that through specific fusions and mutations of commercial and cultural functions and unprecedented new spaces, create a synergy, a new organization whose unity produces a whole greater than the sum of its parts. Genetic SkinProviding completely free plans to accommodate in a flexible manner, the variety of programs, including structure, enclosure, facilities and circulations, became a composite skin. The exoskeleton is generated by an algorithm which grows the skin cells in width and thickening, responding to its content and context. The skin became the input for greater specialization and local differentiation through the transmission of its attributes. Stress intensity acts as feedback for the exoskeleton’s design. The morphological continuity provides structural integrity, and a parametric model allows for the accurate actualization of the exoskeleton geometry. This structural net has two main reactive behaviors derived from the typological hybridization. On the one hand, in the vertical section the load vectors are distributed by splitting the effort thru the diagrid diagram, avoiding “breaking moments” in the skin. On the other hand, the horizontal section of the structural net acts according to the principle of “compression arcs”, which allows hanging the concert hall from the structure, generating a surrounding buffer zone.
The project questions the possibility of coexistence between a high-rise building and a horizontal city. It is placed in a typical Western European city, characterized by high density of historic urban fabric, materialized in the historic Place des Vosges, in Paris, France. Any kind of intervention here seems impossible. Finding a way to integrate the high-rise building into this urban tissue, and at the same time provide it with minimum impact to the surroundings, while giving it maximum surface / program capability, is the main objective. We wanted to avoid the usual way of imagining skyscrapers, the one that imposes its own, strange, and often totalitarian law. The lower parts of the three structures create programmatic and typological links within the existing neighborhood. A series of shops and small public amenities serve as connecting vectors, leading the users into the heights of the building. On the ground every independent structure fuses with its surroundings. On one side, the city climbs on it; benches, pavement, street lights colonize it, following the vertical deformation of the city. On the other, nature takes its share of the newly conquered city space. The neighboring park invades one of the individual structures and leads nature to the very core of the building. A series of cores are developed within the structure each having different functions and typologies of spaces. These cores form independent units within the global building. Each has its own facade, its own rules. The whole is wrapped in a global external skin, which is neither air nor water proof. It is made out of ETFE (ethylene-tetraflouroethylene) panels. They play a double role, unifying this heteroclit environment and producing energy. The large surfaces of ETFE facade protect the inside from the strong winds and at the same time let the air and the rain pass through. Under the facade large surfaces are covered with solar cells. The presence of ETFE improves their capacity of energy production by 20%. The top part of the building contains a field of wind mills, supplying the needed energy for the building.
Along with space tourism and adventurous tourist destinations, the Waterscraper offers an opportunity to experience the world’s most voluminous element – water and its amazing habitat. Built as a skyscraper upside-down, into the sea, the Waterscaper creates a habitable link towards the lower levels of the sea and features a unique hotel with a distinctive combination of recreation and scientific facilities. Half building and half vessel, the Waterscraper’s design and construction is purely driven by the analysis of aquatic forces. The circular setting provides an effective ring structure to withstand the water pressure. The floor plates diminish in size as the water pressure rises in the lower levels. The submerged main body is stabilized by the floating ring which connects via a dampened bridge structures to ensure the vertical position of the Waterscaper at all times. A glazed dome marks the top of the structure and allows light to penetrate deep into the inner atrium, which connects the public and private zones of the hotel facilities. While the hotel’s lobby, restaurant and café are situated in the levels above the sea, the conference facilities and hotel rooms are located below sea level with a view into the vivid underwater world.
Phare Tower is a 300 meter-high new-generation tower at La Défense, on the western rim of Paris, France. The program consists of 140 000 m2 of office space with two restaurants and a rooftop viewing deck for the general public. The concept we are evolving aims at two things. First, express power in a high-rise structure that is a communication device without precedent. Second, introduce poetry by creating a unique building the size of the Eiffel Tower. The surrounding ring accommodates a series of apartments with direct access to the Waterscraper’s beaches. Eight beach platforms are hung between the bridging elements of the structure and are directed towards the centre to form a protected water area within the open sea. Further the ring encloses the Waterscraper’s marina and connects to the main plaza in front of the dome. The space below the plaza is used for the compounds own underwater port and diving center.
Central London is amongst the most expensive locations for land and real estate in the world despite having a 19th Century transportation system at full capacity that puts the city in danger of stagnating and losing its pre-eminent world city status. The long-delayed Cross Rail Project, which will form a rail link between Heathrow, Brentwood, and Shenfield, via the West End and Canary Wharf, will likely begin construction in 2008. It will not be completed until 2015, three years after the London Olympics. The solution to London’s congestion is not underground, but London Overground. More easily and rapidly constructed than the tunnel which Cross Rail proposes from Paddington to the Isle of Dogs, a network of elevated, high speed rail connections, London Overground would be the armature for the construction of a mega-structure overlaying the historic city center. London Overground would be financed by realizing air-rights developments off the structure and would contribute significantly to the solution of London’s housing shortage through “planning gain” on commercial developments and the densification of the city center rather than the construction of a new suburb.
At a time when Mankind understands the need to respect and protect nature, in order to enable the continuation of life, architecture draws its inspiration from nature and attempts to use nature’s energy in the most ecologically friendly manner. A skyscraper cannot be built on a site as a vulgar object, without link with its urban environment; it must grow from the ground. Is there a tree without roots? To live, plants need to be in contact with the ground, so their roots draw water and rock salt necessary for their development. In the same manner, it seems to me that the new skyscraper needs to weave a link between the basement (its foundations), the ground, and the sky. The skyscraper of tomorrow comes to nourish activities of its urban environment and the ability to generate new activities. Thus, the basement shelters serve as shopping centers, or the access to the subway stations, and form a network of cavities which recall galleries of anthills. On the ground floor, the rhythm is slower; one finds areas for relaxation, open to the public as hanging gardens which climb on the members of the new building. As we continue our ascent, we gradually move to more private spaces: the flats. The architecture of the building allows that the efforts of each branch are shared by another branch. When there are compressive forces exerted by the wind, for example, on one part of the building, those are taken again in traction by a structural root. The fact that the roots make contact with the ground ensures the wind-bracing of the unit.
Spacescraper creatively invents a new speculative world structure with advanced NASA technology that expands urbanity into outer space. Innovative photovoltaic elevators, powered by lasers, carbon nanotube fiber structures, and advanced environmental control systems, support an extensive universal cable system that houses societal needs on mass scale. Space for individuals, corporations, and entire cities grow to organize within Spacescraper’s continuous exoskeletal form. Derived through a series of digital scripting explorations initiated alongside study of carbon molecular structures, Spacescraper performs as a habitable biomimetic network tethering the Earth’s atmosphere. In consultation with astro-physicists at Caltech, Spacescraper elaborates Edwards’ vision to propose a complex tethering system that uses lightweight carbon nanotube fibers weaved together with structural truss patterns similar to those formed by porifera (sponges). Pre-tensioning the carbon nanotube tethers against the rotation of the Earth increases cable strength, and by adding a series of smaller tethers held-up in tension to numerous satellites positioned at GEO, Spacescraper’s extraterrestrial infrastructure achieves equilibrium. Suspending a futuristic “City-in-Space”, Spacescraper naturally grows over time from individual satellite cities to encircle the Earth like a gaseous Saturnine ring. Base towers extend into orbit from several locations along the equator to create a vast series of redundant arteries and nodal support systems. Vital transport consists of local elevators with mass transit lines and hubs that run throughout the orbital network connecting multiple metropolises. Within the twisting overlapped spaces of its complex vertical sections, Spacescraper provides for multiplicity as a new exo-urban megalopolis emerges to innervate outer space as prosthesis to our inevitable posthuman condition.
This project focuses on the fact that a skyscraper is capable of becoming a landmark within the context of almost every European city. The project Urban Image is based upon the potential of the skyscraper to become the landmark of a particular area. Every megastructure in Holland is a highly planned act with strictly defined regulations. The extreme lack of space in cities such as Amsterdam doesn’t allow mega-developments, as seen in Asia nowadays, or in the USA through the XX Century. Urban Image consists of two very thin square shaped slabs which accommodate different programs. The square shape provides a legible frame. The image is being generated through the interactions and visible intersections of these two slabs, according to light or darkness, and the different use of the multi-purpose buildings at any given time. It becomes a scene you can peep into. The slab is doubled in order to create more variations, to make the scenographic intention visible and to bring certain enjoyment from the interaction and tension between the slabs. The inner spaces of the thin slabs support the creation of the image through different concentration of mass according to the purpose of each space. There are many different degrees of transparency and concentration of mass within the slabs. The most transparent parts of the building are holes and the others vary in different degrees concentration of mass according to their function. There are two basic types of holes. The first type is being generated by intersections of different programs within the buildings. These holes are collective open spaces for intersected programs. The second type consists of private open-air spaces within sections of the buildings.
The skyscraper as a ‘modernist’ invention was a logical conclusion to the desires of a paleo-capitalist society, as an urban landmass approached its critical point of wealth and density of inhabitants. Imagined as a sign of cultural power and ownership, the skyscraper was typified in its ‘classical heroism’ from its logically consequent tabula rasa condition; as a formulation for a utopian blank slate on which a new building is conceived, free of compromise or complication after the demolition of what previously stood on the site. Any speculation to the order of formulating a ‘new’ condition of the ‘skyscraper’ must encounter this semantic intent and deviate from its historical tendencies. Contemporary speculations on the typology of the skyscraper side-step the essential semantic dimension and instead, merely engage with a technological evolution of its species (intelligent systems, efficient circulation, stronger structure, energy efficiency, environmental consciousness etc.). Although some radical formulations of the mega-structures, such as Archigram, Constant and the Metabolists, as designs of pure infrastructure, attempt a semantic alteration where the content is attached at will, they are still invested in the modernist genealogy by their tabula rasa tendencies. Para-city is imagined as a system of programmatically neutral habitats that situates itself dialectically to the tendencies of the Modernist projects and has the capacity to locate sites and proliferate in the varied and complex geometrical and cultural constructions of the present Metropolis. With ever- increasing densities and changing programs, Para-city grows in the entire three-dimensional space of its host; the existing skyscrapers of the present urban landscape. Para-city feeds on the service-cores of its host, since sufficient service spaces already exist within the host-structure, to potentially free itself as a program-less ludic-zone, implying a radical overcoming of any spatial hierarchy; an architectural assemblage for a nomadic generation, where work and play coincide in nebulous zones of continuously shifting technological and cultural flows. Para city is explicit as a version towards a progressive utopia that seeks ‘play’ between the totalizing form of the city and organicist individualism. The ‘play’ suggested here has its origins in the idea of the ‘event’; “ the moment of erosion, collapse, questioning, or problematization of the very assumptions of the setting within which a drama may take place-occasioning the chance or possibility of another, different setting.” [as described by Foucault and further incorporated into the architectural discourse by Tschumi (Architecture and Disjunction)]. The future of architectural utopia is imagined in the facilitation of such play, implying a constant rupture and its immediate resolution… ad infinitum. An infinite feedback loop of perpetual anguish and its continual absorption.
The past decades have seen the creation of major cities from scratch, at break-neck speed, through the endless proliferation of Skyscrapers. Shanghai, Guangzhou, Dubai, Singapore are mere specimens of such a milieu that is set to perpetuate and grow.The mass production of this ubiquitous and definitive building type, that investors, planners, and government addictively rely on to achieve both market efficiency and the “landmark” effect in any new urban development, clearly exposes the very paralysis and inability of the state to imagine a new city that is not populated by high-rises. However, the insistence of such an ambition consequentially culminates in an inflexible urban plan that hinges on “uncertain” investments, while indefinitely postponing and denying the participation of mid/small-range, often local, businesses from activating the site with more economical building types. The total abdication of control for the laissez faire agglomeration of skyscrapers is no longer the solution. Instead, control should be localized and intensified typologically to give the “city” different types of buildings. To subvert the control of the skyscrapers over the ground plane from its endless proliferation, the strategy is to invert the skyscrapers’ massing through the cultivation of multiple urban plans within the skyscraper type, hence not only releasing the ground plane for the immediate activation of a variety of smaller building types, but also creating multiple “clustered” volumes for increased partnership of public and private establishments. The project resists the formation of a generic empire, a city entirely submitted to the discretions of the corporations, by providing an urban typological framework – The Inverted Skyscraper Typology, is committed to the cultivation of difference, through the coexistence and participation of multiple types and stakeholders.
Articulating the contemporary European city“Although it owes much to its heritage in the American skyscraper, the contemporary “Euroscraper” is in need of a new expression, one that provides distance from the modernist orthodoxy of the 20th Century and is a critical response to the ornate and delirious notions of the 21st Century tall building that now proliferate in cities such as Shanghai, Kuala Lumpur and Beijing. The European urban dilemma is that while rightfully holding onto the notion that cultural difference will continue to prevail throughout the European urban landscape, a new economic imperative must somehow become evident and explicit on the global stage.” Hani Rashid The Void: defining space with spaceThe concept of emptiness as aesthetics, the void as negative space, as positive formal element was borrowed from Isamu Noguchi’s theoretical interests, a growth upward of earth-generated forces. He intended to capture the void, the immaterial by emptying the space of mass. The idea of framing the space or the city is also present in two examples in Paris: Arc de Triomphe and La Defense. Both entities seem to be interacting and framing one another. By designing a looped shape, a dialogue within the building itself, and between the building and nature, is achieved. The project basically filled space with space, rather than piercing it with a needle-like structure. The building was able to look at itself, understand itself, as a unified entity, as a belt, a city within a city; it is a single, unending surface. Weight and mass were replaced by light, time, and space. The formal scheme not only generated a coherent geometry to engage the flow of program and people, but also gave a new interpretation to the concepts of base, shaft, and crown, which are present in every single tall building. Keeping the idea of the base as a more horizontal-oriented element, which actually interacts with the city while forming a natural departure for the shafts, it still anchors the building to the metropolitan fabric. The shaft, which basically ties the earth with the sky, appears bifurcated while redirecting upwards, a configuration that offers variety in floor plate shapes. When the shafts become one, the presence of the crown is addressed in an unusual way; the crown resembles horizontality in the endeavor of gaining more area at the top, which is meant for public spaces. Structural Skin: questioning the central-cored, four-curtain-walled orthogonal schemeUnlike traditional buildings , which use vertical supports, in this design the principal structural elements are central ring-like core and diagonally steel elements that spiral around the outer edge of the project. The aerodynamic form encourages wind to flow around its face, minimizing wind load on the structure and cladding. Natural air movement around the building generates substantial pressure difference across its face, which can be used to facilitate natural ventilation. This first building is not a traditional tower, but a continuous loop of horizontal and vertical sections that establish an urban site rather than a point in the sky.
The Freeway Interchange Tower seeks to reclaim the “throw-away” land often left in the wake of massive highway junctions, typically an abandoned, unattractive space at the center of maze-like crossings. These infrastructure nexus not only serve as transportation nodes, but also act as buffers between differing land conditions, uses, and city environments. In this particular site, the freeway interchange is bordered by low density residential neighborhoods on the south and east sides, a nearby institutional center to the north, and a major drainage canal to the northwest. With such proximity to varying uses and zoning regions, the interchange often becomes the separating barrier. The intent of this proposal is to elevate the status of the interchange from utilitarian infrastructure to one of regional unifier. By sucking up the visual language of southern California’s formidable freeway system and coalescing it into an iconic high-rise, the tower can act as a symbolic ribbon that ties the area together, signifying the crossing points of the cities of Anaheim, Orange and Santa Ana. The mixed-use program of the tower – retail, commercial office and high end hotel near the top – completes the micro-arcology of the area, complementing existing nearby residential and recreational uses. At the same time, the tower reinforces the Southern California automotive culture, celebrating the constant dynamism and technological achievement of its impressive freeway system. In a vision for the future of the these endless sprawl zones so ubiquitous to southern California, Interchange Tower would be the common place connecting and completing the local ecosystems. With the development of “community towers”, destination nodes would be created that enhance local economic stability (retail), relocate and diversify commercial office space, as well as form areas of vertical social density encompassing high end hotels and condominiums. Ironically, the Interchange Tower would serve to reduce the burden of excessive automobile transportation by creating waypoints; however, this intervention would also begin to render the mega interchange (its habitat) obsolete with the reduced need for such infrastructure. In conceiving the idea of the Interchange Tower the parti was developed in which the freeway strata was brought quite literally into the tower, forming a symbiotic relationship between site context and object. As the automobiles are brought into the building, they would circulate up to the parking levels which are followed by retail and observation decks, office space, hotel, and final a sky lounge. In order to create a unified language based on the sweeping lines of the freeway below, the tower’s outer skin is composed of a helical ribbon of aluminum panels which serve two main functions; first and foremost a sound damping system to control the noise inherent of its surroundings, and secondly as a sun shading device which is more sinuous at the lower levels to allow more or less light at the upper levels, where solar shading is necessary.
Skyscrapers started to emerge in cities like Chicago and New York towards the end of 19th Century. Over a century has passed, and the skyscrapers become the norm for the big city centers throughout the world. Although the skyscraper itself is truly an achievement of modern technology and vision, the urban space that is created by the collection of these seems to be fragmented, limited, and very unkind to nature. The project takes place in this urban context, investigating the way to reunite the isolated city blocks and insert a multi-layered network of public space, green space, and nodes for the city. Structure + CoreThe main structure of this facility consists of two components. The first is the core, which acts as a spine for the units to be plugged into, and the second is the interlocking structure which distributes the overall load of the tower to the surface, slab, and the main structure of the existing skyscraper. Wind Turbine UnitThis unit is designed to incorporate four wind turbines which convert the kinetic energy of the wind that flows through the skyscrapers into electrical energy. Vertical-axis wind turbine among the various types of wind turbine is chosen due to its flexibility in locating the generator and the efficiency in utilizing the wind energy from both windward and leeward sides. Vertical Garden UnitThe vertical garden unit is an open structure which provides a habitat for plants, insects, and animals, which also becomes a public park for cities where natural spaces are limited. This unit is combined and multiplied throughout the towers in order to achieve positive effects, such as reducing the urban heat and filter pollutants from the air.
Interaction is the influence of two systems on one another, which can be understood as interchange and interrelation between the two. Transition means the connection from one status to another, or a gradual or sudden transformation between the two parts. Living-Tower is designed as a vertical strategy that situates itself within the most complex urban context- Shanghai, which is considered as the fastest-developing city in the fastest-developing country. Emphasis of this project is given to examining the idea of the interactive transition within and outside a building. The theme, interactive transition, emerges when two systems react to each other. First of all, with a flexible-weaving base, the tower is a self-organizing creature, standing above a sophisticated highway joint, not only creating a new relationship between the architecture and the vehicular circulation, but also saving a huge amount of space within the urban area. Interface between UnitsApartments are defined by their users, and the overall shape of the building is a response to these forces. Bridges are the result of reaction between these tubular units. Transition spaces connect different families, different generations, create the possibility of communication within the neighborhood. Program & GeometryWe obtained the geometrical results thanks to the analysis of the architectural program.. The building is characterized by nodes which provide space for amenities and public recreation.
V-Hive for Vertical Hive – a concept for skyscraper design utilizing the natural organic growth of unitary hexagonal cells, which cluster, grow, and evolve to form honeycomb colonies in a vertical fashion, and applied to the vertical nature of skyscrapers. By creating a lattice structure to which these cells can attach, the organic germinating nature of city growth is reproduced. The clustering of individual cells form sky-pod colonies, which themselves become “neighborhoods” or “buildings”, in a vertical urban environment. Thus the life and energy of the two-dimensional/horizontal urban fabric of the city is continued along on the three-dimensional/vertical axis through the void/core of a transparent and environmentally permeable structure. This allows for the formation of an open-air 360 degree vertical urban corridor. This concept takes skyscraper design from the vacuum of visual icon to the experiential level of the vertical street. The honeycomb is the most efficient geometric structure in terms of using the least amount of material needed to obtain stability. Modular and rigorously structured, yet evolves into an organic whole. Circulation This public transportation system is engineered to transition from underground, to a vertical orientation. This alleviates the need to stop, find parking and/or change into the secondary mode of vertical transportation such as elevators. All other infrastructure is designed to “seamlessly” transition from a horizontal into a vertical system. Community The lattice structure which is open, is transformed to form the “plazas” and ”side streets” where communities can interact as well as provide open-air circulation between the sky-pod colonies. This also brings “to light” the isolated nature of city dwelling in typical buildings, in which individual levels do not interact with one another. By providing the visually apparent nature of an open vertical urban core within the skyscraper, community identity (hive) is reinforced. OptimizationJust as a plant thrives in its own particular niche, different building types will colonize the facets of the V-HIVE according to their needs. Residences, with higher heating needs, face southward, as offices, with demand for even light and lower cooling loads, tend to the North. As a self-sustaining colony, every liability becomes an asset, every waste, reused. The district systems serve to balance any excess that optimal orientation and passive systems cannot.
The government-established program for the new U.S. embassy currently under construction in Baghdad is extraordinarily large, dwarfing any other embassy in the world. This project accepts this dubious program as its starting point, but questions how it and the architecture might change over time. In the first radical gesture, the embassy is configured as a tower, the most iconic, visible, and counterintuitive form for the building. Next, to advance the architectural project and test one possible scenario for the embassy’s decomposition, a hypothetical timeline for U.S. withdrawal based on an optimistic assumption of gradual but continuous improvement is proposed. Finally, as the political, economic, and security situations improve in Iraq, programmatic units of the building are removed, gradually creating an incomplete monument to this challenging period. The U.S. withdrawal is registered by the form of the building.
Live in a tower if you want to! Simply push one button to look beyond the horizon, watch the sun rising, admire your town’s aerial view. See without being seen with a complete view range of 360 degrees. Live the tower without the disadvantages, the price, the fears and dangers. Plugged in the city, the virtual towers are integrated in difficult landscapes and urban fabrics, without constituting a mask for the buildings neighborhood and the roadway systems. Fine and svelte, they are almost imperceptible and do not fear the bad weather. Structurally, the virtual towers make use of the innumerable court yards of buildings as potential supports. These “urban periscopes” drawn up above the obstacles, offer the inhabitants a dominant panoramic sight of their city and their district, a pricey and rare privilege. Heights are variable and adapted to each place, the towers support chains of cameras laid out to sweep 360°. These new eyes of the neighborhoods exist as virtual windows. The townsmen wishing to benefit from it , chose the orientation and the height of their apartment view. Indeed, each one of their windows can be replaced by a LED screen reconstituting the field of view of one of many cameras. These “LED window screens” restore a quasi real and psychologically beneficial luminosity for the individuals. The height of the cameras guaranteed to benefit from the solar luminosity, from dusk until dawn. Moreover, LED are ecological and affordable because they diffuse neither UV nor infra-reds and can be recycled to 98 percent. Their energy consumption is minimal and they have exceptional life-span.
Inspired by the transformative process of rusting and ecological gradients of day lighting, our mixed-use tower twists and modulates from a thin, flaky character to a sharp, solid condition as it rises from Battery Park City, in Lower Manhattan. Facade porosity varies in response to environmental simulations and incident solar calculations, becoming more open on the north face, while more enclosed on other elevations, and distribution of program is informed by interior day lighting levels. The concrete core, composite slab and complex lateral bracing are clad in Corian panels, which have been thoroughly studied for curvature and seaming to delineate and accentuate continuity of flow from floor to wall to window mullions to ceiling. We have developed and deployed innovative digital techniques in an opportunistic fashion for the generation of growth and evaluation of patterns in the emergence of form which is greater than the sum of its parts, yet manifest at every scale from birds-eye to detail. Elegant organizations are highly integrated formal/spatial systems which operate similar to organic systems. Form results from adaptation to performance requirements and the holistic integration of structure, circulation, and skin, imbued with an intelligence of fabrication and assembly. Precise geometry and high-order surface continuity inform the continuous differentiation of our skyscraper.
Paral.lel is the result of the modeling of the skyscraper’s archetype. Several parallelepipeds are transformed following different directions. This design, obtained through three different “formal actions” (stretch, bend, wrap), brings a new perspective to the skyscraper’s usual design; the building is perceived differently from different points in the city. Size and height are not important. What is crucial is the relation between skyscraper’s design and its position in the city (at urban and human scale). The skyscraper interiors are made of wide glass partition with breathtaking views of the urban skyline. The partitions are design with a solid texture of alveolar plot, so that interiors are filled with daylight, whether its a business or residential space. Exterior texture is the same on all sides of the skyscraper. A particular torsion makes every sides bend towards every direction in space. This unique structure makes Paral.lel a creative process that can be applied to any building. Paral.lel is not a simple aesthetic form of urban design.
The “genetic” predispositionThe urban structure of the city of Bucharest was designed without a master plan; since its creation, drifting neighborhoods developing around religious centers have defined its urban characteristics. This continuous migration, as well as the poor “circulatory irrigation”, led to a city predisposed to suffer from massive “urban strokes”, both in terms of functional disposition, as well as in the associated circulatory system. The strokeDuring the last years of the communist regime, Ceausescu tried to impose his utopist, totalitarian vision over Bucharest. His top-bottom approach did not manage to change the urban structure of the city, but merely cause a massive stroke in its continuity. By the significant intervention, that eradicated almost a quarter of the old urban tissue in his attempt to “upgrade” the city, he only created the premises for what was about to be known as urban necrosis. Urban necrosis As it is often the case after a major, near fatal stroke, the urban tissue of Bucharest was severely affected by the urban stroke Ceausescu induced. The necrosis of the “new urbanisim” led to an increasing separation from the rest of the city in terms of public appeal and commercial functions. Urban by-passOur proposal tries to suggest a new type of radical intervention, to rise up to the utopist totalitarian urban dream. We propose a vascular urban system that can revitalize the affected tissue and, without any attempt to hide the scars, provide a new start, a new lifestyle, and a new building approach.
The concept of high density in cities is one that has transformed the modern city. Architecture and technology made the development of towers and skyscrapers just another element of the modern city’s urban fabric, casting large shadows on social life, both literally and metaphorically speaking. The changed urban fabric brought with it a change in urban life. In these cities, crowdedness, pollution, traffic, noise, and crime, have become an everyday experience. The private, single-use, outsized skyscraper brought on a hefty impact on city life. The instinct to climb up to some high place, from which you can look down and survey your world, seems to be a fundamental human instinct. However, while the rest of the urban world lay in the horizontal, the vertical presence in the city became a privilege for a few; a private realm that towered over the urban stage of everyday life. Escape blends the private and public realm into a structure that becomes, in essence, a vertical realization of our horizontal urban fabric. The streetscape is stretched and wrapped around a vertical structure, pumping urban existence and energy into a perpendicular stance. This landmark in the city, becomes a natural part of the topography, which includes a physical climb, giving people the satisfaction of climbing up to a high place from which to look down. Escape takes the idea of high density to a new level. It drives the city into the openness of a high-rise structure with public access and mixed lanes that are continuously in use. Residential, commercial and office use, on the banks of a constant ramp that continues from the city street to reach the top of the structure, gives people the benefits of a human scale interaction within a large scale metropolis. A second street wraps around the structure, at instances, intersecting with the first street. This generates an urban feel that is recognized by the users, and that resembles the successful urban plan of much acclaimed cities. The concept of deterritorialization is new, but new things are certainly not without precedent in our evolution, or we’d have had no evolution. When human beings moved from grunting tribalism to the idea of kingdom & empire the idea was new; when human beings moved from monarchy to democracy the idea was new; and of course the idea of a world without borders and/or governments is new, or fairly new, and inevitable. We are one species. despite the fact we often pretend we are not. Escape is not a building, but our addition to the traditional five elements of urban settings. It is an element that people escape into, where all types of amenities are available (residential, commercial, offices, open public spaces) and fit into an element that creates vertical life with all benefits of the horizontal city. Escape is open to all people, they can enter anytime, as if they were walking on the streets. Since the building structure is formed from two streets going up and intersecting with one another, the circulation within the building becomes easier, mainly by walking or lifts and escalators. It is accessible to all types of people, to enjoy life, and escape the pollution, crowdedness and aggression of the horizontal city.
MILone is the result of a research begun during the Integrated Design Workshop of Prof. Montuori at IUAV (University Institute of Architecture in Venice). It is conceived as an outside-in city, located in the near periphery of Milan, and called to be an attraction point of the area, where green, stone paths, wooden relaxation areas and water basins are projected to foster a symbiotic relationship between the natural and the artificial environments. MILone is to allude to Pirellone, the famous Gio Ponti’s tower, symbol of Milan, in the year of the 80th anniversary of the foundation of Domus, by G. P. himself. MILone is thought to be a “Fuori Salone” area of the Milan’s Expos, where art exhibitions, design expos and collateral events could take place. The final conviction is that the building’s substance should have environmental qualities that create a state of well-being, making use of tools of architecture that translate into space, materials, and colors.
The ‘flyscraper’ is a revolutionary and visionary design proposal for the next generation skyscraper, consisting of flying living units, attached with individual ‘carbon isogrid’ tubes to the ground. In urban areas across the world we see two phenomena: fast growing metropolitan areas, as well as shrinking cities. The ‘flyscraper’ is designed for both: deserted as well as congested urban areas. Moreover the ‘flyscraper’ responds to the existing urban fabric in a very adaptive way, respecting the historical context and heritage landmarks. In addition, the ‘flyscraper’ offers a solution for very dense urban fabrics, making small, irregularly shaped, and usually commercially worthless pieces of land (‘curb property’) accessible and worthy for developments; since only ground for the foundation of the ‘carbon isogrid’ tubes is needed. The ‘carbon isogrid’ material was originally developed for space research. It is a carbon filament wound structure with shape-memory epoxy which is able to deploy or fold when heated to a prescribed temperature. This allows performing in two ways: first as an overall, stand-alone element, responding to natural heating during daytime (ascending) and natural cooling during night time (descending). The living units, which are also equipped with a helium pad, in order to support the rising of the units, can start to rise with the gaining power of the sun, then slowly descend again after sunset. Secondly, the units are individually controlled by each inhabitant, who can direct them via several shape-memory epoxy “hot spots“ on the ‘carbon isogrid’ tube from a PC to any desired position. The ‘isogrid’ tubes are anchored with thee root-like pile-foundations to the ground. In the lower part of the ‘flyscraper’, special nodes, a widening of a tube, are intentionally interwoven with the ‘carbon isogrid’ tubes, so the floating tubes can move elastically and won’t mingle accidentally. Therefore, the lower part of the structure forms a very coarsely meshed tissue, which is still navigable. Small helium pads, incorporated to the ‘carbon isogrid’ tubes, support the rising of the structure. Past the interwoven part of the structure, the tubes can move individually; crashes are avoided by a security system that keeps units at a certain distance from each other. The frame of the living unit is made of lightweight fiberglass laminate, reinforced with additional carbon Kevlar delta stringers. The topcoat is made of sand blasted epoxy resin. Each living unit is equipped with a large living area, which is designed in a boomerang shape so living would work for both positions: the flying position and the static position on the ground. Moreover, a kitchen, bathroom, bedroom and the PC control-station are an integral part of the living unit. For environmental reasons, the heating and cooling energy demand of each unit is minimized through multi layer insulation of the living unit’s outer skin. The rest of the required energy is generated by ultra-light solar modules, DuPont Kapton polyimide films. Those high-tech solar modules are mounted on the skin of the living unit, exploiting the latest technology in order to maximize their self-sufficiency and sustainability.
The premise behind Urban Mountain is a high-rise geometry that can simultaneously accommodate a vertically-arrayed subsidiary ski community program, along with indoor and outdoor skiing amenities. The project was informed by examination of the modern city and the phenomena of urban densification, as well as analysis of varied sets of parameters and emergent behaviors. Indeed, the evolving condition of the urban quality of life and what measures can be taken to enhance it, are relevant to the Urban Ski Mountain. Taking into account the scenario of an intensified cityscape, with increasing stresses on air quality, open space for leisure, and general feelings of well-being, the importance of these commodities are no longer being taken for granted. With aim to develop a structured and controlled technical process, reactive to the evolutionary growth of various city conditions, the examination of biological constructs has provided a certain amount of technical influence for the scheme. Using the premise of performance, and through the study of a biological construct – the Heliconia plant form – a stacking system was derived and evolved in such a way as to react to varied parameters of densification, as well as various typological constraints and requirements. The collaboration of physical efficiency with the typological requirements of a structure for skiing gave a resultant set of optimum parameters. The gradual change in gradient as the structure becomes more vertical was greatly influenced and pre-determined through the investigation of skill level within the sport, as well as other factors of speed, route enjoyment and maximum lengths of runs.
The beginning of the 17th Century was the advent for the first trade routes. It was because of its great geographical position, that New York grew fast. After the Erie Canal was finished in 1825, it opened vast areas of New York to commerce and settlement. It was the wind which carried the first ships to this place and it was the beginning of its financial, cultural, and political development. Sailing ships were able to transfer trade goods via the Atlantic to Manhattan, and about the Hudson River to the vast areas of New York. The early historical background of New York is the main idea of this project. To combine the early seafaring with necessary methods to save energy is an important element. It should be a self-sufficient tower, constructed with light metal. The buildings’ envelope should be able to catch the wind. A symbol of the early history of New York, which represents its energy-conscious future. The Great Lakes, ocean, rivers, and mountains, give New York its characteristic weather. New York has a humid continental climate, resulting from prevailing wind patterns that bring cool air from the interior of the North American continent. Masses of cold, dry air frequently arrive from the northern interior of the continent. Prevailing winds from the South and Southwest transport warm, humid air. A further air mass flows inland from the North Atlantic Ocean and produces cool, cloudy, and damp weather conditions. The “Wind Catcher Tower“ is 560 meters high, and has 125 floors. It could be used for various activities; retail, offices, apartments, and penthouses. Some structural engineers define a high-rise as any vertical construction for which wind is a more significant load factor than weight. This is a good reason to design an aerodynamic skyscraper that is able to absorb the wind power and use it to produce electricity. Built on a rotating platform, the tower is able to move into the right position, where its skin can catch the wind. The stream of wind would be channeled to the top, moving faster through the three wind-generators which are fixed in a vertical position on the last technical floor. The steel floors are attached to the central core, where elevators and emergency staircases are located. A climate control system could also be supported by the wind at the building’s surface. The electricity for the moving platform would be provided by the self-sufficient tower, giving it the ability to move in a soft and slow manner.
Throughout history, mankind has been competing to build higher towers, not only to meet spacial demands, but also to celebrate and display their technological ability. Perhaps, this kind of proud achievement is interpreted as the origin of our desire towards vertical architecture. In this sense, one can say that every vertical structure has its own monumentality. While a historical monumental tower speaks of certain memory or event, a contemporary skyscraper should celebrate its height, functions and achievement of technology. The depiction for monumentality of a skyscraper should be a different concept from the representation of a historical monument. Contemporary skyscrapers tend to express their grandiosity in a monotonous way, as if to mimic a historical monument. This kind of phenomena eventually leads a contemporary skyscraper to be perceived as mere vertical storage, void of historical significance or real technological achievement. This design proposal explores a skyscraper that denies mere representation of vertical emptiness and becomes an attractive feature to the public. In other words, the proposal aims at true monumentality, which appears when true architecture is in operation. The vertical spa facility, located at approximately 200 ft. of height, releases steam from each sauna unit, creating an elegant skin that covers the tower, simulating how humans sweat during physical activity. A sphere sauna shell and its integration with the core, are derived from the shape of pores in the skin. The vertical circulation and the elevator work as the skeleton of the facility. The framed glass is a depiction of covering drapery, as well as pathways for steam evaporation. The facility is located on the river, so the environment creates the mirror image of the tower on the surface of water. The reflection of the tower and steam evaporation neutralize the heavy sense of gravity, as well as the sense of buoyancy. The deck with punctuated holes is filled with spherical ornaments and plants, which create a sense of continuity from the ground level to the top of the tower as if water bubbles floated from the river to the air. With maximum capable operation, the tower becomes a vertical connection between ground and sky.
This is a proposal for a 720m tall skyscraper to be located above the existing Belarussky Train Station in Moscow, Russia. The program consists of a hotel, assembly, retail, cultural spaces, and apartments. These respond to the needs of the site, which serves as a major gateway to Moscow by road and rail. The main road to St. Petersburg runs through the site and is intersected by the main train line to Europe. Built in 1870, Belarussky Train Station is one of Moscow’s most important historical structures. It was celebrated throughout its history and earned the moniker ‘victory station’ for its role in shuttling Soviet troops to the German front during WWII, and for receiving the first trainloads of soldiers returning victorious after the war. The process of designing a skyscraper for this site faced two problems above and beyond the issues typically confronted by skyscrapers, built above complex interchanges of roads, rails, and subways. Firstly, the building needed to address multiple urban contexts which varied drastically in their history, form, and program. Secondly, the design needed to confront the environmental difficulties of building in Moscow’s harsh climate. The solution proposes to de-laminate the performative layers necessary for skyscraper construction (structure, weatherized enclosure, solar control, circulation, and mechanical systems), in order to solve these divergent problems. The de-laminated layers are programmed with technical functions and then interwoven amongst each other. Most spatial conditions are defined as the spaces between (and serviced by) these layers, but at key juncture points (programmatically and structurally) the layers interweave forming more complex spaces. Urbanistically, the de-laminated layers ‘interiorize’ the existing urban context within multiple levels of spatial enclosure. As the building approaches the ground, it splits to form a literal gateway over the city’s main street. At the same time, several of the layers pass over Belarussky Station to form a glass canopy above the tracks, while also helping to preserve the existing building. Other layers pass over the existing ‘object building’ modern context elsewhere in the site, turning the otherwise useless expanses of open space between those buildings into partially weatherized, and thus usable, public space. Ecologically, the de-laminated layers allow for the ‘interiorization’ of multiple climactic zones. Each of the layers traps a zone of passively conditioned air. Each progressive layer of air insulates the layers within, meaning each layer takes progressively less energy to heat or cool. During the winter, the outer layers function as greenhouses, heating the inner ones. During the summer, the heat generated by the outer layers generates a stack effect – the rapidly rising air aids in passive ventilation and cooling. As a result, the building responds sectionally to its climate. During times of extreme cold and heat, the inhabitants of the skyscraper can withdraw into the inner layers, while at other times they can freely use the interstitial spaces between the layers. For special needs, each hotel or apartment occupant can choose, as required, to expend the extra energy needed to condition their share of the interstitial spaces, meaning that their domesticated space can ‘expand’ or ‘contract’ as they need as well.
Our project is based in Jurong East, Singapore. The site benefits from its adjacency to a mass transit line station and beautiful natural lake amenity. It is located between a Chinese garden and a heavy industrial district with large residential developments. Unfortunately, these residential developments do not take full advantage of sustainable building opportunities that are inherent in this region. Cultural richness and diversity in use, sustainability, and innovation particular to climatic influences in the region were primary drivers for our concept development. Our intent is to blend site specific sustainable strategies with a new interpretation of high rise design, derived from the juxtaposition of the vibrant complexity found in the traditional Malay village and the streamlined efficiency of modern Singapore. We sought clues from nature that could be utilized to develop a sustainable approach that would provide a stark contrast to the existing architectural landscape. The heavy use of gardens, both in the landscape and in the towers, provides a point of cultural departure in a sea of relentless housing blocks adjacent to our site. An interesting fact about Singapore is that amidst constant deluges, Singapore has to buy its fresh water from Malaysia, due to a lack of adequate reservoirs. Water conservation thus became a primary initiative in concept development. In formulating a response to this challenge, we gained inspiration from the Wah Kim orchid, the national flower that pulls water directly from the air. There is inherent beauty in its form, and efficiency in the manner by which the orchid draws sustenance from its environment. This flower became a wonderful source of inspiration in developing a sustainable strategy for our mixed-use hotel and residential towers. The organic form of our buildings jumps out into the air to catch falling rain water. With this as our starting point, the sustainable strategy for the towers became locally referential and provided for an environmentally inspired cooling and ventilation approach. The tower placements capitalize on the prevailing north winds to provide through ventilation in the buildings. The roofs of the modular pod units oriented to the north and south for the residences utilize a water-reclamation system to capture rainwater, purify it, and use it for cooling and gray water use. Energy for the system is generated by the building integrated photovoltaic cells in the double skin glass façade on the west face of the towers, where the majority of the solar radiation in Singapore occurs throughout the year. Most of the modular residential pods have a green roof to assist with cooling and terraces for the residents’ use. The configuration of the pods for the north and south facades create dynamic exterior and interior sky gardens, capitalizing on climatic influences. The resulting undulations and overhangs formed by the placement of the units provide shade for the south facades. The units also peek out around the side skins to catch glimpses of an adjacent Chinese garden, lake, and newly created public area at the base of the towers. Connections to the community and site are established immediately upon arrival at various levels. The new public park and arrival plaza connect the hotel and residential towers to the community via natural landscape, orchid gardens, and undulating green roof areas, which conceal parking below.
Huasco City is a port in the north of Chile. The city is a place of important agricultural development thanks to the Huasco River, but in the last decade the water flux decreased, which will probably lead to agriculture disappearance in the near future. A new strategy is required to obtain water from the Atacama Desert. In this place there is a climatic phenomenon called Camanchaca, dense coastal fog that has dynamic characteristic: condensation at great heights that is carried towards coastal zones by strong wind currents. Its origin is in the anticyclone of the Pacific Ocean that produces a layer of stratocumulus, covering the coastal strip from Peru to northern Chile. The base of the cloud is at 400 meters (with a variation of 200 meters) above sea level. The second layer contains minerals from the sea, in lower concentration than sea water. The idea is to build towers that collect water from these clouds and provide it to new agricultural land along the coast. The towers are 400 meters-high, and designed to catch water particles in the air that come from the coast to the Valley of the Huasco River. The anticipated performance, ranges from two to ten liters per square meter of vertical surface. Each tower has 10,000 square meters of vertical surface, producing a minimum of 20,000 liters per day, and an impressive maximum of 100,000 liters. There will be enough water to start agriculture in this arid coastal region. The tower is composed of four components with specific functions: The tower is composed of four components with specific functions: 1. Four sides of high density plastic meshes that serve as water collectors. 2. Four sides of low density meshes (copper) that link the spiral arms. 3. Four spiral arms that serve as structure and transport the collected water into the main cistern. 4. A main cistern located in the base and divided in three parts: a water accumulator in the upper face, a multi-composite filter membrane in the middle, and a circulatory system that distributes the purified water.
The skyscraper has paradoxically enjoyed a renaissance since the terrorist attacks of 9/11, which brought world attention to the tragedy while raising multiple questions about its future. The boom in the Middle East has focused purely on new aesthetics and a lavish display of economic wealth. In contrast, Vertical Ecology Redux is a project that brings a new level of per formative organization into the design equation; it is fully integrated into the urban fabric and existing infrastructure. Vertical Ecology Redux is located on the waterfront of Hong Kong. The ground level is a continuous path that fuses the tower to the port and offers a series of cultural amenities. The tower emerges as three distinct geometries that merge into a structure with housing and commercial space. The façade is a hybrid structural system of pleats, seams, subdivisions, lacing, and cells.
A closed loop metabolic systemA completely closed metabolic cycle in which traffic exhaust emissions are harnessed via CO2 collectors in order to feed algae grown in photo bio-reactors within the building’s facade. Algae and natural by-products produced during algae cultivation are then refined to produce renewable energy sources. Towering 1.2 km above Spaghetti Junction, Birmingham, the UK’s largest and most congested motorway intersection, the scheme portrays a radical concept in high rise, high density urban living. Benefitting from positive solar orientation, in order to maximize solar acceptance toward the dynamic photo bioreactors which are built into the facade, BIOCITY acts as a an environmental filter, harnessing harmful traffic exhaust emissions in order to feed and cultivate microscopic algae to produce renewable bio-fuels. These bio-fuels are used to produce renewable electricity to power the vertical city and to cultivate vehicular bio-diesel and liquid hydrogen for use in hydrogen fuel cells.
During the 1960’s the city of Dallas possessed a vibrant urban culture, stimulated by round-the-clock living, working, and playing. A few years later, an aggressive interstate construction and a new desire for the suburban dream, transformed the city into a commuter business hub that closes at five o’clock. The Land Scraper is a horizontal skyscraper, rescaling human experience, trying to reconnect the once thriving urban life. Spanning over 1500 feet and five city blocks, the building slithers through three main districts: The Performing Arts District, the Financial District, and Deep Ellum. The project seeks a balance within its neighborhood, encouraging a pedestrian and public experience throughout the day and night. It eliminates the single-core vertical circulation and responds to the dense urban sprawl.
The cities of the twenty-first century embody extreme qualities of communication and complexity of interaction. In response to the new urban demands the Algorithmic tower employs a code-based scripting methodology that configures higher orders of complexity required by a new kind of aggregation logic. It is coded with specific rules for growth and subdivision that articulate spatial organizations with a mathematical approach. The Algorithmic tower is formed by cells that are divided into three distinct continuous non-intersecting volumes that allow interplay between indoor and outdoor spaces. These interacting spaces maintain their character, while adapting to growth, and gradually transform into a series of vertical aggregates. The skin wraps and changes its shape, porosity and character in response to the indoor spaces which vary in dimensions, according to the proposed parametric growth. The cells grow vertically and spirally, creating curved modules that are locally controlled with a set of rules for program, density, orientation, and expected growth.
Nature of Nature is a proposed skyscraper near Machu Picchu, Peru that will be used for different cultural activities and as temporal residence for visitors to the archeological site. The skyscrapers will be attached to the mountains by a series of anchors or ‘morphological extensions’ that collect and distribute energy from the jungle. It is designed as a structural mesh for programmatic cells of different sizes for public and private spaces. Its façade is conceived as a flexible membrane that allows different micro-climates and collects water from the constant fog and energy from the sun. The grouping of various cell clusters will create residual spaces for cultural and recreational activities.
Skyscape is a possible solution to the most polluted cities around the world. It is a system of thousands of air cleaning cells that float above the urban areas as an orchestrated particle filter. Every ten days the cells regroup for maintenance in a landing base outside the cities creating beautiful skyscrapers. Its surface is made of high efficient filters that collect pollutants and constantly produce fresh-clean air. The cells are radio controlled with different patterns of organization depending on the environment.
By working within the constraints set forth by an economically driven market the complex finds a way to use design to create a more vibrant living environment while maintaining financial viability.  Typical Hong Kong residential developments exist as a series of eight towers set atop an amenity filled podium. The addition of overall height and the expansion of floorplates to include nine living units allow this project to condense the same number of units and a similar percentage of amenity space into five towers. Subsequently, space is freed around the base of the towers for agriculture and recreation while also creating a buffer between Niu Shu and neighboring high-rises. The primary architectural design stems from a double skin system that is employed to create an intermediary space for hydroponic farming. The exterior structural skin affords large clear spaces to engulf the residential units in greenery. Each residence becomes a part of a small community within a tower that is identifiable by the crop that they produce. The crops are further coordinated by color to give each tower a distinguishable identity. Various community types are differentiated by the height of the agricultural atrium which they are part of. Through the creation of these communities the typical hierarchical arrangement of income levels is altered. The top level of a tower may longer draw the highest price or afford the most interesting opportunities, but rather the potential to access a certain communal garden midway up the tower may cause one community to be more desirable than the next.
In 2007 over half of the world’s population had moved to a city. This shift from rural areas to cities poses a multifaceted problem for the urban context. The Alchemorphis tower unites these disparate worlds in a synergistic response to the environment, local community, and greater city. New York City metro area ranks amongst the most populous urban centers in the world, with its average citizen using nearly 100 gallons of water daily. Much of this water is merely gray water which is processed with wastewater and eventually pumped into the bordering rivers as cleansed effluent. Utilizing its own influent from the Hudson River and neighborhood gray water supply, the alchemical tower recycles this discarded resource into valuable commodities for city use.
The Metropolitan Veil 2019 is a sustainable skyscraper designed for a business area in Seoul. It is an investigation on urban memories and their interconnection in a single place. Thus, new programs emerge from the mix of economic, cultural, and environmental conditions. Prefabricated slab units are stacked on top of each other to create frames that allow different programs. These frames also work as structural elements connected to the vertical cores. Sunlight is controlled by a series of layers that constitute the exterior envelope with photovoltaic cells on the southern façade. On the other hand, wind turbines are located on the big openings of the façade.
Traditionally, high-rise buildings are predicated by maximum economic return and are thus associated with commercial endeavors and opulence. This project recasts the initial ambition for vertical expansion. It envisages a rapidly deployable building that will provide centrally located resources in disaster situations. Instant High-rise builds upon the visionary concepts of Buckminster Fuller by continuing his research into lightweight ‘synergetic’ structures and geometries. The tensegrity principle is explored for its potential to provide a feasible structural system that enables the deployment of an instant skyscraper in areas struck by disaster. We envision Instant High-rise projects to be long-term structures that can adapt to their rapidly changing context. Once they have met their immediate infrastructural goals, they can be appropriated to suit sociopolitical objectives and can ultimately help to reshape the emerging local identity.
The main focus of this investigation is to rethink the ‘skin’ of the skyscraper to generate renewable energies through the use of new materials and technologies. Our idea is to design a new generation of towers with carbon shafts attached to the glazing that capture the wind and generate sufficient energy for the entire building. These shafts are flexible and oscillate with the wind and protect the interior from direct sunlight, reducing the greenhouse effect.
Urban Nebulizer is a type of skyscraper designed for the most polluted cities worldwide. The geometry of the tower is a continuous spiral with program ‘trays’. It has a central hollowed core where smog is cleaned by a series of filtering membranes that use water and vegetation. It is a vertical garden that could be located in the center of any city.
Creating a New Green Layer of Urban Life for TokyoResearch has shown that strenuous physical activity in polluted cities increases our chance of breathing harmful particles. Sky-Terra is a new level of plazas for Tokyo. They are elevated 1,600 feet above ground and are formed by the roofs of individual skyscrapers joined together to structurally support each other- allowing for smaller footprints. Each building is a module able to be reconfigured in a variety of spatial patterns that could be implemented in any metropolis worldwide. Sky-Terra bridges over the existing high-density conglomeration of Tokyo. The transportation system in the ‘plazas’ is designed for pedestrians, electric cars, and bicycles. Everyone will enjoy clean air in this virtually endless park in the sky. The green roofs recollect rainwater for landscape irrigation.
This project examines a possible solution to the multiple environmental problems we might have in the year 2050. If we continue with the same year to year increment in air pollutants it will no longer be safe to breathe in the outdoors without a filtering device. Neo Arc is the solution proposed by a group of architects, engineers, scientists, and developers that are studying how to integrate the latest green technologies in major residential and commercial developments. Neo Arc is equipped with solar panels and filtering systems for air and water. Its high-per formative green façade is covered with vegetation that filters rain water and releases oxygen into the atmosphere. Neo Arc is a continuous surface that is shaped as an artificial landscape that provides shelter to plants and people. Its enormous water reservoir produces oxygen and sufficient energy for the entire structure, including its own transportation system. Its façade is designed as a set of triangles that respond to the program and environment. Its program includes residential and commercial spaces, transportation system, water reservoir, sky pool, sports arena, and public parks.
Michel Etienne Turgot, Borough President of the City of Paris in 1734, commissioned to the drafter Louis Bretez the most beautiful and accurate representation of Paris in the ‘Ancien Régime’. Neo Arc is a continuous surface that is shaped as an artificial landscape that provides shelter to plants and people. Its enormous water reservoir produces oxygen and sufficient energy for the entire structure, including its own transportation system. Its façade is designed as a set of triangles that respond to the program and environment. Its program includes residential and commercial spaces, transportation system, water reservoir, sky pool, sports arena, and public parks. The center of Paris is deeply characterized by the extraordinary presence of the Seine River, touching the historic monuments such as the Louvre, the Eiffel Tower and the Grande Palais. These are all landmarks that provide orientation in the city, as authentic milestones.
In the Hudson Yard area of Manhattan, this urban high rise farm introduces inherently political opposing elements; farmers (producers) and New Yorkers (consumers) through farms, workers housing, and market places. Through the mixing of politically opposing classes, social and cultural confrontations are generated within a high rise typology by introducing producers of biomass into the city, a place of historic biomass consumption. In so doing, the high rise is re-defined not by efficiency, but rather through the use of surfaces to orchestrate the dynamic programmatic interactions and the multiplicity of spatial organization they suppose. The essence of these social/political programmatic relationships is unclear. The spaces they create are lived not represented or conceived. One can only speculate on the range of lived relationships and oppositions that might form within and around this urban farm. Through food production and consumption, this skyscraper sets up a fluctuation of varying densities and collections of people, bringing together different social and cultural groups, creating new and unforeseen urban experiences that form and dissipate within the flux of city life. By defining programs, this tower does not seek to control and manipulate interaction between politically dynamic groups of farmers and consumers, but rather give a place for the acting out of a multiplicity of outcomes. Program is merely a given caricature not a dictated function. The interior surfaces do not prescribe function but merely hint at their potential. It is up to the everyday users to define the outcome of the space they inhabit given the environment they inherit. In this urban high rise farm, the romanticizing of modern food production or utopian garden city additions is rejected. Rather, if farming is truly able to provide adequately for a city, a dystopian stage of agricultural production which uses mans control over the growth process, must be accepted. This project accepts genetic engineering, airponic watering and nutrient technologies (a method of spraying plant roots with needed solutions), and controlled lighting and CO2 levels (to maximize plant growth and food production). The tower takes into consideration the different stages of plant production; cloning, vegetative stage and flowering stage to maximize food production as much as possible. In addition it is assumed that genetically engineered plants will be bred to maximize both the nutritional value and production of the crops within the tower. Genetic engineering is controversial but necessary if the tower is to accommodate Manhattan’s food production needs. It is projected that multiple towers will be needed to meet the city´s food production needs. Accordingly a new type of city dweller is created, the nomadic worker, who moves throughout the city tending to its food production needs and resisting and reversing the suburbanization of Manhattan.
Some of the inspirations for this project are the classical Chinese landscape paintings of the Lijiang River, the natural environment, and the culture and traditions of the local ethnic groups. The main idea is to create sustainable towers for people seeking solitude and meditation. Among the different programs there are agricultural fields, terraces for meditation, housing, and recreational parks. The towers are carefully designed to be integrated to the landscape and to provide a proper place to live and work for the different groups along the Lijiang River. It was designed with the use of three dimensional voronoi patterns that follow the configuration logic of the immediate landscape.
The Sky Table is a large horizontal building suspended above six blocks of an abandoned neighborhood of a generic city. Its primary structure is a steel mesh that peels into four colossal columns that connect to plazas and parks at street level. Due to its large scale and the variety of programs this proposal could be considered a city within a city where offices are located inside the pillars, housing is available in ten levels within the platform and recreational areas cover the entire roof level. Many green technologies are integrated; a recycle plant and gas tank is located underground below the main columns. Solar panels are located on the roof level along with wind turbines which are also used below the steel mesh where the aerodynamic shape of the building will direct fast air currents.
One of the most discussed topics in Italian politics is the construction of a bridge over the Strait of Messina which will link Sicily to the main land. The shorter distance between the cities of Messina  and Reggio Calabria is 3,150 meters and the average sea depth is between 80 and 120 meters. In 1968 the Italian Road and Motorway Network held a competition to design this bridge and the winning project “Future Metropolis of the Strait” by Alberto and Giuseppe Samoná considered both areas a single entity and proposed one city on both shores. The main idea of our project is to further develop their concept and design this bridge as a skyscraper and a place to live. The building is configured as a modular three-dimensional grid that rises from a hollow platform below the sea level. The volumes are articulated according to different functions such as residences, public spaces, and cultural and entertainment areas.
Vertical Confluence is a contemporary skyscraper that integrates to Paris’s historical urban fabric. The volume morphs according to its program and relationship with the existing urban spaces and landscape. The lower volume contains an auditorium and an open-air theatre facing the Seine River. In the middle there is a public library with views toward Paris’s biggest green space known as “The Bois de Vincennes”. In the upper levels, facing the city’s skyline, there is a museum, a restaurant, and a café.
Cities like Dubai and Seoul are developing hundreds of extravagant skyscrapers as way to express their economic prosperity and geopolitical power. Architecture has been transformed into a marketing tool for individuals, corporations, and countries in which, unfortunately, there is a lack of responsibility towards the existing urban fabric and the environment. This proposal departs from formalism and focuses on the interaction between programs and the transformation of the building volume according to its relationship with the inhabitants, the city, and the landscape. The structure consists of three main building blocks for housing, offices, and gardens. There is a set of rules to plug each block and optimize the space while creating a novel program distribution. The result is a porous tower with gardens and terraces distributed throughout the entire building. An environmentaly responsible cladding is equipped with photovoltaic panels and manual windows.
During the last couple of decades, Paris, like any other major city has exponentially grown. Nowadays it requires 70,000 new homes per year; a situation that has created a lot of controversy as urban planners propose skyscrapers and Parisians drastically refuse to change their beloved city. Paris is a city of low buildings that recognizes street life and human scale as one of its most important aspects. The few skyscrapers located in La Defénse have been criticized and almost no one believes that skyscrapers could be the solution to their housing problem. This project proposes a possible solution by creating a city-like skyscraper that takes Paris’s street life to the sky. The volume of the entire building is fragmented by a spatial ribbon that begins at street level and moves upward to create community areas, restaurants, auditoriums, parks, and cultural spaces.
Beyond Manhattanism The New York design and development community arguably has been the leading international nexus for innovation in skyscraper design over the past 150 years. Roughly every other generation, in interaction with changing technology, design theory and zoning codes, it has innovated a new building type. We leverage existing NYC zoning, and rearrange the traditional elements of the city to produce a new skyscraper: the Elevated Street and Plaza Skyscraper. Call and Response CyclesInnovation in skyscrapper design proceeds through a call and response dialogue between zoning and building type. First, an existing building type is called into question by technological change, or health and safety concerns. As part of the public discourse around these issues, architects begin to reform the existing building type, eventually developing a new “better” building type. This discourse (including design experenentation) leads to the revision of building and zoning regulations. 
The ubiquity of the high density residential podium city typology throughout Hong Kong has made it one of the densest cities in the world.  The typical podium city consists of a huge mega-block shopping mall (in plinth form) with 8 to 16 high-rise residential towers sitting on top.  Upscale podium cities have resort like amenities on the surface of the plinth such as spas, tennis courts, and giant swimming pools.   These amenities, while a primary selling point, are in fact rarely used by the residents, particularly in comparison to public amenities located in the rest of the city.  The overwhelming genericness of the actual residential units themselves has caused developers to advertise the buildings as a chic lifestyle choice rather than focus on the details of the actual living space.  The podium cities’ relentless high density efficiency has destroyed street life in the areas where they are located and eat up huge amounts of potential public space with their underutilized private amenities. The intent of Double Stuffed: Scale vs. Size is to redesign the podium city in order to maximize the use of space for both the residents and greater public.  For the lower level, the design breaks up the shared amenities typical of the tower / podium typology and distributes them directly to each residential unit.  This privatizes the shared amenities, giving each unit (and resident) its own exterior space, something lacking from existing residential types.  This fosters more activity in the notoriously underutilized podium city amenities and generates a shared spectacle out of its atomization and distribution.  The upper level of Double Stuffed distributed the amenities in a different way by dividing up the shopping spaces and attaching them directly to the upper residential units.  This is based off the common Hong Kong typology of the home/storefront with a prime example found in the Chung King Mansions.  These two types were assembled into ‘landscapes’ that interact with each other across a central void.  Public program towers pierce these ‘landscapes’ to connect the roof and shopping space to the public street level.  The roof reclaims the privatized lot the project sits on as a massive open space (an increasingly scarce commodity in Hong Kong), which is available for various large-area public programs, such as fairs, races, concerts and demonstrations.
Does a skyscraper have a soul? If it does than this is a soul given by humans. Taking away a material shell from a skyscraper we provide it with a possibility of transformation so it can get closer to a Plato’s idea of a skyscraper (At this point we need to insert a smiley). Still, seriously enough we do move from a totem to a pure spirit that keeps skies untouched and pure no matter how sexually unappealing it sounds. Though having had said that we have told only half of the story. The second half of the story is connected with a crispy fresh history of Saint-Petersburg, where a fight with the Okhta Centre skyscraper that ruins the historical cities’ skyline has become a real and unique example of citizenship and a symbol of human spirit prevailing over the power of money. We want a different “non-material” skyscraper to emerge every night on the spot of the Okhta Centre tower.
Technocratic society of the 21st century establishes its own laws and rules for almost all spheres of life. Not an exclusion is its influence on architecture, especially in question of design of the most large-scale, significant and expensive projects, which are the skyscrapers. The look of these buildings is dictated by the latest technologies and achievements in materials science, implementation of the cutting-edge construction, energy saving, aerodynamic and ecological solutions. Often the shape of skyscrapers is conditional not on architect’s creative approach but on a calculation of optimal solution by technical software. The final result of building look depends on one specific team of designers and their preferences in style. It’s also worth mentioning that we can always see the result of the project before starting the construction, and after it’s over the building inevitably retains its invariable shape. Like each room is dead without people, similarly the skyscrapers, hiding their inner rooms behind the single facade, look lifeless. In this work we want to present a skyscraper project on the example of Odessa city, Ukraine. It develops in time taking arbitrary shape. Its look will be influenced by numerous people willing to live in this house. Depending on preferences and needs of each person a separate living environment, including the house and the yard, will be formed. The building starts developing and taking shape as it is populated on different height. It invokes association with a vertical street where people may buy a plot and build their own house and are not limited by the skyscraper’s construction. Like houses along the city street are built different, similarly will be formed the look of future skyscraper. A great number of architects, designers and landscape architects will have an opportunity to participate in erection of this skyscraper. The tenants may choose the look, planning, style, characteristics of their house. The bounds of the ground on each separate level will be formed in such way that will prevent their interference. This will give a general skyscraper look complex and unpredicted shape. The uniqueness of building’s volume will contain in that, like a coral lying on the ocean’s bottom and accumulating mollusks, it will be filling itself with life. This will form natural and inimitable environment.
Capture the Rain Skyscraper is a building whose roof and external shell ,which consists systems of gutters, are aimed at capturing as much rainfall as possible to meet the daily needs of its inhabitants. Average daily consumption of water per person is 150 liters, out of which 85 liters may be replaced by rain water. Within the last thirty years water consumption has significantly increased. There are lots of factors that contribute to such an increase such as increasing number washing machines and dish washers, increasing popularity of garden showering devices and flushing toilets. A third of water being used in households in western countries is flushed in toilets. Since 1900 the total water consumption in the US has increased by 1000%. At present, an average American uses five times more water that a citizen of developing countries. Such an increase is related to among others improved living standards. On the other hand, a national hobby of the Danes is collecting rain water for washing and watering plants. Within the last ten years average use of pure water in Denmark dropped by 40% and inhabitants of the so called eco-villages use a third part of the national average. In view of these data, we decided to design a tower, whose structure will allow for capturing and processing as much rainfall as possible to provide with water for its inhabitants.
Valdrade brings a new definition of a city dense space, based on 3 interdependent vectors: density, sustainability and diversity. We must consider the city as a true ecosystem, able to manage its self-sufficiency and its self-generation.Valdrade expands as an “upper city” above the existing “lower city” to enable a zero ground occupation and to compensate the deficiencies. The lower city consumes whereas the upper city produces by the plug-in of self-sufficiency generators. So the entirety of the infrastructures, necessary to the city life, is replaced in the urban network. These infrastructures are currently off shored in suburban areas, participating to the urban sprawl and energetic expenditures. These plug-in create positive energy poles to compensate the current buildings over-consumption. They provide different ways of recycling, so that the whole cycle can slide back, in such a way that someone’s wastes become some other’s raw materials and sources of energy.The self-sufficiency generators propose a photovoltaic skin and wind turbines for the electricity production, lagooning for the waste water purification and recycling area for the organic and paper waste recycling and production of recycled paper, compost and gas by methanization.
In 2008, for the first time in history, more than half of the world’s population is living in cities than rural areas, that’s 6.6 billion of us. By 2050, this figure is expected to surge up to 9 billion. This had led to rapid urbanization in cities all over the world over the past several decades. However the form and spatial organization of skyscrapers (or vertical-strategy) have been  majorly dominated by the structural and cost efficient of extrusion of floor plates and the definition of space by planes- floor plates, walls and ceilings. This striated spatial definition and its arrangements had forfeited the future adaptability of skyscraper space for ever-changing needs and users group.
The advance of technology and science continues to redefine our lives with exciting and mesmerizing results. However, the rushing growth we have witnessed over the past century has left us with a global ecosystem struggling to survive. Increasing levels of pollution and rapidly expanding urban borders are eating up vital agricultural lands and forests – placing the world’s ecosystems under enormous strain. This is a proposal for an archetype that aims to help restore the harmony of human existence on Earth. Now more than ever humanity must learn to live in balance with our natural world before we do more irreparable damage. This goes beyond building smarter and more efficient buildings. It will touch how we structure our lives and how we organize our cities. The site of this proposal is located on the dense urban waterfront of Rio de Janeiro and is to be completed in time for the 2016 Olympics. With a worldwide spotlight held on Rio, it is a perfect opportunity to draw  attention to innovations in sustainable architecture.
Throughout history, through his need for civilization, man has created buildings that consume resources. The skyscraper is the epitome of this voracious consumption, its highly dense grouping of activities ie work, play, rest etc has become an ominous harbingers of our ecologically bleak future. As a reaction to the modern skyscrapers and its dilemmas the world’s eminent minds have created many variations of the skyscraper in the form of the antithetical subscrapers, groundscrapers and even depth scraper. Yet still they still struggle to achieve zero input/zero output in terms of resource production. There are greenscrappers which , though themselves are ecologically sound, are tied to and urban fabric and interconnection of production networks which are still contributing negatively towards the environment. The hO2+ scraper proposes to break free of the urban fabric and functions as self-sufficient ambassadors in the sea. The hO2+ scraper is an autonomous floating unit of livable, functional and self sustaining space which will function, in a collective manner, as a floating city.  It is self sufficient as it generates its own power through wave, wind, current, solar, bio etc. and it generates its own food through farming, aquaculture, hydroponics etc. It carries with its own small forest on top its back and supports places for users to live and works  in its depths. Its bioluminescent tentacles provide sea fauna a place to live and congregate while collecting energy through its kinetic movements. Such sustainability strategies aim to ultimately create and provide an oasis with ‘Zero’ negative impacts to the environment, not only that but also improves on it hence the ’Plus’. Aptly as poetic antithesis to a skyscraper which goes up into the heavens the hO2+ scraper goes down to the depths of the sea.
Tower | city | towers is a city-towers project designed to give back to a land its natural dimension taking into account the constraints of the current city. Although it is conceivable on different kinds of lands, Tower | city | towers is here experienced in the city of Marseilles, second largest city of France located in the south-east. Port city of 240 km2, Marseilles and its suburbs constitute a metropolis of 1,600,000 inhabitants and has a current density of 3,500/ km2. The city has spread little by little by conquering the surrounding natural lands, the housing has scattered, becoming denser and denser, thus creating a disorganized, ultra-urban and totally artificial urban sprawl. The Tower | city | towers project offers the opportunity to rethink all the functionalities, needs and demands of the city, especially in terms of population density and everything it involves (leisure activities, work, housing, transportation, etc.), thus allowing the nature to take back its original place.
The goal of this project was to design a sustainable building that differentiates from current assembly of ecological developments. This is achieved with combining sustainable systems and other parameters within design process, therefore forming the building into harmonious and controlled complexity of geometry and space. The Trombe Wall system, Chimney and Wind tunnel effects are all traditional components here used in innovative way to generate exciting points on every level of the project. The data of domestic environmental elements such as Wind and Sun are combined with functional organization of a building into a set of parameters that generate a modeling condition for a new “zero+ energy” high-rise typology. The result is a vertical, voluptuous façade pattern on the city horizon with diverse structural submatrix that reacts in multiple scales. In relation to the old urban fabric of Zagreb, Croatia, the tower follows existing rhythm of interference within each city block. It appears differently from each viewpoint, thus being a significant landmark in the mixed context of historic and modern architecture. On local level, building differentiates in all directions, creating unique interior-exterior spatial situations within fluctuated facade distortions on every floor horizon view. 
The project of a high rise medical centre is planned to resolve problems connected with public medicine services in Moscow. The image of the building was formed due to the following three factors: the desire to get the highest possible amount of usable area within the city downtown – a crucial issue for municipal hospitals; the need of a structure solution that could provide the ultimate self-support in energy system; the necessity of linking hospital units in a way that will help to avoid all the traffic troubles existing in Moscow nowadays. The system of health care in Russia is free, so the absolute majority of hospitals depend on the financial provision of government. In the center of Moscow many of them turn into shapeless and irrationally organized complexes that occupy huge areas of former manorial estates – places of historical and architectural value.  The lack of state subsidies and indifferent treatment of local executives often cause these precious buildings to lose their original form irretrievably. Furthermore, many of them don’t meet the modern requirements for hospitals.
Skyscrapers are urban icons. In collective imagination, “skyscraper” means “city” because it is a solution that was invented to meet density issues in big cities. As we were looking for the redefinition of the term “skyscraper” through the use of new programs, we decided to look for somewhere else to implement a skyscraper. Obviously, it has to be the countryside. The main question we had to answer then was: why would we build a skyscraper in the countryside? What issue could justify the need to build skyscrapers in the countryside? As you might know, although water is very present on earth, 97% is salted and 2% is blocked as ice. Actually, there is only about 1% left of liquid freshwater and the UNO and the World Water Council estimate there might be a crisis affecting half the worldwide population by 2030. Freshwater will be a major stake in the 21st century. Indeed the production of a daily food intake for a human being requires 3000 liters of freshwater and the annual rate of freshwater needs is 64 billions cubic meters.
The project is a housing proposal for the Hudson Yards area of New York, which is currently occupied by a train depot that forms a recess in the continuity of the ground plane at pedestrian level. Acting as a physical division, the depot prohibits any connections of the Midtown part of Manhattan to the Hudson River while also creating a programmatic boundary with transportation and industrial uses bordering the adjacent residential and commercial areas. Urban Reef addresses these problems of localized ground discontinuity and programmatic and physical isolation within a larger urban area by proposing a highly connected three-dimensional network of housing integrated with commercial as well as recreational uses. Working to a brief of three thousand housing units, the normative isolated high-rise building type found in New York, is replaced by a series of mid rise buildings that incline to minimize structural spans and interconnect in order to maximize the area available for housing and communal space development.
The 70’s urban development, born from a political decision and flourishing economic period, has left us a harmful point of view for living in skyscrapers worldwide. Faced with an increasing population, we tend to be more concerned with providing homes to inhabitants and stacking the apartments on top of each other at a good cost ratio rather than looking at the ecological and durable aspect of buildings. Over the years, each architectural era tends to declare that it is the right way to build cities, but today cities reveal the human work of the past decades, showing also some mistakes which were considered as the truth at that time. 
Interlock: Architecture + NatureThe central feature of this project is the design of a new skyscraper typology for ensuring it will provide a coherent natural environment without fragmenting the urban living from the natural world.  By interlocking the green soft tissue into solid architectural structure, this skyscraper reveals and reclaims the characteristics of cellular automation generated interlock forms. As a concentrated space with huge population, city must take the current climate change, peak oil crisis into account and actively seek to counter it. The proposed project is to create a basis infrastructure for developing not only a dense, vibrant and dynamic skyscraper, but also a self-sufficient agriculture infrastructure to support its own resident. Rather than seeking out-sourcing agriculture in the surrounding rural area of New York City, the project emphasizes possible local food production within the building itself.  A linear sequence of small scale vertical farms, integrated with food market, public recreational space, day-care facilities, schools, other services facilities and civil works, are proposed along in the interlocked tower, as the backbone for its neighboring residential tower. The internal farming space can be sold as finished units to promote a diverse food production within each level of the skyscraper.  They become well-defined linear spaces in which the agriculture and recreational elements are integrated in the structure from the beginning.
An interactive engine for the design of reactive architecture. Many skyscraper projects are pixelated stacks of boxes. Typological Organizer is a robust architectural ‘engine’ that refers to such projects but also adds both complexity handling and real-time reactivity capability. The engine does this by setting up an automated process of spatialization driven by internal typological parameters and external environmental factors.
Entering 21st century, massive city mazes and high speed is everyday reality and frequently changing our working and living location has become almost a necessity. The SKY-BRIDGE is designed for speeding up this changeability. This is an alternative network of transportation with integrated settlement capability. The SKY-BRIDGE is the idea taken from our ancestors. A Combination of transport networks and skyscrapers follows the basic logic how settlements were created – along rivers and roads with free movement of its dwellers. Nowadays, migration is much more intensive than in ancient times. Two thirds of the US population move every 5 years. More than one million people move out of the US yearly. The most active age group is 18-34 year olds. The main reason for their movement is change in location of work and education. But still we live far away from work. Londoners spend around 225 hours per year commuting to work. The numbers are rising all around the world as the current migration trend is towards cities. Today more than half of the world population is living in cities, and as building activity increases there is more pressure on poor and overcrowded transport system.
Damascus was voted the Arab Capital of Culture in 2008, and is also the capital of Syria. In it’s past it has been the capital of empires and located at the centre of the silk route and has always been a hive of trading. Because of this it is very proud of it’s historical context and is trying to improve it’s cultural and business facilities. The site chosen is at the centre of the New City, at the junction of the business and cultural axis. Because of this there is a great desire for development in this area. Having a train station and university as a neighbor emphasizes the demand for development, especially as at the moment there is no clear connection between the station, the university and the sports facilities
Preface“The sky switches on daylight for us – or the shower. We are small gods, mere gods of the machine which is our highest. Our universe is a huge motor, and yet we are dying of boredom. In the midst of fullness, there is an insidious dragon gnawing at our hearts.” — D.H. Lawrence AboutThe basic idea of Natwalk 2.0 is based on the assumption that as highly developed descendents of our species, machines will more readily understand the significance of an ecological renewal than we human beings. Moreover, they act with an ethical and social conscience. The origin of the machines is knowingly left in the dark.
Compress is a specially designed dynamic system which provides instant space for variety of use. Environmental, social and economic disturbances cause significant fluctuation among people. Many are left in danger and the need for shelter comes only second after basic necessities. In such case architecture plays important part in reducing the effects and providing basis for restoring continuity. This project examines the possibilities of creating First Aid Skyscraper (called Compress), easily transported in standard shipping containers and deployed all over the world. Location for this project can be anywhere from Haiti to Afghanistan. It is designed as first building on site after accidents. It shares almost military aesthetics and is intended to be in the front rows. As such it can respond to any need and provide first aid, accommodation or shelter for scientific research.
Some studies reveal that post-release offenses are very high and that criminal’s imprisonment is just a temporal solution because they do not have the opportunity to rehabilitate in a desirable community. This project examines the possibility of creating a vertical prison in the sky where inmates will have to work and live in a community that will contribute to the host city below. The prison will have agricultural fields, factories, and recyclable plants that will be operated by the offenders as a way to give back to the community. They will live “free” until they have completed their sentence and are prepared to rejoin their communities. The vertical prison has its own transportation system which consists of different “pods” for officers, prisoners, firefighters, and other workers.
The city of Jakarta, Indonesia, was originally designed in the confluence of thirteen rivers which were used for transportation and agriculture. The largest of its rivers is The Ciliwung River, which has been extremely polluted during the last couple of decades, characterizes by hundreds of slums inhabited by thousands of people in marginal conditions. The Ciliwung Recovery Program (CRP) is a project that aims to collect the garbage of the riverbank and purify its water through an ingenious system of mega-filters that operate in three different phases. The first one separates the different types of garbage and utilizes the organic one to fertilize its soil. The second phase purifies the water by removing dangerous chemicals and adding important minerals to it. The clean water is then fed to th One of the most important aspects of this proposal is the elimination of the slums along the river. The majority of the people will live and work at the CRP which could be understood as new city within Jakarta. The CRP project will be a 100 percent sustainable building that will produce energy through wind, solar, and hydroelectric systems.  e river and to the nearby agricultural fields through a system of capillary tubes.  Finally in the third phase all the recyclable waste is processed.
The Nested Skyscraper adapts to climatic, urban, and programmatic conditions with the use of advanced materials and robotic construction. Its form and building method derive from the carbon sleeves and fiber-laced concrete performance. It is a composition of multiple layers of louvers which thicken and rotate according to solar and wind exposure. The construction method consists of a series of robots that stretch a network of carbon sleeves that are sprayed with fiber-laced concrete to create a primary structure. A second set of robots wraps the structure with a steel mesh for lateral movements and increase or decrease its density according to structural and programmatic needs. The resulting structure of “nests” is a hybrid of compressive and tensile elements that frees the skyscraper typology from the rigid multiplication of floor plates. This prototype was designed as a fashion boutique for Tokyo; a city of extreme climate, density, and earthquakes. It explores the use of advanced materials and robotic construction to re-imagine the skyscraper.
NeoTax is a proposal for a three-dimensional city grid as a response to dead ends, long connection paths, wasted area, and interference with surface-related bio-ecological processes generated by standard skyscrapers. NeoTax is a three-dimensional infrastructure network organized in a horizontal and vertical street grid that offers short connection paths and higher urban density with better local communications, less social isolation, and higher number of neighbor interactions. This projects seeks to create a hyper-rectangle, where residents can occupy a building site on X, Y and Z coordinates. The network is based on a modular system where each module can be viewed as a separate quarter or neighborhood. It is designed to be able to expand by adding new infrastructure modules with plug-in residences that are less dependent on specific terrain conditions.
PoroCity is a project that seeks to re-organize extremely high density environments into an integrated three-dimensional city while addressing sustainability problems. The specific site for this proposal is Dharavi, Mumbai, India; one of the largest slums in the world and one of the most contentious sites of the new millennium. It is poised for being the one of the largest regeneration schemes of recent times and has attracted investments from some the world’s biggest real estate companies and leading global architecture and planning firms. Spread over 216 hectares, the site is triangular in plan, and has a residential population of 376,000 people.  In addition to the residential population, the district has an estimated 5000 businesses and 1500 single room industries. A large number of these businesses are hybrid homes, where residents live and work in the same area. There is also a lack of public amenities, including schools, hospitals, and parks.
Over the next four decades the number of people over 65 years old will increase by more than three-fold in developing countries, reaching 1.6 billion by 2050. On the other hand, Mexico City’s buildable area is extremely scarce and limited growth is only possible towards the outskirts of the city, with the consequent loss of agricultural land and environmental consequences. This project proposes an underground vertical cemetery for Mexico City – a vision that takes into consideration the overpopulation, the scarcity of land, and the psychological and sensory experience of grieving. The ‘Tower for the Dead’ allows the family members of the deceased to be reborn,  after a trip to the underworld, where they just buried their loved one. The proposal was conceived as a large-scale screw with curved retaining walls and ramps with an enormous light-well that provides light and ventilation.
The Fish Tower is a prototype for a vertical fish farm that could be up to 30 times more efficient than traditional farms. It was designed as a solution to the substantial decrease of wild fish which is estimated to peak by 2050. This tower proposes an intensive, yet healthy aquaculture environment with three primary programmatic components. The first one is a fisherman’s market and visitors center at ground level. The second component is the fish farms that are designed based on the research and analysis of habitation and movement of specific fish species. Each tank has specific width, form, and shape that resemble natural habitats. Water temperature and flow are also controlled to mimic ocean conditions. The third program is dedicated to research labs, where new technologies would be tested to achieve a productivity of 600 traditional fish farms in 20 levels.
One of the most iconic building typologies of all civilizations has been the sports arena; being a gladiator’s coliseum in ancient Rome, Olympic tracks in Greece, or soccer stadiums in the modern world , competitions and tournaments have been an integral part of the development of our cultures. Nowadays, with a variety of sports and the need of several specific facilities, urban planners have usually scattered them in different areas of the cities according to available land, communication routes, and existing infrastructure. This project proposes a vertical complex that would accommodate a variety of sports facilities in one site. The main intention is to create a cluster of functions that would alleviate multiple areas of a city and make the most efficient use of a specific site. Users and fans will be allowed to freely move between stadiums and matches. A public complex that will be in use the majority of the day and that would be able to host international events, including the Soccer World Cup, Olympics, and Tennis tournaments. Its diversity in sports and visiting people would allow for new interactions between people of different nationalities and social backgrounds. Although the ‘Sports Tower’ could be located in any part of the world, this specific project is situated on the bank of the Dnieper River in Ukraine. It consists of a series of structural modules in various sizes that, through different combinations, allow for diverse programs. Large blocks are used for soccer stadiums, while medium sizes are swimming pools, tennis courts, and basketball and volleyball courts. The top and smaller levels of the tower contain a hotel, restaurant, observation deck and other recreational areas.
The World’s oceans cover over 70% of the planet’s surface, contribute to half of its primary production and contain an enormous diversity of life. They also play a vital role in the Earth’s life support system through regulating climate and global biogeochemical cycles through their capacity to absorb atmospheric carbon dioxide. The pH (a measure of acidity; the lower the pH, the greater the acidity) of pristine seawater measures from 8 to 8.3, meaning oceans are naturally alkaline. When carbon dioxide dissolves in seawater it forms carbonic acid. As more C02 is taken up by the oceans’ surface, the pH decreases towards a less alkali and therefore a more acidic state. This is called “ocean acidification” and is happening at a rate that hasn’t been experienced for at least 400,000 years. The effect of ocean acidification on marine ecosystems and organisms that inhabit them has only recently been recognized and is of serious concern to scientists and policy makers involved in climate change, biodiversity, and the marine environment. The underpinning concept for the Coastalscraper is to reduce the acid levels of the oceans by adding fossilized Coccolithophores to the water. The perfect location for the project is the south east corner of England, with a vast geological swathe of Coccolithophore (white chalk) spanning from the outskirts of London, and terminating in what is known as The White Cliffs of Dover. The scheme proposes that these vast chalk deposits are to be excavated, refined and stored in large silos before being pumped out to sea where it can begin to neutralize the effects of sea acidity.
The Iceberg Autonomy is an enclave, a seascraper of suspended oil collectors and separators – a new water-world in constant navigation. It is a drifting political territory of temporary autonomy occupied by a maritime mining and refining community that is searching and hunting for suspended  oil plumes in the pelagic depths of our oceans – lost oil, forgotten and unclaimed through leakages, industrial run off, and devastating spillages. The Icebergs hunt the North Pacific and North Atlantic gyres where the majority of oil spills have occurred. It is known that oil plumes of approximately 300 square kilometers and 10 kilometers deep exist in this area. These are blankets of poison, detrimental to all marine life that blocks the sunlight necessary for phytoplankton and other photosynthesizing marine flora. This phenomenon increases the amount of carbon dioxide and acidity levels that causes catastrophic coral reef bleaching, as well as the death of local marine ecosystems. Another benefit of this proposal is that thick ice is collected and attached to the seascraper main structure during its visit to the Earth’s poles and slowly melts as the archipelago drifts into warmer waters while releasing minerals and nutrients into the ocean. Marine life is stimulated by its creviced and cavernous form, the nutrient rich waters occupy a busy and thriving water column suspended underneath and between the icebergs. Their long raking and tentacle-like hair hug the water line and feeds all types of aquatic life.
This project examines the latest United Nations Climate Change Conference (COP16) as a basis to rethink the way we inhabit cities, how the built environment has modified them, and how global economic interests such as tourism, sustainability, and mass consumption relate to one another. Tourist City is a proposed cluster of mega-structures in Cancun, Mexico that will eliminate the unplanned urban sprawl and bring back to life the once pristine environment.  The main concept is to concentrate an efficient infrastructure network in very small areas with tourist skyscrapers where visitors and workers will share the same facilities and resources. Today the majority of the existing hotels are owned by few international corporations. This proposal will also benefit the owners as there will be less transportation, administration, and marketing costs.
The Rhizome Tower is a proposal that explores the creation of an underground city. It is the response to abrupt climate changes and other environmental catastrophes. The main idea is to develop a ‘Groundscraper’ that harvests natural resources above and below ground while creating a new living typology. The project is divided in four different layers, organized around a central core that is open to the light. The first layer is above the surface and contains the recreational, and food production facilities, with agriculture fields, farms, and glasshouses. The entire façade is covered with photovoltaic cells to harvest solar energy and specific locations are also equipped with wind turbines. The second layer, approximately 60 levels, is the residential part, with a diverse range of living quarters according to family sizes. The third and fourth layers are used as offices, and service areas with the deepest part of the project dedicated to the study and harvest of geothermal energy. Based on rhizome theory, the project is not a single element but the combination of programs; structure and substructure working together. A series of Rhizome Towers would be connected and function as cities and maybe nations.
The unprecedented population growth of mega-cites around the world requires the sustained increase of urban density. Over the past century the pressure from population growth was relieved with the vertical expansion of the city. To fulfill the population demands of tomorrow, growth in building density will be forced to expand in all axes. Situated above the existing urban fabric, this building occupies the space between 22nd and 14th street and 6th and 7th avenue in New York City. The size of the structure creates interdependency, and allows for the formation of new communities within the already-dense housing grid. Woven into the residential fabric of the grid, large office towers provide a workplace for the residents of the structure. These towers unfold to allow for a large public park cut high above the city, maintaining the necessary public access to nature. Far removed from the intensity of urban life, the park provides residents and visitors an escape to nature while still maintaining a unique visual link with the city. The building is interconnected with a massive expansion of the current New York subway system. Trains within the structure move in all directions, servicing stations at all levels. Stations are embedded within the grid structure and linked to pedestrian bridges which act as the main arteries of transportation. The collection of these parts reaches a critical mass, allowing the structure to exist as an autonomous entity within the city, a new radical prototype for a 6th borough. Corporate Towers – Burrowing up through the ‘Housing Grid’, large glass towers provide the working space for surrounding residents. Reminiscent of the existing corporate towers in New York, these large structures are the landmarks within the grid. Counter to the traditional tower condition, the direct connections between the towers and the grid produce a more cohesive relationship between the companies and the surrounding communities.
The proposed building is located in Singapore’s waterfront and will serve as an extension to the existing financial district. Considering Singapore’s climate and its insufficient water resources, the emphasis on the design is set on building strategies to utilize natural ventilation, rainwater and provide shaded outdoor spaces. In addition, the project seeks to create the perfect home with its own garden and in close proximity to Singapore’s downtown. The tower is positioned at a 20 degree angle to the site to face the nearby waterfront. It is porous and allows the wind to pass through. This structural strategy creates a vast shaded atrium with bridges that connect the two sides of the tower, serve as extra structural support, and accommodate various mixed-use programs. The base, which resembles a terrain with rich vegetation, forms two outdoor swimming pools, public gardens, and sports facilities. A huge water reservoir for rainwater stretches along the entire building across the atrium while connecting the outdoor pools.
In challenging the typology of a skyscraper this proposal considers an alternative set of criteria to reexamine habitation, construction, and organizational logic. In examining our global trajectory resulting in issues of overpopulation and depletion of natural resources, this project proposes a developmental shift away from the Earth. The chosen site for this project is on the Shackleton Crater Rim on the South Pole of the Moon. The Moon was chosen as a testing ground for its ability to depart from the traditional constraints we find on Earth. There are limitations, such as low gravity, non-existent weather, and an abundance of unexploited natural resources such as large traces of frozen water and hydroxyl gases. These are particularly useful if combined, with the use of Regenerative Fuel Cells, where the process of electrolysis is proposed as means of sustaining energy and life by extracting the hydrogen and oxygen molecules from the water. In order to maximize solar gain due to the low oblique angle of the Sun, the skyscraper is the optimal building typology. However, this verticality is not solely expressed above the lunar surface. Instead a nested verticality of embedded towers deep below the surface provides protection from radiation, meteor impacts, and temperature differentials. The embedded areas of the towers are networked together through a multitude of robots working together to produce a self-organizing system. The operation is a simple technique of mound building like termites and ants colonies. This behavior is characterized by programming local interactions, which give rise to emergent structures. In the development of these behavioral and bottom-up techniques a complex network of relationships will emerge. Ideally, this settlement would grow into the size of a contemporary human city, with developed infrastructure and habitation systems.
The modern Olympic Games have been a platform for the host country to present its culture and wealth to the world. The amount of energy, time, and resources invested for a two-and-a-half week of games is seen by many as a waste of infrastructure. One of the main problems is what has been defined as the ‘post-Olympic syndrome’, in which large urban areas comprised of Olympic villas and stadiums become isolated after the games. These lavish structures are rarely used afterwards and steady deterioration becomes a norm. The main idea behind the Floating Olympic Complex is to create the first vertical Olympic architecture with large-scale inverted skyscrapers that will serve as host to the games and will later be transformed into a floating city with housing, offices, recreational areas, and infrastructure already in place. The idea of the inverted tower draws inspiration from an umbrella shell structure, mushroom, and stalactite formations. The slim structural elements are able to support massive platforms and cantilevered volumes through an ingenious branching system and cluster of structural elements.
This proposal imagines a world where the natural wilderness of the arctic is bisected by the largest shipping canal ever built and becomes a trading post for the world’s freight industry and the new oil and gas exploration. Slicing vertically through the Arctic ice-shelf, the structure is an architectural representation of the corporate struggle with nature. The whole structure reacts to nature by using the power of the wind, ice, and water. Its conceptual research is based on globalization and our dependency on shipping freights as the moving parts of consumerism. The North Pole Skyscraper is an open structure that holds containers in multiple levels or platforms that serve as transaction posts between countries.
Imagine a day where you are video conferencing, playing golf, working out, having a face to face meeting with your physician, watching a movie on a giant screen, and hanging out with some friends in a bar, without ever leaving your apartment on the 20th floor. Wouldn’t that be great? Well, it’s possible with the ‘On Demand Experience’. The concept behind the ‘On Demand Experience’ is simple. Instead of going to different places, the facilities come to you. Simply request the desired space with your computer and the request will be processed by the warehouse connected to your building. Your space will arrive as an equipped ‘box’ that plugs into your apartment. Several boxes can dock in a single apartment at the same time and everything is available on demand. So whether your desire is to play golf, work out or have a lunch meeting, just let the warehouse know! This is the ultimate mixed-use building where apartments blend with different functions and services, the hub of your professional and social life.
The Waste Collector Skyscraper is a new typology for highly polluted cities around the world. It is conceived as a recycling plant in the middle of the city. This specific project is designed for the Huangpu district in Shanghai, China. It ranks among the most populated areas in the world and, with more than 55,000 inhabitants per square kilometer, this agglomeration of persons produces the largest amount of municipal solid waste (MSW) in the world. The waste in turn is unfortunately collected by more than 30 diesel fueled trucks and transported more than 40 km away. These trucks consume more than 2,500 liters of gas and emit 6 tons of carbon dioxide daily. The Waste Collector Skyscraper addresses these problems through the potential recycling of 400 tons of MSW daily, in a comprehensive, clean, and self-sufficient process without intensive land use. It also raises awareness in the population by its distinct and strong visual presence in the city’s skyline.
As a result of the recent deteriorating economy and rising unemployment, homelessness is among the most pressing issues faced by US cities. Following the housing market crash, “tent cities” (makeshift shelters set up by people who have lost their homes) have been popping up all over the country. It is a time where the poverty rate is at a record high, and in many cities unemployment is in double-digits. This project proposes a transient solution to accommodate growing numbers of citizens who have lost their houses to foreclosure. The main idea is to create an environment that will provide a stable ground during the search for a steady income and a permanent home. The spatial organization of the project promotes social interactions between the residents and strengthens their feeling of safety and security in their current situation. The project design is based on a permanent steel structure, security skin, open floor plans, and compact dwelling units (includes bed, working desk, and storage)that can be installed on site according to changing demand. Shared amenities, such as laundry, storage, showers, restroom, and kitchen facilities are distributed along various levels. Differentiated from sprawling “tent cities”, the Hopetel is centered on a minimum footprint vertical density housing solution, which can be adopted in city centers with limited development space. Furthermore, this proposal highlights the foreclosure homeless problem by presenting a transparent building that encourages communication with the surrounding and creates public consciousness.
This project examines the idea of developing a vertical park and farm between skyscrapers in Shanghai, China. Over the last 20 year Shanghai has exponentially grown due to the massive migration from rural to urban China. This has lead to the development of hundreds of skyscrapers that today define the city’s skyline. Unfortunately, the number of public parks and recreational areas have not increased and the city is now a large block of concrete and glass. This project uses the structure of three contiguous skyscrapers to attach a vertical park that will serve as prototype for the city. The new park would provide a recreational green space to the office towers and a new lung to the city. In addition, the park is equipped with wind turbines and photovoltaic cells for wind and solar energy harvesting.
The city of Cairo, in Egypt, has become one of the most polluted cities worldwide. The idea behind this proposal is to recycle the city’s waste and use it as building material for large-scale development that could eventually become a city in itself. The project is composed of an exoskeleton where different types of living and working units could be plugged-in. Each unit is designed with a specific program in mind – from small ones for single families to large ones for recreational areas such as parks and sports facilities. Hundreds of terraces are used for agriculture and rainwater collection, while specific sites are used to bury organic waste and produce biogas, electricity, and fertilizers.
The Living Mountain is a city-like skyscraper for one of the Earth’s harshest environments: the desert. Fertile land is gradually being transformed into deserts due to global warming. This project is located in one of those regions, the desert of Taklamakan, in the northwestern region of China. This high-rise conglomerate, in conjunction with man-made lakes, could gradually transform the desert into a habitable environment. The Living Mountain would extract water from the regions substrate and through its smart use, treatment, circulation, and controlled evaporation, could create a microclimate inside the structure. The housing areas are envisioned as “living pods” of 2,000 square-feet with easy access to all the facilities. Rainwater is collected and circulated on top of the super-structure and freely cascades to the atrium while filtering the air and promoting the growth of indoor vegetation.
The Tree of Life is a skyscraper proposal for open mines around the world. It is an autonomous ecosystem based on the structure of a plant where the inhabitants live and work producing ecological products. The bottom part, or root, is comprised of a power station that harvests geothermal energy and includes a subterranean water purification plant. The stem is an external frame designed as two interlacing structures that provides stability to the entire project. Vertical communication is achieved through pneumatic elevators on all levels. The top part, or crown, is the public area with housing sectors, offices, schools, and entertainment facilities. Attached to these structures there are a series of pods or terraces that are used as geoponic greenhouses, covered with solar panels and wind turbines.
Hydra is a skyscraper that investigates the possibility of creating a power plant that uses hydrogen as source of energy. The international community recognizes hydrogen as a key component of sustainable energy system for the transportation, industrial, residential, and commercial sectors.  The power is produced through electrolysis and could be stored in batteries and transported by truck, pipes or cables. Another interesting part is that the by-product of the process is clean water. Its exoskeleton is built from grapheme, the basic structural element of carbon allotropes such as graphite and carbon. Grapheme has a high thermal and electric conductivity and is two hundred times stronger than steel. The idea for the Hydra skyscraper is to harvest energy from lightning storms and store the power in several mega-batteries located at the base. The project also includes a research facility, housing, and recreational areas for scientists and their families.
Despite the alarming news about global warming and its catastrophic consequences, the use of fossil fuels has not decreased. In an effort to alleviate this problem, this project seeks to transforms oil platforms around the world into sustainable seascrapers that produce and store fresh water. The old pipes are adjusted to bring water to spherical containers attached to the main structure which, through a series of distillation processes, produce fresh water and later transports it to countries in need. The project also contains a research facility and housing pods for workers. The platform is transformed into green areas that will serve as recreational areas and farms.
For more than one hundred years after the birth of the skyscraper, our tower designs have been defined by a simple notion, a rigid core and heavy perimeter columns.  We envision a future skyscraper typology that is more efficient and unburdened by large vertical compression members at the perimeter. The Tensile Tower uses a structural concept that results in uninterrupted views, open space planning, efficient day lighting, and minimal material use. The Tensile Tower uses one primary mega compression member, which also contains the vertical circulation, much like a traditional core. The perimeter edges of the floor slabs are supported by tensile cables suspended from the top of the mega column. These cables spiral the tower at an angle in both directions, creating a diagonal configuration that provides resistance to torsion and overall stability. The use of suspension members at the perimeter gives unprecedented lightness and openness to the exterior wall of each floor space.  For lateral loads that would otherwise cause bending throughout the tower, this bow shape acts like an oversized herring truss; the mega core and slabs as compression members, and the perimeter cables, in tension. The Tensile Tower re-considers traditional urban planning. Based on the efficiency of a tri-pod configuration for structural support, we can imagine a future city pattern that enables tensile towers. The plan provides both tower and shared cable anchor sites. The towers propagate throughout the city as focal nodes of a physical network, linked by pedestrian scale streets.
Elevated Connectivity is a high-rise proposal that creates a new urban grid above the city by connecting existing skyscrapers. This elevated horizontal platform would become a new type of public domain that will redefine the interaction between people and their city – allowing new program and architecture on the top levels of the existing structures. The entire city would have three main layers. The ground floor will remain public and mainly used for transportation. The middle layer will be a private one with residences and offices while the third one will be dedicated to leisure and entertainment activities.
One of the most famous buildings in New York is the former New York Times headquarters known as One-Time-Square. The skyscraper opened in 1905 and has been through several renovations and transformations ever since. It is the place where New Yorkers and the world celebrate the New Year with the famous drop ball. Another interesting fact is that its façade is almost entirely covered by the most expensive billboards in the world which cost more than $10,000 per hour. This proposal seeks to transform the infamous building into a vertical amusement park. The project explores the potential of using a roller coaster as means of transportation between the different programs. It is an exploration of transportation in three dimensions which has never been tested and tries to break the norm of using elevators and horizontal corridors. The park is divided in zones specifically catalogued with different colors with each zone composed of a series of modules attached to a primary steel exoskeleton.
The Korean de-militarized zone (DMZ) is a 2 kilometer area between North and South Korea established in 1950 as a buffer zone between the two nations to prevent further hostilities. After more than 60 years this area has become the habitat of hundreds of endangered species – a pristine habitat untouched by human beings. The Barbe-wire Skyscraper is based on the idea of a unified Korea in the near future and the importance of preserving the untouched natural habitat of the DMZ. The idea is to create a series of skyscrapers with the existing 250 kilometers of barbed-wire as a landmark of the unified country. The structures are designed as museum and ecological reserve, where visitors will enjoy different sports facilities and outdoor recreational areas.
The Great Pacific Garbage Patch is a pile of plastic floating in the northern part of the Pacific Ocean. The San Francisco Chronicle claims that the patch now weights more than 3.5 million tons, 80% of which is plastic waste that reaches more than thirty meters in depth. This area of the Pacific Ocean is a relatively calm region that causes the accumulation of floating garbage in big piles. Its removal will cost billions of dollars and no country claims responsibility. This proposal consists of a series of underwaterscrapers, floating islands that will be used to remove and recycle the garbage patch. These are self-sustained structures organized by function hierarchy with four communication cores that connect three main programs – collectors at the bottom, recycling plant in the middle levels, and housing and recreational levels atop. Considering that the size of the floating garbage island is constantly varying, the structural organization of the skyscraper should reflect these variations. The main hole in the structure would adjust the mass of the underwaterskyscraper while keeping the volume constant.  Fluctuations in the amount of trash in the landfill (located in the lower part of the structure) would be adjusted by adding or releasing water, so that the weight to volume ratio is appropriate for floatation.
Mexico City is one of the major and more polluted metropolises in the world. With over 20 million inhabitants, the main problems are the lack of affordable housing, long commute distances, and no recreational areas.  The Kinetic Skyscraper addresses these challenges in a unique and innovative way. The structure has three main programs with a geothermal plant at the base, housing and offices in the upper levels, and a solar plant powered by thousands of photovoltaic panels on the façade. The most interesting part of the proposal is the design of kinetic housing units attached to a main exoskeleton. These units resemble a flower and are able to open, close, and direct towards sunlight.  The skyscraper also has recreational and working areas – it is a city within the city.
In December 2010, the Ukrainian government lifted the restriction on tourism in the zone around the Chernobyl power plant. Conceptually, this proposal deals with the reconstruction of a post apocalyptic environment. Since the accident in 1986 the site has been abandoned long enough for nature to take over, the absence of humans provides an opportunity for creating a utopian vision for a city. The proposed structure would engage the existing site and architecture as a new layer of landscape, a network of self-evolving skyscrapers that will address scientific, cultural, and historical concerns. Due to the unpredictable distribution of fallout materials and possible radiation, the primary structure will be manufactured with light-weight fiber composite materials and fixed and transported onto the site by air. Secondary structures, such as highways and other programs, can be built above ground like cantilevered bridges. The proposed skyscraper network is meant to help improve the existing conditions of the site by slowly decontaminating the soil, providing a self sustained community for travelers, scientists, and current inhabitants. Years later, when the skyscraper network has grown, more people can relocate to the site, creating a new typology of urban phenomena.
Air pollution is a major problem in the city of Guangzhou, China. The main contributor to the air quality is the outrageous number of industrial facilities within the metropolitan area. The White Cloud Project is an air purification network of skyscrapers. These are inverted buildings that liberate the base for public use and create a cluster of structural branches with residences and offices on top – almost like a group of trees. The structure is covered by a fine membrane that cleans the air through an ingenious filtering process. The air particles are trapped by the cloth-like structure and washed away by a constant mist. At the same time the collected dust is transported through a secondary branching system to a brick factory on the bottom.
The final height of this skyscraper has not yet been decided, as perpetual development of the project has continued for more than twenty years. Its rich history can be witnessed and analyzed through the changes in the facade, the same way history can be seen in layers of stone or the rings of a tree. The architecture of the skyscraper changes as each firm contributes their own unique design proposals for the next addition to the tower’s elevation – mankind’s skyscraper project of the twenty-first century. Hong Kong’s Kowloon side is Corbusier’s Plan Voisin, compressed and multiplied. Victoria Harbour has decreased to accommodate endless developments as the majority of the population live and work in skyscrapers. The principles of Coalesce are to discontinue Hong Kong’s public housing estate-style developments and remove existing estates in order to unite the parks on the Kowloon side. The equation of the project: recreational green space substitutes each estate razed, and with each estate razed, the equivalent amount or more leasable area is added to the central skyscraper. With an increase in green concentration at the heart of Kowloon, the district is expected to experience a drop in its uncomfortable temperatures and filter polluted air, while providing recreational space and facilities. The core of the project is the skyscraper. Unparallel to any skyscraper in the world, the design of this structure is an ongoing collaboration of work from architects on the global scale. The skyscraper rises in phases, depending on the needs and demands of the community. Each phase is produced by a mixture of both local and international architects to create a completely unique design and individual architecture. As the development continues to rise, occupants will begin to inhabit the tower.
Conceived as a giant turbine the LO2P skyscraper would be located in New Delhi, one of the most polluted cities in the world due to the exponential increase in population and cars -it is estimated that number of cars grows by one-thousand every day. The idea behind this skyscraper is to recycle the old cars and use them as building material for the new structure.  The building is designed as a giant lung that would clean New Delhi’s air through a series of large-scale greenhouses that serve as filters. Another set of rotating filters capture the suspended particles in the air while the waste heat and carbon dioxide from the recycling center are used to grow plants that in turn produce bio-fuels.
The construction of skyscrapers has been an architectural solution for high-density urban areas for almost a century for its ability to combine height with a small footprint. Today there is a constant race between large metropolises and nations to build the tallest structure, but it has been proven that this typology is sometimes not desirable for medium-size cities where skyscrapers destroy the skyline and disrupt the infrastructure of a specific location. The Flat Tower is a new high-density typology that deviates from the traditional skyscraper. It is based on a medium-height dome structure that covers a large area while preserving its beauty and previous function. The dome is perforated with cell-like skylights that provide direct sunlight to the agricultural fields and to the interior spaces. The dome’s large surface area is perfect to harvest solar energy and rainwater collection. Community recreational facilities are located at ground level while the residential and office units are in the upper cells. An automated transportation system connects all the units, which are different shapes according to their program. It is also possible to combine clusters of cells to create larger areas for different activities. Although this proposal could be adapted to any medium-size city around the world, it has been designed for the city of Rennes, France, in an old industrial area.
The current public amenities of the world-famous Hoover Dam in the United States consist of a viewing platform, a bridge, and a gallery scattered around the entire site. This project aims to reconfigure these programs by merging them into a single vertical super structure. One of the main purposes of the project is to allow the water from the upstream river to engage directly with the visitors through a series of containers. A hanging tower above the 700-foot drop into the Black Canyon would be used as gallery and a vertical aquarium.
Natural disasters, the threat of technological meltdown and even the possibility of visitors from space all present a need for cities and even countries to reorganize to implement infrastructure that can protect people from possible catastrophes. The “Citadel Skyscraper” project is imagined for Japan because of the numerous natural and manmade disasters that have struck the region in recent years. The project proposes a three-part implementation of new structures with an end result of protecting the island with a fortress-like defense shield. The first part involves a restructuring of the land use of all of the country’s major cities as residents are moved out of the city proper. Businesses and commercial endeavors will stay located within the cities, but residents will move out to sea and live in self-supporting residential skyscrapers, or citadels. The second part specifies the location of these citadels: They will be lined up as a single “sheet”, creating a barrier 2-3 km from the shoreline that can protect the mainland from tsunamis. The skyscrapers themselves are connected by a system of breakwaters and drainage channels, and are able to withstand waves up to 50 meters tall. These are further bolstered by a connected series of fiber sails, buried as deep as 1,200 meters, that surround the island. When the waves hit the sails and meet the oscillations of its stretched fibers, such a dissonance is created that the wave is reduced to nothing. The third part of this plan involves a skyscraper design that can protect its inhabitants. The prototypical skyscraper for this project has a metal frame; its foundation is poured at a depth of 1,200 meters and it reaches 500 meters into the sky. By burying the structure so far into the earth, it is protected from seismic activity (earthquakes up to a magnitude 11), waves (up to 40 feet tall) and man-made disasters (such as the explosion of atomic weapons). A system of bars forming a single, one-piece shield around the building serves as its protection system. They are energetically self-sustaining, using wave power for energy generation, and they have live fish tanks to provide food for residents. The citadels mainly function as residential structures, but every 50 meters there are recreation areas and mini parks. The buildings also feature restaurants, cafes, shops, cinemas and laundromats. If the citadel’s outer shield is closed completely in anticipation of disaster outside, the building is ventilated by blowers located every 100 meters that are connected to a system of niches filled with hydroponic algae that produce oxygen by absorbing carbon dioxide. The citadels are connected with the city and the coastal zone by above ground, high-speed trains that run through 4 systems of tunnels.
Moved by the economic disparity in the United States brought to light by the 2011 Occupy Wall Street movement, the designers of the Occupy Skyscraper propose creating a building that can further empower protesters and accelerate the Occupy movement. The temporary Occupy skyscraper can be erected on any protest site to provide shelter and meeting spaces for dissenters. By providing a means for protesters to take their movement from a horizontal plane to a 3-D vertical reality, the Occupy skyscraper strengthens and bolsters the event as a whole, but amazingly, it does so only using hemp rope and canvas. The skyscraper’s construction begins as soon as a protest takes place: Ropes are woven into a vertical web by attaching to and climbing nearby buildings. The webs are woven thicker and thicker until they form nets that can support weight. At this stage, the “building” can be used for climbing, hanging flags and supporting sleeping bags in the vertical spaces, and can be used for gatherings on the horizontal plane. Canvas is then attached to create solid paneling to segregate space uses within the building. The designers envision several designated areas: orientation spaces, and other spots for recreation, sleeping, workshops, conferences, rallies and large meetings. As the movement gains in strength and more people join, the masses will continue to build out the skyscraper, adding space as needed. The height of the skyscraper reaches its peak, however, when the heights of the surrounding buildings that are supporting the ropes are met. As the protest dies down the building is deconstructed, and after its over, its remains can be removed completely, restoring the urban fabric to what it was before the event.
How to live vertically? Building higher and higher does not seem to change the way we live. Most people wish to live in single-family residences, but the problem is the lack of diversity and density. How to have the benefits of suburbia combined with the intensity of living in the city? The history of the skyscrapers goes back to Elisha Otis, who invented the elevator in the 19th century. This invention promoted the conquest of the sky with projects competing for prowess and size.  What would happened if within a house the elevator is used as a remote control to move from one floor to another, from one program to another? This new “object” would challenge the function of living. The house becomes smart and incorporates multiple applications – one application per floor. The elevator is for the house what that Internet is for a smart-phone. A necessary parameter! Now you can “zap” your life spatially. Imagine yourself in your room, put on your slippers, go in your elevator, and zap! You will be in your living room, your garage, your favorite bar or business place; the park where you go jogging! The new tower is born, or rather, the first cell. We must now find the idea of “Tower”. This cell is only anecdotal, but multiplied and intensified, it marks its existence. It is now clearly identifiable as an “object”.  The idea of “Tower” is inseparable from the idea of city, so we have now an object in the city, which looks like a city.  Perceptions are distorted. The object in the city became literally the “city-object”.
The “Migrant Skyscraper” is literally mobile: A giant, thin tire with a building and green space in the center, this skyscraper is ready to roll. The concept behind this structure is that in an unstable world, people need the stability of self-sufficiency to truly be free, and the future of the architectural field can help provide that to people. By constructing a safe haven for residents to live in that ensures they will have food to eat and water to drink, the Migrant Skyscraper affords people freedom despite what natural and social disasters may come. The building-inside-a-wheel can stay stationary for however long residents please, but, for example, if political upheaval destabilizes a region, residents can fire up the biofuel-powered engine and cruise to a new location. The structure’s exterior tire is clad in recycled rubber. Inside, two buildings and surrounding green space provide everything residents need to survive, making the tire-encapsulated unit completely self-sufficient. Outside of the buildings there is space for agriculture, including crops and livestock; within the tire, plumbing systems circulate potable, gray and black water for drinking, waste facilities and irrigation. Each tire holds facilities for one family; layouts show two buildings next to each other within the tire. The first is three stories tall, with restroom facilities on the ground floor, indoor agriculture space on the second, and a balcony and kitchen on the third. Next door, both floors of the two-story building hold bedrooms for residents.
The race between countries, cities, and corporations to construct the highest structure is a challenge of pride and power. Our technological advances allowed for the construction of super-tall buildings – the higher they are, the more space they loose and the harder the engineering challenge becomes. The global financial crisis was the last decisive argument against such structures. The House of Babel offers a radical revision for the common method of building a traditional home. With the help of aerostatic construction we can eliminate extra floors and elevate the building to almost any desired height. The post-crisis skyscraper is the house consisting of two floors connected with a high-speed elevator on a thin heavy-duty cable. The first floor is located at ground level while the second floor is attached to the aerostatic bearing structure that holds it at a height of up to several kilometers. The upper floor has a fully sealed enclosure. For security purposes, the aerostatic dome has several compartments. The cable connecting the floors can shorten or lengthen, thus changing the height of the building. In normal mode, the house can be used as a traditional two-storey house. If necessary, the height can be increased. Finally, anyone can have the highest house in the world.
In the middle of the Pacific Ocean sits a mass of garbage that is 8.1% the size of the entire sea. It is known as the Great Pacific Garbage Patch (GPGP), and is estimated to contain over 100 million tons of waste. The debris gathers in that particular location as ocean currents convene in the Subtropical Convergence Region, and is causing grave harm to the immediate ecosystem and those within a broad surrounding swath. The Plastic Fish Tower, a circular structure floating on the ocean surface within the GPGP, will collect and reprocess plastic, which estimates say comprises 90% of the GPGP and is often ingested by birds and fish, causing their demise. A large fence will circle the structure underwater in a 1 km diameter to capture all the plastic that floats its way. The plastic will be recycled within the structure and processed into plastic patches that can be assembled into fish farms to restore the ecosystem. In addition to helping mitigate the pollution, the fish farm will also have two added benefits: the buoyancy of the plastic fish farm elements will be enough to keep the entire structure afloat since plastic is in fact so buoyant, and it will position the structure as a tourist attraction. Bringing tourists to the GPGP would greatly help in disseminating widely the reality of this manmade ecological catastrophe. The tourists will be transported to and from the site by ships that are fueled by chemicals that will be collected from the processed plastics within the skyscraper in an as-of-yet-undiscovered method of chemical extraction. The structure itself is a ring that rises above the water and also goes below, but is largely hollow. The outer ring holds residential and leisure spaces, and is connected at intervals by bridges that are enclosed underwater (and one that is open on the water’s surface). Fishing banks made from the recycled plastic funnel up through the middle of the ring, helping to keep the structure buoyant.
In an era where mega-structures threaten to strip man’s needs and the humanity of architecture from new buildings and the field as a whole, the “Tower of Babel” seeks to do the opposite, existing as a living monument to its creator and their aspirations. The building is perpetually “under construction” as the needs and wants of its creator evolve, allowing the monument to experiment with and showcase many architectural trends. The skyscraper is a mutation of the Palace of Culture and Science, an enormous, landmark structure built in 1955 in the destroyed center of Warsaw, Poland (which was still ravaged from WWII). Although it is the most recognizable symbol of Warsaw, it is a controversial building, as it symbolizes, to many, Soviet domination and the enslavement of the Polish nation. A typical communist monument, it ignored the local architectural vernacular and good urban planning, and instead was built as a monolith to tower over the rest of the city. Despite this, the designer of the Tower of Babel defends the Palace: “It is a monument of IDEA, a monument of its creators.” Today’s architectural monuments are driven by money, not people, and symbolize the culture’s worship as such. This capitalist approach to architecture creates a “dystopia,” says the designer. The Tower of Babel is therefore meant to glorify the old use of monuments to honor people and social ideas. It is a “maze of glued-together architectural blocks which are not finished, incomplete or damaged.” This commentary reveals that though past monuments may have glorified controversial regimes or figureheads, at least they had soul, and purpose; modern monuments are about nothing but the monument itself, and the designer protests this reality by leaving the structure raw, without purpose or completion.
With today’s weight of cities on the landscape, we tend to lose our original relationship with nature. The cities are getting bigger, larger, and higher as the population increases and our connection to natural landscape is disappearing. Urban planners and architects have been trying to recreate nature in cities by drawing parks and planting trees on streets. The implementation of these “green parts” in cities has nothing to do with nature in its original state. Instead of trying to force nature into the city, we should adapt the city to nature. For example, living underneath the earth allows us to preserve most of its surface. We know that verticality allows cities to face the increasing needs for density. The design for this city is set in a wild landscape inside a mountain to preserve the development of nature around it. A geothermic plant is the logical solution to provide energy to the city. The main condition for this is that the city should be located in a geographic zone with high geothermal gradients – active tectonic and volcanic areas. Iceland is the ideal location for this city because the country has significant energy resources provided by its unique geology. In 2007, statistics showed that 66% of the primary electricity of this country came from geothermal energy.
The incredibly destructive effects that coal plants cause to our natural environment are well documented and known, but 50,000 plants still operate the world over every day to power the planet, as green technology has not evolved to a point where they generate enough energy to replace fossil fuel processes. The “Coal Power Plant Mutation” project is a proposal for coal factory addendum, a skyscraper built over an existing factory that can reduce the amounts of harmful waste that spew from their chimney stacks while we wait for green technologies to take over. The skyscraper coal cleansers are comprised of three long, tubular legs that join are built around the existing factory’s chimneys and meet high in the air to share a bio-filtering area that also has balloons to capture and hold waste particles. The structure is made out from multiple carbon-fiber steel props that are held together by a carbon-fiber steel mesh; the props are anchored in the existing foundation of the power plant. The chimneys rise 1,000 meters in the air; as the smokestack pollution rises through the tall skyscraper chimneys, tubes with various types of air filters with various densities are placed at different heights. The lower filters for carbon dioxide exhaustion use synthetic carbon fixation techniques, while filters located higher in the chimneys are bio-filters. , At the very top, the chimneys are equipped carbon and vapor capturing and filtering devices that keep the gasses from reaching the atmosphere. They are made of horizontal air pipes connected only to the exterior. The vapors condensate on them, and the resulting water is gathered and distributed back at the base. The mesh that holds the skyscraper together is covered by a lightweight skin, a waterproof elastomer that isolates the gasses and vapors that are produced in the factory. (The skin keeps them separate, as the vapors and gasses mixing could lead to acid rain.) The skin has an area of 300,000 square meters and is covered with photovoltaic cells and air quality monitoring sensors.
On the borders of two regions at war, those who suffer the greatest are the citizens who simply want peace for their nation. Often, warring regions build great walls between them, but do such walls truly solve conflict? They don’t, say the designers of the “District 3 – Skyscraper of Liberation” project – instead, walls obstruct mutual understanding and intensify the discrepancy. This project is imagined for the border of Israel and Palestine, which is defined by three districts: an Israeli district, a Palestinian district and a third, which is a zone where the borders are separated by a wall. This wall will be removed and replaced with a skyscraper, transforming the isolated and hate-filled area with one that is shared and fosters reconciliation. The skyscraper can only be entered by Palestinians and Israelis who are non-violent and seek peace and cooperation, and is administered by the United Nations. The skyscraper will have many programs inside to foster cultural and social exchanges between the two countries. These programs include a farmer’s market, a soccer stadium, a museum, a school, performing arts and assembly spaces, a zoo, a hotel, shopping and business spaces, and farmland at the very top. Residential complexes are connected to the skyscraper peripherally. These activities are designed to celebrate the cultures of both nations, as “destroying others culture is the strategy of diminution of the enemy’s forces,” say the designers. This skyscraper instead promotes fun and educational activities that distract attention away from conflict. “The District 3 is an assembly where Israeli and Palestinian can negotiate, cooperate with each other and represent themselves.”
The Bridge of Hope is a symbolic structure that seeks to link the shores of the Dead Sea to promote peace between Jordan and Israel. Construction of the bridge would commence from both sides of the sea, ultimately meeting in the middle; there, a settlement for Arabs and Jews to live harmoniously is established. The water level of the Dead Sea is dropping by 1 meter per year, and plans are currently underway by the Jordanians to replenish the water levels by connecting it, via pipelines, with the Red Sea. In addition to the bridge’s construction, this project also proposes the creation of aqueducts from Israel’s side to help replenish the sea with water from the Mediterranean. These aqueducts would generate electricity as the water flow drops 400 meters; this electricity is used to desalinate the water, making it useable for irrigation purposes (residual water is discharged into the Dead Sea). Salt water pools  (with normal salt levels) are created within the Dead Sea for fish farming, and other pools are also created to cultivate mineral baths for a variety of uses (potash is used for fertilizer, Bromine for fire retardants, fresh water for hydroponic farming, Dunaliella bacteria for its high CO2 sequestration rate, etc.). The houses within the bridge settlement are adaptations of traditional Middle Eastern “wind catcher chimney” house designs. These will differ, though, in that all sides of the structures will offer shaded areas and openings of varied sizes that lead to green terraces and water pool terraces. These openings allow for fresh airflow, which creates cool breezes to cool the homes in this warm environment. As approximately 7 million tons of water evaporates each day, a water cycle within the buildings will be established to create fresh water from condensation; this will help irrigate the gardened terraces. The condensation is created when ocean water is brought from a depth of 15 meters to the surface; when the salt water meets the warm air, the temperature difference (which is 20 degrees Celsius or more) creates vapor, and the molecules regroup without the salt, creating fresh water.
The “Vertical Ground” project reexamines the “norm” for the organization of college campuses. Students today want proximity to the culture, activities and networks available in urban settings, but typical campuses are horizontally oriented and require large swaths of land for development, which are increasingly rare in desirable urban areas. By orienting a college campus vertically instead, colleges can locate in dense areas and perhaps even better facilitate social communication amongst students and faculty. 20,000 students are located on a campus complex that is comprised of several towers that occupy a small city footprint, and are connected at varying heights by sky bridges. By spacing programmatic needs properly throughout the towers, the vertically orientated campuses can give students both space for privacy and opportunities for dynamic interactions with others. The campus tower typology is composed of series of clustered departments and open spaces that are located amongst the college’s three schools: Applied Sciences, Design, and Social Sciences schools. The designers imagined two test sites for campuses within Manhattan, transforming the typical sprawling land model of a campus to one that is a super block. Lighting conditions and restrictions at ground level and in relation to other nearby buildings present new issues with which vertical campuses need to adapt. Neighborhood restrictions also pose interesting issues: Due to building requirements, a campus in New York’s Chelsea neighborhood would look different than one built in Midtown, for example, as Midtown would allow for construction with taller tower heights. This might give a Chelsea campus difficulties should it ever need to expand, but despite these issues, the designers contend that orienting a campus vertically allows for more programmatic flexibility and opportunities for dynamic interaction than a campus plan that requires an open expanse of land.
Ninety-seven percent of Chinese airports will need to be rebuilt by 2020, according to a recent survey, causing huge implications for cost and land use issues, and the city of Beijing is currently planning the construction of a second airport. The designers of the Air@Port propose avoiding using precious land for new airports by constructing one that is positioned 450 meters in the air. The airport sits atop the bases of dozens of thin towers that mushroom out at the top with wide platforms that all connect to support the runways and airport facilities on top. Locating an airport city so high in the air has many immediate benefits. Being so high up will mean that there won’t be height restrictions on the buildings erected on the platform, which will allow for great stimulation and creativity in the resulting development. Also, because wind speed is higher 450 meters in the air than it is at sea level, the length of the runway can be effectively reduced, saving space. Vertical air buses will transport visitors from the ground (or underground, if they are arriving via subway) up the stems of the tall structures. In addition to air transport facilities, this air city will also include a hotel and commercial, conference and office spaces; these areas are located in the towers beneath the airport. Passengers can stop anywhere on the air bus ride to access these other programs.
Aakash, the Hindi word for “sky,” provides the inspiration for this project, which proposes locating floating clusters of development high in the skies above Mumbai, one of the world’s most congested metropolises. The complex as a whole is comprised of tree-like structures that stem at nodes throughout the city, grow into the sky and then branch out into wide, floating modules that connect to create a road-less cityscape. The majority of the structural load is taken by cloud-shaped helium balloons; only some of the load is transferred to the ground by means of nodes. In the canopy of this structure, an intricate network of units and modular capsules grow endlessly in all directions, with intermediate green terraces accessible to public use. The terraces act as lungs throughout the city to purify the air in congested Mumbai. The habitable cells, which are two-story “celluloids,” are held by the helium balloons and float at reasonably high levels (at least 50 meters high) so that every inhabitant can enjoy a breath-taking view over the city. The balloon cells draw the users from the building terraces at higher levels and the nodes draw the users from the ground. The geometric celluloids are clustered around large, circular communal cells. These connections provide further bracing for the structure.
Is it possible to develop a zero footprint construction? Is it possible to build while being part of the landscape? For many years we have been developing unsustainable models that year after year are taking more natural landscape and resources to satisfy the necessity for grow.   The typical skyscraper offered the chance to have a small footprint in order to have more free horizontal space, but at the end, if we build a lot of them we will end up with the same unsustainable model. The main idea behind this project is to inhabit the natural vertical geographical conditions. The vertical plane with zero occupancy offers the possibility, with the help of technology, to conquest the apparently inhospitable wall areas in order to preserve the green horizontal plane exclusively for wild life. The cliffs are the new virgin territories to explore. Many artists explore different techniques of low relief sculpture in its artwork, using it as a language to show the presence of the void. It is interesting how the result show some cavities that can easily, in other scale, acts as program (activity spaces, circulation, etc.).
Illegal acquisition of land by local Chinese government entities has caused thousands of residents incredible grief and even death recently, plus social instability, say the designers of the Structure of Human Rights in Beijing. Though private property doesn’t really exist in China (and buying a property only ensures its use for 70 years), the designers of this structure feel that land use needs to be reexamined in China, as a private home is a basic human right. Their proposal to bring every person a place to live takes into account the country’s exploding population and need for dense development, and thus is oriented vertically. Inspired by the Chinese character 田 the traditional siheyuan residence and ancient Chinese urban planning, these designers have dreamed up a giant reinforced concrete structure that serves more as infrastructure than a building. It is “land” for housing, instead of the housing itself – a 3-D checkerboard that houses units within each cell. The structure is the same length as the Forbidden City, and is located directly to the east of it. (“Ironically,” the designers say, “it confronts the Forbidden City, the symbol of the superpower of despotism, emphasizing the priority of human rights in a dramatic and symbolic way.”) Living spaces within the structure measure 25 by 30 by 25 meters. This proposal was not made by politicians, they stress, or economists. “We are people. We just want a house, and land.”
Noah’s Ark is a self-sustainable city on the water that can support all living species, from humans to animals and fish to plants and trees, that have been evicted from land by natural disasters, warfare, whatever disasters the end days may bring. In addition to providing protection from these disasters, the Ark concept also addresses overcrowding on land: 72% of the earth’s surface is already covered by water, so extension of the urban city grid onto water is both logical and useful, as solar, wind and wave energies are easily captured at sea, and it is these natural energy sources that will power the development. It is designed as part of a network consisting of other Arks, which connect with floating underwater tunnels and the main land. As the settlements grow, the Arks can attach to each other, creating one big artificial mainland from a series of artificial islands. A large number of flexible cables connect the island to the ocean’s bottom, providing stability, and an external wall as tall as 64 meters protects the island from hard sea winds and tsunamis. When emergencies of grave severity arise, residents can retreat to bubbles inside the depths of the islands for protection. Underneath the island, great turbines attached to the bottom convert ocean currents to energy, and artificial coral coats the surfaces, encouraging the development of new ecosystems.
Tundra City is located in the exhausted diamond mine “Lucky” which is the geographical center of the entire Russian Tundra – the last point of urbanization of the Russian North. The tundra is an unexplored region, which hardly anyone wants to go. It is associated with a “hole” due to poor living conditions. The Russian government has paid attention to the prospect and huge potential benefits of developing the region to the whole the country. This has been facilitated by the existing geopolitical threat posed by the rapidly development of China, India, and other countries. Tundra City is a launching pad to address the problems of the region: population, development of infrastructure, creation of new industry, agriculture, science, and culture. Tundra City is a new ark, which will gather people together for a new life, new qualified scientists and workers will grow, who will put the Yakut ideas into practice. The tradition of the Yakut people is dominated by the heart-“olonkho”. The Center (a symbolic heart) is built of 11 modules – logs, including the following areas: scientific, social, agro-industrial, residential, relaxation, hospitality, educational, and industrial. Two blocks (expedition and station) are located on the surface; the rest of the program is located underneath. A central skeleton supports spatial structures while residential unit are built around an H section, in which the central wall is complemented by a number of locked houses. Academic (scientific) units are built of space trusses. Agro-industrial unit consists of a structure of massive floors, fixed on the central bearing wall.
Inspired by the towering cranes found in big cities, the 380 meter-tall GreenGru skyscraper provides public transportation via air to residents of metropolises with traffic problems or airports located far from the core. It also works as an energy station, generating enough power from within to run its own systems and light up some of the surrounding city as well. The building’s name capitalizes on the energy creation inside, a process the designer’s have dubbed “Artificial Photosynthesis Installation,” explaining the “green.” “Gru” is the Italian translation of “tower crane,” the basis of its look. The tower’s mast is made of carbon-nanotube-reinforced steel, with large concrete counterweights underground for stabilization. The building’s façade, inspired by twisted rubber bands, is made of graphite, which is ten times stronger and six times lighter than steel. The graphite is covered in a polymeric carbon dioxide-absorber called zeolight, which lowers carbon dioxide levels during the night; sunlight exposure during the day allows the molecules to float away. This means the exterior of the building creates a greenhouse effect inside, making the environment excellent for growing plants. The ground level and first five floors of the skyscraper are reserved for commercial use; the 80 floors above that hold offices and residential units.  Above that, the upper portion of the building has a high-speed turbine that spins around the building to generate power. Its exterior is clad in flexible and lightweight polymer-based solar cells for further energy generation. Inside, the mechanical systems take neutral water and separate its molecules, storing the hydrogen and oxygen cells separately to produce useable energy in a process that harkens to photosynthesis. It is the stored hydrogen and the power it is able to produce that is responsible for energizing the building; it is also stored and transported in cells made of magnesium nanoparticles and polymethyl methacrylate to other parts of the city for use as energy elsewhere.
Constructing a building that floats in the ocean has inherent benefits, the main boon being buoyancy. Locating a structure in the sea allows the possibility for massive complexes to be constructed without the restraints of gravity, opening possibilities for great architectural experimentation. Enter “Oceanscraper,” a design for a cone-shaped underwater city complex. The Oceanscraper has a large “bowl” in the center to allow daylight to reach the depths; surrounding the bowl is a ring of living space. Submarines dock into the living space, and residents remain inside, creating a community of submarine apartments. This mobility affords freedom for residents and also allows each city complex to shift rapidly, if need be. Submarines are free to navigate both within the bowl and outside of the complex, and can dock collectively in themed groups, such as submarines that are performing research, or those that are hosting tourist groups, etc. Each complex has two Borei nuclear submarines stationed at the bottom; one is positioned to face the sky, the other to face the sea floor. Borei submarines are the fourth-class nuclear subs used by the Russian Navy, but their life spans will only carry them through to the middle of the 21st century. After they are decommissioned, they must sit on the ocean floor with radioactive waste material inside, posing great potential threats to sea life. Instead of letting them rot, The Oceanscraper will commission these subs back into use, using them as nuclear power stations. Power lines from the submarines will connect directly to the city complexes to bring them energy. The power will be generated from the 16 intercontinental missile launch silos located inside each Borei submarine.
Tehran, Iran’s largest city and its capital, is plagued by extreme air pollution, 80% of which is caused by auto traffic. Amongst its 8.5 million residents, it is estimated that 27 people die daily from pollution-related diseases, showing the tangible and deadly dangers that result from the traffic caused by urban sprawl. To combat this reality, the designers of the Tehran Tower propose building up, locating massive skyscrapers within Tehran to house masses of residents centrally. Demolishing unimportant old buildings will create space both for the two legs of the large tower, which is connected above ground to create a wide building expanse, and for green space that will make the urban expanse as a whole more livable. By designing a tower with two legs that connect above ground, precious land is saved from development: the skyscraper occupies just 1,200 square meters of land versus the 30,000 square meters a typical tower would need for development. Each tower provides 1,200 housing units. The overall shape for the tower is inspired by muqarnas, traditional Iranian vault and cable systems. Like concave vaults between two pillars, the residential units will hang en masse from the two sturdy legs of this structure. The legs are composed of trusses with parking cores at the bottom. (Cars park up the legs until the building convenes in the middle.) This helps keep them lightweight, and the structure as a whole flexible in the case of earthquakes. On the top of the structure, a solid floor is laid atop the hanging cells to create a green rooftop expanse to be enjoyed by residents. The tall height of the garden and the prefab residential cells help protect them from the noise pollution of the city, and subtle structural design elements provide shading to units in the summer to protect them from the harsh sun.
天上人间 (Tian-shan-ren-jian – Heaven and Earth) is the physical manifestation of the traditional Shanshui painting, which aims to reach the ideal lifestyle. Earth, with 7 billion people, is continuously increasing her load with three new babies born every second. With limited resources, the rapid growth of population has caused many problems included environmental degradation, ocean acidification, ozone holes, lack of fresh water, and constant loss of biodiversity. The “Heaven and Earth” project is a utopia wonderland residing in the air. There are mountains, rivers, lakes, forests, and animals. It solves the problems that exist on Earth, including food, water, and housing. Heaven and Earth is operated by the Maglev Technology to allow it to float in the air. The repulsion caused by the aircraft’s magnetic system and the Earth’s magnetic filed will control the floating city – there are a large number of molecular magnets distributed along the underside of the vessel. The rotation of the curved bottom can generate the power necessary for the city. This rotation could also maintain the balance of the flight. Small, magnetic suspension aircrafts are used as the transport links between the vessel and Earth.
Housed within 55,000 glaciers in the Himalaya Mountains sits 40 percent of the world’s fresh water. The massive ice sheets are melting at a faster-than-ever pace due to climate change, posing possible dire consequences for the continent of Asia and the entire world stand, and especially for the villages and cities that sit on the seven rivers that come are fed from the Himalayas’ runoff as they respond with erratic flooding or drought. The “Himalaya Water Tower” is a skyscraper located high in the mountain range that serves to store water and helps regulate its dispersal to the land below as the mountains’ natural supplies dry up. The skyscraper, which can be replicated en masse, will collect water in the rainy season, purify it, freeze it into ice and store it for future use. The water distribution schedule will evolve with the needs of residents below; while it can be used to help in times of current drought, it’s also meant to store plentiful water for future generations. The lower part of the Himalaya Water tower is comprised of six stem-like pipes that curve and wind together and collect and store water. Like the stem of a plant, these pipes grow strong as they absorb their maximum water capacity. In each of the six stems, a core tube is flanked by levels and levels of cells, which hold the water. The upper part of the building – the part that is visible above the snow line – is used for frozen storage. Four massive cores support steel cylindrical frames that, like the stems below, hold levels that radiate out, creating four steel tubes filled with ice. In between the two sections are mechanical systems that help freeze the water when the climatic conditions aren’t able to do so, purify the water and regulate the distribution of water and ice throughout the structure. At the bottom of the structure, surrounding the six intertwined water tubes is a transport system that regulates fresh water distribution to the towns and cities below. The curving channels connect the mountains to the villages, and are also hold within them a railway for the transport of people and goods.
Industrialization and mining are destroying China’s natural settings, especially mountains, which are excavated to the point of destruction in man’s search for minerals. These processes don’t just devistate regions’ ecologies; they also displace whole populations of people, separating them from their homes and also their means of living, as many in these rural areas work as farmers. The “Mountain Band-Aid” project seeks to simultaneously restore the displaced Hmong mountain people to their homes and work as it restores the mountain ecology of the Yunnan mountain range. This is achieved with a two-layer construction project. The outer layer is a skyscraper that is built into and stretched across the mountain. By building the structure into, and as part of, the mountain, the skyscraper helps the Hmong people recover their original lifestyle. It is organized internally by the villagers to replicate the traditional village design they utilized before they were displaced. The building’s placement on the mountain means that its height is mainly determined by the height of the mountain. The design as a whole is one of “dual recovery:” the Hmong people living on the damaged mountain can keep the unique organization of space in their village, recreating it within the skyscraper, but they won’t be contributing to the mountain’s degradation. Instead, they help the mountain’s environmental restoration by recycling domestic water for mountain irrigation. It is this irrigation system that comprises the project’s inner layer: an irrigation system is constructed to stabilize the mountain’s soil and grow plants. The skyscraper is constructed in the traditional Chinese Southern building style known as Chuan Dou. Small residential blocks are used as the framework: The blocks are freely organized as they were in the original village, but the framework controls this organization of blocks into different floors, acting as the contour line in traditional Hmong village.
The designer of the “Monument to Civilization” asks you to reconsider what constitutes ‘spectacular.’ Skyscrapers are meant to wow, to impress. But other things within cities are also impressive, the designer says: “New York, for instance: If we put its annual garbage on a area of a typical tower footprint, we’ll get a 1,300 meter high landfill tower, which is about as three times tall as the Empire State Building (450 meters). Isn’t that spectacular?” As landfill possibilities surrounding growing metropolises disappear and cities fight waste management issues, the power of trash needs to be reconsidered. The accumulation of waste, for example, actually creates potential energy-recycle opportunities, such as when gas is emitted during decomposition. The Monument of Civilization proposal suggests locating trash vertically in a tower and using the energy generated from its decomposition to help power the surrounding city. By locating the tower in the heart of the city, energy is provided in immediate proximity, and money is also saved in transportation costs when garbage no longer needs to be shipped out of town. It also able to serve there as a loud reminder of society’s wasteful ways: “The ever-growing Monument may evoke the citizens’ introspection and somewhat leads to the entire city’s waste-decreasing and better recycling,” the designer says. Seeing the tower as an “Earth-Friendliness Meter,” the designer says, means the shorter the tower, the friendlier the city, as that means less waste is made and more is recycled. “Perhaps all metropolitan cities would inverse the worldwide competition from being the tallest to the shortest.”
Energy is one of the major concerns of our current society. Today sustainable architecture seeks to minimize the negative environmental impact of buildings by enhancing efficiency and moderation in the use of materials. Noise is part of our urban environment and our everyday life and it is one of the most prevalent pollution form in cities, but it is also an important source of energy not valued yet. The soundscraper takes advantage of city noise pollution by capturing airborne sound and converting it into usable energy. One of the most abundant energy sources is ambient motion. Vibrations can provide plentiful energy, and can be transferred through many media, making this form of kinetic energy very useful. The Soundscraper is located next to main transport infrastructures, mostly outside city centers where noise pollution is at it maximum. Motorway junction, railway hub represent no man’s land in the urban territory and areas of greatest efficiency to produce energy . The skyscraper ‘s facade is evolutive, it vibrates depending on intentisity and direction of urban noises. As the skyscraper ‘s skin, the electro active lashes supported by a light metallic structure, form the exterior of the building, provides maximum exposure to city noise. Covering a wide spectrum of frequencies, this noise includes vehicular traffic, pedestrians, train, building inhabitants, and even aircraft passing overhead. 84000 electro-active lashes are integrated throughout the 100 meters high tower. The lashes are covered with sound sensors P.F.I.G (Parametric Frequency Increased Generators). A specialized PFIG energy harvester convert sounds vibrations caused by surrounding noises to capture kinetic energy, after which an array of transducer ‘cells’ employing a novel actuation method are used to convert the mechanical energy into electricity. The electrical current is then transferred to a main storage compartment to be redistributed to the city. Based on scientific researches results, one tower could produce until 150 MW/h representing 10 % of urban lighting consumption of Los Angeles. In the same time, this renewable energy could participate to reduce CO2 emissions. The energetic tower will be a landmark, creating a new interaction between neglected peripheric spaces and global cityscape, by giving a new function to huge interstitial spaces. Each motorway junction could welcome a soundscraper tower to generate enough power to provide electrical needs of a whole city.
As technological innovative and higher latest skyscrapers can be, they still need to rely on the support to the ground. So a higher heights usually means more unstableness as well as weaker capacity to resist disasters. The project proposes a mega hex grid that evolves around the earth circumference at a stratosphere heigh, the principle that support this hypothesis is that it seem to be that in a building the larger the span is, the scale and the unstableness will proportionally increase. But if the span is large enough within the scale of the earth, the unstableness brought by the size decreases inversely. In this case the network of buildings  and bridges connected to each other, covering the entire circumference of the earth, will no longer need structural ground support and can be suspended in the air by the effect of the earth gravity. The elevated bridges and buildings that relate the grid can reach any height with out worrying about overturning, earth-quakes, floods and any other natural disasters. The earth needs to find a environmental balance. As human over-used the resources the earth is being heavily damaged, eventually approaching to a point in which the earth will be unsuitable for human living. The modern skyscraper has represent for years the modern urban ideal. But in a non far future the booming population increase will be a catastrophic, being the stratosphere grid  the only platform for ensure the continuity of human civilization.
The outbreak of the Industrial Revolution in Europe, since 1750, unavoidably brought severe environmental pollution. The most explicit consequence is the Acid Deposition caused by waste of large-scale industrial production. Produced by the fossil fuel used in abundance, as well as the heavy traffic and industrial production, the SO2&NOx drives the PH value of atmosphere under 5.6. Gradually precipitating to the surface of the earth, these acidic materials have caused great harm to plant, architecture and human beings. The project aim to use a gentle way to manage Acid Deposition and eventually turn pollutants into available resources (reclaimed water & chemical fertilizer) for the region of Chongqing. The project is set to be 200-300m high where acidic pollutants gather. The aerocyst filled up with H2 at the top of the building provides buoyancy to it. The porous membrane attached to the air bags can absorb the acidic materials, like acid fog, collect and put them into core purifier where neutralization takes place with alkaline substance produced by nitrogen-fixing microorganism via biological action, which is stored in the purifier center. With neutralization, acid pollutants can be transformed into neutral liquid with ammonium salt which will be absorbed by plants attached on tentacle pipelines as green nutrients. The remained liquid will be delivered to the terminal tank as the source of reclaimed water.
The Skinscape project was inspired from the idea that the natural environment modifies architecture as time passes by and in some instances nature even reclaims it. For example, Banyan trees now cover the Angkor Wat Temple in Cambodia built in 12th century. Experts have decided not to remove the trees because they now serve as part of the structural system – building and nature have become one. This project explores the possibility of creating a building tissue between skyscrapers. This tissue not only adds unto the buildings but also modifies them to allow for new programs. The idea is that buildings need to evolve with time because their initial design intentions and programs morph with time. Vacant space become active and a new hybrid emerges from the integration of two distinct buildings.
The global increase in population, its concentration in cities, and the development of emerging countries lead to a big increase in energy need.  The Earth has undergone dramatic climatic changes, which have been linked, by a large consensus, to greenhouse gases (GHG). The concentration of GHG in the atmosphere directly affects the global temperature, with potentially global, dramatic consequences. Without any doubt, it is indispensable to define an objective of maximum emissions, in order to limit problems in the future in the Earth. The Project Nomad goal is to change the atmospheric and soil chemistry of Mars to make it hospitable for human colonization. The concept is to build nomad factories that use Martian minerals to create complex carbon greenhouse gases (GHG) in the atmosphere. The project has two main phases: (1) Blue Mars and (2) Green Mars. The Project Nomad has been designed to complete Phase One – we know how to warm planets, our main goal is terraforming Mars from a cold, dead planet into a warm, vital planet with green forests, blue oceans and a sustainable ecosystem.
From the suffocation of Pompeii to the air traffic gridlock suffered in Iceland in 2010, the tephra that is expelled during volcanic eruptions has long posed grave threats to civilization. Since volcanic eruptions cannot be controlled, the designers of the VolcanElectric Mask I propose constructing an industrial structure over a volcano that can collect tephra during an eruption, keeping it out of the skies and away from cities and villages below, and also harness the power from the volcano’s heat in calm periods to provide clean electric power to surrounding areas. For the prototype, the designers imagine locating the structure on the Popocatepetl Volcano, which is 70 km from Mexico City, is one of the ten most active volcanoes in the developed world and has 500,000 people living within 10 to 30 km from its crater. The VolcanElectric Mask is actually a multi-layered skin that covers the volcano, perched above its surface and its lava crater. The skin is comprised of the adjoining tops of tentacles, which are shaped like screws, that are relatively flat on top – this is what is visible when one looks at the volcano – but are long and sharpen to a point at the bottom. This long, sharp bottom allows each tentacle to burrow into the volcano itself to monitor its temperature, helping to predict eruptions, and also allows each one to capture carbon dioxide that is used to create and store dry ice. In periods of calm, each tentacle operates as a power station. The top layers of the tentacles, the screw head-like areas, which are above the ground, have ample openings, allowing the volcano’s surface to be ecologically undisturbed, with access to rain and fresh air. To create thermal energy, the top level of each tentacle acts as a rainwater collector. After a rain, water is transported to a sub-layer of the tentacle, where it comes into contact with lava. The resulting steam turns turbines in the middle of the tentacle, where the top meets the long, pointed bottom portion, and this creates clean thermal power. When the tentacles sense an impending eruption, they first activate shields that close the openings on the top layers of the tentacles – a process that keeps the lava, tephra and other debris that erupts out of the volcano from ever actually being dispelled into the air or flowing into nearby towns. The tentacles then shoot the stored dry ice into the volcano’s core to cool the lava down so that when the volcano does erupts and coat the tentacles in lava, the temperature will not be so high as to ruin the tentacles’ machinery. When the volcano does finally erupt, the outside world is shielded. Once the lava has cooled, the tephra is collected and shipped to an industrial plant to be used for production, and the surfaces of the tentacles open once more, allowing thermal energy production to resume.
The Symbiocity project rethinks the way prisons are built and operated in an effort to better criminal justice and rehabilitation systems. Traditionally, say the designers of the Symbiocity, prisons act like a parasite on cities, sucking resources but giving nothing in return. By locating prisons in city cores, they propose, prisoners are surrounded by society (instead of isolated in prisons located in rural areas), and therefore inspired to better themselves so they can reenter society. Other changes are also proposed: prisoners will be paid more for the work they do while locked up, but they will also be charged for their accommodations, food, and other amenities, inspiring them to work harder to earn perks like nicer cells or better food. Prisons will also be forced to become more self sufficient, instead of relying on taxpayer dollars: this will be done with inmates having to grow their own food in vertical farms and raise their own livestock. It will also take in money by renting out its facilities for functions in the busy, surrounding city, and also selling memberships to the gym located inside, as prisoners only have access to those facilities for part of the day. The prison itself is a massive tower that promotes life: its circulation systems mimic those in the body, flowing through organs (or clusters areas of similar programmatic uses); it is filled with plants and green spaces; and it is flexible so that the structure can grow when needed. Vertical farms are located on the east and west ends of the structure to maximize sunlight exposure, and prisoner cells are oriented to the north and south to promote natural ventilation. The gamuts of sustainable energy generation methods are utilized: solar panels, wind turbines, hydroelectric turbines, wave energy capture, and biomass cultivation. This energy generation also raises money if prisons choose to sell their extra energy back to the city.
By extending the ethos of reuse to the aqueous environment, In Charybdis reconsiders the plastic detritus in the world’s oceans as building material. Harnessing the complex, dynamic system of forces of the oceans and its intensive gradients, this project coalesces plastic particulates into a self-limiting, dynamically formed, yet chemically inert, super-tall building structure that plunges deep into the ocean’s depths. Utilizing advanced material technologies, it provides scaffolding for deep-sea research vessels. These vessels navigate through the water column, over time converging and dispersing within the structure, forming and disbanding spontaneous research communities as they venture to the depths and slowly return to air. By utilizing an existing material condition to build a research facility in the Great Pacific Garbage Patch, this project leverages cleanup and rehabilitation for the advancement science, creating a novel venue for the study of the last and great, earthly frontier—the deep ocean. The project’s specific site within the ocean gyres is both emblematic and anomalous. Situated within a fractal gyre of motion and framed by three subsurface mountains, the site is a vortex within a vortex, its conflicting currents both sculpting our structure and harnessed by it for dynamic stabilization. Gradients of salinity, temperature, pressure, fluctuations in surface wind speed and direction, ocean currents, and magnetic anomalies are all a part of the complex system of forces that drives material down into the ocean’s depth, and shapes this research facility over the years. The intensive properties of pressure, temperature and light have a material impact on the quality and nature of the space of this underwater structure. The gradient of light slides towards total darkness between 0 and 700 meters, creating unique sensational atmospheres. The Ekman Spiral twists the aqueous environment between 0 and 100 meters, creating a denser and more habitable scaffold near the surface. These, the force of pressure, the effect of declining temperature, and the increasing salinity, all contribute to yield vastly divergent research environments in this inverted ‘skyscraper’. The project reaches 350 meters into the ocean’s depth with this vertical research facility. It is shaped by the robust variability of water, an ecology registered in material structure, form, and program, a balancing act between gravity and buoyancy.
The quantity of small plastic fragments floating in the north-east Pacific Ocean has been increased a hundred times over the past 40 years accumulating and forming what we know as the Great Pacific Garbage Patch,  a great hazard to the earth ecosystems balance. Studies estimate that the amount of plastic floating on the Pacific Ocean is twice the size of the US State of Texas. Kinetic Islands address this problem and propose a solution for disposal huge-amount of plastic and garbage patches in North-east Pacific Ocean, and take advantage of them as construction elements for a futuristic floating city. The project propose a modular study on floating elements. Each module or element works as a flotation device, using 3 floats, that allow it to move trough the pacific ocean currents. Each module will recollect as much garbage as it is founding trough his path. Then when its full it will move to meet the nearest units to form a garbage chain. By the time many chains floating in Pacific Ocean, meet each other, they can be assembled like a Spiral Shape formed by ocean currents and centralized like a big island. That island can be covered by soil in order to have c a strongly solid founding that allow to develop farming crops. The units in the island will work as an artificial land, and eventually can be steady enough to support agricultural activities, as well the possibility to use vacant units as buildings blocks for shelters housing and resorts.
The Urban Earth Worm skyscraper uses one of the basest of creatures as its inspiration. Just as earthworms clean the soil and solve pollution problems, promulgating life in thriving ecosystems, this skyscraper will clean air and soil pollution in cities and also feed cities – literally. The structure is in fact even shaped like a worm, horizontally extends and curves throughout the city, cleaning the air, processing waste and providing food in not just one but many points. The top part of the structure has growing tubes that are filled with soil and grow trees and plants. This green area cleans the city’s air and also provides crops for the city’s residents. An energy station near the ground (but still within the worm) takes the city’s garbage and processes it into biomass from which energy can be generated. This energy fuels the skyscraper’s own processes but also is sent back to the city. The biomass is also used to replenish the soil that is used to grow the trees and crops in upper levels. Soil is periodically transported down to the energy station and mixed with biomass. It is left to sit for some time and replenish its nutrients. When that process is complete, it is transported back up to the growing levels, and the soil already up there is moved down to be regenerated.
Mankind has always face the threat of extinction, from an extreme natural disaster. “Zero” is a radical skyscraper, designed to ensure mankind’s survival after global devastation. Like an emergency toolbox, it will be the starting point to the reestablish social order through digital communication and information exchange. “Zero” will provide the crucial elements to support life and to rebuild our existence, even if we had to start from zero. The key element to ensure that humanity is not lost is information. We live in the digital age.  Communication and knowledge It is our most important resources today. “Zero” is dedicated to gathering information; an online data vault to make sure human knowledge is not lost. Government, institutes and organization around the globe are able to upload information to “Zero” data vault. Anything considered important from architectural construction, agricultural planning, scientific records, language translation, or even family photos can be stored within this data vaults. If a “Zero” is destroyed, the data will not be lost as they are duplicated and shared around the world among other “Zero” units. The skyscraper is designed to be site in strategic locations across the globe. Once the tower is activated, these data will be accessible and shared among the survivors to rebuild our society. With the right knowledge and the right guidance, anything is achievable. The building it’s self-sufficient and capable to support life by providing it with all the necessary resources including energy, shelter, food, water, and information.
The massive amount of waste and debris accumulated in the Pacific Ocean is known as the Pacific Garbage Patch. The Scraper is a floating building designed to collect and compact the garbage into cubes with the use of automated robots. These cubes will later be burned by two different actions. The first system burns the cubes using space rockets exhausts during launch. The second one is the transportation of the cubes to outer space and let them re-enter the Earth’s atmosphere to burn down.
“Big Wood” is a prototype on mass timber construction that offers the possibility to build more responsibly while actively sequestering pollutants from our cities. Sited in Chicago; “Big Wood” aims to write a new chapter in high-rise construction. Steel and concrete structural systems have been the primary materials of choice in skyscrapers construction over the years. Unfortunately, these materials have a heigh energy production and recycle costs considering the entire life of a structure. Understanding that the construction industry accounts for 39% of man-made carbon emissions, it’s imperative that we develop more intelligent and less environmentally destructive strategies for construction. Recent studies had proved the success of 20-30 story mass timber structures with the potential to go higher using hybrid systems. “Big Wood” is a mixed-use university complex sited in Chicago’s South Loop neighborhood. The structure consists of a mass timber system utilizing lumber grown and manufactured on a brown-field site in South Chicago. Known as “South Works”, the tree farm site was once home of a steel mill, where raw materials were brought in via barge on Lake Michigan. A majority of the steel used to build Chicago’s famous towers (including Willis and John Hancock) came through the South Works steel mill. Implementing a tree farm will extract toxins from the soil as well as carbon dioxide from Chicago’s air.
Building an underwater city is the main goal of this project that responds to the sea level rise in the upcoming decades. The US National Research Council estimates that in this century alone, the sea level will rise between 50 and 200 centimeters – leaving some existing cities underwater. The project has been designed as a floating bowl with a massive atrium open to the sky where sunlight will be able to reach all the underwater levels. The geometry is composed of an array of boxes in different sizes that allow for very specific program delineation. The stepping and shifting of volumes create and intricate system of terraces and voids imagined as community and leisure areas. The project also resembles a traditional hillside town with a network of stairs connecting the various levels. Providing views to the mysterious world beneath the water surface is a priority of the design while vegetation also plays an important role in the design. The idea is to provide as much green surface as possible for parks, farms, and oxygen generation. In addition, the city has been designed to rotate according to light exposure and transported to different locations around the globe.
Moses is a decentralized, self-sustaining city unit, populated by approximately 25,000 inhabitants, which offers the transition of men from land to sea, so that the land could be used for food production and the Earth could start its process of self-regeneration from the negative human impact. It functions independently as a city-unit, as well as a cluster of units, which share information, energy, and goods. Each city-unit is placed on the intersection of perpendicular traffic lanes, which form the grid that serves as a connection between cities and land through a network of ultra fast trains. Moses takes maximum advantage of its offshore location to produce renewable energy by two main systems. It consists of two structures that can rotate independently to utilize wind and water flow energy.
By 2100 it will be extremely unhealthy to live in megacity areas and people will migrate to the countryside seeking cleaner air, food, and water. By 2150 megacities like Beijing, Jakarta, New York, and London will be abandoned ghost cities and automated bulldozers will be sent to demolish buildings and infrastructures, saving only sites of historical value. By recycling the demolished material, the bulldozers will start the construction of Sphera. Sphera is a new type of living environment, where the citizens of the world will live during the “earth’s regeneration”, by using innovative and sustainable energies. At the same time, the purpose of Sphera is to build an entirely new civilization, where people will try to redesign their culture and generate a sustainable society by creating a global-resource based economy that enables all people to reach their highest potential, a society that protects and preserves its environment. All people, regardless of political views, social customs and religion, ultimately require the same resources, such as clean air and water, arable land, medical care, and relevant education. Each Sphera provides all the  needs of a human being and can hold 4 million inhabitants. Sphera is divided into different areas, from bottom to top: factories, research, educational, mixed use, and residential. Included in the idea of self-sufficiency is the automatization of the production, distribution, and disposal lines, and thereby allowing Spehra’s inhabitants to develop their diversity and explore their individuality.
Nowadays approximately 3 billion people rely on rice as their major source of food. It is expected that the rice demand will continue to accelerate and by 2025 more than 4 billion people will rely on it. As a consequence local governments in East Asia have established a total control on rice fields and production. This has been a disastrous event for the local farmers and has left the price of rice in absolute control of a handful of people. It is also expected that the price of rice will gradually increase to a point in which the majority of the Asian population will not be able to afford it. This project proposes the creation of decentralized aeroponic vertical farmlands that will be able to provide enough rice for future generations. The basic structure consists of an array of bamboo parallelograms that create stepping terraces of rice fields. It counts with a natural irrigation system where gradually flows down with gravity through a network of irrigation paths. In addition, the proposed skyscrapers will be located within the cities to avoid unnecessary processing, packaging, transportation, and storage. The facilities will also be operated by the local community providing countless jobs and opportunities for the inhabitants.
The form of a skyscraper is a growing crystal – a structure characterized by the inconstancy and regularity of its elements. The height of the units ranges from 130 to 180 m. At the full height, in the center of Multipurpose Research Complex (MNC), is a static rod – a quantum safe energy source, which will produce energy in the required quantity. The center of quantum computing, greenhouses, walking tracks and, aeration blocks are placed in immediate proximity. The external crystal structure of the building is mobile and can be transformed depending on the configuration of the plan and the conditions of research, to flow into one another, forming a transition between the other MNCs. Transparent gateways for people access to the building are located at different heights while the ground floors are occupied by technical units, air purification, and transportation compartments – 10% of the total area. The research part is the largest part of the building, different laboratories, lecture halls, and areas for meditation are located here taking up 65%. The information part takes 4-5 floors and comprises a media center, a cafe, and a conference room – 25%.
This project begins with the premise that Shanghai’s distribution of water resources is out of balance. The first problem is a lack of groundwater; according to the designers of the Water Re-balance tower, the people of Shanghai, in the quest for clean water, have taken so much water from under the city since 1860 that the city itself has sunk 1.7 meters in the past 40 years. Additionally, the water supplies that do exist today are largely polluted. Despite that shortage, the city does experience flooding in monsoon season, and the Suzhou River’s level can sometimes reach to the city’s streets. By building towers that can collect and purify rainwater and also purify the water from the river, several advantageous things occur: clean, drinkable water is readily available for the city; rising river levels are mitigated before flooding occurs; and clean water can also be pumped back under ground to fix the sinking subsidence problem the city is experiencing. Further, the tower collects organic matter as it filters the water and uses that waste to develop and feed farmland, wetlands, and to grow green algae. The farm and wetlands purify the air, and the algae is cultivated and processed within the tower by a generator to create energy. The tower is thin and is based underground, allowing the structure to pump collected and cleaned rainwater into the underground water table. From this base it spirals up and flowers at the top with a large platform that holds a green roof that collects the rainwater. After it is collected on top, water filters as it flows down through the tower, and is clean by the time it reaches ground level. There, a pump either directs the water for use by the city, or it is sent underground. Grey water is also captured and used to irrigate the vertical gardens throughout the structure. Turbines are also placed through the spiraling tower to generate energy with the water flow. That energy, plus that generated by the algae, creates enough to both power the tower itself and send energy back into the city.
The Crater Scraper project is an imagined solution for the healing of the Earth’s surface as the planet suffers the impact of major asteroid strikes. Asteroid craters could be filled in with built settlements, holding communities of different sizes (depending on the size of the crater). As cities historically form at a core and extend peripherally, Crater Scrapers too have a central core that connects the settlement as a whole vertically and horizontally. Elevator systems link infrastructure vertically, from the bottom of the crater to the Earth’s surface; at the top, a separate transportation system links the community across the expanse of the filled-in indentation. At the bottom of the city, people traverse its length on foot. The crater is filled with towers and structures that are covered by a roof system that has large holes, causing the built community, from an aerial view, to resemble mesh. Imagining that top-down view, each cylindrical opening of the mesh holds a type of development that is needed for the community to function, from residences to shops and offices to hospitals to recreational spaces. The community as a whole is developed with the garden city model in mind, featuring a central park located at the core and open green spaces interspersed throughout. The roof allows for sunlight to stream in thanks to the holes, but it also holds vegetation on its solid structure, which allows for water capture, is ecologically advantageous to the Earth’s surface and also provides insulation for the crater city below. The water that falls onto the roof surface is redirected so that it falls into the crater community on the edges of the actual crater, creating a water curtain, and is also partially directed into the central park to create a beautiful waterfall. The concept as a whole, the designers say, is to unify opposites: ground and underground, artificial and natural, disaster and rebirth, to create a utopian reality in the aftermath of the disaster of an asteroid strike.
The abandoned Shenfu Dongsheng coalfield, was China’s largest coal-producing base goaf. The goaf not only influenced the local soil and land, but also wasted the terrestrial heat at a large scale whit a lot of consequences such as collapse,debris flow and soil erosion, destruction of building and cropland, atmosphere pollution etc. The project proposes to reuse the goaf and part of the pipelines on the working platforms. The vertical pipelines will work as the chief transportation system. The main volumes are deposited in the site. Applying principles used in miner, the horizontal skyscraper will use the existing vertical miner elevator systems as a way of transportation. The housing and habitable space will be underground , supported by vertical tube that will bring fresh air in the water will be taken from the underground soil trough  advanced and explorative techniques and will be heated by geothermal processes. The terrestrial heat is used to cultivate the saplings and then the grown trees are replanted on the mountains to renovate the worn-out land. The hole complex will have different features and programs such as housing, office, tourism, commercial, crop etc. each one located in a strategic place in the mountain heigh. In order to continue the life style in the cave which was lasted for thousands years, the local life style take advantage of the mountain life. The residences are built along the surface of the mountains. In this way, the project takes the most advantage of local water and soil.
Located in the Republic of Chile, Atacama Desert is one of the oldest and driest places on Earth. This desert is fenced by the Andes Mountains on one side and the Chilean Coast Range on the other. The moisture which comes from the Pacific Ocean cannot get through either side and creates a “rain shadow effect.” Due to this geographic situation, Atacama Desert is constantly dry even though it is located near the Pacific Ocean. People living in Atacama are at risk and degradation is spreading rapidly. However, a dense fog known as “Camanchaca” could potentially end desertification in the Atacama Desert. Sourced from the Pacific Ocean, this fog has the potential to nourish plants and other living organisms. “Mist-Tree,”  is a skyscraper which can bring new life to Atacama, Chile. It proposes a simple solution to end the drought coming from the high ranges of the mountains. The skyscraper penetrates through the Andes mountain range and captures fog from the sky of the Pacific Ocean. The building façade is a “net structure” which attracts condensation to form on the building itself. It promotes this condensation by gaining heat on the interior, harvesting sunlight though its large glass structure. As the moisture from the fog is captured, the gathered water is brought down to the Atacama area to nourish life. Inside of “Mist-Tree” is no different; the water collected also gives life to a variety of plants throughout interior green spaces. This building becomes a node in the mountains, a starting point for anti-desertification reaching out to make further green lands. “Mist-Tree” skyscraper would provide numerous benefits for promoting a high quality of life in and around Atacama.
The rising of sea level is one of the most dramatic crisis that modern cities face in the last decades. It is estimated that sea level will rise of more than 500mm by the end of this century. At that time, 600 million people will lose their homeland with 3000 cities sinking into the water. Since 2/3 of the world’s population is settled in the coastal areas. The Promised Land is conceived as “humans” final homeland, a self-sustainable city on submerged places, shape as massive cross rising over the water level.  The building works as a modular self assembly system. Prefabricated girders and columns made of reinforced concrete are fixed on the ground as foundation, then prefabricated floors are placed in order to sustain the different programatic modules. By using a modular assembly system, the skyscraper is able to be built constantly, making it possible to develop upper programs continually. Each block its design in different sizes according to the program that will hold, making it flexible to adapt different functions and meet different requirements. The smaller blocks are housings cells while the bigger blocks are public spaces, such as shops, schools, hospitals, recreational spaces, etc. Housing will be located on the upper layers just above the horizon while the graves will located under the horizon. The building its conceived applying the principle of water tank floatation system that steel ships use. When the water rise, the tank can be emergency closed against the waves of the sea, only let in as much water as it requires
The Ring of Mars is a closed self-sufficient off-line mega-structure, which contains all functions for comfortable existence and development of all life forms.The ring is designed on the model of linear cities, a circular system for comfortable connection of all parts of the structure as single agglomerate. The ring is conventionally subdivided in zones, residential zone and green zone. The residential zone contains accommodation modules, i.e. houses being automatically man-carrying aircrafts, in which people arrive for settling in the ring. The green zone includes simulations of Earth’s habitats such as forests, fields, meadows, rivers, and lakes.
During the last decades of global warming, the polar ice caps have experienced a severe rise in temperature causing the northern and southern ice shelves to become thin, fractured, and melt into the ocean. Rebuilding the arctic layers is the primary objective of this proposal which cools down the Earth’s surface by reducing heat gain in vulnerable arctic regions. The Polar Umbrella’s buoyant super-structure becomes a statement for the prevention of future depletion of our protective arctic region. Through its desalinization and power facilities, this arctic skyscraper becomes a floating metropolis equipped with NOAA (National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration) research laboratories, renewable power stations, dormitory-style housing units, eco-tourist attractions, and ecological habitats for wildlife. A series of these structures would be strategically located in the most affected areas. Salt water is used to produce a renewable source of energy through an osmotic (salinity gradient power) power facility housed within the building’s core. In addition, the structure’s immense canopy allows for the reduction of heat gain on the arctic surface while harvesting solar energy. The umbrella’s thermal skin boasts a series of modules that are composed of a polyethylene piping system that pumps brackish water. Finally, the Polar Umbrella also regenerates the ice caps using harvest chambers that freeze the ocean water.
The Phobia Skyscraper is a new form of modular suburban residential development for Paris, France. It is located over the “Petite Ceinture”, a former industrial site with excellent views of the city and an extensive transportation network. Two main ground slabs and an empty tower structure, constructed of recycled industrial materials, hold prefabricated units that are stacked to utilize the same plumbing system but are rotated to open to outdoor spaces. The units are grouped around outdoor common green spaces. These common areas, or “nuclei centers,” are equipped with displays that provide real-time feedback for residents on societal issues within the community, occupancy rates of the structure, and messages. It also contains water-collection equipment and solar power panels.
The rapid increase of population within the major cities around the world has led to poor development and serious urban design problems, including the lack of infrastructure, housing, and recreational areas. In Beijing, a large portion of the historic center has been demolished. One way to make scarce green and recreation space available to residents of this crowded city is a skyscraper that floats above the land, taking new development to the sky. The Light Park stays afloat thanks to a large, mushroom cap-like helium-filled balloon at its top, and solar-powered propellers directly below. Programmatic platforms that host parks, sports fields, green houses, restaurants, and other uses are suspended from the top of the structure by reinforced steel cables; the platforms fan in different directions around the spherical vessel to balance its weight. These slabs are also staggered to allow for maximum exposure to sunlight on each level. Translucent solar panels cover the top of the vessel to power the uses below, and water collectors, also located at the top, direct precipitation towards filters that send clean water throughout the structure.
Sand Babel is a group of ecological structures designed as scientific research facilities and tourist attractions for the desert. The structures are divided into two parts. The first part, above ground, consists of several independent structures for a desert community while the second part is partially underground and partially above ground connecting several buildings and creating a multi-functional tube network system. The main portion of each building is constructed with sand, sintered through a solar-powered 3D printer. The top structures are based on the natural phenomena called Tornadoes and Mushroom Rocks, which is very common in deserts. It utilizes a spiral skeleton structure, which is tall, straight and with strong tension, to meet the requirements of residential, sightseeing and scientific research facilities. The dual funnel model not only improves cross-ventilation, but also generates water condensation atop the structures based on temperature differences. The net structure for the portion of underground and surface is similar to tree roots. This design not only helps to keep flowing sand dunes in place but also facilitates communication among the buildings.
If you feel ill, you seek medical assistance. If the city is sick, what should we do? The Climatology Tower is a proposed skyscraper designed as a research center that evaluates urban meteorology and corrects the environment through mechanical engineering. The skyscraper analyses microclimates within cities as a result of the use of industrial materials, the accumulation of buildings, and the scarceness of open spaces. In order to maintain a healthy environment for the city, two main strategies are employed:
A cylindrical matrix of super tall structure centered on an electromagnetic vertical accelerator to eliminate the hydrocarbon dependency of aircraft during takeoff. The radical re-interpretation of the skyscraper format provides hyper density in an organic and adaptive habitat. Commercial air travel is celebrating its centenary in 2014 and over the last 100 years aviation has made an unprecedented impact on the way people can experience an interconnected and relatively open world. Looking ahead, we can see that in 2050 aviation is predicted to fly 16 billion passengers and 400 million tones of cargo. We must be able to manage that with sustainable technologies and efficient infrastructure.
The cinematic vision of hyper speed rail was once a phenomenon. However, nations from around the world from the USA to UK are again consolidating futuristic proposals for an advanced public transport network, to maximize the economic growth of their cities. The Hyper Speed Vertical Train Hub, aims to resolve the inevitable challenges that cities will face by 2075, and offers a deliverable and sustainable solution for the future of the transport generation.
The Rainforest Guardian Skyscraper consists of a water tower, a forest fire station, a weather station, and scientific research and education laboratories. It stands still at the Amazon’s frontier, preventing fires effectively by capturing rainwater in the rainy season and irrigating the land in the dry season. The lotus-shaped water tower is capable of capturing rainwater directly. The collected water is filtered and stored in spare reservoirs. Using capillarity combined with active energy, the aerial roots with a distinct sponge-structure can absorb and store the excess water without disturbing the Amazon’s ecosystem. In the case of fire, firefighters fly to the scene and extinguish the fire with the collected water. In addition, the Guardian Skyscraper provides special scientific research laboratories for scientists to monitor the climate change and the ecosystem stability. The laboratories also act as exhibition spaces for tourists to create environmental awareness.
Cities are strongly influenced by their landscapes resulting in various spaces and unique structures, which define its inhabitants’ way of life. Some cities have open, free spatial structures while others evolve vertically following a particular grid. The New Tower of Babel is a steel construction built over the desert surface with multiple levels planned depending on the landscape’s topology. The top two panels are made of glass, and the air contained in between is warmed up by the sunlight. The structure is slightly tilted upwards, which leads the air to the middle of the tower into an inner cylindrical. The updraft power channels the warm air into the chimney tower, propelling the wind turbines located in the base of the building, thus converting kinetic energy into electrical power. Under the glass panels, protected from adverse weather conditions, dust, and debris, photovoltaic panels are placed. They generate electricity while reflecting the sunrays thereby further increasing the temperature of the air contained between the glasses. Underneath, the floor plates are transformable and can be utilized in different ways, including the transportation of people and goods as well as the transmission of water, gas or electricity. Moreover, the photovoltaic panels cast a shadow, which cools down the land’s surface. This newly created microclimate allows the creation of residential and recreational areas as well as the development of agriculture.
Light and resistant, bamboo is traditionally used as a building material in numerous regions around the globe. Over time, its allocation was somewhat modified, especially in Asia. Henceforth, within great cities, it is restricted to being used as a building construction support. In this way, it was used for the scaffolding of five of the greatest skyscrapers in the world. Bamboo scaffolding served the splendor of these constructions, but also contributed to the erection of many much more modest towers. These towers make us feel ill at ease because of the harshness and coldness of their frontages. The virtually infinite stacking of identical storeys annihilates all human expressions and interactions. Abruptly cloned, these towers produce oppressing dormitory towns. The stance of this project is set up around the observation of the harshness of these towers and to suggest a solution. The project offers to use bamboo scaffoldings as a driving force to promote the revival of these buildings. By making them permanent and inseparable from the construction. They endow the towers with an external surface which the inhabitants can directly claim and where life can expand. They produce a net which can be fashioned according to the circumstances, specific to each building and give each one a true identity. They promote the emergence of authentic vertical gardens in places where density does not allow the establishment of horizontal gardens. Furthermore, they favor the stabilization of structures during earthquakes and support an ecological production of energy – towers and bamboo scaffoldings achieve symbiosis.
The PleXus Tower emerges from the banks of the West Hong Kong Harbor as a distribution of disjointed structures, initially finding itself amidst the neighboring ferry terminal. The structure starts out as distributed pods reaching out to connect with the city’s transportation fabric, accepting traffic from the water in the form of boats, ferries, and other water vehicles. This misfit arrangement of structural pods weaves into alignment with the Macau terminal to greatly increase the scale of the transportation hub. Bridged together by connected pipelines over the water, these pods work in harmony with the existing Macau Ferry Terminal to expediently move people towards the inner structure.  This assembly forms a podium for the first segment of the tower, which emerges as a parking structure accessible from the highway network tangent to the tower. Located at the water’s edge next to the Macau Ferry Terminal, the tower’s design varies in both its circulation and organization to control the speed at which it receives and negotiates the flow of traffic to optimize movement around and inside the structure.
The Hyper Filter Skyscraper recognizes the threat of environmental pollution to Earth. Under today’s levels of pollution, harmful substances spread over hundreds of kilometers and a whole region and even a country could represent a single pollution source. The Hyper Filter Skyscraper is designed to inhale carbon dioxide and other harmful gases in cities and exhale concentrated oxygen. The skin of the project is made out of long pipe filters that ensure the cleaning process. While clean air is released to the atmosphere, all the harmful substances are stored for use in the chemical industry.
China’s explosive economy has left the world in awe but the country is paying a big price as the “factory of the world” is getting polluted at an alarming speed. Chinese cities are now characterized by an unhealthy hazy weather as the result of large amounts of suspended particles in the air. The purpose of Project Blue is to transform suspended particles into green energy by creating an enormous upside down cooling tower with a multi-tubular cyclic desulfurization system that produces nitrogen and sulfur. When both elements are combined with the atmospheres surplus of carbon monoxide the result is water coal that would later be transformed methane and used as green energy through a low-pressure reaction called low pressure efficient mathanation – a physical-chemical process to generate methane from a mixture of various gases out of biomass fermentation or thermo-chemical gasification.
With bigger and worse natural disasters appearing on the news with no signs of slowing down, we need to rethink how cities should rebuild. When a city is destroyed, it is a sign that the city’s infrastructure is not suitable for the environmental conditions of that particular location. With so much variation of inherent environmental properties around the globe, why do we globalize a singular infrastructural system? Christchurch, New Zealand is one city that has recently been devastated by an earthquake. With citywide liquefaction destroying infrastructure, it is clear that the typical method of construction is not suited for such soil condition. The immediate response by the city is to artificially condition the soil for better building surface, but this method of forcing nature to take form of an ideal environment to perpetuate the same construction technique seems time consuming and wasteful.
Los Angeles freeway system segregates the city’s fabric restricting urban activities to single locations. Similarly, skyscrapers exacerbate this condition of segregation instead of encouraging urban integration. The envisioned vertical city would bridge over freeway interruptions and connect the four quadrants around 101 and 110 freeways as a single architectural organism while boosting cultural exchange, urban activities, and social interaction. The interchange 101 and 110 breaks Los Angeles east urban fabric into four disconnected quadrants: Downtown, Chinatown, Echo Park, and Temple Beaudry. The four quadrants have distinct cultural and social differences, lacking a coherent urban tissue. Moreover, the leftover space around the freeways reaches over 27 acre. Skyvillage aims to reclaim this terrain vague and provide green filtering towers to clean the freeways and also articulate various programs to revitalize the disconnected urban fabric.
The most dynamic cities of the 21st century, such as New York, are anthropomorphic alloys that act as engines for innovation and social cohesion. These cities, with their continually evolving demographics, will forge the dynamic societies of the future. With the rapid rise of near instantaneous communication, a city’s’ livability has gained prominence as an attractor for top minds. In order to secure its future as the leading global center, New York needs to continue to grow in smart ways. We see the opportunity to draw the energy of Manhattan out into the four other boroughs without disrupting existing land use. We propose a residential typology rooted in the remnant spaces surrounding the intersection of transportation infrastructure, such as elevated train lines and freeway interchanges. With the proposed design and specified materials, we aim to optimize a heterogeneous and highly linked set of living environments capturing the air rights above these systems. The combination of escalating land prices and the acceleration of city migration have made urban renewal based modes of densification unfit for the contemporary city. Urban Alloy is the symbiotic repurposing of the air rights above transportation corridors in New York.  Urban planners have long touted the benefits of greater housing density near public transportation hubs – Urban Alloy proposes the advancement of this idea by locating the system directly on the intersections between surface and elevated train lines. We have chosen the intersection of the LIRR and the 7 trains as a test case. The paradigm of one-size fits all is obsolete. Urban citizens want diverse living situations where they can work, play, eat and rest within a pedestrian zone. As technology creates the market desire and a conditioning for personalization, society is more willing to pay a premium for spaces that are tailored to their particular needs. The towers’ design facilitates a continuous blend of program and space types that are accommodated by a spectrum of floor heights and enclosure conditions.
The project is designed in the copper Ruashi mine in Lubumbashi, Congo which is predicted to stop production in 2020. The mine would then be abandoned and left as an enormous urban void surrounded by a rapidly expanding city. The Here-After projects seeks to make use of the left over space, waste soil, and sulfuric acid from the mine drainage and former copper production. A machine will reuse the waste soil to neutralize the sulfuric acid, which in turn will be used to erode the land to be used as raw buildings blocks for the project.
The Blossom Tower in Kuala Lumpur has created an opportunity for Malaysia to lead the world in defining the 21st Century tower – uniting social, commercial and environmental agendas in a new symbol for Malaysian cultural ambitions. Kuala Lumpur has several icons, among them the KL Tower and Petronas Twin Towers; each employs a well-known typology (a sky needle and twin gateway, respectively) that contributes a strong and defining silhouette to the skyline that adds to Malaysia’s assets. Yet, there is room for a third icon – one that builds on sustainable leadership, using one of Nature’s perfect engines as its highly functioning symbol. The Blossom Tower takes its form from Malaysia’s national flower, the Hibiscus, for a number of reasons. Expanding in size over its height, the tower announces its presence in the sky – not by poking it like its neighbors, but by reaching up, outstretched, to embrace and harness power.  Like the crown of a flower, the top floor of the tower has 29% more area than its base, capturing maximum solar energy and water for use in the tower’s systems.
Globally, millions of tons of trash enter the ocean each year. Between 60 and 80 percent of it is land-based and the rest is from ocean-based operations. Due to ocean currents, this plastic waste collects in particular areas of our global ocean. Such a region of accumulated plastic debris is the North Pacific Subtropical Gyre, where the prevailing ocean currents have created a large mass of tiny particles of plastics, which have resulted in a “plastic soup” commonly referred as the Great Pacific Garbage Patch (GPGP). GPGP is twice the size of Texas and contains six times more plastic than plankton biomass. As plastic does not biodegrade, it poses a threat to thousands of marine animals. Seawer proposes to install a huge drainage hole 550 meters in diameter and 300 meters in depth in the middle of the GPGP. The project would engulf all kinds of floating trash filled with seawater. Seawer consists of five layers of baleen filters, which separate particles and fluids. The plastic particles collected from filters are taken to a recycling plant atop of the structure while seawater is filtered and stored in a large sedimentation tank at the bottom to be further cleaned and released into the ocean.
The Infill Aquifer aims to reconnect the built world with the natural environment in order to create healthy and thriving urban ecosystems. The project does this by re-establishing the ground plane as a vital component of urban building design. The Infill Aquifer is a floating mass, exposing the ground and soil to natural processes while accommodating the density required by growing cities and world populations. The Infill Aquifer is an optimistic proposal that humanity and nature can coexist and flourish.
It is estimated that over 50% of the global population lives in an urban settlement. The growth of cities and their massive expansion brought great progress but major setbacks on the level of land use. The overloads of the soil through our urban developments have caused extinction of species, fertile land reduction, and poor distribution of biomass. Realizing that the soil, its biomass, and what it conceives is a limited resource, gives us a glimpse of how we should live to preserve and improve our natural environment. Re-Silience Skyscraper looks for an answer by proposing a new organization and resources distribution of the soil and its biomass through the observation of natural forms such as honeycombs, coral reefs, and ant nests.
This project side-steps the common stylistic tendencies of computation-driven architecture, synthesizing our expanding digital toolset with the language of Classicism. At a time when these digital tools facilitate the generation of novel and varied architecture form, we embrace nostalgia and acknowledge the inherent, if indefinite, significance of the Classical elements, genera, and their organization, taxis. Classicism provides an established register against which architecture might be evaluated and understood. Thus, amid a preponderance of indeterminate architectural form, a new Mannerist Project emerges, augmenting and modifying the Classical kit-of-parts and rule set with computational methodologies. Located at the site of the abandoned Chicago Spire, this project is motivated by the city’s history of tower-building and place-making.  While the neoclassical style of the 1893 World’s Fair was not without detractors, none can deny the potency of its image.  Its ordered civic grandeur inspired classically-styled architecture and city planning throughout the nation, legitimizing a rapidly evolving society via analogy to valorized ancient regimes.
In the past few decades the world economy has seen a global shift of industry and manufacturing eastwards to the emerging markets of China and India purely for economic efficiency and not innovation. The rate at which urban populations are expanding will impact upon how we perceive the strategies of sustaining our cities with regards to supply and demand. The rise of global cargo shipping has seen the ability of local enterprises to move their businesses to areas of low labor costs but sharp rises in oil prices is only enhancing the argument of more localized production. The population of New York City is expected to grow to 9.4 million people in the next two decades and in addition with a declining manufacturing industry, not aided by recent rezoning, the pressure to support the proposed influx will only grow exponentially with an ever-increasing reliance on imports. Dense cities such as New York, with a substantial inventory of older factory structures have the capability to look at the new innovative and flexible industrial methods to revive manufacturing locally and regionally.
Hanok is the named used to describe a traditional Korean house. A Hanok is defined by its exposed wooden structural system and tiled roof. The curved edge of the roof can be adjusted to control the amount of sunlight entering the house while the core structural element is a wooden connection named Gagu. The Gagu is located below the main roof system where the column meets the beam and girder and it is fastened without the need of any additional parts such as nails – this connection is one of the main aesthetic characteristics of traditional Korean architecture. Historically this structural system has been developed exclusively in plan, applied only to one-story residences. However, as various modeling software have been recently developed, there are more opportunities to apply this traditional system into complex high-rise structures that meet contemporary purposes and programs. Vernacular Versatility can open a new chapter of possibilities to bring this old construction and design tradition to the present day with efficiency and beauty.
This project proposes a city in the sky for Detroit, MI. The new city is conceived as a vertical suburban neighborhood equipped with recreational and commercial areas where three main grids (streets, pedestrian pathways, and structure) are intertwined to create a box-shaped wireframe. Traditional and contemporary houses and other diverse programs plug in the structure to create a rich vertical urban fabric. My partner and I have been awake all morning, our faces aglow in front of brightly burning screens, our fingers feverishly clicking to keep pace with our racing thoughts. Franticly driven by decades of fear, themselves perpetuated by an avalanche of numbers and an onslaught of “better world” fantasies born of an endless stream of technological innovation, our mission is clear:  rescue Detroit from being rescued.  In a world whose only acceptable path is the immediate betterment of our own existence, my partner and I demand the discipline to let it die and live another day.  Sweating and panting with the knowledge that our current society’s insatiable and nearsighted appetite for growth, innovation and development is strangling the whispers of life out of the very future it hopes to serve, my partner and I can no longer stand idly by and watch our cities consume themselves with an anxious need for expansion.  Our society has been poisoned by the belief that a city in decline is a city in need of resurrection.
Carbon capture is an emerging practice aimed at obtaining and containing greenhouse gases to mitigate their net availability in the atmosphere. However, existing carbon capture practices use the method of point capture, catching carbon gases at the source, requiring a significant initial investment in additional facilities, infrastructure, and maintenance of underground storage. Hence, the implementation of point capture method may directly and indirectly contribute to a significant sum of greenhouse gases through construction, material production and processing, in addition to the contingencies associated with underground storage. Current research on carbon gases suggests alternative method of capture, such as air capture through carbon-philic resins and material processes that transform carbon dioxide into solid construction material. Taking this one step further, we hypothesized a material capable of assimilating carbon dioxide as a means to self-propagate. Employing such a material allows air capture of carbon dioxide and the resultant production of a solid construction material capable of supporting load. Channeling its properties, we propose a skyscraper that grows. By constructing a simple vertical grid scaffold as a framework, we are given control to the extent and underlying structure of the skyscraper. Required ingredients for material propagation are supplied through the scaffold, while its actual pattern of growth is defined by environmental factors such as wind, weather, and the saturation of carbon dioxide within the immediate atmosphere. Thus each resulting structure is sui generis in its formal expression, while maintaining a regular spatial organization for ease of occupation and adaptation. Various circulation methods can be employed depending on the need; this and the retrofitting of circulation enable the occupation of individuals in different ways. Naturally, clusters of habitation will emerge with the circulation access at its center, with each structure able to accommodate multiple circulation access ways and clusters. As occupied spaces increase, varying points of access can be linked to form lifted streetscapes between a multiplicity of clusters. While programmatic attributions are left undefined and inherently open to occupying individuals, the open structural framework allows tetris-like stacking and up to six directions to extend existing space. The regularity of its physical form guarantees the ease and accessibility of occupation, attracting and inspiring new methods of habiting within the skyscraper. Given the three-dimensional freedom of occupying space, new forms of social interaction may also emerge as a result. Unlike conventional skyscrapers, which rely on steel frame and concrete casting, the proposed skyscraper suggests a more environmental conscious construction method, an alternative mode of occupation and ownership, and possibly a distinct organization of social relationships.
Limestone hills that are mined are doomed to suffer total annihilation, or become remnance of a souless terrain. This design approach seeks to intervene the process of mining, turning it into a mere “site clearance and earthwork” phase to allow buildings to be erected within, adapting to the sophisticated and ever so beautiful terrain of the karsk topography.  These towering natural monuments withstood the tests of time, until humans begin to mine their substances. Mining of these substances not only creates an eye sore, it also increases calamities such as flash floods and landslides. Therefore, it is vital that proper treatment has to be applied upon mining of the natural resources. Limestone materials have numerous uses: mainly as building materials, as aggregate for the base of roads, as white pigment or filler in products such as toothpaste or paints, and as a chemical feedstock. This in turn, creates a building within a mountain, harnessing the natural resources of existing stones and minerals on site to be used as the construction materials eg. marble, travertine. The Architecture serves as a compliment to the monolithic beauty in its original state, bringing a different life and purpose to the mining hill sites.
Because of facing threat from alternation of the natural growth pattern, deterioration of the global environment and excessive harvesting of the living creatures, more and more species of animals and plants are now endangered on the Earth. How to maintain species diversity has become a crucial issue. Endless reports of deforestation, city sandstorms, unpredictable death of elephants and brutal hunting of whales keep coming into the public eyes, while human beings are focusing on constructing their survival fortress and exploring potential habitat outer space. However, could we slow down the pace and ensure our future generations could have the same experience about this blue planet, and even the blue sky before industrial era? Before rehabilitating successfully the livable environment and climate, or finding out artificial reproduction methods of all species, human have to build up a Noah’s ark, which guarantees the provision of three elements of life: sunlight, ] air and water. Meanwhile, enough soil and food are essential for growth and reproduction.
Nowadays, there is growing problem in global climate. Studies on atmosphere components provide possibilities for people to learn the law of climate changing. However, detected datum don’t include all the components of the atmosphere. We hope in this memorial building, it can get atmosphere samples automatically every year, and store the samples with reasonable system. With time passing, the building will become a library to study atmosphere components changing with the most resources. In the meantime, future techniques will allow more thoroughly studying atmosphere, providing better ways to respond to climate change. Background
Reversal Strategy is one answer to multiple emerging global questions.  A single synchronic action can reverse the collapse of human habitat to a better scenario. Simultaneous events seem to occour in the next decades.  After the official statement of global warming (UN),  the evidence of climate changes has dramatically actualized all the previsions about the increase of planet temperature. The question now is about the possibility to avoid the “non return date”. The politicians negotiation is all about emission reductions,  but the only possible strategy nowadays is to reverse the trend of global greenhouse effect. Meanwhile time is giving to human civilization another deadline:  the decomposing process of Carbonation makes reinforced concrete structure unstable in 70/80 years.  Almost 60% of global concrete structure buildings was built in the 20 years after WW2. This means that in the next decades an impressive number of heavy and expensive structural refurbishments or reconstructions must occour.  The collapsing risk of most concrete cities is increasing year by year. It is necessary to think new durable construction systems to reverse the collapsing trend and to substitute existing exhausted buildings.  It is important to find a “new construction land” to build before moving people and functions. Then is possible to demolish what substituted. Urban areas figures demonstrate an increasing expansion of soil sealing and land consuming despite agricolture and wood.  Private closed spaces are way much more determinating the urban grow while percentage of pubblic open spaces is decreasing. The consequence of this tendence on environment and landscape is known.  Planet earth deserve a reversal strategy to change proportion between “closed land” and “open land”. Reversing figure ground
In the past few decades the world economy has seen a global shift of industry and manufacturing eastwards to the emerging markets of China and India purely for economic efficiency but not innovation. The rate at which urban populations are expanding will impact upon how we perceive the strategies of sustaining our cities with regards to supply and demand. The rise of global cargo shipping has seen the ability of local industries to move their production to areas of low labour, tax and land costs. However, the onset of rising labour costs in East Asia, higher transportation costs, a weaker dollar, rising U.S. productivity and cheaper energy are only enhancing the argument for more localised production that is closer to the consumer. The population of New York City is forecast to grow by 12% to 9.4 million people in the next two decades resulting in a current city-wide acute affordable housing shortage. Manufacturing land in the city is perceived by planners as a viable outlet for the expansion of residential development, forcing a gradual decentralisation and extinction of local industries which are inherent to a wider network of urban ecologies within New York. In addition to a declining manufacturing sector, not aided by recent re-zonings or passive policy measures, the pressure on manufacturers to relocate in the face of development-led socio-spatial conflicts will only grow exponentially with a burgeoning population and an ever increasing reliance on imports. Economically diverse cities such as New York, with a substantial inventory of old, functionally unsuitable factory structures have the capacity to look at the new innovative and flexible industrial methods to revive manufacturing locally and regionally. However, the assumption that the city’s manufacturers are a dying breed or an anachronism epitomises the enormous challenge that the sector faces.
"With the increasing demand of energy resources and the exhaustion of inland petroleum, the exploitation of marine seems inevitable. The drastic development of offshore rigs, however, comes with the great potential risk of oil spill, which will endanger the whole marine ecosystem tremendously for decades. The clean up of the spill, however, is still inefficient and time-consuming. Our design transforms the original rigs into vertical bio-habitats, which aims to exert instant response to oil spill, restore damaged eco-system and offer all beings shelter from future disasters. The original rig will become a reactor center, where the spilled oil will be converted into catalyst and building materials, as well as a recreational center and research facility. The structure underwater will be attached to pipes with a floater at the end. Our strategy could be divided into the following three periods of time. 1.	Short term strategy: absorption of spilled oil When an oil spill incident happens, the floaters at the end of each pipe will immediately absorb the spilled oil covering the surface of the sea as an instant response."
The constant change and growth of the human population that we are experiencing these days produce a collateral damage in the natural ecosystems where the cities stand all around the world. This damage is produced by today´s building and urban systems that do not take into account the natural environment where they are built. The expected and rapid population growth for the first half of the 21st century, propelled specially by the developing countries, results in a need to research about alternatives to today´s building methods in order to provide construction tools and guides that makes urban growth compatible with the preservation of our environment. Moreover, I believe in the power of architecture to change the future of our cities and generations, and with that, our thinking and behavior towards an understanding between the places that we inhabit and our ways of living in them. The project stems from the analysis of the population growth of Hangzhou, China. The direct consequence observed was the partial destruction of the ecosystem on which the city stands, the wetlands.  The construction system used so far does not support them. In China and all around the world, the population will continue growing, and the continued use of the current construction system, will end up destroying their ecosystems entirely. As a solution to this, I propose a new construction system that is organized, distributed and expands as cells throughout the city. This cell is elevated above the ground, to make way for the recovery of the wetlands. To do so, it should be translucent and permeable, without disrupting the natural cycles of the sun, air and water, which allows the natural regeneration of any ecosystem.
The skyscraper is one of the type of architecture which is still under the strong influence of Modern architecture. Generally, a skyscraper is limited to flat floors for efficiency of construction and glass façades for placing premium on expansive vistas of the city below. Therefore, skyscrapers have not changed very much since their introduction unlike other types of architecture, since the height and the transparency of skyscrapers are the absolute standards to determine their values in this era. This project avoids the typical skyscraper and aims to create a new typology. Instead of approaching the design with an existing architectural methodology, the design is approached from the skin. To be precise, the research focused on, not on a skin of an existing architecture but, a skin of living organism, a shark skin, in order to adopt its system for a façade design. The analysis of the configuration of a shark skin, especially how it is formed in macro and micro scales has led to the idea of ‘Deep Skins’ in which, different inner volumes of the tower is derived from various skin types. The idea of Deep Skins has a potential of being developed to the scale of a tower. The proposed building is located on 157 West 57th street in Manhattan, New York City, between the 6th and the 7th avenues. The layout of programs follows that of a typical tower in New York City. However, the tower is composed of accumulated volumes transformed from a prototype, instead of flat floors, according to the programs. The resulting design stands as a towering interlocks of tightly packed units that are varied beyond the norm and yet provides a desirable level of privacy and intimacy simultaneously. The sense of intimacy from the interlocking and from the billowing interiority introduces a new sense of community for a type of structure that is bound to be highly liquid and mobile in terms of occupancy throughout its existence.
Why we still design cities by dividing the ground in urban plots and defining heights for each building? Why don’t we think our cities as a whole, planning them from the three dimensions at the same time, allowing us to define positions freely for our constructions in the space (x,y,z axes). Let’s think and create new cities in a three dimensional development system that won’t consider the ground as the main one, and will permit to have several of them “floating” on air. That would allow the creation of new green areas on the rooftops, creating new forms of living, working, circulation… and public space relationships. Thinking about cities through a three dimensional point of view could be a good way of hyper-densifying cities even when they are extremely dense without affecting negatively the existing living conditions. This is the case I examine, taking as an example of a very dense urban fabric: in the Haizu district in the city of Guangzhou, China.
As our planet continues to overpopulate, Times Squared 3015 is an opportunity to explore the spatial, environmental, and experimental possibilities of vertical living. This tower embraces the problems of overpopulation, farm production, oxygen generation, and the re-purposing of obsolete infrastructure. The tower grounds itself in the heart of the city that never sleeps: Times Square, New York City.   The existing framework of Times Square take on a different, three-dimensional form, as the tower rises above it, driving the concept of Manhattanization to new heights.   Peaking over a mile above the city, the tower pushes the boundaries of how vertical a skyscraper can be.   When fully taken advantage of, Times Squared 3015 proves the skyscraper typology capable of fitting an entire city within itself. Vertical farming, beach, mountain range, stadium, redwood forest, housing, and offices–destinations that are normally farther apart, are now stacked vertically.   Each one of these destination zones consists of an individualized block or module, much like ¬ the different districts in a horizontal city.   Open space is carved out of the south-facing side of the module for maximum solar exposure, regulating the destination environments within. This creates a series of L-shaped ‘living’ clusters — the city fab¬ric — that surround and integrate with the natural environment.
This project is based on a complete transformation of an Arctic hub port. It is necessary to create comfortable working and living environment of the Northern Sea Route transport infrastructure. The initial idea is to design a separate anthropogenic microcosm, detached from the harsh Arctic environment, but based on the dynamic equilibrium between people and nature. The structure of the proposed building is same to the structure of nature, the earth’s crust, the structure of usual human perception. Symbolically imaginative solution consists of two main parts: a square of a “man-made” land and circles of supporting heaven pillars. The result of designing is a single “horizontal skyscraper” high-rise building bearing all the functions of a port city, with a possibility of expending. The aim of the project is to increase population of Dikson city from 674 to 5,000 through attracting people with various skills from all over Russian Federation. The proposed building is a multifunctional complex that can replace the existing ruined port city. Two distinct types of housing are created – housing for permanent workers with families and housing for temporary workers. Residential and public areas are augmented with large green recreational areas. For this purpose the project employs natural and artificial lighting, since the Polar Night lasts three and a half months in this region. One of high priority tasks of this project is to redefine the energy supply of the city and the region on the whole. It requires switching from scarce fossil fuels to more environmentally friendly energy sources. In Dikson the most available and abundant energy sources are wind and tidal power. The output capacity of designed wind and tidal power plants could reach 500 MW, which is enough to power a city double the size of St. Petersburg.
Seen from space, the majority of the Earth’s surface is covered by oceans – that makes up 71% of the surface of the Earth, with the remaining 29% for land. But what percentage of the Earth’s land surface is desert? Deserts actually make up 33%, or 1/3rd of the land’s surface area. Desertification is yet another consequence of climate change that takes a great toll on biodiversity, natural resources and, ultimately, the lives of people who inhabit drylands. Along with measures to curb and compensate it, there are several solutions for bringing life back to arid lands. It is called “reversing desertification”, and it has a great deal to do with permaculture. Permaculture is the development of agricultural ecosystems intended to be sustainable and self-sufficient. “You can solve all the world’s problems in a garden.” – Geoff Lawton The largest non-polar desert in the world is the Sahara Desert, a subtropical desert in northern Africa; it covers a surface area of about 3.5 million square miles. Just to put that into perspective it is as big as the United States of America, only difference is that desertification and land degradation increases about 12 million hectares each year, the size of New York State!
City populations are growing faster than the city infrastructure can adapt. The world’s cities are growing because of population shift especially concerning rural to city areas in search of jobs and other opportunities in hopes for improvement of lives and creating better future for the younger generations. Along with the growth and expansion of cities, comes the rise in environmental issues and problems. It comes to the role of future architects, planners and developers to achieve green and sustainable strategies where modern buildings can rely on new forms of energy. Although most skyscrapers provide solutions of catering the density of population with the spaces they provided as compared to the available space on land, it is highly argued that they do not provide good street-level experience that hence, totally disconnect the street cultures from vertical structures. This disconnection has led to the difficulties, in a case of high-rise apartment living, for families to experience the community living where the proximity to other facilities available in street culture is higher instead of being constrained in the walls and perimeter of the vertical structures they live in. The exploration of horizontal skyscraper aims to offer dwellers a maximum recreational experience almost as much as living on the ground or surface of the streets. This horizontal skyscraper is building a community where neighborhood qualities and everyday life practices are carried through. People relate to these living environments as part of their identity and, thus, neighborhood community living becomes personally meaningful and relevant. In fact, studies have shown that people who live in close-knit communities are statistically safer and less likely to be burglarized.
Neither did we know at first that the juvenile yet ingenious imagination of touching and catching the cloud would bring balance to the Earth… The mankind, despite their remarkable advancements, could not for once surpass the greatness of nature. In the face of devastating floods and droughts, our bests were mere building of dams and planting of trees. But one day, the abnormalities of climate started to exhibit signs of balance. The balance comes from redistribution of cloud. Capturing then releasing the clouds from where they are affluent to scarce started to change the color of the planet Earth. The arid-yellow deserts transformed themselves as fresh green. Changes in the nature were only the start of all the other transformations to follow.
So forgettable, so engraved. Time dating back to April 26, 1986 ,a quiet night. With a big bang , the fourth reactor which is located in the Chernobyl nuclear power plant exploded, the amount of radiation is about 400 times of the atomic bomb which is dropped on the Hiroshima. There are about seven million people were forced to leave their homeland in two days, they even had on time to say goodbye to their present life. But not everyone accepts the arrangement of fate. The negative effects of radiation have been dafeated by a large group of settlers, more and more people are returning to their homeland which located in the restricted area, what can be sure is that they use a different way to look at the risk which they bear . They survived from the harshest environments in the 20th century, Stalin caused the Great Famine in Ukraine in 1930s,which caused millions of people to death, they also experienced the atrocities of the Nazis in 1940s. Therefore, after the Soviet government is stable for years, the Chernobyl incident happen, they do not want to leave because of the enemy which is invisible . There is a kind of heroic toughness and frank reality in their character. For the people who return , home is no longer a transitory concept , it is a force even to resist the radiation. Their spirit will let us review the meaning of the relative risk and grab a kind of internal emotional contact of motherland— Fallen leaves return to the roots.
Away from everyday routines, in a dense city center, a secret garden that combines architecture and a nature is born. The main goal of this project is to position non-architectural phenomena in an urban fabric.  An inspiration rooted in nature allowed to form a representation of external worlds in the shape of a vertical structure. Overlapping landscapes like an ocean, a jungle, a cave or a waterfall will stimulate a diverse and complex range of visual, acoustic, thermal, olfactory, and kinesthetic experiences. The main body of the building is divided into 11 natural landscapes. They are meant to form an environmentally justified sequence open to the public that includes extensive open floor plans that form spectacular spaces with water floors, fish tanks lifted up to 30 meters above ground, and jungle areas among others natural scenarios. The sequence landscapes might become a variable set of routes dedicated to different shades of adventure.
India’s Slum population is expected to surge to 104 million (9% of the national population) by 2017*. As the nation’s disparity between the rich and poor deepens, the number of people living below poverty line (<1$ per day) has doubled over the last decade. Chennai city’s Nochikuppam slum is home to 5,000 fishermen families living in less than 1,500 shanties making it the third largest slum dwelling amongst the Indian metropolises.  The rise of city’s squatters over the past decade indicated the struggle to cope with rapid urbanisation and the lack of political will, resulting in the failure of the government to regularise and successfully build resettlement tenements. The government’s only indirect response to such slums has been the construction of large-scale resettlement colonies on the outskirts of the city rather than recognising improving residents’ access to services. Pragmatically, building adequate amounts of resettlement housing to house all slum-dwellers will simply take too long, require vast amounts of land and cost the city 1 billion rupees. Moreover, many residents do not necessarily desire such housing: reports indicate that nearly 20 % of allotted homes are vacant and 50 per cent of the original beneficiaries are no longer living in them, subletting them instead. Clearly, this was due to the fact that slum dwellers were transplanted 30 kms away from city centre where they found no jobs and no social infrastructure and thus were forced to move back to the city. A far more reasonable strategy would be to implement the Tamil Nadu Slum Clearance Act (1971) in the spirit that it was written, and start to recognise slums and improve them in situ. The sky-high rentals in Chennai’s downtown and the fight for survival in India’s slums such as Nochikuppam are increasingly blurring the lines between centre and periphery. Urban planners face escalating challenges as these slums will mostly proliferate in semi-rural and downtown areas, a consequence of scarcity of urban land and accelerating rural to urban shift across the nation. Unrecognised slums have effectively become akin to an invisible Chennai, largely ignored by the service provision agencies. As urban planners and architects we must make a conscious decision to improve the quality of life of squatters (shelter, services & livelihood) by applying principles of sustainable urbanism. The need of the hour is a reimagination of the existing land parcels, growth and infrastructural burden squatters place on the city’s civic supplies. This begs the question – Will the cities of the future be filled with vertical slums? Informal settlements and the paucity of land parcels can no longer be ignored & the complexities of resettlement will force slum dwellers themselves to build higher using locally available, structurally sound, recyclable materials accommodating themselves into organised communities. Shanty-Scraper aspires to provide a unique solution for the fishermen of Nochikuppam located at Marina bay beach. The vertical squatter structure predominately is comprised of post-construction debris such as pipes and reinforcement bars that crucially articulate the structural stability. Recycled corrugated metal sheets, regionally sourced timber & thatch mould the enclosure of each dwelling profile and lend to their vernacular language. The double height semi enclosures serve as utility yards & social gathering spaces. The vertical transportation is fragmented into multiple plank lifts that are constructed from a simple mechanically driven lever & pulley contraption. The rhythmic timber lattice membrane structure at the ground level, houses the public sea food market, & forms the first level of defence against future tsunamis. The high rise typology serves as a vantage point for the fishermen to gauge high risk waters & during emergencies.
For the last few years mankind has accumulated more knowledge than in all its previous history. This factor enables us to say that in the next few decades there will be fundamental breakthroughs in science and engineering which will result in changing society and the architectural design of cities. The degree of its influence could be compared to the age of Great Geographical discoveries. A complex space structure of the future megapolis combines the physical and digital worlds. Spaces of these digital areas have a large number of physical and mechanical laws alien to real space. An ability to fly over or move from one planet to another one, to pass through the walls during system bugs makes the city more complicated. Cyberspace full of hallucination and bugs, components of its own habitat has moved into a real megapolis which is being formed and organized simultaneously in the digital and physical space. “Tomorrow” we expect a completely different topography of the city. It will be a map which includes cyber worlds with intrinsic geography, laws of physics, qualities and even its own residents. It is as though landscapes of computer games have woven into the city space becoming its integral part. The spatial structure of a skyscraper is also flexible and mobile. All complex is formed round frame structure on which cranes move, completing and moving whole blocks of a complex. The part of frame structure can be sorted at once after completion of the region of a housing estate or intentionally to remain invested with a framework for potential possibility of further transformation and change in the future. The whole completed regions of a housing estate can move to the separate sector that “not to disturb” and “not to constrain” further building or to be interspersed directly in frame structure for transformation of a program palette or its intended consolidation. Huge ships that at once become part of this block of the skyscraper, its organic communication and spatial cell. Its decks are temporary squares of the city, and construction woods of its street. On them inhabitants move. Having sated, the ship “sails” in the next swimming, and on arrival in the new port city, not become dusty indefinitely in megalopolis port, and joins new structure, as the spatial block. Main decks of the ships are covered with numerous weaving installations, reaching top level immigrant-workers start weaving goods for the city. Other ships serve as suppliers of a material for housing that is constructed here. It is a new format of the city street, new public space in a superdense and dynamic urban environment. The residential area of the skyscraper represents constantly growing and developing spatial complex. Series of frame and spatial elements that are printed by 3D printer or by drone construction, carry out a role of structures for the subsequent local consolidation and change. The central axis of a complex that unites a series of the inhabited quarters, comprises a monorail on which moves the printer which is printing out, and in some cases erasing spatial structures. In this extended communication the intra quarter train settled down that with a huge speed moves citizens from one part of the city to another. Technologies became so safe and exact that are interfaced with everyday life of citizens. For example, if in a family got a child, it can order the press of new room, having expanded the living area. While the room is printed, it grows roots residents, and everyday life flows the turn. Way of life on a building site.
The medical and health organization of a country includes the country’s security and improves the health of the people, the treatment of diseases and injuries of persons, organizations, systems and processes. The hospital plays a very important role in the system. However, the world is generally encountered in the case of lack of hospitals to serve the patients, at the same time, the chaos of the hospital streamline is not convenient for patients to use. A space and tectonic responsive hospital is easy to assemble and reflects the society. It shows the BMI from the morphology of itself. Morphological changes can be suitable for various terrain environments, at the same time according to the functional requirements to change in morphology. The medical building tries to solve the medical problems, so that the building can reflect the urban living conditions of the urban human settlements directly. The building collected within 10 km radius of the residents’ health data, which is reflected from the building surfaces directly, and the internal function (inpatie Patients arrive at the hospital, and enter the core tube directly to the emergency treatment and the outpatient departments directly. The patients who need the in-patient treatment will transfer to the wards. The idea of the hospital is that the patient does not have to move by himself, according to the motion track, the wards can move to where it should go to, like the outpatient space for further consultation with a doctor instead. However, if there are not too many patients of any department, the space for the outpatient and in-patient will be folded to form a therapy garden space.nt, emergency treatment, medical technology, and the outpatient which contains 50 departments) consistently. The whole building is divided into a frame, a core tube structure, a large assembled body, which is an independent department module, and a small mobile body which is a medical cubic module inside the large assembled body. Technology The small medical cubic module could move on the track in and among the large assembled bodies to form the body of the independent department. Driving device It is the mechanism that drives the actuator to move, according to the command signal sent by the control system, the module moves with the aid of the power element. It is the input of the electrical signal, the output of the line and the angular displacement. Detecting device It is a real-time detection of movement and work, according to the need to feed back to the control system, and sets the information after the comparison, the implementation of the organization to adjust, to ensure that the action is in accordance with the requirements of the scheduled. Control system One is centralized control, which is the total mechanical control by a microcomputer to complete. The other is decentralized (level) control, which uses multiple computers to share the control.
 New York City is a city of large high-density buildings that sets a trend for people’s life and goals. A lot of people are still trying to come to the city with a utopian dream. However, at same time, people are running out of town because of they struggle with urban life causing little social diversity. There are countless skyscrapers in NYC but people cannot recognize existence of the places because the buildings don’t have specific features. A definition of a place is a particular portion of space, whether of definite or indefinite extent. However, in the building, the space is not limited by the fundamental dimensions of “place”. The place is a space people can feel the existence and specific emotion. The morphosis design of organic creature integrates diverse experience that blurs the boundary between spatial relationships. The space uses the city’s landscape as a background, and façade as an experimental symbol, which is stunning the society and evoking people thought to explore more value of the community. Spatial atmosphere also creates an opportunity to experience some special interior phenomenon and moment which people may get inspired and surprised. It can be considered as a chance to provoke people’s passion about aesthetic urban life and turn those passions into a diverse way of thinking. In the façade, morphosis design of organic creature makes many different diffuse light qualities, which can produce various interior atmospheres. When people experience the space, the bright light lead and gather people who are losing way from dark area, then the dark zone attracts people who are holding a strong curiosity. The contrast of small-scale rooms and large-scale atriums gives people various spatial inspirations on the difference of urban scale. The entire project does not only synthesize the fundamental function with morphology of the building design, but also consider large-scale urban environment as an experimental field to explore and provoke people’s diversity.
Air-Stalagmite is a high-rise designed to emerge in the most polluted areas in the world. This project recognized the environmental problems originated after the Industrial and Technological Revolutions – two centuries of a very high consumption of natural resources around the globe. This skyscraper serves two functions. First as a beacon that acknowledges an extremely high pollution problem. Second, it is designed to filter contaminated air and capture suspended air particles.  A gigantic vacuum placed at the bottom of the building sucks polluted air to be cleaned by a series of air filters located on the higher levels. The particles are then accumulated and used as building material to further construct the skyscraper. Each filament on the building’s façade represents a year – a similar concept to tree trunk rings.
Droughts are a recurring feature of California’s climate, and the current four-year period starting from the fall of 2011 has been the driest in history since recordkeeping began in 1895.  California is in fact the world’s fifth-largest supplier of food and most of the farming depends on irrigation, which usually accounts for about 80% of the state’s human water use. In 2014 growers lost about 6.6 million acre-feet of surface water and 2.2 billion dollars because of the drought. California, much like the rest of the planet, is in dire need of immediate rain and snowfall; long-term water conservation and storage strategies for the future; and responsible architectural designs that incorporate innovative technologies to help preserve the earth’s environment, before it is too late. Looking to the sky can be a solution. Cloud seeding has been around for many decades and used throughout the world in various strategies. China used cloud seeding in Beijing just before the 2008 Olympic Games in order to clear the air of pollution.  Farmers in the midwestern United States shoot flares of silver iodide out of planes to help spur rainfall in that region.  It is more and more becoming a popular weather modification tool to help combat drought, famine, pollution, solar radiation, etc. Clouds contain super-cooled liquid water vapor.  A rainstorm happens after moisture collects around naturally occurring particles in the air, causing the air to reach a level of saturation at which point it can no longer hold in that moisture. The process of cloud seeding essentially provides additional “nuclei” around which water vapor molecules condense in the cloud. These nuclei can be salts, dry ice, or silver iodide, which are all effective because their crystalline structural forms are similar to that of ice.   The water vapor molecules combine with the added crystals to induce freezing nucleation, resulting in larger heavier water droplets and eventual precipitation. The architectural concept imagines a future earth where cloud seeding has become the standard process to modify and manipulate the weather.  Cloud seeding can result in many positive environmental outcomes including temperature control, flooding prevention, decreasing pollution, dispersing fog, and deflecting solar radiation.  But for the purposes of California, it is mainly used for irrigation and rainfall to combat droughts and famine. Towers are erected near the coast so as the lower marine layer clouds pass overhead, they can be seeded at different times and intervals, causing precipitation to occur in as little as 10 minutes.  After years of practice, scientists have been able to pinpoint the exact amount and timing of release of chemical mixtures in order to manipulate the path of a cloud after seeding and predict where the rainfall will occur.  Thus, rainfall is dispersed or “doled out” to cities and towns further inland that are suffering from drought. The towers themselves take on the aesthetics of a tree.  Great limbs stretch to the sky; cloud farms grow like fungi off these limbs.  The upper levels of the tower act as a self-sustaining community – the cloud seeders jettison the salt + iodide mixture into the air forcing the clouds to precipitate.  The cable netting catches the rainfall and syphons it down to irrigate the farms.  And the farms in turn provide food for the community.  Residential flats line the cloud pythons, housing the farmers and workers of the tower.
This is an imaginary future, where resources of nature have been used and reclaimed exhaustively by the greed of man to the point of irreversible damage. Spanning across the landscape by human intervention, until there is no more nature left for the upcoming generations to see. In those days where the impermanence of concrete can not withstand the true forces of nature, the solid ground is soon to be covered by earth, minerals and eventually the green, growing on top are the woods that would stem deep and span miles and miles, beyond the imagination of mankind.  We build these super structures that would spread throughout the city, as if they were grains of seeds that would uncontrollably grow, taking back what was once theirs. When the forces of nature is too strong for men to resist, we would have to learn how to cope with nature in order to co-exist with the earth, occupying less surface on ground as much as possible, tall vertical super structure is the proposed solution. The Babel skyscraper can accommodate food security and living space for both nature and human. To achieve this, the architecture is designed with a concept of the emergence twisting parametric mountain, seamlessly flow with the geometric skyscraper. The building is designed with only floors to provide the vertical spaces; with open plan and inside void, providing ventilation. The Babel skyscraper is located in many sites around Bangkok. People visiting and living there will once again experience the natural habitat; bringing back the intimate bond we once have being so close to nature. The homogenizing of concrete landscape had us forgotten our relationship with nature. This future is to re-imagine these connections and visualize them. This connection would also form a more intimate symbiotic relationship between nature and humans. During the first phases, the architecture only contains the mountain-shaped base and vertical columns, which would eventually grow into an Eden, a relaxing park and food bank, for the organic vegetables and rice. The architecture itself is time-based and would change dramatically through the years. And in the times where human can no longer walk the earth, this skyscraper is where humans can depend on as inhabitants, traveling up and down by drones, a technology of the future, which we foresee. We’ve planned many possible locations for this this skyscraper in order to spread the green effectively throughout Bangkok, Thailand. Neglecting the living of man and let nature flow through every street and avenue of the city, eating up the main vessel and eventually the heart of the what we see as places, until there is nothing left for man to stand and looking back at what we’ve done to the earth. This set of skyscrapers would be a symbol for the cruelty we’ve done to nature, and what we have to pay back; including how human should adapt in order to survive. The design is something that may or may not have happened in a world beyond our imagination, and the architecture not as we recognize today, but as seeds that that takes us back to the past where nature rule the earth and where man are but just another creature that walk the planet. Nature here plays a crucial role in the establishment of the architecture, unlike the ones we see nowadays, being changed and adapted, according to the use of man.
Modern cities have faced extreme changes due to developments of the Industrial Revolution and the urban sprawl caused by population increase. Artificial environment, cities, offered diversity of opportunities and new lifestyles which humans comforted with. However, this benefit jeopardized the balance and harmony of natural environment. Capitalism, while making possible these megacities, also brought severe side effects such as economic polarization and social imbalance. Once expected to guarantee prosperity of human lives, technics and systems, are now even considered as threats to the coexistence between human and natural environment, and human communities. Here, we design skyscrapers, with nature as the main user and human as parasites of the planet, struggling to survive and camouflage, living towards the very end of the race.
Located north of Tindouf, Algeria, the Valley of the Giants is the largest oasis in Northern Africa. However, this was not always the case. In the early 21st century, the area was mostly dust. Water was scarce, and the only inhabitants were nomadic tribes like the Tuareg people. As global conflicts grew and their impact rippled over several continents, demand for refugee housing and temporary settlements increased in the area. Frustrated, the country’s government decided that they needed to build something; a permanent solution to the temporal problems which kept piling up. They needed something that addressed the influx of immigrants, the desertification of the area, and changing cultural diversity; something beyond a quick-fix. Architecture was the solution. But not a contingency plan; rather, a catalyst. The proposal was not to build temporary shelters or redesign a city from scratch, but instead to use infrastructure and ecology to jumpstart and augment already existing environmental and cultural systems. The concept was simple: a series of towers that would (1) house plant-spores, (2) produce, collect, and treat water, and (3) pollinate the surrounding landscape, catalyzing the production of an oasis in the region. The structures themselves had to be of an immense scale in order to effect significant change; thus they were designed as 1km tall, thin, cylinders. In addition to their independent functions, a new network of underground pipes was implemented to facilitate the creation of pools and wells. Within 20 years, the area would drastically transform from a barren landscape into the Valley of the Giants. Today it is home to both permanent residents and traveling nomads. The oasis extends far to the base of the Anti Atlas Mountains in Morocco, and south to the city of Tindouf. The new urban development is a mixture of traditional Tuareg tents, permanent clay huts, and contemporary dwellings. Politics and social life have their ups and downs, but there hasn’t been a major conflict in the area since the time before the Giants. The structures themselves are still functional. They tower over the villages like keepers of the land. Some communities have even invented their own stories of how the Giants came, suggesting a new mythology and awareness of these mysterious structures.
Our planet is going through the irreversible process of global warming, and even if various strategies have been planned to solve the problem, none of them provided a solution. This is causing natural disasters all over the planet. The temperature all around the planet is increasing making the ice in the pole melt. Only a “global strategy” can be adopted. To cool down the temperature a huge greenhouse is placed in between the sun and us. This works according the same principle of the “solar tower”. Thanks to the accumulation of heat in the glazed structure, air flows naturally from hot to cold generating rapid and strong flows. These flows bring hot air far from the Earth cooling down the temperature of the whole globe. The airflows restore better climate conditions and moreover generate renewable energies by wind turbines placed inside the structures. The structure acts either on climate conditions or on energy production. Furthermore this structure creates an amazing and surprising effect. Since it has to solve a problem for the entire planet, its dimension is over scaled.  It has to be a unique and continuous structure, placed in a single point, and cantilever on both sides. It results as a tangent object on the planet. It touches the ground in a unique point, and for this reason it is perceived in different ways from different parts of the world. On the Equator it looks a horizontal element while from the poles it looks a vertical one. The impressive structure allows solving a critical question and works maintaining perfect climate conditions and providing clean energy for all.
The 22nd Century – Humankind succeeded in avoiding the dangers of the 21st century’s Technological Singularity. Through great efforts and extensive preparation the crucial moment of the awakening of a self-improving Artificial Super Intelligence (ASI) could be predicted and controlled. Mankind was able to stay the most powerful yet not the most intelligent species on the planet while ASI became its god-like slave – forever bound to serve humanity in its needs. Induced by ASI, unimaginable, all-embracing progress throughout the entire research was achieved, lifting the human state of knowledge to uncharted heights. Step by step the human biological body was technically modified. Biological evolution merged with technology. Human communication changed into the medium of electromagnetic radiation, eventually the human mind was transcended into technical units and merged with ASI. A total integration happened. The human body was, through the immortality of its digital mind, eventually made redundant. Although physical reality is the basis of everything, being in it became obsolete. The shift of human reality from the physical to the digital world was completed. The appearance of this digital world is beyond our current understanding of time and space – its only dimension is the speed of communication, the speed of data transfer. Cartesian locations loose their importance. The digital world is not a world of movement – it is a world of calling up. Since being in this digital world differs entirely from human’s former nature, a new desire towards the physical reality arose at a certain point. Just like humanist artists used to depict the ideal ancient landscape of Arcadia in their paintings, mankind made the physical world into their world of NEW ARCADIA. For reasons of nostalgia human minds would then materialize into a favored biological body to experience this physical world`s truth. The Tower of New Arcadia situates everything that used to constitute human life. It defines a place where people can meet and enjoy the beauty of physical world’s sensations. A place of touch, sight, sound, smell and taste. A place of pristine human interaction and feeling. To stroll our so called Real World.
Modernization and globalization symbolize human advancement in the 21st Century, but life in big “modern” cities is extremely pale, focusing only on work. Modernization, despite of all the conveniences it brings, it also devours people’s feelings, sensory information and emotions- the key ingredients of life. The Sensory Skyscraper was conceived for on an island in the Yangtze River in the Chongqing Municipality, China. Landform, environment and climate deprive the local society of perceptual experiences. This project is a multifunctional laboratory of scientific exploration on human senses, perceptions, rehabilitation of sensory information, rehabilitation of experience effects, and rehabilitation of motivations and expectations etc. This laboratory is a cube that consists of 6 pyramids with a side length of 100m. The shape of pyramid derives from a perception pyramid figure. The combination of 6 pyramids mirrors the way human brain works, different cortex processing different senses. Seen from outside, each pyramid has specific patterns which show the functional sectors inside. Every sector represents an open space for different types of perceptions and senses. Five magnetic flexible pillars support the cubes. The corridor system inside the pyramid links all units together vertically and horizontally. The pyramids can be parted and move vertically since the cubic shape is control by magnetic power. With the coverage height of the magnetic power 600m and 100m lateral of pillars, the mobility of pyramids is completely secured. Magnetic power is invisible; so that the project looks like it is floating in the air the magnetic power is strictly controlled without harming nearby environment. The main entrance is at the bottom of the pyramid that has an elevation of 10m above the ground, so the only method to get in or out is through a magnetic floating vessel. The island is divided in modules of 20x20m for different purposes including 5 modules for supporting the cube itself, modules for floating vessels, storage, office, parks, shopping malls etc., making the island as multifunctional as the cube. Also the project can make full use of the island in this way. Down the riverbed are several pillars, which can rise to protect the island and buildings on it from water in wet season while fall to keep close to the water surface in dry season. Once human beings regain their sensory perceptions they can better understand their origins, potentials, and natural environment, thus get rid of the downside of modernization and enjoy their life.
If there is a need for a monument in this city, let there be one. This monument will become a slice of the contemporary world, and the ideology of citizens will be revealed with a massive collage of culture symbols. Taipei is a great city where people of different classes from different countries are living. Mysterious games are played by everyone, while the winners accumulate huge capitals and others lose everything they have. Some people are born to win while others never have a chance. With population rising and more foreign culture are imported to the city, the game will be played by more people with frenzy pace. The Dutch, the Spanish, the Chinese and the Japanese people in modern history have colonized Taiwan. A diverse political and cultural heritage has rendered Taiwan a country without clear root or origin. Taiwan thus becomes a blender that accepts most influences from other cultures. The mixture also represents in the build environment.  Taiwan has find ways to incorporate different cultural aspects, whether traditional or modern, western or eastern. Like all other colonized cities, the urban scape is an agglomeration of different influences and developments. To represent the city and its people, the government started a project to create a monument that is also a tremendous housing. Having no more land to use in the already crowded city, the only way to go is up. A colossal height is expected, and the design becomes a task of vertical urban-planning. A megastructure in architecture as well as a superstructure in the sense of Marx theories, this monument / housing complex is an embodiment of economy, culture and society. The infrastructure of the architecture is designed to allow various builders to construct different buildings within the tower for different needs. Huge elevators are erected to provide vertical transportation. While wealthy people purchase luxury high level residences, the lower levels and the ground floor becomes a slum that is not that different to the surrounded urban areas: chaotic and immense. The Tower becomes not only a monument for the city, but a representation of the city itself. Seven Phases of Tower Building 1.  A superstructure starts to develop under the supervision of the government.  Verticality is a strategy to densify the use of space. 2. Real estate dealers start to advertise on the “tallest dwelling in the world”. Lured by the view and the sunlight accompanied with the height, buyers flock toward the mid- and upper sections of the tower. 3. As the tower continues to grow, people starts to move in. Newcomers gradually find that the tower is self-supplied. 4. A huge amount of labor force is needed to sustain the tower. The lower levels are open for workers to move in. 5. The possibility of lower level residents working their way up to the upper level threatens the stability of the power structure. A separate management is established for the lower levels to cut away connections with the top. Two dividing zones are established: an industry belt and a green belt. 6. The capacity and influence of tower expands rapidly. The difference between the three sections deepens. The lower levels fall into a slum condition while the top floors become more luxurious, and the middle-class working people caught in between spend much effort to keep up. 7. The infrastructure of the tower keeps expanding, as if the tower would never reach a limit. As the diversity within the tower grows, the cultural and visual identity of the tower becomes harder to describe. The Tower becomes everything.
Core Issue Modern capitalism has been the 20th Century’s religion, and finance is its product. This system created utter inequality, the final stage of class struggle, where 1% of the population controls more than 40% of world’s wealth. Growing inequality is the flip side of something else: shrinking opportunity. Whenever we diminish equality of opportunity, it means that we are not using some of our most valuable assets—our people—in the most productive way possible. In 2008 financial capitalism collapsed. This collapse aroused the crowds, breathing life into a new political and economical approach, which we call Socialism 2.0. The upcoming neo-socialist economy requires a collective action, it is based on the certainty that paying attention to everyone else’s self-interest-in other words, the common welfare-is in fact a precondition for one’s own ultimate well-being. The Architectural product of the XX century was the Skyscraper, and its mania for reaching the sky. The Skyscraper is the XX century’s Babel tower, where people only work, speaking different languages, distancing themselves from the city and from other people.
A major destructive earthquake is predicted to shake the city of Tehran in the near future. To mitigate the damage from such earthquakes it is necessary to find relevant risk factors of Tehran by assessing the social and urban response to such catastrophes. Our proposal for a safe and temporary infrastructure in the event of an earthquake consists of a network of urban links that lead to central core or “stackable” shelter pockets. We have strategically selected the Deh-Vanak area of Tehran as our scenario location due to its high urban density of buildings at high risk of collapsing and its lack of open public spaces. In the event of such earthquake, our project proposes a network of infrastructure and vertical safety nods acting as temporary central cities that will safely mobilize and shelter the local community. The proposed central safety nods are based on the antisismic properties of and consist of clusters of sliding sphere geometries. Mixed use clusters that cover basic needs are allocated around a core public space and key transportation nods. These nods are capable of serving as shelter by aggregating the mobile sphere units that navigate the network. Network The proposed network in Deh-Vanak analyses threats and opportunities of the site and efficient trajectories not only at pedestrian level and but also along clearances of low rise and mid-rise buildings. Through this analysis we are able to deploy minimal infrastructure to reach safety and optimize the number and location of these central safety nods. Sphere Geometry The geometry of the sphere allows the minimum friction and the maximum freedom of movement hence minimizing structural tension during the repercussions that follow in the aftermath of an earthquake. A selection of spheres are fixed to compose central pockets that serve as public spaces while other spheres characterized by their double shell act as mobile units to host diverse functions from information points to first aid checkpoints to food and clean water distribution centers. The shells of these mobile spheres have the capacity to ensemble into emergent shelters. Supporting infrastructure such as water and waste canals feed along main links into the core public space and key stations. Connectivity between spheres in shelter pockets is possible through connecting joints.
Research has shown that crime has closely related to personality disorders. Conventional correction center usually conveys a feeling of suffering for the inmates. Limited sunlight and tight space has negative psychological impact on the inmates. Personality disorder tends to be aggravated in the custody process, rendering the inmates difficult to effectively reform or being corrected. Healing Matrix is trying to break the ordinary design of a correction center; it is attempting to address this social issue from an architectural perspective. In this building, newly defined healing cluster-space has replaced the traditional detention space to facilitate the healing of personality disorders, and meet the needs of inmates in different stages of the healing process. During the entire sentence, under the arrangement by the Command Centre of the building, inmates will interact with each other according to their instant need. Inmates will also be able to look inside to discover their inner spirit and interact with the architectural space itself, through a multi-layer treatment approach, therefore fundamentally cure the personality disorder and achieve the goal of complete healing. To achieve crime prevention and psychological and cognitive rehabilitation, other than the setup of a conventional correction center, six independent yet related types of spaces are created here. Each space has its own function and approach towards self-healing and self-correction. Each space is a cluster of several cubes. Different needs of inmates with distinct personalities are addressed here. Spaces are divided as such: Praying Space (religion support), Meditation Space (the power of inner peace), Accompaniment Space (interpersonal interactions and support), Anger/Depression Management Space (cognitive behavioral therapy), and Social Training Space (communication and soft skill polishing) Each inmate has his/her own independent space (each space is a cube with dimension of 3m*3m*3m). Inmates’ life and privacy are appropriately respected and protected. Inmates’ instant need is transmitted through feeling receptors to the Command Centre of the Building. The matrix network would then automatically match and transfer the inmate to a “best fit” space to optimize the healing effect. In order to ensure the free multi-directional movement each unit, the building itself has an inner matrix space, which allows for three-dimensional movement. The mobility of the space has not only created diverse environmental experience for the inmates, but also has realized the frequent interactions between inmates hence promoting the healing effect. In terms of the appearance, due to the changing needs of the inmates to the healing space, the inner form of the building is kept dynamic and adaptive. At different times, by observing the location and volume of the clusters formed by different cells, inmates’ current psychological status and the needs for particular space could be identified. Rather than being differentiated through conventional parameters, inmates are identified and distinguished by the types of personality disorders they are suffering from. Each inmate’s experience of space and healing path is determined in accordance with their unique personalities and healing needs. The sentence is not merely sentence here; it is a customized self-healing journey. One’s peculiar character determines one’s fate. The length of staying in the building is no longer determined based on the type of crime one has committed, rather is determined by psychological indicators such that psychological and behavioral assessments are done periodically to determine when it is a proper timing for the inmates to return to the society. This spontaneous healing mechanism promotes a more positive way of self-discovery and personality improvement. Life path and the meaning of space are being revolutionarily redefined here in the Healing Matrix.
In the 21st Century, the act of cities throwing away architectures and everything that contributed to their present scene is no longer strange to the eyes. Everyday there are buildings being torn down, immeasurable amount of objects being abandoned and sent to landfills at an overwhelming rate. Neighborhoods change progressively, eventually becoming a place we are no longer familiar with. In Japan, the government created artificial islands within Tokyo Bay as a method to bury the evidence of earthquakes debris and also, indirectly reduce landfills. Unwanted objects are then hidden beneath as reclaimed lands. Their existence and contribution to the ci The ‘Displacement’ is to evoke the nostalgic emotion of mankind, through architectural salvage to regenerate the abandoned and hence turnaround their fate to be forgotten. Boats and ships perform the salvation by moving the abandoned from their origin to Harumi in Tokyo Bay, an artificial island where the project took place.ty are obscured. It is urgent; a revolt is needed to criticize on the erasing actions of human and cities without considering the true values of what it is demolished. The salvaged are then processed through the factory on-site, granting them a new aura relationship while inheriting their memories as well. The whole architecture is an empty framework sitting on the site. Through the architectural salvation, it will continually be infilled with the reclaimed objects and buildings in phases and in the end it attains saturation. It is an architecture that inherits buildings. Not hiding what we abandoned, but acknowledging their efforts to create our memories.
Neza York Ciudad Nezahualcóyotl or more commonly Ciudad Neza, is a city and municipality of State of Mexico adjacent to the northeast corner of Mexico City. In the 20th Century, the land on which Ciudad Neza sits was under Lake Texcoco and uninhabited. Successful draining of the lake in the early 20th Century created new land, which the government eventually sold into private hands. Today Ciudad Neza is a sprawling city of over one million entirely with modern buildings. Until the 2000s, most migrants from Mexico to the United States, especially to places like New York, were from poor rural areas. However, since the turn of the century, another wave of immigrants is coming from poor urban areas such as Ciudad Neza. These immigrants tend to be younger and better educated than their rural counterparts, and tend also to keep separate from them. This is bringing into existence a new Mexican subculture called “Neza York” distinguished by dress, speech and the likelihood of learning English. Businesses with names like Tacos Neza and Neza Grocery have appeared in New York City. Subsidence As Mexico City continues to pull water from the aquifer below, its ground is sinking. The subsidence that results from groundwater extraction is a problem all over the world, but is especially dramatic in Mexico City. The aquifer has been under increasing pressure over the last several decades as the city’s population has skyrocketed. While subsidence has been stabilized in the city center, many parts of the metropolitan area continue to sink. Some parts like Ciudad Neza have sunk more than 30 feet during the last century. Vicious Circle Mexico City puts a lot of effort to stop the sinking. In some locations it has caused the sewage lines to become slanted – resulting in the lines running backward. Consequently, the city struggles with flooding during the rainy season. Emergency pumping stations have been built to maintain extraction capacity, but a major solution is still needed. The water difficulties have become a vicious circle: as the city grows, more water is pumped from the aquifer. As more is pumped, the city sinks further. The sinkage ruptures more underground water pipes, sending fresh water gushing into the sewers, aggravating the shortage, requiring more water to be pumped from the aquifer, and so on. Design Concept If Mexico City receives significant pluvial precipitation at a total rate of 215 m3/s, pluvial water is partly responsible for the urban flooding problem in rainy season, but rainwater harvesting could be part of the solution for people living in Ciudad Neza. Here, rainfall is heaviest, and the area is sufficient to collect and store water to reduce costs. In the other hand, the total amount of wastewater treated by public wastewater treatment plants is 10 m3/s and all the treated wastewater is reused. At the present time, reused water is utilized to fill recreational lakes and canals (54%), to irrigate agricultural areas and parks over a total area of 6,500 ha (31%), cooling in industry (8%), diverse commercial activities (5%) and to recharge the aquifer (only 2%).
Cyprus, an island in the Mediterranean is a divided country between Greeks and Turks. Nicosia is the capital of Cyprus and it’s the only city divided in two in the world since 1974. The demographic composition of Nicosia consists of Turks who live in northern cities and Greeks who live in southern cities.   There were lots of public spaces and facilities in the “UN Buffer Zone” before Cyprus was divided and people needed them.  But at the same time, the “UN Buffer Zone” became a barrier between the two parts because of it’s a limit of height. Both Turks and Greeks in Nicosia are looking forward to a unified country. This project changes the horizontal “UN Buffer Zone” and public spaces near it to a vertical direction. Both Turks and Greeks ordinary life will have an intersection in the new skyscrapers There are three design points of the “Unify Monument” skyscrapers: 1) Looking at it for each time, people in Cyprus could remember those periods that Cyprus were split into two parts. 2) Water is one of the most important elements for people in Nicosia. Water in vertical “UN Buffer Zone” can make people know that we connected the two parts with “water”, and this is an important function of the skyscrapers. 3) These skyscrapers distribute in all the main areas of Cyprus, which are passed through by the “UN Buffer Zone”. So the whole Cyprus will be “sutured” by these skyscrapers because all the people will go into them for public spaces.  All main cities in Cyprus will build one skyscraper like Nicosia and each one will set up a corresponding relationship with the part of “UN Buffer Zone” in each city, and then, the whole country will be sutured by these skyscrapers.
The human activities’ byproducts, such as the piston effect of the metro and elevators and the stack effect of the dominating skyscrapers within the metropolis, are generally unexplored due to the ignorance of the severity of the environmental situation. Based on the fact that the smog problem within Chinese metropolis always concurs with the lack of airflow due to meteorological reasons, this design intends to utilize these passive energies as the source of urban airflow. By a careful analysis of our site, Lujiazui, Shanghai, China and the discovery of the never-changing core structure system behind the ever-changing facades of the skyscrapers, our team arrived at the conclusion that designing a new core prototype could be of great value not just to the incorporation of these passive energies mentioned above into the great war against smog, but also to the education of the entire population. Beside the traditional functions of a core such as the stairs, the, toilets, the shafts and the elevators, this new core prototype includes this very core urban issue of air. Passive airflows from subways, elevators, atriums and stacks are intentionally conducted through a serious of carefully designed spaces and devices, so that the dangerous pollutants in the atmosphere can be absorbed by the mature and energy efficient methods, including centrifuge, wet deposition, HEPA, phytoremediation, and low voltage adsorption. Meanwhile more public and green spaces are created along this process, so that everyone within and without this building can interact with it to get more awareness of the air situation. With the smog becoming a national issue, the government and the citizens in China are forced to fight together. FAR policies can be adopted to encourage the developers to apply this new core prototype, which benefits the city, making such bold architectural adventure more sensible.
Hanoi, a city inside the river, is a sanctuary and special city. It is not only the capital of Vietnam but also a place where histories throughout different eras have met, where all cultural and historical values have converged and which has been inhabited since at least 3000 BC. Hanoi has evolved significantly from its core – The Old Quarter. This Quarter initially started with 36 streets with each street had its name reflected the business trading happening on the street. This is one of many unique points of Hanoi. Some of the streets currently still reflect that such as: Steel street, Silk street, Paper Craft street. Hanoian is very proud of the Old Quarter. Especially, families those have been living here for many generations, those who called the Old Quarter the cradle of culture. Hanoi nowadays is a big capital and comparable to London, UK. However, the expansion has been done much faster than living conditions of people. This has caused tremendous problem of leaving a large area of new parts of Hanoi in very much poor conditions in terms of people’s lives as well as infrastructure. There have been a lot of new urban developments started to fill up the gaps and to reduce density from the City center since then. However, due to unready infrastructure conditions in the new expansion areas, people still pull themselves into the city center to trade, work, and live. This has become a serious fact for a thousand year old capital. Together with the urbanization, the Core of Hanoi has become more complex. The complexity could be described through population density, types of professions, building’s functions and infrastructure. The Old Quarter is still the most important Centre of the City attracting a lot of businesses and trades as well as tourists, famous for its street activities within a human scaled street covered by two rows of trees along both sides. The Tower is stemmed from an idea of bringing the horizontal density of Hanoi to a vertical living space and still reflecting all beautiful aspects of an Old Quarter and a busy city center. The Tower is expected to be a Happy Tower where people will live their lives with full of joys, experience good facilities and where tourists could come and experience Hanoi’s History through different eras. The Tower is also an ambition of future architecture, which is integrated with potential technologies to provide an uplifting sustainable living condition. The Tower is a combination of modules, which reflect Hanoi urban density in a better way. Two types of modules are created: Experience and Residential. The Experience is distributed along the Tower right from ground level to the Top. These are places of interests, where visitors come and experience History of Hanoi. They will find different atmosphere, different experiences starting from Prehistory, Early Dynastic Epoch, through to French invasion period till current status. Moreover A great Core in the center connects all modules. This Core is not only for vertical transportation; it is where technologies are integrated in order to transform energy collected from the Experience’s solar fiber and the residential cladded PV fibers. Besides, it could self-collect energy from the earth and ground water. In addition, modules also are connected by horizontal connections acting like pathways or water tubes., these are covered with solar fiber in order to self-collect solar energy. The Residential distribution reflects the density throughout historic periods.
Site The prototypical site in China, Wuxi City, Jiansu  Province, allows the  exploration of  issues of displacement and cultural identity  as well as those of community  and diversity as defined by architectural form. The smart city leverages both passive and active technologies in its formation this includes the local, as a definition of connectivity, with off grid networks  owned by the inhabitants. It is proposed that the physical and material qualities of this construct should manifest itself in a porus coral like form , these  can either appear as  slices  joined together to form a more conventional urban grain  or as in this instance become a stacked series of evolving circumstances defined by the consequence of the internal and external environment. Concept The banyan tree deposits additional downward branches to stabilize its imposed load much in the manner of this structure, Osteon city maximizes the potential of   a small footprint, touching the earth lightly, whilst providing the maximum in amenity, at times appearing as a cumulo-nimbus cloud formation,  and at others as a floating forest. Ethos The proposition consider the nature of the skyscraper as a 210 floor community, where work , retail ,, hospitality ,  leisure and residential   accommodation   form an aerial community serviced horizontally by driverless cars and bicycles swegeways  and pedestrian routes. Structure and form The diagrid is re purposed to a waffle format, much like a radiator, the interleaving structural elements , join together to form a self supporting yet  extremely strong and flexible structure.The elements which make up the structure are porus  lightweight and analogous to bone “ osteo, it is envisaged that the construction will make use of rapid prototyping techniques on an industrial scale with integrated services technology. These elements are then horizontally braced with walkways and lift cores . Zoning The three main elements of residential, leisure and work are located within the vertical elements of then tower , whilst  retail sits within the landscape mounds which appear to rise and descend from the aerial parks . Residential elements are disposed within the diagrid structure, cradled such that they can be interconnected to form more or less complex arrangements as required. Aerial parks and landscape These areas, provide respite and a sense of localism to the towers inhabitants, the voids allow light to penetrate deep into the structure, whose surfaces act as sun scoops illuminating the inner areas of the tower.
It is apparent that throughout history, diversity fuels innovation and progress. Many studies show that multi-lingual individuals are better at problem solving, and multi-cultural societies spark new ideas and provoke critical thinking. Reversibly, lack of diversity and variation will stunt our imagination. This is also true with spatial environments, as lack of diverse spaces that we inhabit everyday will hinder our capabilities to be more imaginative and creative. Globalization is therefore a phenomenon that has indisputably aided the advancement of our civilization by cross-pollinating ideas, culture and tradition around the world, however, the benefits of globalization will foreseeably expire shortly if we are not careful with how we progress. Today, in the midst of a housing crisis where 70% of the world’s population is expected to be living in cities by 2050, building high-density apartments to accommodate mass migration and population growth is a natural response to the demands our economy is facing. To solve this global crisis, we have banded together through free trade of goods and knowledge to provide efficient building solutions by standardizing construction materials, techniques and spatial configurations. Although it may be effective, as a result, repetitive and standardized apartments are being built all over the world irrespective of its location, and living spaces categorized into types to meet the image of modern living. No matter how idealistic this temporary solution may be, this type of ‘Global Modernization’ is a slow devolution of our race as it sets a standard of a unified cultural norm and irradiates diversity through socio-global expectations. China is an extreme example of ‘Global Modernization’. Within a few decades, China has assimilated cities by rapidly building high-density apartments, and more often than not, by demolishing old towns and structures that are rich in local culture and tradition. This careless rapid urbanization is not only wiping out historical artifacts but also eliminating opportunity for diversity in the future. Local, cultural, and spatial diversity is a necessity for enlightenment and enriching progress, therefore we must ask ourselves “is global unification worth the extinction of local characteristics?”
As the busiest and most densely populated county in America, Manhattan has always been a big fan of skyscrapers. Limited by its street grid, however, buildings in New York City are often skinny and tall. Rather than constructing another slim tower by building upwards, “New York Horizon” envisions a new paradigm by digging downward to Central Park’s bedrock, which will reveal the park’s rugged natural terrain while also creating a continuous wall of skyscrapers around its periphery to house habitable spaces with unobstructed views of the new underground park. Envisioned by Frederick Law Olmsted and Calvert Vaux over 150 years ago, Central Park was so beautifully designed that the people of today overlook the fact that it is actually an artificial piece of land built upon the once rugged, bedrock-strewn landscape, which had to be heavily sculpted in order to show any semblance to a park. The project’s inspiration builds upon Olmsted’s theory of providing equally accessible common green space to all citizens and giving people “greater enjoyment of scenery than they could otherwise have consistently with convenience within a given space”. His vision, however, is slowly disappearing as skyscrapers continue to rise higher than ever around the park. And unfortunately, only the affluent few that can live and/or work on top of these towering skyscrapers are given the benefit and enjoyment of the park’s total stunning view on a daily basis. The project was conceived to contrast against the city’s densely constructed buildings and towering skyscrapers, as well as, to provide New Yorkers with a natural environment that they could enjoy and use as an escape from their busy urban lives. Consequently, the soil removed from the park would be used to add a more dynamic landscape (mini-mountains, hills etc.) to underdeveloped plots all over Manhattan. This would create a new urban condition, where the newly constructed landscape becomes a cohesive part of the city. This reimagined parkland would allow for hiking, climbing, swimming and other outdoor activities. And finally, the reflective glass façade canvassing the wall of skyscrapers will reflect the park’s natural terrain and create the illusion of a never-ending natural world within the heart of Manhattan’s concrete jungle, while also offering New Yorkers’ a perspective of the landscape that is not limited by the park’s physical boundaries. The 1000 feet tall, 100 feet wide wall of skyscrapers/mega-structure would create 7 square miles (80 times greater than the Empire State Building) of habitable indoor space, while introducing more natural diversity and verticality to the once flat 1.3 square mile Central Park. The seven-mile-perimeter wraparound mega-structure would contain apartments, retails, museums, libraries, etc. within the 100 feet deep inhabitable walls, with an unobstructed view and connection to the park. Following Manhattan’s city grid, there are main circulation cores (elevators) that would align with every single street from 59th to 110th street to transfer people down to the park, as well as to other various floors. Secondary circulation (ramps, stairs) would connect separate spaces in various scales between the cores. The goal of the concept is to reverse the traditional relationship between landscape and architecture. Instead of building distant, flat landscapes to surround and complement individual architectural buildings, the natural landscape is now the centerpiece. In this case, the dynamic landscape is surrounded by characterless architecture that tries to be nothing but mirror that reflects nature. In the heart of New York City’s concrete jungle, a New Horizon is born.
Drone technology, adopted by many large corporations, has become a leading trend in the field of fast-delivery, aerial mapping, commercial advertising, government inspection, and filmmaking. As recent years have witnessed a rise in the development of drone technology, several major corporations, such as Amazon, DHL and Walmart, have begun investigating the use of drones in high-speed delivery service. As more and more people live on internet-based lifestyles, these “small flying robots” could easily become an ordinary part of future everyday life. The demand for high-speed drone delivery is estimated to increase continuously in the upcoming years. However, legal restrictions on the navigation of drones are currently standing in the way of drastically broadening the use of drones The Hive is an infrastructure project that can better meet the emerging demand for incorporating advanced Drone technology into daily life in New York City. The project was proposed as an alternative asset argument for the usage of the land on 432 Park Avenue, the project aims to create a central control terminal that hosts docking and charging stations for personal or commercial drones (unmanned aerial vehicles) in the center of Manhattan. The current air-zoning regulations are to be re-shaped in a vertical highway model around a tower. This centrally controlled model will be more appealing to the legislative sector as it adheres to the concerns about regulating drone traffic. The primary location of the building does not only gather the commercial power of Manhattan, but also stands away from the no-fly-zones set by the FAA. in various aspects of our daily lives. No-fly zones and conditions to maintain visibility with the drone at all times are two of the main constraints. To provide a safe landing environment, the tower projected a new method for drones to dock horizontally onto their corresponding platforms with the fitting shape and scale; the platform with docked drones can be flipped vertically to be in parallel with the tower façade. The façade is constantly animated as the platforms flip outwards and backwards to nest back into it. Live Façade The Modules on the façade are designed to fit nine different types of drones, categorized by the shape and scale of their landing fixtures (point, bar or ring). A sequential study of how to categorize non-uniformed industry products into modular fixed architectural structures was conducted through a series of simplification of the geometries and articulations of the fo The overall organization of the façade uses layering as means to maximize surface area, with two overlapping exterior layers and an inner layer. A hierarchy is established, as the size of drones and modules is smaller in the inner layer creating a more intricate interior that can be accessed by the smallest drones by a major opening in the façade.rms. The different sizes and geometry of the drone paired with different size and geometry of the module result in a variety of configurations. The transparency of the tower changes constantly, while the tenants of the building-the drones fly in and out. The flickering lights of the battery station behind each module help with navigation and also indicate the occupancy percentage of the building as well.
"Data is proliferating: every transaction, entry, emails, and even every mouse click is stored in a server. Annual global IP traffic will pass the zettabyte threshold by the end of 2016, and will reach 2 zettabytes per year by 2019. Considering this, a problem in the near future will be to find a place to store this information. A data center is the physical location hosting different servers used by many types of companies, it is used to store and process all the information we generate every day. Today data centers consume a lot of energy and have a large carbon footprint: servers absorb a lot of electrical power and they need to be constantly cooled down to avoid overheating problems. The solution for the future is hosting data centers where the power is clean and the costs are low. For this reason some companies have been started to think about Iceland. Iceland is a strategic location for data centers for 3 reasons: •	Location: its placement between Europe and the U.S. means that companies can run their web services for both continents in one location; •	Renewable energy sources: Iceland can offer data center services powered by 100% clean energy (hydropower and geothermal) for the same price or less than web services powered by fossil fuel-based grids in other locations; •	Climate: Iceland’s proximity to the Arctic Circle allows exploiting cold temperatures and a fresh natural breeze that could be used to cool down the servers avoiding the costs of a traditional cooling system."
Manhattan is a paradise of skyscrapers, which not only decorate the city’s skyline, but also provide more usable space for people living there. This design scheme starts from a most basic architectural component, an arch that undergoes transformations through the changes of light, human behavior, and other factors to form different spaces/units, which overlap one another vertically to form the final design. Arch and hidden transportationIn both, Middle Ages cathedrals in Europe and ancient pagodas in China, we found that double-layer arches could create a mezzanine, which we cunningly combined with vertical transportation, which works exceptionally well to service spaces. This hidden space inspire us invent a new relationship between arch and transportation. Arch and spatial transparencyEither in a Gothic cathedral or a Chinese Buddhist pagoda, lighting is altered by the height and span of arches. In this project, we reconsolidate the acknowledged form of the arch and tend to reinvent a new arch system that is defined by direction, dimension, and memorial distortion.
Tracing back to two hundred years ago, urban growth came with the demolition of old buildings, which then were replaced with clusters of new larger and denser buildings. The original residents, in many cases, were forced to move out and were reimbursed for a monetary loss. Urbanization was based on this constant cycle. Today, however, there is a new era that people have been waiting for but was not imagined. Contrary to demolishing old buildings to achieve urbanization, the early generation legislated a rule that all of new constructions cannot be built at the sacrifice of demolishing old ones. The past buildings remain in physical forms various mirrors to tell who we used to be and where we had been. As a return, the original residents of old buildings are able to stay, to hold high value of properties, and to enjoy the majestic view. In order to keep the past and to accommodate the future on limited land, every generation starts to construct new buildings from the bottom of existing ones. Consequently, older buildings constantly rest on top of newer blocks. They gradually, generation by generation, penetrate clouds and become memorials beyond the sky.
City’s Affinity for AutomataTokyo has long been the leading city for robotics and manufacturing. The city’s fascination towards science and engineering has changed how society interact with machines. Its culture and social patterns have long revolved around its obsession with automation and its high regard for automated systems. The proliferation of vending machines in Tokyo is impossible to ignore. They are on nearly every block in Tokyo down alleyways, in front of convenience stores and almost in every neighbourhood. As a result, these machines have minimised the cost of human labour, eliminating the need for sales clerks. The Pod Vending Machine explores the possibility of converting the real estate industry into an automated vending system. Building on DemandAbandonment of construction projects remains a serious problem in the construction industry. It results in the wastage of materials and resources. It affects not only the immediate house buyers but also other project players and the general public. In some occasions, it also involves the use of public fund for the revival of abandoned projects. In response to the problem, the scheme proposes a building is constantly under construction: A tower that grows in parallel with the city’s housing demand. Borrowing the Japanese maxim Wabi-sabi, the building remains an ‘incomplete infrastructure’ that changes and adapts over time. ProposalA skyscraper that functions as a home dispenser. It continuously grows according to the city’s housing demand. The building production method adopts an automated system. Ready-to-use pods are manufactured, plugged onto site and can be purchased instantly. A pod printer that 3D prints modular dwellings is installed above the building. The printer will dispense pods and will grow higher as the building grows. Inspired by a commonly used machine that dispenses nearly all of life’s necessities for the people of Tokyo, this vast framed structure aims to house a large number of pods equipped with basic amenities for residential and commercial use.
Extract from the scientists report.Planet Earth, March 16th 2039. The world is a safe place again.We went through the time when the complex patterns representing the world were doomed to collapse, climate was changing at a rate exceeding most scientific forecasts; oceans warming, air pollution and climate change were caught in a discernible self-boosting loop. Global warming was becoming catastrophic and irreversible. Thereupon, we grasped the urge to take action. Carbon dioxide – the abundant greenhouse gas and primary driver of global warming – levels in Antarctica raised to an unprecedented number in 4 million years. “The far southern hemisphere was the last place on the earth where Carbon dioxide had not yet reached this mark”, Peter Tans, lead scientist, NOAA’s Global Greenhouse Gas Reference Network (June 2016).
Dar es Salaam, Tanzania’s largest city, with a population of 4.5 million, with the city’s stable and high economic growth of 6.5% per annum over the last decade, it has become one of the fastest growing cities in the world. Due to large amounts of investments being injected into the construction, communication and mining sectors, Dar es Salaam is now prioritising infrastructural and commercial developments throughout the city. For this reason, many informal settlements are being destroyed for development, displacing hundreds and thousands of people, getting further and further away from the city’s infrastructure. Due to Dar es Salaam’s huge shift in economy, the poverty rate has declined to approximately 28%. However, one in six people still live below the national poverty line, almost unchanged due to the high population rate.  While the city is growing, it is also rapidly urbanizing, but countless cannot afford to live within the city which leads to falling into informal settlements. 80% of informal settlements are overcrowded, lack clean water and adequate sanitary and are surrounded by garbage and toxic materials. With the expanding population, these problems will only escalate, putting more people’s livelihoods at risk. The proposal seeks to address these problems by adapting and reconfiguring an alternative solution for slum-dwellers, by the means of a ‘Vertical Village’. This vertical village aims to provide a higher quality of life to the inhabitants, eliminating rough and unsanitary conditions for a cleaner and safer environment. The design also recognises the key factors associates with slum communities – autonomy, flexibility and a strong sense of community. This offers dwellers the opportunity to develop in synchronisation with the rest Dar es Salaam.
The Mountain is a skyscraper located in California at Yosemite National Park. The structure reaches almost 3,000 feet in the year and is conceptualized to exist congruously with the existing environment. ConceptThe illusion of separation between man and nature continues to be perpetuated in the zeitgeist of a culture where forward thinking and technological advancement come at the expense of our environment. A relationship constrictively defined as occupant (man) and habitat (nature), the general consensus is that one is recurrently intruding on the other. In the pursuit to reconcile this dichotomy, The Mountain generates a spacial and functional relationship between context and program. To cultivate a harmonious environment, the structure combines synthetic and natural resources that equilibrate the necessities of man and nature. ArchitectureThe Mountain takes the primitive idea of naturally cavernous space and combines it with the form of a modern skyscraper. Using a grid to establish a framework for the design, the mountain cliffside becomes the host for the spaces to be carved out of. These extrusions are negative spaces embedded in the towering natural structure of the earth. Individually, the habitats are able to occupy different programs varying in scale. When aggregated together the volumes form a monolithic skyscraper reaching thousands of feet into the the air.
Human desires are endless and incapable of coexisting with nature. Crying in agony, nature seems to fight back with worldwide natural disasters. Deforestation is one of the worse crimes on nature and also one of the main causes of natural disasters. Now it is the time to change, to stop exploiting nature and find equilibrium. The Giant Sequoia in the United States, worshipped by the Native Americans, has been mercilessly destroyed by modernization. Global warming has increased the breeding rate of pests and has shortened the life span of these trees. Moreover, the Giant Sequoia with enormous volume and height does not grow deep roots. When the heartwood, or the structural backbone start to rot, they fall dead by its own weight. This project attempts to show a new architectural approach to human coexistence with nature, in harmony with the nature’s temporality. The architecture quietly takes place in the empty void of trunks, without hindering the breathtaking landscape formed by the giants. It then becomes active as an artificial organ to replace the trunks rotten away. Only occupied in the void is the minimal gesture necessary for human occupation.
Moscow can’t breathe anymore due to non-stopping traffic jams. The transportation system needs to be improved- radical solutions are needed. The analysis revealed the problem of the underground transportation system is that they lack connection to some metro branches, there are long intervals between trains, and problems with transfers between the stations are frequent. There is also the problem of inability to get from one periphery area to another without passing through the center, that is, the so-called pendulum movement “from the periphery-to the center-to the periphery”. This problem can be solved by the formation of a new transportation system and the emergence of a new type of transport. To solve this problem has been created additional chords to the existing system on which the train will move. This is a string-rail system, located on poles, like a monorail, but is more environmentally friendly, low-cost, allowing to develop more speed and allow to set support poles wide apart. Transportation chords will connect disjoint metro station and highway, at the intersection of which must be located multifunctional transport hub, including not only transferring from one type of transport to another, but also the social and cultural functions which are needed in this area. Also multifunctional object should become a new attraction point in the area. The location of the transport hub has been selected at the Vykhino metro station. This is the busiest station of the Moscow metro, because it is the intersection of railways and subways. Also monotonous types of buildings dominate this area and it does not have its point of attraction.
As the rate of space travel increases exponentially and off-Earth settlements multiply, the political and regulatory networks of the human species will likewise expand and diversify. From this growth emerges a new nexus of activity: Earth Port One. Evolved from the electromagnetic propulsion technology first pioneered for space travel in the ancestral StarTram system, Earth Port One – or simply the Port – is the planet’s foremost spaceport for transporting mass volumes of people and goods between Earth and Deep Space destinations. Its Antarctic location, which allows for the most efficient access to polar orbits, by treaty, remains unclaimed by any single sovereign nation since its discovery. The Port is the result of the largest international joint venture in recorded history and is an icon of human collaboration and creation. For these reasons, Earth Port One houses the Embassy: a singular Earth bound location which serves as neutral ground for the delegates of various extra-terrestrial agencies to assemble and interact. Whether it is to discuss off-world trade agreements, the establishment of new orbital communities, or the Interplanetary Olympic Games, the Port provides the means and space to host such conversations.
Currently known as the worst humanitarian crisis of our time, the on-going Syrian civil war has not only eroded the nation in its entirety but also defaced its cultural identity. Over 11 million people have been displaced in the last five years and 4.8 million refugees have been forced to seek protection in neighboring countries, resulting in a continental scale exodus. What was once a land with a rich history and diverse culture is now a war-torn nation reduced to rubble. In response to the existing ruined city fabric and architecture, ‘The Silver Lining’ concept proposes a radical approach of process driven conversion of post-war debris into a myriad of raw building material. The proposed mega form line establishes a colossal yet sublime presence above the broken city, adjoining the crumbled fabric through extreme horizontality. The proposal extracts the debris from the city into the mega form 200m above ground level and then deposits it under a series of systematic processes from which the reformed material will be placed back onto ground zero for construction. This procedure is distinct and isolated from the post war wreckage; to accentuate the creation of the new city typology from the old. The new city will rise above the debris of war to give the Syrian capital: Damascus a new beginning.
Nowadays, the construction of the building needs a lot of time, manpower, and working procedure. A variety of buildings are formed through being assembled with different materials. However, the changeless rigid material has not been able to meet the people’s pursuit of the architectural form, and the complex construction process also limits the development of the building. So we hope to explore a new architectural model to meet people’s pursuit of architectural form while reducing the tedious construction process. Draping – just like putting on clothes for a building, which are tailor made from inside to outside. We hope to find out a new material which can be arbitrarily folded, cut, enclosed, sewed, turned over, and falls into a pattern. Tower just shows such a concept and form. Most of its exterior spread like vertically carpet from its top floor, the local contraction showing a part of the internal details. In addition, its interior is assembled with more detailed small units. This method not only makes the construction of the building more convenient and simple, makes the building repaired easily, but also makes the material easily reused and recycled after the demolition. As a result, the building will be able to developed more possibilities, the burden that formed for modeling reduced in the aspect of structure, so the method is more convenient for the construction process and for recycling to reuse, which solves the problem that the vast majority of construction waste, and also brings people a new space experience.
Senseless, disconnected blocks crowd the urban scape. The absence of dialogue, of emotional connection, brings up the question: where does art end and architecture begin? Although art and architecture are distinctly different, they share one obvious characteristic: the ability to activate emotional response. In its thousand years of history, architecture spoke of myths and tales through sculptural expression, and tapped into its ability. However, coming into the 20th century’s age of mechanization, the doctrine ‘form follows function’ manifest itself so deeply that now, architecture of raw, honest narrative is hard to be found. The issue at hand in the modern city is not simply the “modern box” aesthetic. The problem is that these structures lack an authentic connection to the ever-changing dialogue in which they exist. To our stories. The human castell, inspired by the castells of ancient Catalonia, continue the story that was abruptly cut off. By bringing back formal expression in full force supported by new technologies, the tower begins to fill in the blank page.
New York, the densest and largest city in the World, is also widely reported to be the most wasteful in terms of garbage, water use and energy. It generates 14 million tonnes of waste each year and spends $2.3 billion per year disposing it off. Until 2001 nearly all of NYC waste ended up in landfill in the borough of Staten Island. Since its closure the garbage is transported to landfills elsewhere. This approach is only diverting the problem and fails to recognize that the reason for excessive amount of waste is not only the sheer size of the city but is mostly a result of consumer-throwaway culture. The magnitude of this manifestation of wastefulness is amplified with the density. Manhattan, the densest county in America, generates 2400 tonnes of waste alone every day. There is a constant flow of products into the busy city centre and at the same time a flow of waste going out. This waste is scarcely recycled due to lack of public recycling facilities and either ends up in landfill or if recycled, the raw material, goes as far as China to be used in manufacture again. This results in pollution due to transport. This consumerism and wastefulness cycle continues on a global scale. Urban Mining Factory is a vertical recycling factory in the heart of the city. A factory which turns trash to product. Process is focused on the materials and waste of the city such as paper, plastic or food and turning those into products and fuel that the city needs.
For a long time, ancient Chinese people have unlimited desire for the mysterious sky. Many years ago, China experienced the era of exploring the high-rise building, such as high-platform building, Tasha, and so on, even our ancient emperor Wei also want to build a super high palace. All of the stories show our ancestors’ aspirations and creative ideas for the high-altitude buildings. Cultural inheritance is considered as a significant design element in the development of exploring the high-rise buildings. We should solve the ecological issues by using our science and technological methods and try our best to preserve our historical cultures. Human destroy nature, break and disorder the balance of original ecological system. Our plan try to consider architecture as a special medium to better the relationship among human and nature and recover the balance of ecological system. We use the traditional design forms to solve the environmental problems and preserve the regional cultural context. Analyze and reorganize the functions in multiple ways to create a living complex with the local cultural significance. We try to use Chinese painting comfortable and free expression forms to plan and design architecture to strengthen the contacts between different people, human and nature.
Since the industrial revolution, production fuels the capitalism and consumerism, the big cities and skyscrapers become possible. And this was when workers began to play an important role in this complicated social system. Due to the height they need to work at, construction workers are viewed as one of the most dangerous professions now, not to mention in early days when security measures were less efficient. They are risking their life building our cities when architects and city planners seem to take all the credit. Ironically, the construction builders are underpaid, surviving at the bottom of the society. As our cities sprawl over the land, the confrontation between the worker class and upper social classes has become sharper than ever. The luxurious skyscrapers take up the urban space, while the constructers of these buildings end up in city corners or even homeless. They have laid every piece of brick in the city, yet were driven away from the kingdom they built by high prices and other urban problems. Seldom do they have a chance to live a city life. “Workers of the world, unite!”Change will happen. The workers start from a common strike and take up movement. Soon the site of taking up will become a site to live. With scaffolds erected, workers move in, infrastructure built, a community of workers leaded by constructors grows out of the top of our concrete jungle. That’s the babel tower of workers, a heterotopia for worker class in the central and topmost area in a metropolitan, a deserved decent place to live and reproduce in the city they have devoted themselves to.
From the beginning of time we have shown our eagerness towards progress. “Mutable man may be able to make them (challenges of life within the boundaries of death) – our existence as a species can have genuine meaning and fulfillment. However, vast the darkness, we must supply our own light.” – Kubrick said. The very meaninglessness of life forces a man to create his own meaning. We could understand the history of mankind though this eagerness, from the cave man – to the industrial revolution. Elon Musk says there are two fundamental paths to our future, one path is we stay on Earth forever with an eventual extinction event. The other is to become a multi-planetary species, which should be our generation’s milestone. Dreaming for the stars
Typhoon, as we all know, brings huge damages to human life and property. It could be considered as one of the worst natural disasters in the world, meanwhile, contains a huge energy which could even raze a whole city to the ground. As nowadays the deterioration of our living environment, we have all reasons to assume that, like most cases of extreme weather, the strike of the typhoon will become increasingly frequent. And Taipei, by its special location where the typhoon shows its horrible power most thoroughly, is regarded as a typical district in our research and design. Our design consists of two main correlated parts. The main building serves as a view frame of city landscape, inside which we arrange a variety of functions, including water retaining, storage, temporary shelter, research institution, and exhibition. Between the frames is a three-dimensional staggered space structure for holding numbers of devices for energy collection and typhoon intervention. Driven by the strong winds, these devices will float diffusely among a larger scale, converting and collecting the kinetic energy from winds to mechanical energy, electrical energy or thermal energy. They will also release chemical substances later in the air, including dry ice and other catalysts, for dropping the temperature and dehumidify the surrounding high moi sture air. After the mission is done, another building, whose location should be chosen by probability calculation result, will capture all devices again. With both preventing and defending approaches, we see this project as an attempt for human positive intervening measures towards future disasters.
A city which is almost entirely built by private Industry. But when you look at the city closely it’s a city which is a direct result of the hyper capitalist consumerist economy. It has a private metro line, fire bridged, energy system and even security forces. As much as this has facilitated the growth of the city it has resulted into some strange happenings in the city. According to the Belgian philosopher, Lieven de Cauter, we experience our civilization only in capsular states. Based on this hypothesis, Gurgaon NOW asks what consequences such encapsulation – what Peter Sloterdijk identifies as spheres or foam formation, could have on our urban condition. The question is pursued through the architectural program of a city of call centers – that is, could serve as a model and organizational prototype for a city and the constant expansion of urbanization? The design tasks contextualize the Gurgaon as a prototype relative to the existing growing cities in developing countries. The result of the design process is a strange city building whose formal principle derives from the misfit between other, different buildings and whose form is at once familiar and strange.
New York is a multicultural city where many beliefs and religions coexist. Death gives rise to various dispositions, as evidenced by the many cemeteries in the city. Religion has an evolving character. We assume that in the near future we will see a standardization of practices, beliefs, where attachment to the body will become non-existent. This sends to question the future of the cemetery. At present, in view of the increase of the population, verticalization appears as a solution against the shortage of urban spaces. The cemetery establishes itself by digging in the basement spaces proportional to the different religions, while making the case of the current problems. Then, the more it springs, the more the present spaces will detach themselves from the basic uses of the cemetery. It will become confused with the sky and then disappear : the cemetery has no place to be. This vertical edifice represents the image of the evolution of manners with respect to death, body and spirit. The building itself detaches from its envelope. It is like the allegory of the progressive detachment of man from the body.
Death and OblivionDeath is inseparable aspect of our life. Cemeteries are usually located very close to us, occupied a lot of valuable land within city center which can be returned to citizens as a new, vibrant public space. However, it is very important to take care of our history and personal experiences, and share them with other people. Nowadays people tend to forget about importance of achievements done by our ancestors. Constantly changing world needs a new kind of medium to immortalize people’s cultural impact on society. Data CemeteryThe following is a proposal of new unique form of cemetery, not as a burial ground but infinite archive of memories and civilization milestones. Cloud like structure of the building is filled with diamond data storage particles made from ashes of the dead. The data cubes contain their speeches and messages to future generations. It provides a unique opportunity of reviving memories of other people, and proves that everyone has a moralizing story to tell. Testament of CivilizationRapidly growing and constantly changing, chaotic world also needs a solution oriented towards creation of protected archive to preserve world heritage and achievements of world’s brightest minds.  Over the centuries many cultural relicts, works of art and manuscripts has been destroyed in social and economical conflicts. The Cloud in its diamond-based memory, also stores this type of data in a form of brightest people’s memories that can be presented by using holographic projections. Instead of creating depressing, silence empty space, the complex works as a learning facility and a monument of all humanity.
London’s skyline can be thought of as a collage city – where the unique individuality of each tower prevents it from engaging with the urban scale of its surroundings. This divergent urban order is neither unique to London nor a condition that will diminish without careful and direct intervention. Our project seeks to address this collage condition by creating a complex that is at once individual and collective as a field of pencil towers blending seamlessly between one another – creating a new and iconic urban order as an archetype for London’s continued growth. Bishopsgate Goodsyard is the largest remaining undeveloped piece of land in central London, however it is not vacant. Currently occupied by a massive brick viaduct and bisected by an Overground rail-line, the Bishopsgate Goodsyard is a unique opportunity for density and diversity to redefine the conventions of the typical skyscraper while addressing the distinct character of the site. The project is organized into four main components: a high-density tower, a mid-rise neighborhood, a train station that bridges between the two, and a park landscape that mediates between the existing viaduct and the various access points throughout the site.  Each of the four components are given their own unique character, and by blending them into a continuous field they produce a differentiated system that accommodates diverse and overlapping programs at a hyper dense urban scale.
Manhattan is the most densely populated district of New York, where there are massive towering skyscrapers. Although the skyscraper is the hallmark of the modern metropolis, it’s necessary to pay attention to the existing problem when we concern the superiority of skyscrapers at the same time. However, skyscrapers in saving the land are not absolutely, and it is actually have very high requirements on the surrounding environment, such as road traffic, virescence, parking, etc. The higher the building is, the more the need for the surrounding facilities and open areas. For the whole city, the density of dense high-rise buildings can not only bring inconvenience to people’s lives, but also make people feel depressed, and it’s not conducive to people’s physical and mental health. In order to solve the problems such as the narrow space of the city, the traffic congestion and so on, we upgrade the ground, dividing the urban space into two independent parallel spaces. Ultimately, the parallel Manhattan born. Each person, or everything, will produce different results in different spaces, but the time in this space is the same as that of the original urban space.
Mashamba– Swahili, East Africa. An area of cultivated ground; a plot of land, a small subsistence farm for growing crops and fruit-bearing trees, often including the dwelling of the farmer. Over the last 30 years, worldwide absolute poverty has fallen sharply (from about 40% to under 20%). But in African countries, the percentage has barely fallen. Still today, over 40% of people living in sub-Saharan Africa live in absolute poverty. More than half of them have something in common: they’re small farmers. Despite several attempts, the green revolution’s mix of fertilizers, irrigation, and high-yield seeds—which more than doubled global grain production between 1960 and 2000—never blossomed in Africa, because of poor infrastructure, limited markets, weak goverments, and fratricidal civil wars that wracked the postcolonial continent. The main objective of the project is to bring this green revolution to the poorest people. Giving training, fertilizer, and seeds to the small farmers can give them an opportunity to produce as much produce per acre as huge modern farms. When farmers improve their harvests, they pull themselves out of poverty. They also start producing surplus food for their neighbors. When farmers prosper, they eradicate poverty and hunger in their communities. Mashambas is a movable educational center, which emerges in the poorest areas of the continent. It provides education, training on agricultural techniques, cheap fertilizers, and modern tools; it also creates a local trading area, which maximizes profits from harvest sales. Agriculture around the building flourishes and the knowledge spreads towards the horizon. The structure is growing as long as the number of participants is rising. When the local community becomes self-sufficient it is transported to other places. The structure is made with simple modular elements, it makes it easy to construct, deconstruct and transport. Modules placed one on the other create the high-rise, which is a form that takes the smallest as possible amount of space from local farmers. Today hunger and poverty may be only African matter, but the world’s population will likely reach nine billion by 2050, scientists warn that this would result in global food shortage. Africa’s fertile farmland could not only feed its own growing population, it could also feed the whole world.
Bring factories to the cityBy 2025, the number of megacities, cities with a population over 10 million people, will grow from 23 to 36, and the population in the top 600 cities in the world will grow by 500 million. In the near future, two-thirds of the world’s population will live in these megacities. Factories moved to areas outside cities because they were noisy and polluting. But now, many factories are cleaner and could have a new place in the urban environment. Moving them back into the city would provide a higher quality of life, by allowing employees to walk to work rather than commute in cars. Urban factories would be closer to populations of skilled workers, suppliers and technical and research centers. This is the vision we have for the cities of tomorrow: factories will be dissolved into small pieces and then be stacked together into high-rise vertical factories. By bringing factories back to the city, we can achieve zero CO2 emissions, be energy efficient, and provide higher quality of life to the inhabitants. Sustainable waste management.The Philippines’ National Capital Region, Metropolitan Manila, has 14 cities (Las Piñas, Makati, Malabon, Mandaluyong, Manila, Marikina, Muntinlupa, Parañaque, Pasig, Valenzuela, Kalookan, Pasay, Quezon and Taguig) and 3 municipalities (Navotas, San Juan, and Pateros). The region has a population approximately growing at a rate of 4% annually; the increasing population and urbanization of the region results in the creation of more industries and establishments. Inadequate collection vehicles and lack of disposal sites have contributed to the reduction of waste collection efficiency. The main problem of too much garbage generation will hardly be solved when the solutions are not really targeting the main problem. Each dumpsite can only contain a specific capacity or amount of garbage and when it gets reaches its threshold it eventually becomes non-functional and will be shut down. The Metro Manila Development Authority reacts by searching for alternative location for dumpsites. Metro Manila’s dumpsite problem will never end until local governments are able to drastically reduce their garbage output as mandated by Republic Act 9003. Metro Manila’s poor drainage system, pollution, and garbage problem might have worsened the effects of the heavy downpour that ‘Ondoy’ brought to the area. Metro Manila city mayors claimed that it was the garbage problem that was a major factor in the heavy flooding caused by Ondoy (Calonzo GMA News, 2009). Bring nature back to the cityDue to the large population in Manila, a great amount of organic waste is produced daily. This waste will be the resource of the new vertical factory. All the waste will be dumped at the bottom level of the factory, and then they will be transformed into valuable products including water, fertilizer, heat, and electricity. We use these products to create different kinds of natural environment. The landscape is shaped according to the scale and shape of factories. Organic waste then can be turned into new city landscape while factories hide beyond natural surfaces. The main concept of this design is to let people be aware of the truth that the natural environment is a loop, everything you produce will then form the new world. Instead of criticizing the pollution problem we create the most ideal way for people to understand the best interaction between human and nature.
The eastern coast of Spain, containing the most highly populated seafront areas in the country, has suffered an indiscriminate urban expansion. Criteria for construction have erred on the speculative side rather than being the rational consequence of studying the urban needs of the territory. Espiral3500 is situated in “La Albufera”, an agricultural natural park which has been subjected to speculation based development and expansive growth. Tourism has become the main force of attraction. With it, it has produced an urban sprawl, which has disfigured the landscape. Tourism in the area causes an increase in population density of up to 1000% in some localities, turning them from ghost towns in winter to areas of high most density in summer. Would a more coherent model have been possible in “La Albufera” given knowledge of its operation? A model that advocates management of the territory and its demands over selling its most precious good, the land; this is where the typology of the skyscraper becomes relevant as a figure that can absorb most of the anxieties and demands of the population. This element would be capable of seeing to the touristic needs without greatly affecting the natural resources of the territory. The gaps produced by the cyclical nature of tourism in the vertical construction could result in additional maintenance costs. However, the gaps experienced during winter in territories of the extensive model leave a far more devastating scenery behind, producing a total disassembly of most services and urban functions due to reduction of their density. What type of skyscraper should be introduced? The successful level repetition skyscraper model of the 20th century must be transformed. To this end, I focus on initial theories on verticality, in which the concept of verticality is seen as the possibility of reproducing and extending all that happens at ground level. Then, why not place public spaces inside buildings? This tower would no longer be an element where solely private dynamics take place. The Spanish eastern coast city is the quintessential city of public and open spaces. This skyscraper explores the interesting standpoint of introducing the streets and all of the city’s horizontal plane complexity into the vertical realm.
Broadway in downtown Los Angeles was one of the most famous street in United States and had the highest concentration of cinemas in the world by 1930s. The ornamental baroque style theaters witnessed the prosperity of Broadway in the past. However, with the decline of downtown and the migration of entertainment industry to Hollywood, Broadway became an abandoned area in downtown and is perceived as a dangerous location at night. This proposal is aimed to revitalize the Broadway theater district and explore a universal strategy to preserve and renovate the historic downtown area.
The “Sand Dam”, built in the edge of Cairo, Egypt that border the desert, is a wall which blocks the blowing sand or even the sandstorms. In addition to alleviating the land desertification and the inconvenience of  people’s life caused by the blowing sand and the Khamsīn, the “Sand Dam” can also slow down the urban expansion due to the overpopulation of Cairo. Khamsīn , more commonly known in Egypt as khamaseen, is a dry, hot, sandy local wind, blowing from the south, in North Africa and the Arabian Peninsula. The“Sand Dam”is a high-rise which can move regularly because of the tank track at the bottom of the huge racks and walls. The huge dam can be called as an anti-desertification wall, as it can increase the city area as well as the cultivated area by moving outwards until the soil inside the wall reaches steady state. With this process happens periodically, people can make use of the sandstorm and the Khamsīn in Egypt to get the wind power. Moreover, a cement factory built in the middle of the “Sand Dam” can also take advantage of the local materials, which may solve the employment problem in the slum area. To find the relationship between public space and private space in high-rise buildings, we referred to the concentric circle theory of urban planning. This relationship is reflected in the facade which face the city. The center of the cluster, which is corresponded to the air outlet of the desert facade in the section, is kind of a city park as the space here is the most public. The filter intercepts the sand in the wind as well as reduces the wind in order to maintain the thermal comfort.
 The beginning of the Timber AgeCan high rise architecture act as a mechanism to manifest low carbon materials and environmental design principles allowing our cities to breathe? In recent years, the scarcity of natural resources tied with a push for greener construction methodologies has started to change perceptions of mass timber construction systems. Global Government and industry led initiatives into improving the sustainability and Carbon efficiencies of construction partnered with technological advancements in timber technologies will result in a rise of tall timber structures. The project explores the possibilities of using timber for the creation of high rise architecture by carefully considering material sourcing, structural performance, environment, digital design and off site fabrication issues. Implementing prefabricated timber systems not only reduces carbon emissions when compared with steel and concrete, but instead captures embodied carbon within the timber itself. The rule of thumb is that an average 1m3 of timber can store 1 ton of co2. This means that architectural interventions within the built environment can act as Carbon sinks thus improving the sustainability of our cities.
This is a skyscraper that aims to rejuvenate the indigenous salt farming community of the great Rann in Gujarat, India, namely, the Agariyas. The project seeks to become an architectural epitome that caters to the future and ambitions of the region by utilizing the abundant salt as the building block of the community’s macrocosm.An ecological and social renaissance for the people of the cursed land has been sought for by providing them a structure which endeavours to achieve better opportunities for the people. THE WHITE DESOLATIONThe vast expanse of the salt marsh is characterized by myriad salt pans disseminated with makeshift shacks. Inter societal islands arise due to isolated pattern of settlement. An absolute absence of social and physical infrastructure is observed which renders the community incapable of mutual learning. Deteriorating health because of long exposure to immense salt and solar concentration further intensifies it. The salt marsh betrays the community every monsoon, because the fields become completely submerged in water, making annual migration necessary. HABITAT ASSIMILATIONThe project induces community interaction and interdependence, coupled with efficient service delivery. Standard, systematic and non-intermittent salt production throughout the year due to juxtaposed functions which provide ease in the output cycle. Integration of vacuum evaporation plant with the building gives rise to an effortless method of production. Forging a resilient, permanent and sustainable setup with increased dependence of solar power creates a heterogeneous yet admissible ecosystem for the community. An increment in the efficiency of salt production from solar evaporation through introduction of novel methodology, machinery and community training boosts the comprehensive output.
Story Civilization 0.000 is a high tech structure, placed at Cape Horn in Southern Chile, that uses locally available renewable energy sources to generate electricity. Making use of the ample wind, wave, and tidal energy of this region, the structure would utilize a combination of 19 wind turbines, 4 wave power plants, and 6 tidal power turbines to create 100 million kWh of renewable energy each year. However the electricity production is only one of many important functions such as living space, education, resource management, energy storage, research and engineering. Cape Horn – The first 0.000 unitThe first ever designed 0.000 unit will be placed at Cape Horn, the southernmost headland of the Tierra del Fuego archipelago of southern Chile. This unit will be specialized in generating electricity. If we take a look on the global energy maps, we’ll recognize the enormous amount of wind-, wave-, and tidal energy concentrated in this area. The choice to design the first 0.000 unit there is almost self-explanatory. DesignForm follows force – There are three main forces, that define the whole structure – wind, wave & tidal energy. Through a series of different experiments and optimizations according its aqua- and aerodynamic features, the building is composed of three main structural and functional areas – tower, platform & tidal power station.
Yemen is one of the poorest countries in the world. The armed conflicts raging for several months are deteriorating an already critical situation. In addition to causing terrible human suffering, these attacks are destroying Yemen’s unique cultural heritage, which is the repository of people’s identity. Yemen has architectural masterpieces. Shibam is probably the most emblematic example of them. The 16th-century Walled City of Shibam remains the oldest metropolis in the world to use vertical construction, this construction is called « tower houses». The mud-brick high-rises, which stretch up to seven stories high, were constructed from the fertile soil surrounding the city. One of Unesco’s experts, Jacques Heyman, stresses the urgency of the situation : «Today almost nothing has been done to stop the ruin of this city, which is accelerating. If Shibalm is not restored immediately there won’t be much left to restore in 10 years’ time ». It seemed essential to put a spotlight on this threatened city. We must reverse the situation ! The idea is not to resolve an international conflict but to project into a peaceful future. The idea is to propose a sustainable extension of the city of Shibam. The development of the city is both constrained by its ramparts and by the constructive boundary of the mud-brick. The extension of the city is limited both horizontally and vertically. The only possible solution is in the ground itself. The idea is to dig the existing streets. The new Shibam, a natural extension of tower houses, are all roots that directly use the richness of the ground : the heat of the depths, the water of the groundwater, the thermal inertia of the ground, the mud as material and the depths as architecture. The tower is extended from a tower-house to a true skyscraper. Using existing resources under the city, Shibam steers clear from Yemen’s extreme import dependence. Mud construction requires heavy maintenance. Each year, a new layer of mud must be applied on the facades of the tower-houses. That one will be directly extracted from the underground extensions of Shibam. The annual renovation of the facade dictates the pace of the extension of the city at a rate of one meter per year. The existing connective bridges and doors between buildings used to provide a means of quick escape. The idea is to multiply the number of bridges to build a new network that would replace the one of the existing streets. In a peaceful Yemen, the development of the city will be strong but difficult to anticipate. That’s why the proposed expansion model offers a great deal of flexibility.
 A POST-WORK, POST-CAPITALISM WORLDHong Kong, in the near future, where automation has taken control to the full extend. A place where A.I and Robot have replaced 90% of the works. A universal basic income system has been delivered for all unemployed citizens. Human kind progress to a new kind of society: a post-work, post-capitalism world. As most of the white-collar jobs are fully automated, office towers will become useless and empty. However, the need for housing is never reduced. Indeed, since most people have no works, they will spend more time at home and enjoy their freedom. In exchange, people’s hobbies will turn to become their main activities. Thus, this lead to a mass reduction in office spaces, but an increment in housing space. Therefore, a logical policy from the autonomous governments will be executed to re-occupy, renovate and re-alter office towers to become a new type of housing for people, a truly bottom-up approach which create dynamic and democratic community across the ex-economical area of Hong Kong. AN AUTONOMOUS SYSTEMIn 2050, banking has turned to be fully online and autonomous. Bank Organization has started their campaign to give back the empty office space to the state. The state has deployed a strategy to re-distribute housing people from an overcrowded area, such as Kowloon into the center of ex-economical area, which now is becoming vacant. The Bank of China Tower, which was once described as a symbol of the capitalist forces, are now depicted to be one of the first structure to imply this democratic bottom-up housing strategy.
Have you ever thought about a life without water? If you think of the forest desertification image that you saw through YouTube, you can see little impact of water on human life. It is not well known that when water is not available, it contravenes water human rights, such as discrimination and a threat to safety, and can’t escape from poverty. In particular, water is more than just a drink in India. Every Indian loves their river, crossing over the religions and languages of the times. Before daybreak, Hindus take a bath and pray in the nearby river, they wash themselves with bronze water bottles as a religious ceremony. When religious festivals are held, tens of millions of people in the city are bring together. Despite efforts to solve the water system, which is based on international and India domestic law, India’s water demand appears to have failed to meet the demand. As urban population continues to grow with the rapid industrialization, additional 1.5 percent of waste water per day for each increasing in population has been made. Water pollution is serious in India, as the sewage treatment facility can only handle 30 percent of the total waste water and the huge volume of waste water is poured into rivers every year. Furthermore, the long lasting culture in India has accelerated river pollution. Therefore, we propose skyscrapers, including rivers, which are considered sacred to Indians as a way to build a water infrastructure in India. Indians can see rivers in high places and feel a hierarchy of rivers, and other people think of the Monumental meaning of rivers that Indians have. This demonstrates the potential of skyscrapers as an Indian infrastructure. The building cleans water came from the outside, fills in water from inside, and provides drinking water outside gradually. Water transported externally to each village is transferred via the units, and pipes and units form a wide network throughout the country. Ultimately, the project aims to increase the Indian’s water rights through water infrastructure.
Blocks in Manhattan are like small fortresses. The high dense development has rendered the whole block to become an interiorized space. There are only a few entrances to these 243,000 square feet of space and it does not lead you to a public space. Is there any way to develop these blocks in New York to have more connections to the community and become less isolated? And could there be a strategy to achieve that while making the block even denser? The Columbia University campus in upper Manhattan has a potential possibility to achieve this strategy. Although the block of Columbia University has a strong formal boundary than other blocks in New York, because of the intention of Mckim, Mead & White, who wanted to make the inside of the block comparable to the surrounding, it acknowledges the necessity of providing their space to the public, and developing the block as a whole. On the boundary of the campus, there are ascending entrances to enrich the feeling of spatial shift, and makes the contrast more distinctive between the mundane streets and the open campus. This strategy could go further and create an unexpected open space by filling up and connecting the space in between buildings on the boundary. 
We propose a skyscraper to get fresh water from the waters using the principles of nature. This building has a form that can best collect water vapor condensed in the sea. The condensed water flows to the stem through the trumpet and is fed to a vertically stacked farm. To reduce discarded water, the water used in each layer is used again in the lower layer after some water purification. The water used up to the ground level is stored in the lower part of the building after being purified. The stored water and harvested crops are transported to the ground through the ship. Utilizing the power of water falling from a height of about 2 km, hydroelectric power is generated inside the stem to produce energy.
The skyscraper aims to generate a solution for the unprecedented air pollution in Tehran, Iran by combining several innovative technologies in one. Tehran’s air pollution has been a decade-old issue, which has exponentially increased, in recent years. On average, one person dies of air pollution causes at every two hours, and people have been chocking to death from the air they inhale. The most significant causes of pollution in Tehran are the overwhelming number of vehicles, loose inspection regulations, high immigration from villages into the capital, non-standard gasoline, and most importantly the topography of Tehran. The deep topography is due to the mountains surrounding the city. This has resulted in the air being trapped. The site has been picked in the center of Tehran where the air pollution is the most concentrated and the topography is at its deepest. With this aim, the suggested skyscraper would create a new chain system between smartphones, pollution, and architecture. The most important factor is the involvement of people in the appearance of the skyscraper and the amount of data received from the people (through their smartphones) to fight pollution. This is done through an app, which syncs in real time with the skyscraper, creating a spatio-temporal system of visual and spatial syncing between pollution and architecture, through the people. The app provides different services for the exterior and the interior of the skyscraper on smartphones. The facade of the project is equipped with the quantum stealth material technology, which bends light to create invisibility, in accordance with the level of pollution. The data received form the various directions would be translated into the facade of the architecture. The amount of pollution directly affects the visibility of the architecture. The less pollution there is, the less visible the skyscraper would be since it is in a de-activated state. As the amount of pollution starts to rise, the architecture unhides and is activated in order to fight pollution through the diffusion of catalytic converters infused in a capsule.
Aviation has made the world a smaller place. A century ago it would take weeks to travel across a continent by rail, and months to traverse the oceans by ship; today, travelers can cross an ocean in a matter of hours and circumnavigate the globe in a few short days. As air travel has shrunk the world, however, aviation infrastructure has expanded exponentially. Today’s airports use a massive amount of space for terminals, concourses, taxiways, and runways.  This growth is compounded by the surrounding roads and highways feeding into, out of, and around these sprawling airport complexes. Moreover, airports are often hemmed in by the surrounding infrastructure, limiting future growth and complicating current designs. The use of verticality of structures, while not new, opens up new opportunities for development and expansion of airports into smaller footprints, leaving more available land for green space as well as for other development possibilities.  Future airports can take advantage of verticality to reduce their land use. Verticality is not just for infrastructure; it is also the wave of the future for aircraft as well. Vertical takeoff and propulsion systems in future aircraft will minimize the need for the kinds of taxiways and runways that are omnipresent in today’s airports. Eliminating or minimizing the use of paved spaces will allow the available land to be used for alterative purposes, from green spaces and parklands to commercial and agricultural development. This reduction in paved spaces will have other benefits as well, including a reduction in the heat sinks seen in today’s cities and other developed areas. Applying verticality to the development of future airports (or, for that matter, to redesigning existing airports) will fundamentally alter not just the way airports are designed, but how those developed spaces are used. The typology of today’s airports is focused on air travel first, with other uses, such as commercial spaces, largely serving as afterthoughts. Verticality will promote mixed-typology development, and future airports could include such things as farmer’s markets, farming factories, shopping malls, farming schools, aquaponics facilities and desalination plants. Airports designed around verticality would no longer have to be confined to the very outer reaches of urban areas and could be located closer to urban activities and populations. Local customers will avail themselves of the shopping malls and farmer’s markets. Onsite farm factories will produce goods for the airport markets, and schools located in the complex will provide agricultural education opportunities for both children and adult students in the region. An onsite artificial lake in the base of the structure could function as a water storage area connected via canals and subterranean tunnels to nearby bodies of water such as bays and even oceans. Using desalination, aquaponics and other processes, such an approach would open-up a wealth of potential for raising and harvesting fish, providing fresh water for onsite agriculture, and even drinking water for residents in the region.
Design backgroundAs the population increases and the global aging accelerates, the cities with dense population are facing the problems of fewer graveyard resources. Japan is the country with the highest level of aging in the world. In Tokyo, the capital of Japan, the problem is even worse. Recent research shows that the average age in Tokyo is growing rapidly, with nearly 25% of people over the age of 65. At the same time, more and more rural young residents are coming to Tokyo, which exacerbated the scarcity of resources in Tokyo. Meanwhile, the price of graveyard in Tokyo is so high that it costs more than 4,000 U.S. dollars per square meter, which is hard to bear for a Japanese citizen. As a result, most poor people cannot afford a graveyard to place their own relics and loved ones. The significance of building vertical cemetery: to build a place of spiritual comfort for the living relativesDuring the time we grown up, we were told the story about the people after death: their sprits rise to the sky, becoming a shining star. They are watching your life, your progress as well as your life-long career, which endow you the motivation to face the challenge. Based on the humane care for the bereaved family members, we are not only building a place to store the remains and ashes of the dead, but also building a place of spiritual comfort for the living relatives. To this extent, they never pass away. Death is not the end of life. Being Forgotten is.
Water scarcity is currently one of the major issues of the 21st Century. International conflict about Blue Gold has already arisen and is expected only to increase. Nowadays, over one-third of world’s population lives in water-stressed countries. In addition to population growth, it has been reported that another important cause of water crisis is climate change and its impact on the global water system and the environment. Glaciers, as the primary reservoir of potable water, influence global water management and marine currents. Their melting significantly increase water temperature and decrease its salinity. According to the National Oceanic an Atmospheric Administration global temperatures have been increasing steadily for the past 100 years and it is expected to continue to grow. Anticipated increase of only two degrees will cause vast of marine species stop reproducing and eventually vanish forever. Water, water everywhere, nor any drop to drinkEven though most of the Earth is covered by water, only 3% of its resources is potable. The only way to increase water supply are water reuse and desalination, whereas seawater desalination tends to be unlimited and eco-friendly. Currently the most popular desalination method is reversed. However, it still generates some inconveniences and one of its alternatives is freeze-thaw method. Freeze-thaw desalination is based on the fact that ice crystals formed are made up of substantially pure water. As saline water freezing point is lower, brine remains fluid. On the contrary to reversed osmosis freezing does not require high pressure difference thus the costs of the pump and membrane can be reduced. Furthermore, freeze-thaw method has lower energy demand and because of a low operating temperature it minimizes corrosion and metallurgical problems.
The UN is warning that melting polar ice due to global warming will ultimately redraw the world map within a century. One of the biggest resulting threats around the world is sea-level rise affecting many coastal megapolises, including Shanghai, Osaka, Alexandria, Saint-Petersburg, New York , London etc., and even devastating overpopulated countries such as Bangladesh. Building our cities vertically seems to be the key to salvation not only for coastal population but also for human civilization in general, as the vertical urbanization is the only way to save the land (main natural resource of the planet) from the plague of expanding horizontal urbanization. Stacking the urban blocks with associated infrastructure, recreation and parkland in a third dimension in multiple tiers and levels can increase the city density without compromising life quality and standards and even improving them at height with fresher air, better daylighting and spectacular views. Project 1111 is the 1111-metres high sustainable vertical city with over 300 floors stacked in fifteen 20-storey tiers with hanging gardens and parks. Based on hexagon plan with 6 wings attached to spiral hexagon structure it creates the mix of transportation modes, including highways for cars (that can drive up to the top level), vertical transportation (zonal elevators and transiting express shuttles), airborne (copters/drones) and vacuum tube trains.  The 350,000 population at 10,5 million sq.m. of total gross area (or 30m2 per capita – the comfortable living standards for a vertical urban habitat) are accommodated at 1.4km2 land plot. Unlike many futuristic paper concepts this is a first really buildable vertical city designed for many years of phased development without waiting for final completion, where safe and sustainable life and functioning of lower tiers are not obstructed by continuing works on upper tiers due to spiral construction sequence and simple technology of linear construction site. Spiralling sky-bridges at 1:20 slope allow the circulation of trucks and construction cranes during erection process : cranes move up the spiral inclined sky-bridges from building to building on completion of one tower structure to the other, and trucks can easily deliver the construction materials by the spiral highways arranged within the hollow sky-bridges structure(with few lanes in two levels in each direction), so the internal transportation between tiers, blocks and buildings  remains to be conventional in a way, that each building can be accessed by car, taxi, ambulance and fire truck by the same highway road that during construction process was used for delivery of materials/equipment as well as for cranes moving up their spiral path.
The Mid-Atlantic Ridge (MAR) is a divergent tectonic plate or constructive plate boundary located along the floor of the Atlantic Ocean. The Mid-Atlantic Ridge includes a deep rift valley that runs along the axis of the ridge along nearly its entire length. This rift marks the actual boundary between adjacent tectonic plates, where magma from the mantle reaches the seafloor, erupting as lava, producing new crustal material for the plates and holding the only connection between the separating plates from being apart. NYC, as a metropolis, has offered so much promise of either career or day-to-day life. Being a hub where millions of commuting workers, local residents, and visitors interact with each other, during the day and at night, providing the city with an energy generated from the exchange of ideas and knowledge through social interactions, Manhattan’s status as transaction-maximizing place is made possible by its remarkable carrying capacity. However, the increasing load of Manhattan prevents people’s residence in this place, challenges local workers’ everyday commute, and makes New York Dream unattainable. Traveling to and from work should be easy, efficient, and allow you to focus on what matters: your job; while, based on a survey, full-time workers in New York City spend about two hours more per week commuting — an average of 6 hours and 18 minutes per week – which is almost like another 8 hours work day. Work longer hours. Spend more time on subways and buses. Can’t even afford to live here. According to a latest survey, 82% of Manhattan-bound commuters take public transit to work from the city’s outer boroughs, or from Newark, Jersey City. In comparison, commuting trips among Manhattan residents is more multimodal in nature, since the lengths of commutes are more manageable, and residents also have better access to the city’s extensive taxi and limousine network. People who work in Manhattan deserve a home in Manhattan. Manhattan has been over exploited and one can hardly find usable land to build new residential buildings. By introducing new type of land resource to Manhattan, people will be given new type of space to reside and live.
 The city of Detroit has one of the highest crime rates in the U.S, having said that, the U.S.A has 5% of the world’s prisoner population. With people abandoning Detroit after once being an economic hub in the past. The economy of Detroit is crumbling. According to the U.S. Bureau of Prisons, the average annual cost of incarceration in Federal prisons in 2010 was $28,284 per inmate. With inmates being seen as an economic burden to taxpayers, it is logical to rethink incarceration methods in the U.S.A. This is where the idea of production comes into play. The aim is to allow the inmates to serve their jail time while still being a labour force in the economy.
The earth is full of volcanoes, and the occasional eruption of volcanoes has caused a lot of trouble, and has been accompanied by a lot of energy release. Solving the problem of volcanic eruption and using the energy of volcanoes is the concept of our design. Volcanic eruption is due to the magma underneath the pressure is too large, we through unceasingly magma Wells out of the magma of energy, so, in the magma energy will never reach the state of the eruption. Obtaining energy through a magma well requires overcoming the following four points. First of all, the depth of the magma well needs to reach five kilometers, which requires a lot of technology. Second, in the process of obtaining energy, carbon dioxide, sulfur dioxide and other gases will be emitted, so the building USES green plants such as algae to absorb carbon dioxide and other gases. The third point, the conservation of energy, is the way the building USES energy blocks to solve more volcanic eruptions. In order to deal with the problem of gas pressure balance and building flight, a special biofilm structure was designed. The air inside and outside can be exchanged through biofilms. It can also be inflated in the middle of the biofilm, and when all the membrane structures are filled with gas, it provides the power to fly the building.
In 2017, the Hong Kong tops the world chart with 7687 high-risers and 303 skyscrapers. The city’s verticality is a direct result of its extreme density and land scarcity. According to Civic Exchange the average open space available for each Hongkonger is the size of a coffin or a toilet cubicle (8 sq. ft.) This lack of space is considered to have damaging effects on generations of Hong Kong. In a city of 7 million people, many Hongkongers are being ensconced in tiny enclosed spaces, suspended hundreds of feet above the social realm with nowhere to unwind, express, relax and interact with their community. How can we provide open space to people in a city that has already been so dense and filled up with skyscrapers? My proposal is an elevated, mega-cluster of open spaces that attempts to span the entire area of the densest neighborhood in Hong Kong – Mong Kok. The aim of this project is to provide Hongkongers in Mong Kok with a network of public open spaces that are highly accessible and multi-functional to compensate for the city’s severe lack of land and cramped living condition. Hover above the city, the new structure will be supported by the city’s own skyscrapers and high-risers. The core of these buildings will be extended up to serve as structural columns for the new mega-structure. Together with the core, vertical circulation will also be extended up, allowing occupants from these buildings to have direct access to the space without leaving their apartments.
Natural resources varies from one place to another, among these is natural stone (rock) used mainly in construction and buildings.  A high percentage of these quarries are spreading randomly in the City of Amman / Jordan in an unstructured manner.  They have become an environmental threat to the city’s urban fabric, which requires to find a solution for this problem. The project will be designed to rehabilitate an old quarry in Amman, by transforming it into a traditional and cultural Mixed-use Skyscraper on the quarry’s site, by transfer this site into an eco-bridge in order to reconnect the parts of the city separated by these quarries. IntroductionAs soon as the quarries are drained, they usually become deserted and neglected. Abandoned Quarries Impact:
As the world population grows and cities usually expand into the surrounding areas, or because of static infrastructure form way too high urban densities, the question arises what alternatives we have at the latest after exhaustion of land reserves. The proposed project entitled “E Mare Libertas” (Latin, for Freedom from the Sea) provides a scenario of a vertically packed settlement in the port of Singapore, a state that has already exploited 92% of its building land and that is forced to create new land artificially. The creation of open spaces on the water, the idea of energetic self-sufficiency, a modular construction system and the inclusion of privacy represent design challenges that are playing extremely with the tension between density and freedom. With this work, the author tries to point out the problem of our demographic future on an urban scale and to embed it in a proposal for the development of the remaining 70% of the world surface.
Several years after World War III, a global war breaks out between countries in the world to fight for exhausting petroleum resource. Use of large amount of nuclear weapons in late war resulted in destruction of whole ecological environment in the earth. Most particles produced by nuclear explosion has size less than 1 micron floating in the air for tens of years to severely influence environmental temperature of the earth, so a scene like biter cold winter will appear on the earth – “nuclear winter”. Damaged by nuclear weapon, the ecological circle is destructed and people cannot live on the earth’s surface, so we propose the “central survival of people” boldly. Facing long time span damage caused by nuclear pollution, people need to live underground temporarily and restore ground environment, meanwhile, people need to contact outer space closely to explore new planets suitable for people to live. Individual lifesaving building, with most volume underground, has spiral lift device according to restoration condition of ground, providing living environment isolating nuclear pollution size a small city for survivors, with top space mainly used for takeoff and landing of Unmanned aerial vehicle (UAV), green plant and space purification. UAV carries chemicals to purify and reclaim soil and sow seed, giving the earth life while purifying environment. Water in the air is collected through top condensing tube and stored in storage device, they are transported through pipe to be used for green plant and people’s life. Lower film structure turn CO2 to O2 while purifying dust and air.
In Buddhist culture, there is a saying called “reincarnation” which believes that the death of life is actually a fresh new start. It is not only a renewal of life and the eternity of spirit, but also a new starting point of a legend. Every mortal dies eventually. Cemetery is often considered as the place where the deceased rest after their life comes to an end, however, the end of life does not mean virtually meaningless sleep underground. It is not only the place where the living remember the deceased, but also a station where the latter can reincarnate and continue to give back to nature and the living with a different form of life. Based on the foregoing, in this case we put forward the idea of using the cremains of the dead as the nutrients for seed germination to symbolize the reincarnation of life by the process of seed germinating and growing, whilst minor parts of the plant, through sampling, processing and design, can also become a present for the living who would feel that the deceased are still around them.
By 2300 the Arctic north will no longer be a sequestered, seemingly uninhabitable, frontier – with a projected annually averaged temperature increase of 15 degrees Fahrenheit by 2099 (GlobalChange) – as two-thirds of the world will become uninhabitable. (CleanTechnica) (IPCC) (NCA) In recent years – due to climate change and rapid warming of the polls leading to large ice melt – the Northwest Passage has become navigable during the warmer months. In conjunction with this occurrence the permafrost has begun to thaw. This has lead to an array of corporate interest in the region – ranging from oil, mineral, shipping, and tourist entities, as well as, nations attempting to pioneer the circumpolar territory. (ENR) Now the land and sea of the Arctic north is one of the most contentious geo-political campaigns of our time that will inexorably impact the world in coming centuries – in some ways malignant and in others benevolent. This project addresses those concerns with an initiation of the paradoxes being enacted on the region, and what the project presumes will occur in the projected future. These paradoxes and dialectics, from our observation, include: ●      the site initially being a tourist destination which becomes a necessary area of migration
What do we miss from our current city? Large metropolitan areas such as Manhattan, Hong Kong and Tokyo have a dynamic culture and environment which attracts and sustains a lot of people. These areas are international hubs for commerce and the government. As the number of cities and urban population grow, not only does the demographic change but also its social, economic and psychological shape alters constituting demographics changes. Despite big cities having its fascinating sides, it brings with it significant disadvantages caused by the demographic changes and urbanization. It reduces the available green space and creates higher greenhouse gas emission and also affects mental health through the influence of increased stressors and factors such as overcrowding, pollution, high levels of violence, less ‘human fitting environment’ and lack of social support etc. According to ARCADIS Consultancy, there are 3 main benchmarks in being a sustainable city. Quality of life, Green factors and Economic health. Here is where the problems rises. Many of those metropolitan areas have such a high ratings on the latest indicators yet the quality of life(people) ratings is very low. City planning, urbanization, advanced technologies all made the city greater however, it seems to have less consideration in ‘us’. It is critical to construct more facilities and infrastructure whilst not overlooking the importance of the higher number of demographics, their diversities and how they feel in the city. Moreover, from an architectural perspective, the modern high-rise buildings are shaped differently from natural human form or lives. Those heavy and high volumes with vertical lines as well as programs for commerce represents de-humanity. The vertical buildings disconnect people from their environment. On the other hand, a village’s horizontal and natural form seems have more connections to human beings.
BackgroundSince the rapid evolvement of 3D-printing technology, inevitably this technology will take a significant role in industrial projections. In a near future, as lifestyle evolves, new urban spaces, and therefore, city structures would be required. This new mode of production system will greatly shorten the distance between consumer and manufacturer, and provide wider options for urban services. The building 3D-printing system we are proposing for the future society will have similarities to the printers currently using paper. Like paper printers, this “Building 3D Printing System” should vary based on user groups, ranging form family to enterprise, or to an entire society. It can be as commonly owned as a paper printer, and just as easy to use with installed spatial cartridges, as building materials. Furthermore, the “cartridge” itself carries another “Crater to Crater” life circle as a part to the entire sustainable scheme. ConceptColor Printer’s cartridge has 4 colors of ink to print colorful picture, 3d printer’s cartridge need seven kinds of material to print a diversity of product. Glass, metal, plastic, silicone, wood fiber, carbon fiber, these materials can cover 98% of the building production. Analogy to the” home printer -community print shop-large print shop” system, we can build the following mode: For printer in home—cartridge built-in 3 kinds of materials to meet daily needsFor community 3d printing shop: Cartridge built-in 5 kinds of materials (print time is similar to the laundry time in the laundry)For 3d print center: cartridge built-in all 7 kind of materials, can meet all the demands
Though a socialist country, there are some unequal phenomena in People’ Republic of China. Liulin is a small county along Yellow River in Shanxi Province of People’s Republic of China. With its abundant coal resources underground, the county has developed rapidly and its urban area has been expanded fast within recent decades. Especially in the past ten years, the gap between rich and poor is growing greatly with its coal prices rising, which has been embodied distinctly in the urban space. This project is intended to design a complex building which reflects equality and ensures everyone to be treated equally. The development of human society is full of various unfair phenomena, but mankind has never given up its pursuit of equality and equality has also manifested itself in many aspects with the development of society. This design starts from the equality of 12 aspects, and studies its realistic or imaginary space of equality, refining the prototype of the space and getting the basic elements of designing this building.
USE CASES AND OVERVIEWMore and more natural disasters happen annually across the world. When dealing with forces so powerful, standard means of crisis-management often prove to be inefficient. Whether certain region is struck by earthquake, flood or hurricane – help needs to arrive quickly. This is often easier to be said than done, as damages to transportation infrastructure or remote localization can make it extremely difficult. The Skyshelter.zip tries to address these issues by proposing structure that while offering large floor surface is compact, easy to transport anywhere and can be deployed with minimum amount of time and manpower requirements. It is meant to serve as multi-purpose hub for any relief operation. EASY TRANSPORTATIONThe Skyshelter.zip is extremely easy to move due to its unique qualities. The entire structure is foldable in a manner that resembles origami or accordion. This means it can be neatly packaged into single relatively small box with minimum height and base dimensions reduced to building’s footprint. Then such a package can be moved anywhere with help of helicopters commonly used by rescue teams and military in the event of a natural disasters. Because elements do not have to be transported in batches by trucks, it is easier and faster to reach zones cut off from the transportation network. SMALLER FOOTPRINTPerhaps the biggest advantage of stacking vertically all functions required in zone affected by natural disaster is reducing the area that is being occupied by them. Skyshelter.zip’s footprint is on average over 30 times smaller than area required to host typically used tents or containers. This means that much less cleanup work is required prior to setting up the camp. This is especially important in densely populated areas but elsewhere means that it is going to be possible to set up those temporary shelters closer to victims original homes. INSTANT DEPLOYMENTJust as easily as it can be transported, the Skyshelter.zip can be effortlessly and instantly deployed even on unstable soil. Little to none groundwork is required as after anchoring basic supports to the ground the structure unfolds thanks to large load-bearing helium balloon placed within (thus protected from external forces). This process is also easily reversible. Light-weight 3D-printed slabs are attached directly to balloon in succeeding manner and pulled upwards by its load-bearing force and structural steel wires that once strained are capable of resisting horizontal wind forces. In turn, internal and external walls are in fact pieces of fabric attached to slabs that unfold as the structure get deployed. SCALABILITY AND REPURPOSINGDepending on amount of gas poured into the balloon, one can control the number of floors that are unfolding. This way, with single, mass produced module it is possible to attend different-scale, unpredictable events. FUNCTIONSBased on particular cases’ needs various functions can be accommodated inside, including reception area, first aid area, temporary housing, storage and vertical farm that uses soil gathered during anchoring. Additional advantage of producing vertical emergency camp is its height, partially achieved thanks to the size of the balloon. It allows for the structure to serve as a landmark, visible from large distances helping guide people affected by catastrophe straight to the relief center. SUSTAINABILITY FEATURESTaking advantage of large external surface area, use of nanomaterial based on ETFE foil and infused with network of small perovskite solar cells was proposed. This way, the building is capable of producing clean energy especially needed in case of emergency. Similarly, balloon located on top is shaped in such a way, that rainwater is able to flow through its hollow center where it is being cleansed by specialized filters and collected for further use.
The objective of this proposal is to restore the traditional interactions between Jinja (Japanese Shinto Shrine) and local people by reterritorizing a busy urban corner in Ginza, Tokyo with a vertically organized Jinja cum rice-farming complex. In the past, Jinja and rice farming were the center of Japanese economy. The paddy field and Jinja complex also served as centers of everyday interaction. Many local Jinja not only housed the relevant Kami (deities) but also served as a warehouse for harvests.  Also, the biggest communal festival, Matsuri, happened during spring seeding and autumn harvesting. As cities expand, both rice farming and Jinja remains in the shadow of urban livings. Jinja complex is overshadowed by modern skyscrapers. However, more than two centuries ago, according to some ancient manuscripts, Izumo Shrine was said to be reaching 96m high above ground i.e. a historical origin of skyscraping Jinja. On the other hand, recent development in hydroponic farming technology makes vertical rice farming possible. Pitched roof of a Jinja can be converted to a stepped paddy field, which conforms the traditional idea of using organic roofing material in Jinja construction. During Shinto festival, the vertical Jinja served as the focal point during festive parade. The ceremony can be seen from a distance as compared to typical Jinja. The interconnected roofs served as stepped paddy farms and public access to various halls, creating a continuous landscape. A service Core consists of lift and escape staircase are provided for services and emergency.
Forest fires are one of the greatest agents of degradation of ecosystems in the world. Although fire is part of the natural dynamics of some habitats, large disturbances cause a deterioration of their functionalities. Fire modifies biogeochemical cycles, produces changes in vegetation, soil, fauna, hydrological and geomorphological processes, water quality and even changes in the composition of the atmosphere. Each of these elements puts at risk not only the existing geography, but also directly threatens population centers, putting at risk the lives of people, their goods, infrastructure, among other things. The 2016-2017 season of forest fires left a record of destruction never before recorded in the south-central zone of Chile. The consequences of the above were 5,244 fires with an impact of 569,989 hectares, 2,500 homes. The most serious case was the one in the town of Santa Olga, where the destruction exceeds 1,000 homes, destroying the entire city. Reconstruction is an indisputable subject, but the existing model of growth by expansion left a clear vulnerability within the territory. The degraded soils, and the decrease of the vegetation among other variables produced by this settlement model, were part of the factors that modified the natural conditions, leaving the sector vulnerable. WARIA LEMUY, forest city in Mapudungun (the native language of the sector). The proposal looks for a new way of inhabiting the territory, through a system of buildings at height, avoiding the effects of the old settlement model. The objective is to face the reconstruction from a new perspective, recover the lost housing and infrastructure, added to a restoration of the flora and biodiversity, through a system that prevents and mitigates future catastrophes., Through a renovating process that allows to coexist with the geography and the territory. Settlement. The system is positioned on the perimeter of the affected area, allowing to establish a network of routes, public spaces and wetlands rehabilitating the central area. Structure. A modular system is proposed, with embedded base on the ground, enabling an incremental methodology. The structure of the modules that consists of wooden elements, with a metallic supporting exterior structure, allowing panoramic terraces to be added, and including enclosures that act as water collectors, as fog or as rain. The interior facade allows the transfer of controlled light through alveolar polycarbonate panels, which allow ventilation modes on the interior. The main vertical route system consists of a staircase composed of tubular and straight sections, with the possibility of attaching a vertical profile that would allow the inclusion of automated systems. Program. It consists mostly of housing, followed by common double-height intermediate spaces, such as interior courtyards within a system that encourages coexistence. The modularity of the type of housing allows different ways, allowing the inclusion of apartments of different stocks. Functioning. A building with the capacity to interact with the environment is proposed, through a water catchment system, which is redirected and stored in pockets on the access perimeters. With the purpose of heating the building, increase the humidity of the sector and as a network irrigation system, which would accelerate the recovery of the affected flora. Prevention and mitigation. Formally the building is considered an element of prevention, acting as a beacon in the prevention of future catastrophic events. Its façade system allows cross ventilation of the building which slows down the major winds, its water storage system, and irrigation on the environment would allow the increase of the existing humidity, allowing both to control part of the most influential variables in the propagation of the forest fires.
Graubünden is the largest and one of the mostbeautiful cantons in Switzerland. Entirelymountanious, it has manymarkable structures on the mostspecial and not easlyacessible places. Theyused to befortressesfrom the 13th and 14th century whichwereprogressivelyabandoned. Nowadays, theseruinscrown somedistintictive topographie location of the SwissAlps and due to the difficultaccess, remainforgotten. Known as a perfect place for winter sports, Switzerland has manyspecial and longhikes to do in summer as well.The design workswiththeseelements, a family of reusedfortressesalong the trails.ConceptTo be able to protect the ancient structures, somemonolithic roofs are addedtobring a new life to theseruinedfortress. Itsexistingstone walls, frame the floor of the new volumes. This adition covers, protectthe oldruins and providenewshelters for the hikers. The new landmarkshave an important impact thatguide the hikers. StructureWith an hugeconcreteroundedcolumn in the middle, the new volume doesn’ttouch the existing structure and create a gap thatbrings a unique filterednatural light for the entrance area. This central core has all the vertical and technical connections but canguarantee a transparencyin eachfloor. ProgramThe organisation of the building are in threenucleos: public, private and common areas. The first, the fortressthatcontains the public area, is the entrance floorand itiscomposed by a singlespace of an impressive size resultingof a tension betweenold and new, existing and adition. It hasthe Lobby, Gallery, Libraryand at the basement, the Archive and Toiletswhichcomplementthis public area. The second nucleo, already in the new volume, has the private areas for the hikerswhich ar FlexibilityAlthough its massive picture, the building has the flexibility as the main key. With an autonomous entrance for the hikers at the basement, the entrance floor can be part of the refuge or a room to be rented by the neighboorhood. The Refuge units for hikers have also a flexible system which allows a single person or family to rent 2 units (bedroom and living area), as well as 4, 6 or 8, the whole floor.e inspired by theexistingopenings of thefortress. In these body are the Cabins with a meeting balcony between them. The third and higher nucleo, hasthe common areas like the Dining and Living Room, Room of Silence and the Group Rooms in the last floor, iluminated with zenital light. MaterialThe existing ruin and its extension are merged without changing the footprint and the quality of the existing exterior spaces. The existing quarry stone walls are preserved by the addition of the new monolithic brick buildind. This material allows a strategical color composition and next to the fortress, the similar color gets brighter and lighter in high, trying to join the building with the sky. Old and new are now together to ensure harmony rather than contrast.
The project began with the belief that skyscrapers, a collection of architectural and high-tech technologies, could be an alternative to solve the Earth’s environmental problems. In this sense, we have been trying to take an architectural challenge to preserve glaciers that are melting as a result of global warming. SiteOur project destination was focused on Greenland’s continental ice sheet to propose a structure that prevents the melting of glaciers. Especially, it is intended to prevent the melting of glaciers formed between canyons. Glacier is exposed to the air at the area where it connects to the sea, resulting in faster melting. Furthermore, the melting rate is further accelerated by Crevasse and Moulin which are formed by flowing down water. We would like to prevent the loss of glaciers through proposing a structure that would freeze the ice tightly again in areas where it melts. IdeaIn this project, we would like to propose a structure that can make the ice density of melting glaciers hard again. The construction process also had to be coordinated with the structural characteristics of the glacier. The Ice-dam we are proposing here is a skyscraper that functions to prevent the melting of glaciers. In particular, this project is proposed with the idea of the structural module called Ice-ball, which is a tectonic element that strengthens the freezing of glaciers and forming the construction structure and space. Structure and MaterialIce-ball is a self-replicating structural element that forms space. This is a system that is interconnected by the opening of the six sides of sphere. It is a method of structure that can be expanded horizontally and vertically in this way. When it is inserted inside of glacier, it could expand by excavating inside the ice to create space and installing Ice balls. Inside the extended ice ball structure, water that melted from glaciers could be stored and frozen to make ice. Ice ball structural plates could make form of strong composite structure by taking the form of trusses in their own right and letting the ice inside take on the compressive force. Furthermore, the materials of ice ball trusses were used to increase their structural performance by using aluminum alloys that become stronger at low temperatures. Freezing SystemThe freezing system of water inside the ice ball is carried out by the circulation of the refrigerant. In the process of water freezing by refrigerant, vaporization heat was absorbed, and it was released outside or used for internal heating. In particular, heat released to the outside was allowed to travel a long distance through the hot air balloon to prevent the outside air from becoming hot. Spatial ConstructionThe construction of an Ice-Dam begins with the formation of a horizontal structural plate. This system is not supported on underground ground, but rather on horizontal artificial ground and creates hanging spaces. Structural components are formed by Ice balls and structural rigidity is ensured through stages of freezing process of water inside. This process forms the dam to reduce the melting speed of glaciers and also creates the interior spaces. The interior space formed by the Ice-ball structure is a reinforced artificial glacial structure, which creates a unique artificial atmosphere in the natural space.
The future of citiesWith continuous expansion, will cities reach a looming point of plateau where its growth starts to hinder its efficacy? In the first place, why do we live in a city? What makes living in a city so attractive? It is simply a hyper-efficiency consisting of a working system that is the result of the combinatory forces of great infrastructure and density, working tangentially to support growth. This growth makes a city abundant in opportunities but what then happens to a system whose demand and supply forces becomes imbalanced? There becomes an oversupply of inhabitants and a lack of infrastructure supporting it and vice versa- the state that most “great” cities are headed. Over-pollution and over-population will occur and efficacy becomes compromised with growth. When the drawbacks of automation start to outweigh its benefits, where do we go next and in what direction? Post-automationWe go back to where it all began, reinventing the whole concept of the skyscraper, abolishing the forces that turned it into something that we no longer fathom. We start to go deeper into the notion of a building block and take a few steps back, fundamentally questioning how skyscrapers take form and how its production and distribution largely affects it. When cities become unlivable, we vacate to parts of the world that were previously untouched and neglected. The location of skyscrapers is no longer dependent on its geographical benefit related to economics and politics. In summary, we start from the very beginning and this time, we do it right by fully understanding what it means to build a skyscraper from a starting point. Back to basicsWood is a natural resource and is therefore readily accessible. We start off with a clean slate, returning to days where we were not reliant on machines. Like the primitive hut, existing since the beginning of time, we apply a similar idea via a building block and a set of rules that are meant to be bent. The end result is a skyscraper composed of an array of building blocks – a system made out of 1-foot wide lateral timber columns, aggregated through simple joinery. This will thus provide an outline of a skyscraper while allowing variability. The layout of each floor has the ability to vary from one that encourages communal living to one that is more private. It truly is up to the user of the space. We are no longer limited by a specific unit size, the way it would typically be right now. DeploymentEnough modules to create a single floor will be compacted into a single crate and preserved in a time capsule together with a set of guidelines to aid in the initial process of building. The time capsules will be placed in areas that contain the natural resources required to sustain life, places with access to wood and water. The skyscraper can grow as tall and as wide as it needs to be. Its end-point thus becomes limitless. Growth and retentionGive a man a skyscraper and he will be set for years, teach a man how to build a skyscraper and he will be set for life. Unlike the first man on earth who, unfortunately, did not receive any survival instructions from his creator, starting over in this case does not mean disregarding what we have learnt from the past. There is a shift in emphasis when it comes to the notion of a skyscraper. The building block becomes a key element of it and the future is truly in the hands of the people.
Badgir (In Persian literal translation:bâd « wind » + gir « catch ») is a traditional element of Persian architecture used from centuries to create natural ventilation and to refreshinside the buildings, more particularly in the living room area. These wind towers are vertical ducts looking as large chimneys allowing to capture and to direct the winds towards the interior of buildings. We can see them in important quantity in the desert area of the center of the country. The interior of the tower is vertically separated into several ducts to allow the circulation air descending flow (bringing freshness) and air ascending flows (expelling hot air) currents thanks to the differential atmospheric pressures created. The concept is simple: reuse this traditional process by integratingturbines to generate electricity and to turn this tower into a wind turbine. Higher is the tower, easier it’s to capture air flows (5km/h as minimum) and stronger will be the pressure. In adding floors around the structural core to cultivate lands in the shelter of the sun and thanks to a water sensor facade, Badgir proposes to make possible the development of a city in autarky in full desert in an environment inhospitable to the human being. The population will be limited according to the resources generated by the tower. The city composed of narrow streets, public squares, subterranean galleries, a bazaar, an oasis and a well will provide the best conditions to live even at very high temperatures. Badgir will be a city based on respect for ecology, self-reliant and based on a closed-circuit system (zero waste). The goal of the project is to prove that it is possible to live without destroying our planet (even in the worst conditions) by combining technology and ancestral architecture.
There have never been so many people on earth in history as right now. As everyone knows, with the industrial revolution, the standards of living raised and became more available. The result was the population explosion. In the last century, the world population increased fourfold. The unprecedented rate of population growth caused unequal income distribution. While some people increase their wealth,the rest became more and more poor. This economic progress formed classes among people. And the poor have been forced to live in worst. For the cities, which had these kind of differences, the slums were the inevitable end. So what can be expected for the next century? This process didn’t happen in the exactperiod for all countries.  While some complete their demographic transition, others were at the first stage and until they complete the transition, an unbelievable income inequality occurred between countries. Last century, the richest countries were only 3 times richer than the poorest. Today the gap is like 100 to 1.That cause an unstoppable increase on amount of people live in slums,even though the rate of population growth has been decreasing. Today about 900 million people live in slums, in a couple years the number is going up to 1.6 billion, and the unequal income is accelerating it. By 2030, it’s estimated that 1 in 4 people on the planet will live in a slum. So, the expectation for the next century will be overcrowded mega slum cities covering continents. People migrate cities to access more work opportunities. Despite increasing manpower, the work opportunities aren’t enough to extricate them from the cycle of poverty. Naturally, slums are imminent destination for these people.The immediate need for shelter for these people ends up with poorly constructed single story shelters, which are highly vulnerable to any types of environmental conditions,spreaded to large areas. Because of limited financial resources, there is no chance to improve the shelters to better conditions.Instead of investing financial resources in improving shelters, growing them in years will be a more suitable solution. Growing them by arborsculpture will cost only time and labor. These resources are more accessible than money in slums. Arborsculpture is a series of gardening practices which combine grafting, bending, and training of living plants.The only investments to build such a house are saplings, stakes, sting, wire, tree tapes, pruners, saws and time. In a dense slum texture, in order to accommodate more residents in smaller footprint, trees can be grown at higher altitudes than ground by hydroponic system and become multistory building. Each story deck accommodates the roots as a grow tray and supported by trees planted in lower decks. As trees grow, they grafted to each other and whole building becomes a single organism which is also the only structural system of the building. Rock Elm (ulmusthomasii) is the ideal tree with its strength, growth rate and suitability for arborsculpture to build such a tower. It lives almost 200 years and reaches 20 meters tall between 20 – 30 years. So it will take approximately 150 years to complete 100 meters tall building.In 150 years almost 2500 saplings must be planted to complete the building. During the process residents can start to settle in completed stories. As a living organism the structural system can eliminate damages by healing itself. After 200 years the first planteds will complete their life, unexpected cracks and shrinks will occur, and it wouldn’t heal itself, so it will be disassembled. All the remaining materials, glass panels and approximately 5000 m³ timber logs, can be reused.
In the age of “Level 5” (fully automated) autonomous driving, a vehicle (e.g. ToyotaE-Palette) can be adopted as Mobile Green house, travelling between farmers and buyers directly. These vehicles can be charged at vertical “docks” equipped with PV charger and drainage system when idle. The best dock available will be selected by central computer and directed by GPS automatically to suit solar demand of different crops. The “dock” becomes a ever-changing organism with its own ‘metabolism’Recent development in hydroponic technology makes vertical planting possible. Not only farmers but enthusiast or family can hire or own a mobile green house for weekend farming. The docking ports are connected by double spiral ramps; car lift and staircase are provided for services and pedestrian circulations.
Based on the report of urban planning in Singapore, our chosen domain is gene storage in 2100. Estimates based on bacterial genetics suggest that digital DNA could one day rival or exceed today’s storage technology. Gene Tower is like a home tree between citizen and a huge seed that symbolizes the gene carrier. Gene Tower provides a new strategy of gene storage for big data. Synchronously, it brings an idea of delighted sharing and environmentally friendly lifestyle to the rapid development of city. Through a plasma material, we save data in a steel cable. People upload their data towards the tower. If data reaches a certain amount of upload, tower skin changes color at any time. Storing gene is a static activity; saving big data is a dynamic activity. The interaction provides an ambient experience like a cosmic dance.
With the advent of a new era, cities must be able to accommodate more demands than they have in the past, and the role of cities has become even more extensive. Indeed, the city requires dense residential space, a common use space where people can be together, and green spaces. Facing such demands, the cities are changing rapidly, and the speed of the change is accelerating. However, going through past experiences have revealed that rapid urbanization engenders various urban problems such as lack of residential space, slumming, harms done to existing urban context and tradition, and adulteration of environment. Many of Europe’s metropolises were able to cope with such challenges and slowed down rapid changes because they were able to accommodate the changes over long periods of time. On the contrary, in the cities of newly developing countries or other traditional cities where there is no sufficient infrastructure, it is difficult to control the speed of change and it is accelerating. These cities need a new approach because they have to cope with the changes and resolve those issues in a short period of time. We propose a vertical urban space as a measure that traditional cities can adopt to overcome rapid urbanization and meet the demands of rapidly changing cities, all the while preserving tradition. Can modern day Kaesong accommodate the demands of a new city and the urban problems and changes that follow? Kaesong was the capital of Goryeo in the past. The city has been an important historic site, and still stands as important economic, cultural and geographical region today. However, after the Korean War, due to the city’s economic and political issues, the growth of the city had been stopped for a long time. In 2003, the city that had stopped started to revitalize again. An industrial complex jointly operated by South and North Korea for exchanges and cooperation has been established, and a step-by-step plan for urban growth has been initiated. Indeed, Kaesong is expected to be one of the fastest changing cities after the reunification of the two Koreas; this city has the best preserved Hanok in Korea. However, by its characteristic, the houses are not densely located. Inevitably, cities demanding more space cause low densities to be overwhelmed by urban growth. Thus, in order to not follow the precedence and face the same problems, we need to create a new type of urban space to preserve historical buildings. “Vertical City in Kaesong” is a plan to build a town that concentrates residential, production, infrastructure and energy vertically by setting several bases in the existing city. Instead of demolishing traditional buildings, they build up a high-density unit town of eight floors with self-sufficient programs. Unit villages can be added or dismantled on demand in the city. Space and wooden tube structure made up of Korean traditional building unit ‘room’ makes it possible to match the existing buildings and distribute the load. The hexagonal planes of six equilateral triangles composed of different programs are arranged in a private space in the public space as they move away from the center. The center of the building and the open space at each corner provide light and wind throughout the building and provide a green space. After that, we place a residence in the space, create a public space between each triangle, and bring the city to life through communication. It allows the development of industrial complexes between residential and public spaces to maintain economic activity. Kaesong will develop around “Vertical City in Kaesong” and show new possibilities of coexistence of tradition and city.
In a pursuit of technological progress which allegedly improves our life we forget to pay due attention on what has supported our comfortable existence on this small planet for thousands of years. ProblemSwamps are the”lungs of the planet”. The benefits they provide are comparable to the benefits of forests. Every swamp is an amazing organism. Like all life on Earth, it breathes, but how? Swamps absorb carbon dioxide and constantly emit oxygen. Tons of pure oxygen. The swamps are home to hundreds of different types of animals and plants. This is an unknown world, with its own laws and rules.In the middle of the last century, the total area of ​​swamps in Belarus was 2,940 thousand hectares (14.2% of the entire territory of the country). After 60 years, the area of ​​swamps on the territory of Belarus has decreased by 3.5 times. Currently it is only 860 thousand hectares. Unfortunately, mass swamp reclamation (drainage), which began in the middle of the last century, led to irreversible consequences, such as fires, drought, soil degradation and the complete destruction of certain types of animals and plants not only in Belarus, but also in all Eastern Europe. Why is this happening?It is simple – minerals. The swamps are drained because of the extraction of fossil fuels – peat, which is used in the energy industry.
FILTRATION is a waste-management and waste-to-energy power plant skyscraper located in the “Eighth Continent”- it often refers to the Great Pacific Garbage Patch, which is a collection of marine debris in the North Pacific Ocean. It spans waters from the West Coast of North America to Japan. The size of the patch is estimated to be 8.1% of the size of the Pacific Ocean, twice the size of Texas, thrice the size of California, the rubbish layer is on average 100 feet thick. The Great Pacific Garbage Patch is not the only vortex—it’s just the biggest. The Atlantic and Indian Oceans both have trash vortexes. Even shipping routes in smaller bodies of water, such as the North Sea, are developing garbage patches. FILTRATION essentially is a highly modularized prefabricated waste-management and waste-to-energy power plant megastructure that contains several Material Recovery Facilities (MRF) and Water Treatment Plants (WTP) to recycle the floating garbage continent and clean the seawater in all levels from the different ocean across the world. The innovative not only for self-sustaining but also helping resolve the world energy crisis for this coming century. Unlike the conventional material recovery facility mainly relies on gravity, by using multiple conveyors to rise the garbage mainstream several times to sort different items. The “FILTRATION” uses seawater to pump the garbage with polluted water together to the highest location of the building and filter the water and recycle the material for the top to bottom of the building. Eventually, the non-recycled material and recycled material will be transported away. The main structure – the “tree truck” Core can allow for a flexible and inclusive range of facilities and plants attach to it. Anything from Plastic Recycling Facility to Waste-to-energy Power Plant can be accommodated in a vertical aggregation on four sides of idealized and efficient dwellings at the foundations of the tower. Most of the facility is composed of modular parts which can be replaced as the requirements. This proposal not only gives a rebirth to floating waste but also give the second chance to reconstruct the relationship between nature and human beings.
In 50 years’ time there will be more rubbish than fish in the ocean.Without interfering in temporal activities, the world of marine fauna and flora will die. The most important step mankind should take is to stop further waste emissions, as well as to raise awareness of waste management. The world of architecture faces the challenge of counteracting to one of the most serious problems in the world. When choosing the subject matter of the project, there was no doubt that the designed skyscraper had to meet the challenge of cleaning the oceans from waste. The project presents a model of a skyscraper, which will be placed in the largest garbage patches in the oceans.  Its main task will be to start the process of cleaning up the oceans and finally eliminate the floating islands. The shape of the skyscraper is determined by its main function – compressing ­oceanic rubbish. The designed facility is a huge floating piston that compacts waste directly on site. In order to protect ocean life, it collects for disposal only the most polluted tissue from the water surface without the use of pumps. The only force that allows waste to find its way inside the pressing chamber is gravity.  When the garbage isinside the piston, a baler crushes it into a disc whose height depends on the density and type of garbage. After this process, the waste is pushed beyond the length of the piston and packed into a specially designed reusable cover so that the waste no longer has the potential to spread across the ocean. The net filled with disks iscollected by a designated ship and then disposed or recycled. The design concept is that waste can be collected by container ships on non-container-loaded journeys.  Above the entire waste compaction sector, which consists of a compaction chamber, a piston and an engine room for the entire technological process, there is a section dedicated to ocean research. On the two lowest floors there is a storage area, above which the re are two medical levels that serve the people working in the building, and equally importantly, there is veterinary support facilities for animals that have suffered while living in a polluted ocean. A three-storey residential section for has been designed above.  There is a social area and an office area aboveit. The lamp, placed on one of the levels, not only serves as a landmark, it is anallegory to the archetype of the skyscraper, which was the inspiration for the first skyscrapers – the lighthouse.  The last floor serves as a helicopter landing pad on the roof. The second aspect of the project is the educational activity aimed at reducing global plastic consumption. Garbage stains on the ocean are invisible to the majority of the public due to their distance from land. This results in a low level of awareness of the scale of the threat. In order to highlight the problem, the discs were symbolically placed in the panoramas of the most recognizable cities in the world in the form of high postuments – the monument of waste. This will show the size of the problem by comparing the amount of compacted rubbish to the scale of the city. An unaesthetic skyscraper towering over the buildings will contrast. It is a symbolic demonstration of what mankind has deserved over the years of its activity and a direct reference to the ocean fauna, which for years has been doomed to live among the waste. After fulfilling its educational role, the skyscraper will be handed over for disposal.
Carbon Sequestration Through Super Reforestation Human development is outracing the capacity of the planet’s natural ability to sustain it. Over-building, farming, and logging have resulted in the inevitable depletion of our forests, which are an important source of carbon dioxide absorption. The release of greenhouse gases into the atmosphere is happening faster than our forests, oceans and soils can absorb them, disturbing the carbon cycle crucial to the equilibrium of our planet.  Having paved our way into this situation, can our urge to build be harnessed to reverse this fatal course and help sustain our future, even as forest cover steadily diminishes? Skyscraper, Landscape, Forest: Our project redefines these three terms by proposing a new ecology in which the verticality of the skyscraper is introduced into the vast horizontal expanse of the forest. Instead of an urban skyline populated by humans, our project proposes a new landscape of forest structures inhabited only by animals, birds and trees. This skyforest is a systemic solution to the problem of deforestation. Built on a large-scale grid, it leaves the forest floor available for managed growth and harvesting, while duplicating the forest vertically by means of a three dimensional grid that rises high above the ground. This new skyline works with nature rather than against it. The historic 1-mile Jefferson grid, serves as the basis of the US land survey and is visible on satellite maps. The project divides this familiar grid into 64 smaller squares of approximately 600’ by 600’. Each side of the square is defined by a timber structure, inspired by the minimal elegance and strength of wooden roller coasters. 20’x 20x 20’ modular frames contain the tree as well as the soil necessary for its sustenance. Each tree is planted in a high tensile fabric pouch that contains the root ball, absorbs and retains water and allows room for growth. The pouch is secured on all four sides. The trees are staggered vertically to allow sun and rain to filter down and reach every tree. The project responds to natural obstacles and topography like mountains, valleys and rivers. Wherever one of these obstructions interrupts the grid, the structure compensates for loss of tree modules by increasing in height. The result is a constantly undulating profile that dips and soars depending on what is happening below. Although the structure looks massive from the air, at the forest floor it remains very open to animal migration, bird flight, even vehicular and human passage. The trees will be planted as saplings, mixing species to encourage biodiversity as a means of resisting disease and blight. As the tree grows, falling seeds and leaves will take root in the suspended soil, creating mini-forest floors that eventually populate, intertwine and cover the entire structure. Both the trees and the timber construction sequester carbon dioxide that would otherwise remain in the atmosphere. Eventually, lighting strikes and natural decay will destroy the structures which will then return to earth. At that point, a new structure will be built in its place, the high strength tensile fabric growing pouches will be reused, and the cycle will begin over again. Without human intervention, nature finds its own equilibrium. We may already be past that point in our time on this planet. While deforestation is inevitable on a regional scale, our project can slow or mitigate this development on a larger, global scale by replacing cleared land in one country with a new, denser and taller skyforest. The new growth will increase the planet’s capacity to sequester harmful greenhouse gases, and play its part in restoring balance to the earth.
This design is located at the border of slum and wealthy area in new Delhi, India.It is intended to be reflected in the Indian caste system, where different RACES blend and influence each other. The plan focuses on the path diversion and divides into five streamlines.Single path is discussed, the line of sight and space effects on people, through the study of 5 kinds of caste into, to extract the different space prototype respectively, classifying the combination, constitute the high-rise buildings, introduces the unique space retrieval way, makes the building is not only a caste of list, more of a deep integration, is a milestone of memorable.
ProblemToday, one of humanity’s biggest problems is transportation. Every single day, many individuals spend hours in traffic congestion which does not only waste their time, but often pollutes the environment by emitting greenhouse gases and particulates. Another challenge is long distance traveling by airplane. Compared to other modes of transport traveling by air has a more harmful environmental impact per passenger-kilometre (see graph). However, the number of airplanes is increasing, and they are expected to fly more frequently. In a plausible scenario, total global carbon emissions in 2050 might be at similar levels as today which means we have to expect an increase in the average global temperature by 4° Celsius in the long run. This project aims to use high-rise architecture in order to address problems of modern transportation systems and to give an alternative to airplane traveling. Therefore, new technologies like hyperloop are incorporated into the project. SocietyAccording to reports by the United Nations, today’s world population of 7.6 billion is expected to reach 8.6 billion in 2030 and hit 9.8 billion in 2050, considerable proportion of which will live in megacities with more than ten million residents. There, most city dwellers will use public transportation while private vehicles will be automated and driverless. Affordable accommodation will be limited and people might be struggling with little social contact, especially in megacities.The societal goal is to liberate the surface of big cities from transportation whilst improving infrastructure. Transportation should mainly take place either below or above street level. The tower is the center of a fully operational transportation network that reduces both greenhouse gas emissions and time consumption for passengers. This could result in greener streets with more space for walking, cycling and recreation in the city centers.This project creates a space for social and professional activities. It generates affordable accommodation and, most importantly. a link between different transportation systems as the hyperloop concept is thought further and lifted into the sky. DesignThe impressive height or architecturally bold design of every skyscraper has to be combined with building functions that deliver diversity and density to the buildings’ inhabitants. For an exceptionally tall building to work, the social needs of residents must be considered. As cities become more densely populated, it is more and more important to create a sense of community.The top and bottom levels are dedicated to transportation, the space in between has social functions with mixed use. There are 50m² and 75m² apartments, shopping centers, office spaces, gyms, theatres, cinemas and public facilities like schools.The top floor is part of the hyperloop infrastructure. How does hyperloop work? The pods in the pipes move forwards, accelerating until they reach a speed where they lift up, and are guided by magnets. Hyperloop One says its 670mph system will be “automated by the most advanced systems in the world, allowing a safe and efficient journey that is never delayed or overbooked.” Hyperloop or conventional trains are usually bound to the ground. However, this presents big challenges, especially in mountainous countries and densely populated areas. Therefore, the network is floating in the sky by gas-filled pillows referencing an airship. This can be achieved sustainably by using the methane produced by farm cows or even pump greenhouse gases from the atmosphere into the loop. Approximately 1000m³ of gas are needed in order to lift a metric-ton, so the construction has to be very lightweight.
People tend to destroy our planet. Looking forward to explore the universe for seeking a new home. This vision shows the possibility to create a new place for us, next to our roots, thus giving them space to breathe and resurrect the second life. We live in times of unlimited possibilities and freedom. On a daily basis no one is thinking about the sources of energy supplied to virtually any device. We do not compare what has changed over the centuries. The world is running forward and you either keep pace or you are far behind and you can never make up for it anymore. However, there are people, events, exhibitions, works of art, performances that occasionally shake the world. They show statistics, problems, possibilities, sometimes even solutions, but in a strange way it seems only to pass through us and disappear like an echo. On the second day, everyone goes on, not remembering. Researchers are looking for answers and are trying to find solutions to alarming phenomena on earth. Unlikely, it seems not to be a priority for most of us. What truly counts is power and money. A vision of settling on mars, flying on the moon, traveling into space. All this does not relate to what state of threat the earth is by ourselves. We do not think what to do for the next generations or ourselves. The human being is a rational being and he has power, but he has forgotten that all nature is ruling by its own laws. All these uneasy actions prompted a reflective, theoretic idea and manifesto created to emphasize the Earth problem and to make the recipient to  think about it. The architectural space does not resemble that known today, technological progress allows new solutions that completely disqualify those currently known to us. For this reason, the drawings drawn up are unusual in their form. Reading them, one should not look for an obvious analogy to the present solutions. The Sky Hub is build up from three different parts and each of them is founded on a various heights.
The Philosophy of Architecture From Vitruvius to Le Corbusier, A.gaudi to Z.hadid, architects are constantly adapting to new situations by developing their own methodology and by continuously pushing the boundaries. From the Pantheon to the Bilbao Museum by Gehry, architects are also building under different conditions, sometimes by following principles of architecture and sometimes by challenging them. The tension that exists between the architects and the age in which they belong creates this evolution. Our environments are constantly forcing us to discover.
Although with the recent American governments intents to enhance the construction of border between Mexico and U.S. to reinforce control. There are many stories regarding how such border separate family members who hold different citizenship, or work and live on different side of border. This proposal aims to transform perception of political border from boundary of separation to gathering for connection. Friendship Park located next to border between San Diego and Tijuana, as one of the location where many separated families will meet from both side of border. In 1900s, there is no well defined border but only patrols to control for access. Many travel back and forth to meet their family during weekend. Later, metal fence was constructed to establish the border. In 1990s, additional metal mesh had been applied to prevent physical contact for illegal activities. Despite seeing each other through metal mesh almost like seeing prisoners in jail, families still willing to travel far to reunite on border. This proposal suggests an “In-between zone” above border fence, which based on temporary scaffolding structure and can be expended or reduced in size according to the needs. With respect to legal regulation and political situation, such zone can be accessed with control of shafts of staircase and allows families not only to meet up but huge and touch each other to share their moment together. As it serves as the platform for opportunities of interaction and communication, it enhances interpersonal relationship and encourages community like gathering space with bi-national identity. As nationality or working and living status should not be the reason for restriction of family reunite, this proposal intents to help for the situation for separation of many families, as well as to provide more humanize gathering space to meet on border. Instead of construct obstacle structure like wall to reinforce control, situation might be altered if better architectural system can be provided and better control method can be employed. A better outcome such as bi-national community can be expected and encouraged to form.
I remember watching the rapid transformation of our beloved city from the window of an overcrowded bus. On commutes to and from work I would wonder: how can we as a community embrace this change, and adapt without losing our identity? This place we love grew from a humble city to a booming, unrecognizable metropolis. Despite the technology that was meant to bring us together, we were left feeling less connected than ever – to each other, to nature, and to the small-community values that defined our cozy hidden nook in the northwest corner of the country. In hindsight, ARMATURE was an ideal that Seattle followed to avoid becoming the hollow shell of a city we now see elsewhere in the country. Its topophilic concept was built to be adaptive and resilient, responding to a changing environment that has shaped the development of the thriving city we live in today. Author and humanist geographer Yi Fu Tuan described topophilia as “a framework to discuss all the different ways that human beings love a place.” Our perception and love of place is influenced by the interconnection of our sociocultural, natural, and built environments. The overlap of these environments are framed by the idealized qualities of resiliency (natural + built), regeneration (sociocultural + natural) and responsiveness (sociocultural + built). While providing homes, workspaces, gathering places, and respite from the chaos outside, ARMATURE never lost touch of the roots from which it grew. While the structural framework is the true innovation of the project – it allows for an infinite flexibility of program – sustainable and biophilic design features are at the core of its responsive nature. The building changes with the city, neighborhood, and inhabitants’ needs just as the leaves of a maple tree respond to the change of the seasons. Vertical and horizontal voids throughout the tower provide access to light, air and circulation spaces. Projecting sky gardens create community gathering spaces allowing for activities and interactions formerly reserved for the terra firma below. Modular, reprogrammable spaces can be moved throughout the tower, adding endless permutations and adaptation of the vertical community. Much like the petals of a flower, the biomimetic envelope adapts to the changing environment by opening and closing as a response to sunlight and temperature. I remember riding that packed bus twenty years ago, the anxiety and fear as I considered the future of our city and planned my escape from it. Thankfully, I was witness to a positive revolution that came with the arrival of ARMATURE. The tower taught me that change shouldn’t be a cause for concern. Instead, it can be an opportunity to hold true to your values, adapt and thrive through resilience. This city is loved, and because of ARMATURE, it will be for centuries to come.
OUTLINE | PURPOSEForests cover more than 30% of the entire planet. They create oxygen, they absorb malicious greenhouse gasses, they provide a substantial source of medicines, and many more actives necessary for life. However, even with these vital characteristics, it has not stopped developers from exhausting its resources while being misinformed; never reaching its full potential. Therefore, “Ka’ poy yepü” seeks to address this problem by proposing a multi-platform research center with a focus on geo-biological education. The purpose is to expand knowledge on how to harmonize technology and nature by networking around the globe on how to use and discover new forms of energy. ORIGINS | DESIGNCanaima National Park – Venezuela, is one of the largest natural reserves on the planet and possess definitive characters that differentiates it from other natural reservoirs. It’s soil dates back to the precambrian period, between 1.5 million to 2 billions years old; which makes it one of the most ancient rock formations in the world’s geochronology. These unique formations called “Tepuis” are a kind of table-top mountains with 90 degree vertical walls. Because of its ancient condition, high levels of electromagnetic fields can be found in the area. “Ka’ poy yepü” uses these forces to expand the use of electromagnetism as a form of direct energy. It prevents the disruption of the habitat by harboring said electromagnetism to keep the facility hovering over the valley. PHILOSOPHYThe original inhabitants of Canaima were the Pemon tribe, for whom the word pemon means ‘people’. Their relationships and perception of nature inspired how “Ka’ poy yepü” seeks and stores data. Named after the locals dialect, which translates to “I come from the sky, from infinity” provides the facility a connection to the land. It expands throughout several structures in additive formation over the valley while scanning for data. By using a combination of Mixed-Reality and Augmented-Reality it creates a non-invasive mean to educate visitors and researchers alike. FORMATION | TRANSPORTATIONAerial transportation is the only way to reach Canaima due to lack of roads and difficult terrain. Therefore, electromagnetic enhanced vehicles were created as means to reach the facility. The “Töröns”, which translates to ‘Birds’ have the same matrix as “Ka’ poy yepü” and work as links between all parts of the main structure. The vehicles can access remote areas in the valley and makes sure to provide a full picture of the site. Above all, these vehicles are used as structure carriers for the facility. They guide the ‘Cocoon’ structures to different towers on site depending on the needs of expansion from both researches and visitors. FUNCTION | FOOTPRINTEven though the facility is mostly focused on geo-biological research it does accommodate a diversity of visitors. It includes several interactive centers that allows public citizens to experience close encounters with the unique environment and get educated at the same time. For researchers and scientists; semi-private and private areas have been designated so they can work and exchange ideas productively. Finally, the facility provides sleeping pods for in-house researches that stay for long terms. SUSTAINABILITY “Ka’ poy yepü” presents itself as a pioneer for new sources of self-sustaining energies. Therefore, it proposes using both 3D printing joints and molecular nanotechnology to self-construct the mesh pieces that holds the structure together. Gravitational panels are infused with solar cells to collect electrical energy. Furthermore, It’s external facade is filled with breathable skin and sensors that allow for liquid in the air to be collected and later filtered to produce clean water for the facility. All of these sources combined maintain an intrinsic harmony within the structure with zero-carbon footprint effects.
It is a grim reality in many parts of the world that the sand is pressing on. Desertification is a worldwide ecological and environmental problem. On average, there are about 50,000 ~ 70,000 square kilometers of land desertification every year in the world. This design is located in the desert of Egypt, and choose a typical pyramid group as an example, trying to explore the combination of modern technology, using skyscrapers to improve the desert environment and Egyptian culture（pyramids、temples、castles） combined with the architectural situation. The skyscraper is not only a building, but also a culture and a national symbol. The prototype is based on Cook’s idea of a “plug-in city”. On the basis of improving the ecological environment of the desert, the internal production, life and transportation should be organized. Form the appearance of the inverted pyramid. Floating above the desert, the structure is shaped to collect and produce water. At the same time, the interior of the building collects and manufactures water sources, stores and accumulates them into artificial lakes, and effectively interacts with the desert ground. The interior of the building becomes a hanging garden. The facade is in the solid form of pyramid.In the future, we hope that, thanks to the development of technology, the the vision of desert oasis will be realized and gradually improve the desert environment.
Water is the foundation of life. Now, imagine a world without water. 33% of the land in the world are deserts, so life without water is a reality for those regions. In fact, around 1 billion people lack access to safe water, and this number is growing as the water crisis in the world is getting worse. On top of this, climate change is affecting our water sources. Rivers and lakes are either drying up, or becoming too polluted to use.  Moreover, hundreds of thousands of people die each year because of diseases caused by lack of water. New buildings are usually designed to save water, but this solution is simply not enough. At the current rate of water consumption, this problem will only get worse and we need a better solution. Sometimes the answer we’re looking for is right in the nature. Namib Desert Beetle(Stenocara gracilipes) lives in one of the driest places on earth, at the southwest cost of Africa, in the Namib Desert. This ingenious creature collects water from the air, in one of the driest places on earth. When moist air, lying over the Atlantic Ocean, is cooled and blown into the land, it creates streams of fog over the dunes of the desert in the morning, before the sun burns everything off. This is the saving grace for this beetle. It lifts its back up against the wind, and as the wind hits the beetle’s shell, it efficiently collects water, thanks to the combination of hydrophobic(water-repelling) surfaces and hydrophilic(water-attracting) bumps. The hydrophilic bumps act as magnets for water, and the hydrophobic surfaces direct the water towards the beetle’s mouth. During this process, it drinks about 40% if its body weight. Tower of Life mimics this process to catch water from the air by using strategically placed water-catching surfaces, not just enough for its residents, but also enough water for its surroundings to allow life to flourish. As Tower of Life carries more water to its surroundings, it will create a better life for everyone, and everything around it.
ANALYSIS: OUR MOUNTAINS ARE CRUMBLINGMountains are not only made of ice and rock but also of our dreams and our desires. Man has always believed that, as a witness to our birth, mountains would also be around for our departure. But for the past twenty years, the continuous thawing of the permafrost which binds the Alps together has triggered an increase in the number of landslides. 2018 was another record-breaking year with one of the hottest summers ever recorded, and as a result, the temperature of the earth has never been higher. With rising temperatures come new issues for the world’s population to tackle: unstable peaks kill tens of alpinists every year as rocky outer layers crumble away, causing landslides and the mass flooding of valleys. Thus the Alps become more and more dangerous each day. Mont Cervin is the perfect illustration of these new dangers: located at the Swiss/Italian border, this icy rock formation has been subjected to the changes in permafrost and its decay, and as a result, the countries’ border has moved over 150m in 60 years. The thawing of permafrost has an impact of global proportions. As it thaws, the permafrost releases bio-matter which rots in the air, in turn releasing high levels of greenhouse gases. This positive feedback cycle causes global warming. Although there’s still a lot of uncertainty surrounding the timeframe of these changes and the area they affect, it is widely admitted that climate change will be characterized by a succession extreme occurrences (including heatwaves, flooding and the like) amongst a general, global tendency for rising temperatures. It is therefore important we seek not to adapt our world to one single new climate, but to understand how we can adapt our societies to a climate set to be ever changing. CONCEPT: CLIMATE CHANGE AS A SOURCE OF NEW SPACESOur intention is to create a dialog by connecting increasingly intense and frequent climate variations with the fast-evolving habits of our society. To do so we studied the complexity and diversity of the unique shapes snowflakes take on as they fall. The key defining factors of the crystal’s final shape are the temperature and humidity of the air around it. Though they all stem from the same, hexagonal base form, throughout their descent the snowflakes’ shape is defined as its surroundings evolve, leading to a surprisingly diverse set of crystals. Positioned between two hillsides of the Mont Cervin, the Arch harnesses heavy variations in temperature and humidity to construct numerous glacial structures, thanks to an ingenious air and water circulation system. These frozen spaces’ structure and aesthetics are therefore unique, conditioning the uses they house, much as they themselves are conditioned by the climate surrounding them. As time goes by and their surroundings change, some areas will be frozen in time as others thaw and feed into newer spaces. The result of an initiative by the Alpine Convention, the Arch is designed to re-affirm the uniqueness of an alpine zone which transcends international borders. Run by an international government organization and publicly funded, it is open day and night to visitors eager to make the space their own. Here, the concept of public, shared space is redefined by the temporality of our climate. Above all, the Arch symbolizes a rediscovered peace and unity between Man and Nature.
As we all know, there are many natural wonders caused by uncontrollable factors such as climate or plate movement. It is likely that after several Centuries, there are no Everest, East Africa Rift Valley, Colorado Grand Canyon, etc. Just like us now, we are eager to understand what the world before is like, and we can only guess and restore through fossils and incomplete historical documents. No one provides us with an accurate statement. Meanwhile we don’t have a way to document the natural landscape. So this Skyscraper will play the role of a historical scene recorder and narrator, simulate a real scene for future humans, and let landscape wonders continue. The skyscraper realizes the simulation of the scene by collecting the physical parameters of the physical scene, such as wind, wind speed, temperature, humidity and other major environmental parameters. With these physical parameters, the simulation is no longer just a simple image show, but let the people experience the most authentic scenes from the senses. The entire building will be both a data storage center and a scene simulator.
At multiple times in history and over different periods, the blue planet successfully breeds diversity of species at every inch on land and has experienced a level of natural climate change variability. The complex components of the ecosystem are undergoing constant changes, while a dynamic balance is getting harder to maintain. Seeing the latest period of rising global surface temperatures is without precedent indecent years, as well as the conflictive relationship between human activity and habitat degradation, the conservation of wildlife should not be ignored. In general, the entire ecosystem on earth is experiencing a hard time. If society continues the current trend of apathy, we are doomed towards a very bleak future. Our concept of this vertical nature reserve equipped with a central research station is inspired by the classification of climate groups on earth. Referring to the relationship between latitude and climate zones, the skyscraper divides and simulates each climate group at a different height, while the monitor system locates at the heart of the structure. The residents in the building are endangered animals living within the simulation environment, while the research team and public tourist should be only considered as temporary visitors. Motivated by the trends of contemporary biomimetic architecture, some case studies on nature are analyzed and applied to the spatial organization and interface design in our building. Moreover, the environment of the chosen site is carefully considered since sustainable architecture is required to take advantages from local resources as much as possible. The proposed skyscraper is willing to recall the close relationship between human beings and their mother nature by the form of architecture. Every component in the ecosystem could hardly behave or survive as an individual literally, hence all living creature should appropriate the gifts from nature and they should be treated and valued equally. In modern society, the form of a skyscraper, carrying multiple functions, is expected to be one of the carries that making a better future.
Air pollutionAirscraper is a skyscraper that is sleeved around a chimney structure that has the potential to tackle the air pollution problem. The inner round, empty, tall and smooth tube utilizes the stack effect and sucks the polluted air from the surrounding and cleans it through a complex filtration system inside the chimney. The resulting air circulation also helps to reduce the urban heat island effect. The envisioned tower is 800 m tall and is 60 m in diameter. It combines three types of modules stacked around the 30 m wide inner chimney: Air-Intake module, Solar-Gain module & Green-Garden module. Each performing their specific task to achieve the overall task of cleaning the air. AIR-INTAKE MODULES are located at the very bottom of the tower and is collecting polluted air from the street level. It incorporates a modular kinetic façade that helps to optimize the air intake and responds to prevailing wind directions, a filtration system that collects TSP and PM10 particles and an ionization system that collects PM2.5 particles. According to existing research such a system can clean the air with up to 80 % effectivity. SOLAR-GAIN MODULES are positioned in the middle part of the tower, where they receive maximum exposure to sun rays. These modules are equipped with kinetic reflective mirrors, also known as heliostats, which reflect sun rays onto the black stone surface of the chimney. The solar gain inside the chimney creates the necessary stack effect and results in the desired upward air circulation. Devoid of expensive and complex mechanical ventilation equipment, this system relies on natural phenomenon to drive air circulation, and therefore is more sustainable and has the potential to reduce the CO2 footprint associated with ventilation. GREEN-GARDEN MODULES are incorporated in the residential section of the tower, located at 400m and above, where the layer of smog doesn’t reach. The Green-Gardens include dense vegetation of various kinds, which not only help to adjust air oxygen levels and balance the micro-climate of the tower, but also provide attractive and healthy public areas to serve the wellbeing of the tower occupants and improve the daylighting of the inner chimney atrium.
StatementFor the first time in human history, we can say that more than half of the world’s population lives in cities and urban areas, caused by the process of urbanization and the rise in global population growth. This continuous increase has had a great impact on urban habitats, natural environments, technological development and industrial expansion, and analyzing these changes, we can think about what kind of cities we can expect to develop in the future and what their characteristics are. What makes the future city different from the present one? What kind of new components would be needed for a city decades from now? Many are studying this subject, especially sociologists, architects and engineers, almost always unanimously concluding that free space is becoming more valuable, our impact on the environment is getting more severe and the available resources are getting smaller. Therefore, we can say that human civilization is currently in a specific position, and that cities, as the epicenters of civilization, play a very important role in preserving it. As the city population grows, so does our need for more resources. It has been proven that a person living in the city can produce up to four times more waste than a person living in the countryside. This city waste is usually taken to the nearest landfill and buried there. However, by doing this we are not only polluting the ground, air and underground waters (which can be very dangerous to health), we are potentially wasting a great amount of usable matter. Apart from recyclable material that would otherwise be simply buried, methane gas, which can be collected during organic waste decomposition, can be extremely valuable because it can be turned into electrical energy. Giving the example of the Belgrade city, this project changes the model of a typical landfill into a raw vertical infrastructure. The towers are module-based, and every tower is consisted of waste capsules that are attached to the concrete core. Firstly, city waste is being delivered to sorting facility, where it is categorized by type (glass, plastic, organic matter, paper, wood, metal), after which it is sent to temporary landfill. The recyclable waste is taken to recycling facility, and organic matter, parts of wood and paper materials are gathered and disposed into modular waste capsules. These capsules are attached to the tower core by cranes. Every capsule is equipped with inhaler and pipeline that connects to the methane tank, and when organic matter rots, methane produced by the process is drawn from each capsule and later transformed into energy. When the matter in a capsule decomposes completely, the capsule can be taken out, cleaned and refilled. This type of landfill not only greatly reduces the negative impact on the air and ground (since it emits zero toxic gases and prevents any contact of waste with air and ground), it also massively reduces the amount of space needed to store waste.

The Epidemic Babel is a rapid-deployment health care skyscraper designed as a response to the current Coronavirus pandemic that originated in Wuhan, China. The project takes into consideration that an epidemic outbreak is usually fast, leaving no time for governments and policymakers to react. Under these harsh circumstances, a weak healthcare infrastructure will soon be torn apart turning the epidemic into a deadly catastrophe. The Epidemic Babel features two very important advantages: simple construction and rapid response. The entire building consists of a steel frame with several functional boxes with a very small footprint. The building pattern is simple enough that any qualified construction team can have it ready in five days. Once the steel frame is erected, the healthcare team will choose the appropriate functional boxes to be attached to the steel frame. This building pattern allows the skyscraper to respond to the outbreak in a very short time and relieve the burden of the existing health care infrastructure. All the programmatic boxes are pre-manufactured in factories and need no extra time for construction. The lightness of the frame and boxes also makes it easy to transport to remote locations. Compared to the temporal hospitals currently built in China, the Epidemic Babel is faster to construct and potentially less expensive.
"The Egalitarian Nature skyscraper imagines a new building typology driven by the human urge for nature instead of capital. It is a new kind of infrastructure conceived to serve the whole society. The traditional skyscraper is reimagined as a mountain range that provides a new way to experience nature within an urban environment. A zigzag-climbing path is developed along with abstract spaces that encourage an unexpected engagement between people and nature. Accessing the tower is not decided by capital but individual physical strength. ANOTHER NATURE This design proposal explores a new possibility of tower typology and lifestyle in a high-density urban environment by rethinking the relationship between humans and nature. In future city planning, the existing free land may not be sufficient for building parks or gardens. However, the need for these areas is imperative and this skyscraper provides the opportunity for large green spaces within a small footprint. The tower is a combination of nature and a man-made environment. It is conceived as a vertical mountain in the center of a city: a mountain for all the people to hike or climb. AN EGALITARIAN OBJECT Since the skyscraper was born it has always been an instrument for the privileged. It is an object of power and a symbol of wealth. Air rights have become the new scoring point in the game of capital. The chase of height never stops and this unfair situation will never change until a new type of skyscraper shows up, not driven by capital but driven by nature. This skyscraper offers the entire society a fair opportunity to engage with a new vertical green space. The accessibility will not be granted by financial status but by the physical strength of the individual since there will be no elevators. FREEDOM OF SPACE
“The distance between man and man which generate the way in which people gather and therefore ‘the place’: if a person is alone the place is a small room; if they are two together it is a larger room; if they are ten it is a school; if a hundred, a theater; if a thousand, an assembly hall; if ten thousand, a city; if a million, a metropolis…” –Superstudio Spaces within the skyscraper are in total freedom and flexibility. From one space to another space, from one surface to another surface, there is no difference. Places are only dependent on the distance between humans and their relationship with spatial volumes. The continual human movements and interactions give each space a programmatic meaning."
St. Louis, Senegal, located in the northwest part of the country, near the mouth of The Senegal River, has been home to fishermen for generations. It is a hostile territory where there are constant confrontations with the neighboring countries regarding the established fishing boundaries and territories. In addition to the political and social problems, the region is affected by the rising sea level. Such natural phenomenon has forced the community to move inland, away from the shore. This proposal is based on traditional pillar structures, which are used to prevent erosion. These structures will serve as a foundation for the new vertical housing units. The project is also inspired by Senegal’s traditional wooden architecture that uses a complex arch system with tensile structures.  The system allows a high degree of adaptability and extendibility to create a new community by the sea challenging the rising sea level.

With the accelerating process of urbanization, people’s demand for energy is increasing day by day. The existing oil, coal, and other energy can only be used for about 50 years, and their combustion will bring serious air pollution problems, such as urban haze, so the discovery and exploitation of new energy is imminent. Recently, more and more countries have found new clean energy combustible ice in the deep sea. Its reserves can be used by human beings for 1000 years, and it can only be converted into water and methane, so the exploitation of combustible ice is very valuable. In addition, the problem of marine garbage is becoming more and more serious. It not only causes the damage to the marine landscape but also brings great harm to marine animals. Among them, most of the marine garbage is plastic garbage. Because of its structural characteristics, it will not be easily corroded by the seawater. Therefore, we come up with the idea of using local materials, turning plastic waste into 3d-printed materials, as our own building materials, and filling cracks in the seabed caused by combustible ice mining to prevent secondary disasters. In order to solve the energy and environmental problems to the greatest extent, we take the place with the highest coincidence of combustible ice and marine waste as the building site. There are two main moving lines in the building, the downward materials, and the upward energy. Among them, the energy tower transforms the plastic waste on the sea into 3D printing materials, and prints the building and energy tank down along the core cylinder, turning itself into a building with growth. In addition, the energy tower exploits the combustible ice from the seabed and stores it in the energy tank after being pressurized and liquefied, and then transports it to the cargo ship through the equipment such as track and a mechanical arm, and finally brings it back to the city, becoming new clean energy in the city.


According to the report of the Swedish Global Challenges Foundation in collaboration with the University of Oxford’s Future of Humanity Institute, there’s a 5 percent chance that in the next 100 years, humans will be wiped out by a global pandemic or a nuclear war. A century ago, a strain of pandemic flu killed up to 100 million people—5 percent of the world’s population. In 2013, a new mystery illness swept the west coast of North America, causing starfish to disintegrate. In 2015, a big-nosed Asian antelope known as the saiga lost two-thirds of its population—some 200,000 individuals—to what now looks to be a bacterial infection. Faced the risk of Biological warfare (BW)—also known as germ warfare—which is the use of biological toxins or infectious agents such as bacteria, viruses, and fungi with the intent to kill or incapacitate humans, animals or plants as an act of war; and the evolution of unidentified influenza, are we human beings on our way to meet the end of the world? Every second decade since the 18th century, humankind had to deal with a deadly pandemic. Started with the year 1972, we were having The Great Plague of Marseille in France, in 1820 the Cholera pandemic, and then 1920s the Spanish flu. In early 2020, a virus with the name Corona, the “Wuhan virus” referred to these days, is a new virus of the corona strain (dubbed 2019-nCoV or nCoV), which has never been detected before. On 31 January 2019, the World Health Organisation declared the outbreak of a novel coronavirus a global health emergency, an acknowledgment of the risk the virus poses to countries beyond its origin in China and of the need for a more coordinated international response to the outbreak. The fatality rate in Wuhan is 4.1 percent and there is currently still no vaccine to prevent 2019-nCoV infection. At this infection rate, the Chinese government ordered to build a 60,000-square-metre structure with space for 1,000 beds and 30 intensive care wards. On behalf of a global citizen and an architect, we were thinking of a system of pandemic emergency supply station, whose target is to brave a situation like this of a virus’ outbreak. Its main function will be urgent care service in order to fill in the inadequate hospital resources with a program of diagnosis room, intensive therapy, treatment room, bed-care area with medical equipment… Especially, to meet the emergency requirement, the building has to use modularization technology in order to be assembled in a very short time. vertically configured buildings facilitate more efficient infrastructure in case metropole, where occurs primarily the most case of a pandemic outbreak. This emergency supply station is capable of adapting to many terrains, especially in areas with poorly prepared for an epidemic, such as Africa, Asia, South America… Viruses are a public enemy of human beings, and to take a win in the battle against the novel coronavirus as early as possible is a goal shared by the world. The novel coronavirus outbreak is drawing concerns from the world. In the face of the epidemic, human beings share the same destiny, and only unity and collaboration are able to generate the power to safeguard lives. At this moment, what the world needs is not hypes made by the busybodies, the prejudices and discrimination from the narrow-minded, or the irresponsible labeling and distorting by certain western media. Unity and goodwill shall be the mainstream. And after each pandemic, a lesson is learned: It’s “not yet time to let down our guard”.


Affected by global climate change, many countries and regions are suffering from sea-level rise problems, where people are losing their lands, plants and animals are losing their homes. The design is based in Kiribati, an island country in the South Pacific. This reef-preserving country is particularly vulnerable to the rising sea level issues, and its territory is thought likely to disappear within the next 60 years. The design proposes to constructs a series of wall-like skyscrapers in the offshore waters and combats the problems caused by rising sea levels in three aspects. First, by studying the erosion of the coast and the direction of the ocean currents, the design of the architectural massing is used to slow down the speed of the ocean currents flowing around the building. With such a method, the sand and mud in the water are able to deposit as sediment and gradually cultivate the new islands over time. Second, with the design of skyscraper, land area submerged by seawater was transferred to the air, and thousands of residential units were built in the air to provide a place for people to live and use, protecting them from natural disasters such as hurricane and flood. Thirdly, while constructing a vertical ecosystem to provide greening for people living in it, it can also become a seed bank for retaining plant diversity in Kiribati and other South Pacific regions. Meanwhile, a large number of artificial components located between underwater structures can be a place for coral reef protection and regeneration. Finally, we hope that through this design, we will challenge the traditional architectural design thinking—generating land first, then architecture. It provides a new building mode for Kiribati and other regions faced with the same sea-level-rise problem—growing land with buildings.

With deforestation being one of the biggest human-driven environmental problems this tendency not only has to be stopped but needs to be reversed. Using conventional methods such a reversal could take decades. The aim of this project is to use skyscrapers in combination with modern technology to automate the process of reforestation and re-naturalization. The problem of deforestation is publicly known and can be defined as the loss of trees induced by both humans and other causes. It potentially affects wildlife, ecosystems, weather patterns, and even the climate and is mainly caused by either the natural loss of trees due to climate change and increasing devastation, especially in hot and dry areas or the manmade reduction of forest area which includes farming, grazing of livestock, mining, drilling and accounts for more than half of all deforestation. In Malaysia and Indonesia, forests are cut down to make way for producing palm oil; whereas in Brazil cattle ranching and farms—particularly soy plantations—are the key culprits. Many organizations are fighting to plant new trees. But despite such efforts, between 1990 and 2016, 1.3 million square kilometers of forest have been destroyed. Big problems need big solutions, and the reforestation skyscraper could help to reverse the damage. It recreates forests out of cow grazing areas, soy fields and destroyed landscapes by centralizing all necessary processes into one structure. At the top, seeds are inserted into an aquaponic system which – once large enough – slowly slide down a winding ramp whilst continuing to grow. After a few weeks, the seedling has grown and gradually slid towards the bottom and can subsequently be planted into the surrounding fields by mechanical arms and drones. The tower also houses a laboratory, a seed stock, water storage, a fire station for forest fires, sleeping cabins for temporary workers, a control center, several farming spaces, technology and exhibition spaces. Large semi-transparent solar sails make it energy self-sufficient and are slowly moved with an electrical chain drive and mechanical arms. The tower is 70 meters high and its design is biophilic and inspired by nature itself. The loadbearing construction consists of recycled steel and a building enclosure made of biodegradable and renewable eco-polymers. As for all biomimetic architecture, nature is by far the richest source of inspiration; therefore, this skyscraper mimics the unique Fibonacci spiral pattern found in many natural objects such as pinecones, pineapples, sunflowers, snail shells and the mesophyll in leaves.

"At the beginning of the 20th Century, flying was one of the greatest achievements of humanity and the world was mesmerized about the possibilities that were about to open up. In that era of ingenuity, aviation was regarded as a romantic endeavor, a promise to tie people together and make the world smaller. A century later, humanity is finally able to assess the magnitude of that feat that once was regarded as a miracle. Airplanes were at the centerstage of Great Wars, great shifts in geopolitical power, and gave rise to an ever-growing international elite of frequent flyers. The world of today is a different place, and the undeniable success of commercial aviation meant that flying airplanes has become one of the most substantial contributors to climate change. A Tale of Two Issues
At the same time, we are in the middle of one of the biggest aviation crises for the aircraft manufacturer Boeing. Thousands of their newly designed 737 Max are unable to fly and are stored in airport facilities across America. What if they never fly again? What happens when the aviation industry slows down? And what to do with the significant number of decommissioned planes in storage facilities in the desert such as Victorville? Meanwhile, on the ground, the world has a gigantic housing shortage and many marginalized social groups are unable to find a place to live. Not too far from the aircraft storage facilities, the county of Los Angeles has 60,000 people that have no place to live. A chunk of this population happens to be military veterans, who are denied the opportunity to start new lives as civilians due to the high cost of living and inadequate housing supply, as well as general stigma around post-traumatic stress disorder. How to spatially tackle this social problem? A Building that Flies
Our creative solution is a joint future for the post-retirement lives of both commercial airplanes and veterans. The 737 Max Tower, is an ingenious stacking of repurposed airplane fuselages that will provide new homes and a new chapter of life for a generation of younger, more well-educated retired veterans. The Max Tower not only provides comfortable and convenient living experiences for the veterans but also offers a variety of centrally located on-site amenities that take care of the veterans’ physical and mental well-being, as well as their social needs. Veterans have easy access to mental and physical health care such as private counseling, group therapy, fitness center, on-site clinic, as well as physical therapy that would cater to the special needs of everyone. Pet companionship, STEM and vocational training, as well as community activities, are also in place to facilitate veterans’ smooth transition back to civilian life. If airplanes are buildings that fly, our response is to use decommissioned airframes as a ready-made building unit. Airplane fuselages are already structurally sound, waterproof and insulated. Our idea is to leverage the architectural potential of the airplane and give it a second life as a skyscraper. More than just a single iconic tower, our design is intended to be a provocative yet replicable building system that can be applied in many different contexts. And with a global fleet of 26,000 airplanes and an expected growth to 34,000 by the next decade, there will be no lack of building materials by the time these airplanes are retired. Finally, in the spirit of the early romanticism and promise of flying, we are creating a poetic kind of irony by bringing back to the clouds airplanes that would no longer fly."


Skyscrapers, as its name suggests; refer to the vertical ambition to reach towards the skies and reside among the clouds. The tallest building often soars over others dramatically; operating as a symbol of power and icon of might. This supremacy is unquestioned – yet the reign is often ephemeral and bounded by the constraints of time – since newer buildings can almost always eclipse this height in due time by harnessing newer technologies or regulations. A never-ending competition for height results – leading to emerging trends of taller buildings that are severely detached from the ground levels and out of human proportion; casting harsh shadows over mankind and existing as a built form of social oppression. In response to these conditions – this project proposes a time-based approach with individual and community involvement, to redefine the notion of the skyscraper as a social apparatus instead of a capitalistic one. Tesseract proposes an architecture system that allows residents to participate in not just the design of their own units; but the programs and facilities within the building itself. This process is inserted between the time of purchase for the unit and the total time required to complete construction – a period that is often ignored and neglected.  Through this process, residents are allowed to choose their amenities and their communities, enhancing their sense of belonging in the process. Housing units will no longer be stacked in repetition with no relation whatsoever to the residents living in it – a sentimental bond between housing and men results. The architecture system proposed can only be completed and realized by community participatory design; enabling possibilities that go beyond what computational design allows, highlighting the value of human creativity. High rise buildings now become a medium for the individual to express themselves; giving the power back to the residents, instead of being dictated by capitalistic agendas alone. Located in Singapore, one of the densest country in the world; the proposed design takes advantage of the planning regulations that facilitate Gross Floor Area exemption when greeneries are introduced, by breaking the conventional centralized sky garden down into smaller components and spreading it throughout the entire vertical height of the building. By doing so, the ‘invisible’ space is conceived to cater to expansion in accordance with the lifestyle changes of the residents through time. These conditions allow modular units to expand or subdivide for either rent or sale, providing residents with incentives as time goes by. With this set-up, residents no longer have to move out for better accommodation; a longer duration of stay in their original homes and communities is encouraged, leading to a better sense of ownership and belonging. The volume of verticality once thought of as finite; also opens up possibilities of further intensification through time, akin to the geometry of the Tesseract. With the added value of expansion through time; amenities that are inserted in a vertical manner are able to benefit from increased frontage area, which translates to more business patronage. This outcome reverses the conventional circumstances of amenities increasing in value as they are closer to the ground levels, due to more exposure to the public. Coupled with the trend of housing units having higher value as they go higher due to better views and privacy; the conditions of verticality in terms of value differentiation is now homogenized: tall buildings will no longer be segregated into richer residents living near the top while the poorer residents live near the bottom. The vertical icon is now redefined as a socially driven apparatus.

Among all environmental issues, air pollution is the most pressing and complex environmental problem nowadays. As WHO announced, most of the world’s population lives in an inappropriate air condition. But we concern air quality which is mainly related to inland regions despite water covers about 70% of the planet’s surface. The ocean is not immune to these deep environmental issues. Lots of smoke from the land, ships going between continents, docking facilities, and HVAC systems in ships still use fossil fuels and emit smoke. Especially, the decrepit engine produces a large number of pollutants due to the use of low-quality fuel and its incomplete combustion. This contaminated air moves around the ocean and has already affected water quality, acidity and the marine ecosystem. Based on this current situation, we suggest an eco-friendly research center, ALGAECOMB which floats around the contaminated regions for environmental studies with reducing actual marine pollutants by using both biological and architectural methods. ALGAECOMB’s system deals with not only chemical contamination but also particulates. It uses 3 types of purification methods which are using static electricity, photosynthesis, and aquatic plant treatment. Each method is applied to different types of pollutants. First, static electricity (positively or negatively charged surface formed by rubbing different materials of Photobioreactor package) attract polarized particulates made out of NOx, SOx. Accordingly, fine suspended particles are adsorbed onto the tube surface until rain washes it away. Second, the photosynthesis of plants naturally changes carbon dioxide into oxygen. CO2 is well known as the primary cause of the greenhouse effect. The last treatment uses an aquatic plant to decrease dissolved CO2 gas and organic contaminant (N, P) from the water. ALGAECOMB uses specific species of microalgae as a primary material. Microalgae is unicellular species typically found in the marine system. It performs photosynthesis and produces approximately half of the atmospheric oxygen by consuming CO2. Among them, Pyrocystis fusiformis has a special feature that makes it different from the other microalgae. It is bioluminescent algae which chemically produces a flash of blue-greenish light when disturbed. It is sensitive to the toxicity of the air, so it can be used for the estimation of contamination by its intensity of light. ALGAECOMB indicates air cleanliness and provides a channel of communication between humans and nature during dark night. The main structure of the building is not nailed to the earth. It is a floating building generated by its bottom facility. The buoyant kit has a rising force created by air. It stands vertically by the force of gravity of the counterweight. This floating structure is made out of flexible material to absorb lateral forces and allow natural movement. In order to secure serviceability, squirting system and gyroscope devices are applied in both the upper and lower parts of the building. Because ALGAECOMB is a complex of the living organisms, it is continuously affected by its growing environment. Appropriate temperature (18~24 ℃), CO2, light sources and seawater with proper nutrition are required for cultivation. The envelope of ALGAECOMB consists of multiple units that contain microalgae and supply the required environment via MEP components. Basically microalgae unit system is suspended by flexible sub-structure, and it moves gently over residential / lab areas. It induces generating static electricity and bioluminescent light by movement. In terms of energy, the microalgae perform as the main energy source as well. As microalgae are spotlighted renewable & eco-friendly material, the biomass from the microalgae can be reproduced into different types of energy sources; biogas, biodiesel, electricity through various energy manufacturing technologies. Bio-generator supplies bioenergy to the structure as well as a function of environmental purification. ALGAECOMB consists of 4 units of laboratory and accommodation facilities.

Change of Terra – Terraforming in Permafrost If the greenhouse gas increases more than 940 ppm (parts per million) by the year 2100, the coastal and inland area that inhibits 750 million people will be submerged from the year 2050, and about 29 percent of the Earth’s surface will be desertified. This means approximately a quarter of people from all over the world will be affected by climate change. Also, since 2018, the rate of climate refugees constitutes about two-thirds (18 million) of worldwide refugees (28 million). Therefore, if a settled environment has been collapsed, people should migrate to a new base. We focus on permafrost, which is frozen northern half, as the people’s new base. If the global temperature increases continuously, Russia’s Siberian and permafrost (22.8*10^6 km2), which is more than double the area of the States (9.8*10^6 km2), will be able to accommodate a lot of climate refugees, and it will also get ideal climate. However, the thickness of ice is about 80 m and the ground of permafrost, which is consisted of polygonal patterned wetland and ice-wedge, is still inappropriate to develop the infrastructure and natural forest. Moreover, new puddles and waterways, which were produced by global warming, accelerate the stratum instability and may act as a channel that makes carbon dioxide and methane go through to the air, and this will cause more serious global warming and air pollution. Therefore, a strategy is required to be able to establish the settlement at the unsettled land and atmosphere. We suggest the terraforming of permafrost by a design structured with a systematic mechanism. Root Systemic Structure – Layer Between Human and Nature It is difficult to hold permafrost’s polygonal patterned ground by a singular structure. Thus, we applied the basic principle, in which a root holds the ground, to structure the design. The structural module, similar to a huge forest, is going to occupy, extend, and connect the polygonal patterned ground up to the basement floor, and it will develop organizations such as living accommodation, forestation, and infrastructure construction. In addition, it will create organismic filtering systems, vertically depending on the structure’s core, and will be able to relieve the environmental problems as well as minimize the plane range of facility. About 1.4 km2 of the area is going to be stabilized by three cores, and if 60% of the area is occupied by living accommodation, it will accommodate more than 20,000 households and 60,000 people. Water Treatment We adopted the 1000 m³/d scale of direct couples vertical type water treatment plant on the lower level exterior, and it will be able to reduce approximately half the area (1100 m2) in comparison to the standard (2168 m2), and it also has the advantage in which energy efficiency improves by 30% through collecting water directly and continuously purifying it. Puddle and waterway, causing the stratum instability, will be absorbed, and this will not only stabilize the soil and stratum but also purify the polluted water. Methane Energy Basically, permafrost has insufficient natural forests, which leads to limitations in catching the carbon dioxide and methane gas. We devised an energy plant that can catch particular greenhouse gases at the basement floor before they are exposed to the atmosphere. If power production facilities, which has 6.5 MW(70 Nm³­/min) for each module, is operated for 12 hours, it can supply energy to facilities of structure, surrounding infrastructure, and about 20,000 households (based on the speculation that a household spends 200 kWh per month). We aim to design an air purification facility located on the upper floor. It can catch the greenhouse gases (CO2, CH4) that are not caught on the basement floor and carbon dioxide, which is produced while generating electronic energy. This will prevent carbon from being accumulated in the air and create a stabilized atmospheric environment.

Tulou is a traditional residential building in Fujian Province. Its architectural form is closely related to local people’s farming activities and ancestor worship activities. But because it is built for defense purposes, all the space used is an inward closed space. The thick outer wall of the earth building becomes the space boundary, which confronts the external danger and provides shelter for the internal. The interior is open to the patio and ancestral hall, and life sacrifice activities are included under the protection of the wall. This building attempts to build a high-rise building on the top of the original earth building, and gradually reverse the internal and external relations and turn internal to the external. The new building grows on the original earth building. The external wall of the new building extends upward from the original rammed earth wall, and the wall is gradually enlarged from the bottom to the upper window. At last, the wall is gradually transformed from the wall to the thin beam-column. The material is transited from the heavy rammed earth to the light modern steel column. The internal courtyard extends upward from the transparent to opacity and solid, and gradually becomes the cylinder structure of the new building. Through changes of the external rammed earth wall and the internal colonnade, the original inward space is gradually transformed into outward space from the bottom to the top. Under this change, the internal and external relations of the original space are replaced. From the bottom up, the residential area gradually changes from the hiding behind the wall to an opening the outside wall, facing the mountains and rivers. The transparent appearance of the upper part brings the natural scene into it. The upper part of the residential area is planted with terraces, and the top of the residential area is built with open ancestral halls. People’s living scenes, sacrificial rites and farming activities are displayed in the building. The building combines people’s production and life with divinity. And the vertical height of the building records the internal and external reversal of the space, making the internal space face nature.

The project proposes a timber high rise in downtown Vancouver combining public cultural programs with the technical and legislative processes of a successful land claim for the expansion of indigenous territory. The timber tower stands in direct dialogue with the steel and glass structures of downtown Vancouver, offering a contemporary interpretation of the traditional totems and Longhouses of the Northwest Native Cultural region, making a clear statement about the ambitions of the region’s tribes. SOCIAL SUSTAINABILITY Following a synthesis of research into Northwest Native art, architecture and anthropological history with contemporary developments in indigenous land claims, the project speculates on the expansion of the Hul’q’umi’num’ Treaty Group from 5 tribes to the estimated 71 communities of the Coast Salish region, recognizing opportunity within the relationship between historic land claims and the economic growth seen in real estate markets in the Metro Vancouver area. At the heart of the project is the concept of social sustainability as the building is concerned with the protection and growth of the indigenous culture of the Northwest Cultural Region, offering spaces to learn about art and culture as well as providing the necessary commercial activities to sustain the surrounding tribal economies. The building responds to the urban grain as the tower moves from a square plinth, which addresses the four sides of the street, creating a large internal public space, preferable to an outdoor plaza in the colder climate. The plinth also provides substantial footings for the base of the laminated timber superstructure. Through a combination of qualitative and quantitative design research methods, the project looks to reveal narratives of material culture, environment and economy in the Northwest Native region to provoke questions of the contemporary urban condition, whilst leveraging advanced computational tools and technical knowledge of high rise and engineered timber solutions, arriving a resolved building proposal. The structure is inherently efficient as the form tapers in response increased wind loads with height, whilst a stepping core ensures the floors are still usable to the top. Studies into the structural properties of a Western Red Cedar tree and existing high-rise typologies arrived at a system of abutting Vierendeel towers, and a proportional system was devised to develop an optimized and aesthetically cohesive structure. The curved tapering observes developments in large scale timber bending and glue lamination processes, ensuring that height is achieved with an efficient system of splices and floor connections. Decisions on materiality were made on a basis of cultural and environmental research, as Western Red Cedar was an important material to apply in the project for the environmental performance, both in resistance to destructive weathering and the reduction in embodied carbon. A system of timber louvers vary in depth across the facade to mitigate solar gains, the same elements increase in density to create the protective balustrades of the terraces, and open out to offer views from the intermediate terraces. Environmental design principles are observed at every opportunity with the integration of water reclamation and deep geothermal power, capitalizing on the wet climate and the geologic characteristics of the region.

McFashion’, which is represented by H&M, ZARA, and GAP, has become a trend and spread all over the world. ‘McFashion’ is a sales model which always provides the latest clothes at the lowest prices. A ‘McFashion’ brand can launch more than 10, 000 saleable garments a year, and the average cycle from design to shelf is only about two weeks. But the debate over the environmental ethics of fast fashion is heating up. According to a report, human beings over 100 billion pieces of clothing are consumed every year. Overall, 92 million tons of waste dumped into landfills each year comes from the industry. A separate report found that about 35 percent of microplastic pollutants are emitted while washing synthetic textiles, mostly by fast-fashion brands. It is clear that the environmental concerns caused by ‘McFashion’ should raise our attention. We are trying to build a skyscraper with a whole clothes recycling system, from that we will create a new kind of vertical sales competition model. Those merchants will improve the clothes quality to raise their income, which means clothes can be sustainable and clothes pollution can be solved gradually.

What are the social trends and changes that are affecting the development of skyscraper typologies? What is the future for those existing super-tall residential towers that have similar forms and structure systems? What is the next-decade expectation toward residential skyscrapers? How will the skyscrapers respond to the increasing needs in urban density? Design Gesture In this project, we are exploring a new typology of tower design by bringing up the idea of “customization in mass-production” for those supertall residential skyscrapers. Architecturally, the design is to utilize the existing structure as the basis and add the new hanging structures in sky lobbies to allow the additional spaces to hang outside of the towers. Programmatically, individual needs, which are varied in time, become the focus of post-built design development. Residents can individually customize their cubic spaces as they need, and the building owner will hang them in front of the residents’ doorway. The fundamental concept in the project is about the users’ engagement in the after-built development process of the tower – the further tower shall have the capability of housing their changing needs architecturally and programmatically. In this era of skyscraper competition, the generic core-shell structure has dominated the formal design of the towers, resulting in a limit in both their form of innovation and programmatic flexibility. This limit is even more apparent when compared with the unmatched increasing social needs that each individual pursues. The design pays attention to the possibility of extensions and sustainability of the existing towers in relation to the social atmosphere that shapes the residents. We use 432 Park Avenue as our design site, the famous super-tall symbolic residential tower in New York City. However, we are proposing a new typology that could be applicable to other skyscrapers. Through the exploration of the future destination of the 432 Park Ave tower, we create lots of individual cubic spaces that are requested by each resident, and those additional spaces will house a wide-ranging program, including a private dog park and playground, a private library, and a standard garage space. Those spaces are later putting in a grid-system outside the tower. Directly connected to the residents’ unit, the spaces could be revised, removed, or further expanded as the residents’ needs. We believe that future residential skyscrapers are to explore the maximized comfort level within the existing frame of the towers.

Wildfires started immediately after the appearance of terrestrial plants, 420 million years ago. Natural fires can have beneficial effects on native vegetation, on animals and on ecosystems that have evolved with wildfires. The problem has arisen in recent decades, where we are facing increasing intensity in large fires caused by humans (arsons and climate change). In the case of large and heavy forest fires, it is common to have a totally destroyed ecosystem and, in some cases, the inability to regrow. In recent months we have dealt with the devastating cases of the Amazon rainforest and the bushfires in Australia with over 12.35 million acres of scorched earth and 480 million dying animals. Which role can architecture and architects play in this scenario? Can we suggest new approaches for ecosystem recovery? Regenera finds its role in the process of ecosystem recovery and forest regrowth. Located in the center of a burnt ecosystem, the project aims to spread nutrients and seeds through winds and to be a temporary shelter for birds and small size animals.  The skyscraper will accompany its ecosystem during all the phases, from the burnt forest until the total recovery. It is through the erosion of its own structure and consequently through its dissolution that Regera can transform and spread itself into the ecosystem.  During the initials phases, a laboratory on the lower level is dedicated to experiment, monitor and research the ongoing process and the ecosystem progresses. In the following phases, the scientists abandon the skyscraper allowing the re-population of small and medium-size animals and plants. While the forest regrows, Regenera dissolves. From materials to substances. The new paradigm suggested by Regenera is the possibility to carefully program and diversify each part of the structure, defining a life cycle determined by erosion and constant transformation.  The act of choosing materials is evolved in the act of mixing substances needed by the forest, dealing with the paradox of structure and precariousness. Regenera is a vision that needs chemists, psychogeographers, meteorologists, engineers, and biologists, all involved to understand the necessities of each dead ecosystem. In the end, Regenera tries to be a manifesto for a new possible way of relating architecture and nature, structure and ecosystem, time and erosion, skyscrapers and forests.

There’s no room for hope when there is no action. Actions are hope, amid impending danger of looming disaster. Alarms of demise are ignored. When hope is scarce due to inaction towards an immediate and radical response, comes carbon floss as a political statement to counter absurd/destructive reluctance policies, spurring and promoting hope for action as reassurance for humanity.

The project is located next to the campus in Stockholm, where, as a result of the study, water pollution has been a persistent problem. What we want to focus on is the climate crisis and the relationship between building and environmental impact. Our design is a machine driven by wind power to absorb the pollution in the seawater while purifying the seawater and providing fresh water for the residential building on top. This tower is a self-sustainable public infrastructure. At the same time, it also has the function of enjoyment. Tourists and residents can visit the process of the energy conversion process. This project shows that sustainability is not a burden but should improve the quality of people’s lives and could also be aesthetic and articulate to make a dynamic experience. It’s built right in the middle of the sea and is now part of everyday activities. The tower is ecologically, economically and socially sustainable.

MARS, a mythic red planet and God’s incarnation of the Roman wars are indispensable in the conquest of space today. This planet is situated in the sun’s zone of habitability, but it currently rests in an inhospitable state for humanity. Previously, this planet was known to have living conditions similar to those on Earth as it contained both oceans and an atmosphere. Today, Mars has lost its magnetic field and is struck by solar winds. As a result, Mars is deprived of atmospheric pressure and of water. This star has transformed itself into a cold and radioactive world with temperatures averaging -53° C. Nevertheless, research is advancing and theories are claiming that it will be possible to colonize Mars by terraforming it. NASA developed a concept presenting the creation of an artificial magnetosphere located at the specific site, called Lagrange L1, which is between Mars and the sun. At this specific site, it is necessary to create an object that generates a magnetic field with an intensity between 1-2 teslas that is capable of protecting Mars from cosmic rays. MAGNETIC can rise to the challenge! This colossal “space-scraper” project will allow us to create an atmosphere for Mars that would make the planet inhabitable. MAGNETIC is a spaceship in the form of an airtight cylinder that is more than one kilometer in length and 650 meters in diameter placed in orbit between the two stars. This spaceship will be self-sufficient and generated by renewable energy by means of panels that can capture solar energy. Part of the solar panels that cover the hull of the spaceship will be responsible for producing enough energy to generate the magnetic field in order to terraform Mars. Another part of the panels will be used to maintain the energy required by the inhabitants of the spaceship and to satisfy their domestic and leisure needs. This part will equally be used to generate the energy necessary for the spaceship itself notably to operate all machinery, the centers for research and observation, recycle waste products on-site and to treat air and water in a closed-circuit system. The MAGNETIC spaceship will welcome a diverse population of about ten thousand people for the future colonization of Mars that will be principally charged with the maintenance of the space center. The heat and light will be transmitted through six gigantic columns in the heart of the island such as the filaments of a bulb. Once on-board the spaceship, the living spaces will be organized between the surface and subsurface. On the surface, the habitations will be built around immense spaces filled with forest areas, animal shelters, agricultural zones, beaches and public places that will constitute a life similar to the one experienced on Earth. The subsurface levels will be reserved for the machinery and the factories. The first inhabitants of the MAGNETIC spaceship will form the first civilization to participate in the regeneration project for Mars. They will live the experience like a preview of a successful science fiction film. Why wouldn’t you want to be a part of the first civilization involved in the colonization and investment in the first alternate living experience on planet Mars? As for gravity, it will be produced by a centrifugal force. Mission duration: 2-3 centuries.

As an important type of urban architecture, shopping malls have been profoundly affected by the rise of e-commerce platforms in recent years. The existence and organization of their buildings are constantly changing. The cyber mall and the commercial space, in reality, are constantly interacting with each other and co-evolving. As one of the world’s largest e-commerce platforms, Taobao fully demonstrates the strong demand and continued vitality of the Chinese market. Such a “skyscraper” in cyberspace has aroused our strong interest. We hope that by realizing Taobao, Representation to create a possible skyscraper to reveal the current connection between architecture and the information world. We chose the project location over the highly contemporary Guomao overpass in Beijing, China. This highly dramatic and representative place will better accommodate and inspire the functional setting and contemporary attributes of our architecture. The building consists of a pedestal connected to the urban transportation system, a mainframe, and numerous movable commercial cabins. The pedestal connected to the city ensures the stability of the entire building, and at the same time serves as a medium to transmit the energy required for the operation of the building; the mainframe is made of high-strength metal. Inside the frame is an elevator that can move in both vertical and horizontal directions. The track network constitutes the internal transportation system of the building; the movable cabin is the key to the building’s innovation and future. The unified modular combination ensures effective universality and integrates multi-functional such as retail, catering, and leisure. Commercial cabin movement is achieved by drone traction. The overall space of the building refers to the prototype of Jeremy Bentham’s panopticon prison, which strengthens the sense of surrounding with dense network information. The internal unobstructed atrium has become an important place for commercial promotions and advertising, and it has accommodated a wealth of festive events. The granular space of the corn array implied a catalog-like pattern of network information retrieval. Through the effective use of VR / AR and other technical means, users will get very rich shopping and service experience.

Hong Kong is one of the most densely populated regions in the world. The per capita living area in Hong Kong is only 15 – 20 square kilometers. Many people find it difficult to live here, but most people in Hong Kong are reluctant to leave Hong Kong. Housing prices are also not cheap in Hong Kong, the price of residential buildings in Hong Kong is higher than that in Tokyo, Shanghai, Beijing, New York, Singapore, and other cities, ranking second in the world after Monaco. Under the daily impression of how prosperous and luxurious Hong Kong is, there is a group of people living in an environment that is impossible to imagine. “Coffin room” is one of them. The coffin room is divided up and down on the basis of the original plate room. It is converted into six small rooms, each of which is about 1.5 square meters. Some people can’t even stretch their legs when lying down. Another famous example is “cage house”, which is a sleeping place surrounded by barbed wire. It’s like a cage for raising livestock.  These people living in the “cage” are called “cage people” vividly. In order to improve the living environment and expand land use in Hong Kong, people seem to have racked their brains. A designer in Hong Kong has designed a kind of “snail house” with a sewer pipe as the shell. It covers an area of 9 square meters and is about 2.1 meters high. It is already a quite large house in Hong Kong where land is extremely valuable. In addition, the Hong Kong government has proposed the “Lantau Tomorrow” plan on land supply. It plans to build an artificial island of 1700 hectares in Lantau and provide up to 400000 residential units. It is expected that the first batch of residents will be realized in 2032. Besides these solutions above, in order to increase land use and improve people’s quality of life, there seems to be another possibility in Hong Kong – the use of gap space between residential buildings. Using the gap space can expand a lot of space, and at the same time, it can solve the above problems perfectly without affecting the normal social order. The supporting structure in the gap adopts the folding steel frame structure, which has the advantages of high strength, lightweight, simple fabrication and fast construction period. It is designed as the folding structural unit for mass transportation and rapid installation and can be flexibly adjusted according to the size of the residential building and the distance between buildings. After the steel structure frame is installed, the residential box is put into the frame according to the user’s needs. Because different users have different social statuses, economic conditions, family members and other factors, we classify the boxes, which users can choose their own combination according to their needs. It seems that only using the gap space is not enough. On the basis of using the gap space above, we can expand the space in other directions according to the actual needs of different occasions, such as making some additions along the external facade, breaking down the sheer walls of some floors of the residential building to form a huge connected air platform, and extend the gap space to the roof, connect the roof to form the sky garden, etc.

After thousands of years of living on the earth, have the man found a way to treat the mother of nature or is it still conflicting with it? Nature has always made all its sources available for mankind without any expectations! As a result of the development of technology and increasing the exploitation of nature, many problems and issues are occurring on the earth, climatically and globally; which cause the reaction of nature. According to the statistics of natural disasters such as floods and earthquakes, this reaction has been far increased. The reaction of humans to these disasters is a result of the interaction between natural and human forces. Sometimes this reaction is to deal with these disasters through technology and industry, and sometimes there is no way than giving up and facing many financial and life losses. As a result, it could be found out that the main notion in this interaction, is the human mindset and the tendency to show his limited power. This project has attempted to advocate nature through making a paradigm shift in these critical conditions which the earth has been faced, and focus on the protection of it, instead of confronting. Confronting nature has had no result but regret and loss of capital. Therefore, by protecting nature, we would be able to not only reduce our distress but also make this antithesis of natural disasters to the thesis of exploitation of them and by the help of an exact mechanism, use the resulting synthesis to protect nature. By paying attention to nature and its function, the forces that exist in it could be clarified. Focusing on the flood as a global issue, this project has tried to exploit it naturally. Generally, the destructive and antithesis issue in the flood is the existence of garbage, mud and the aquatic, which enter the residential areas by the pressure of the water, then after facing the obstacles, start to settle and become a threat to the environment. By removing these destructive ingredients from the flood, this project reduces its destructive power and allows nature to make its way. By placing the tower in the path of the flood, the animals are first rescued, then the garbage in the flood is removed, and finally, the mud enters the tower area with the flood and the exploitation operation begins. Balls made of several layers of sieve separate the mud from the water and enter the processing and store loop. In this loop, the operation of processing the mud, which is now our production material, is formed. Finally, as the balls exit the tower, the storage, and transfer operations take place. The flood, passing through the confines of the tower, is converted to a calm, refined stream which has used its destructive power to produce material and help its process, and then continues on its way. This association with nature is not only productive for humans, but it is also beneficial to animals and nature.

The Mekong River is the river of life in Laos which is the only inland country in Southeast Asia. Khone Falls is the largest waterfall in the world, which provides an important financial resource for local fishermen. In the rainy season, the waterfall brings an abundant variety of fishes which only clusters around the rapids of the Khone Falls. It is not only hard but also dangerous for fishermen to catch fishes there. In the dry season, the water flow is almost dry, which shuts off the supply of fishing on which its economy depends. Fishermen can only build bamboo dams and ropes that are used for fishing in the rainy season. Our project, located in the Khone Falls, resolves the living requirement issues, creates a safe and easy fishing environment, and provides new sources of economic income for the fishermen in Laos. During the rainy season, the special roof structure retains fishes and soils with high nutrient contents from the rapids of the Khone Falls. Fishermen catch fishes on the roof of the building by bamboo dams. After fishing, they can process, package, transport and sell the fishes inside the building, which submits a more efficient, systematic way of fishing industries. In the dry season, fishermen could grow rice on the roof by the retained nutritive soil which left by the waterfalls in the rainy season. The Vertical Tidal Settlement would provide more possibilities and economic sources for the fishermen in Laos, which improves their quality of life. 

A fair distribution of resources is the basis of a well-functioning society. Pipelines seem to be an important part of such a distribution in the context of energy, but are always the focus of political conflicts and often encounter local dislike. A densely developed pipeline network with its infrastructure is an important requirement for the global economic system based on oil trading. The climate crisis we are currently facing must be reason enough for us to rethink these systems to get independent of oil and gas, which at the same time requires the development of new ideas for the reuse of these pipelines. The European continent has a vast network of existing oil and gas pipelines like the transalpine oil-pipeline which connects the Italian seaport Trieste with Germany, special the metropolitan area of Munich. It is 470 kilometers long and has a dimension of 100 centimeters each tube. The network primarily serves to supply the refineries in southern Germany but is also connected to other metropolises in Europe via the extensive infrastructure. The towers are designed to be connected to this specific distribution system for alternative use of the pipelines. New systems for renewable energy generation have been known for a long time, but finally, they have to be implemented on a large scale. Decentralization and focus on resources in the respective areas should be in the foreground. Algae as energy resources are in their beginnings and are seen as high potential. Extensive research work has dealt with algae as an energy source in recent decades. As a biofuel, they are up to 6 times more efficient than e.g. comparable fuels from corn or rapeseed. The project focuses on the production of microalgae and their distribution using existing pipelines. The towers are positioned along the transalpine pipeline in a barren mountain landscape. Water is supplied from the surrounding mountain streams and springs, and can also be obtained from the Mediterranean using saltwater. New, empty pipes will be drawn into the existing pipeline. On the one hand, these serve to distribute the sea or mountain water, on the other hand, the microalgae produced can be transported both south to the seacoast and north. The energy for transport is to be obtained from environmentally-friendly hydropower. The tower is circular and both constructed and designed from the inside out. The water is transported upwards via vertical pipes and distributed into the water tanks in the atrium. They are positioned at different heights. A total of 4 maintenance levels ensure that these tanks are easily accessible. The kilometer-long helical tubes, in which the microalgae grow, form the envelope of the atrium. They form the heart of the system and are responsible for the tower’s unique color scheme. Artificial light is said to support the natural in photosynthesis and to accelerate the growth process of algae. The remaining components of the photobioreactor, e.g. carbon dioxide tanks and pumps are positioned in the base of the tower. The tower is accessed via a spiral ramp that is docked to the outside of the algae tubes. It is supported statically by vertical steel frames, which are braced inwards via the four maintenance levels. The spiral staircase is also attached to these frames. The inner core is encased in a construct of platforms and capsule-like spaces. These rooms are used as laboratories and high-tech production facilities for the development of new algae materials. The outer skin is formed by a facade made of vertical thin and perforated tubes. These serve as breeding grounds for the natural algae which give the tower an iconic look.

It doesn’t require many fires or many people to deforest a whole country over a certain period of the earth’s life. Deforestation drivers are; human impacts through deforestation, overexploitation, promotion of faster-growing tree species, clear cut forestry, improper management, air pollution, animal grazing, and many more (Euforgen). There are different cases of countries used to be much more wooded and now become among the worst examples of deforestation. Basically, the soil is exposed in parts, then it starts washing away or blowing away. That is what we see in a very large part of many countries. Seeing those trees setting out there dead in the landscape without having money to do something with the land becomes a global challenge. There are different cases of countries used to be much more wooded and now become among the worst examples of deforestation. Basically, the soil is exposed in parts, then it starts washing away or blowing away. That is what we see in a very large part of many countries. Seeing those trees setting out there dead in the landscape without having money to do something with the land becomes a global challenge. The mission of the project is to produce the seeds each environment needs. That will eventually be genetically well-adapted materials, and to improve the conservation of the genetic diversity of the forests’ tree species across the world (Lefèvre, F. et al., 2013). Genetics of forests’ trees are important. Knowing each tree to plant is a complicated hard process. How much heat they need in the summer to grow, how tolerant they are to drought, when they do know to stop growing in the Autumn, these all of things are genetically determined in the tree. Therefore, areas harboring trees’ populations that have adapted to specific environmental conditions or have distinct characteristics will be defined as “Genetic conservation units” (European strategy for genetic conservation of forest trees). Genetics of forests’ trees are important. Knowing each tree to plant is a complicated hard process. How much heat they need in the summer to grow, how tolerant they are to drought, when they do know to stop growing in the Autumn, these all of things are genetically determined in the tree. Therefore, areas harboring trees’ populations that have adapted to specific environmental conditions or have distinct characteristics will be defined as “Genetic conservation units” (European strategy for genetic conservation of forest trees). Genetics of forests’ trees are important. Knowing each tree to plant is a complicated hard process. How much heat they need in the summer to grow, how tolerant they are to drought, when they do know to stop growing in the Autumn, these all of things are genetically determined in the tree. Therefore, areas harboring trees’ populations that have adapted to specific environmental conditions or have distinct characteristics will be defined as “Genetic conservation units” (European strategy for genetic conservation of forest trees). These new generations will grow better and better than ever before. This will be something that worth timing and results will be satisfying to everyone. That’s a great cause for optimism.


'What’s it going to be then, eh?’ 

There was me, that is Alex, and my thiee 
droogs, that is Pete, Georgie, and Dim, Dim 
being really dim, and we sat in the Korova 
Milkbar making up our rassoodocks what 
to do with the evening, a flip dark chill winter bastard 
though dry The Korova Milkbar was a milk-plus mesto, 
and you may, O my brothers, have forgotten what these 
mestos were like, things changing so skorry these days and 
everybody very quick to forget, newspapers not being read 
much neither. Well, what they sold there was milk plus 
something else They had no hcence for selling hquor, but 
there was no law yet against prodding some of the new 
veshches which they used to put into the old moloko, so 
you could peet it with vellocet or synthemesc or drencrom 
or one or two other veshches which would give you a nice 
quiet horrorshow fifteen minutes admirmg Bog And All 
His Holy Angels And Saints in your left shoe with lights 
bursting all over your mozg. Or you could peet milk with 
knives in it, as we used to say, and this would sharpen you 
up and make you ready for a bit of dirty twenty-to-one, 
and that was what we were peering this evening I’m start- 
ing off the story with. 

Our pockets were full of deng, so there was no real need 
from the point of view of crasting any more pretty polly to 



! 




tolchock some old veck in an alley and viddy him swim in 
his blood while we counted the takings and divided by 
fom, nor to do the ultra-violent on some shivering stany 
grey-haired ptitsa m a shop and go smeckmg off with the 
tiirs guts But, as they say, money isn't eveiy thing 
The four of us were dressed in the heighth of fashion, 
which in those days was a pair of black very tight tights 
with the old ]elly mould, as we called it, fitting on the 
crutch underneath the tights, this being to protect and also 
a sort of a design you could viddy clear enough in a cer- 
tain light, so that I had one in the shape of a spider, Pete 
had a rooker (a hand, that is), Georgie had a very fancy one 
of a flower, and poor old Dim had a very hound-and-horny 
one of a clown's litso (face, that is), Dim not ever having 
much of an idea of things and being, beyond all shadow of 
a doubting thomas, the dimmest of we four. Then we wore 
waisty jackets without lapels but with these very big built- 
up shoulders (‘pletchoes' we called them) which were a 
kind of a mockery of having real shoulders like that Then, 
my brothers, we had these off-white cravats which looked 
like whipped-up kartoffel or spud with a sort of a design 
made on it with a fork. We woie our hair not too long and 
we had flip horrorshow boots for kicking 
What's it going to be then, eh?' 

There were three devotchkas sitting at the counter all 
together, but there were four of us malchicks and it was 
usually like one for aU and all for one. These sharps were 
dressed m the heighth of fashion too, with purple and 
green and orange wigs on their gulhvers, each one not cost- 
ing less than three or four weeks of those sharps' wages, 
I should reckon, and make-up to match (rainbows round 
the glazzies, that is, and the rot painted very wide) Then 
they had long black very straight dresses, and on the 



groody part of them they had little badges of like silver 
with different malchicks’ names on them -Joe and Mike 
and suchlike These were supposed to be the names of the 
different malchicks they’d spatted with before they weie 
fourteen. They kept looking our way and I nearly felt like 
saying the three of us (out of the comer of my rot, that is) 
should go off for a bit of pol and leave poor old Dim be- 
hind, because it would be just a matter of kupetting Dim 
a demi-litre of white but this tune with a dollop of syn- 
themesc in it, but that wouldn’t really have been playing 
like the game Dim was very very ugly and like his name, 
but he was a horrorshow filthy fighter and very handy with 
the boot 

‘What’s it going to be then, eh?’ 

The chelloveck sitting next to me, there being this long 
big plushy seat that ran round three walls, was well away 
with his glazzies glazed and sort of burbling slovos like 
‘Aristotle wishy washy works outing cyclamen get forficu- 
late smartish’ He was in the land all right, well away, in 
orbit, and I knew what it was like, having tried it like 
everybody else had done, but at this time I’d got to think- 
ing it was a cowardly sort of a veshch, O my brothers. 
You^d lay there after you’d drunk the old moloko and then 
you got the messel that everything all round you was sort 
of in the past. You could viddy it all right, all of it, very 
clear - tables, the stereo, the lights, the sharps and the 
malchicks - but it was like some veshch that used to be 
there but was not there not no more. And you were sort 
of hypnotized by your boot or shoe or a finger-nail as it 
might be, and at the same time you were sort of picked up 
by the old scruff and shook like it might be a cat. You got 
shook and shook till there was nothing left You lost your 
name and your body and your self and you just didn’t care, 


3 



and you waited till your boot or your finger-nail got yellow, 
then yellower and yellower all the time Then the lights 
started crackmg like atomics and the boot or finger-nail 
or, as it might be, a bit of dirt on your trouser-bottom 
turned into a big big big mesto, bigger than the whole 
world, and you were just going to get mtroduced to old Bog 
or God when it was all over. You came back to here and 
now whimpering sort of, with your rot all squaring up for 
a boohoohoo. Now, that’s very mce but very cowardly. You 
were not put on this earth just to get in touch with God. 
That sort of thing could sap all the strength and the good- 
ness out of a chelloveck. 

‘What’s it going to be then, eh?’ 

The stereo was on and you got the idea that the smger’s 
goloss was moving from one part of the bar to another, fly- 
ing up to the celling and then swooping down again and 
whizzing from wall to wall. It was Berti Laski rasping a 
real starry oldie called ‘You Blister My Paint’. One of the 
three ptitsas at the counter, the one with the green wig, 
kept pushing her belly out and pulling it in in time to what 
they called the music. I could feel the kmves in the old 
moloko starting to prick, and now I was ready for a bit of 
twenty-to-one So I yelped’ ‘Out out out out! ’ like a doggie, 
and then I cracked this veck who was sitting next to me 
and wen away and burbling a horrorshow crack on the 
ooko or earhole, but he didn’t feel it and went on with his 
‘Telephonic hardware and when the farfarculule gets ruba- 
dubdub’. He’d feel it all right when he came to, out of the 
land. 

‘Where out?’ said George 

‘Oh, just to keep walking,’ I said, ‘and viddy what turns 
up, O my htde brothers.’ 

So we scatted out into the big winter nodiy and walked 


4 



down Marghanita Boulevard and then turned into Boothby 
Avenue, and there we found what we were pretty well 
looking for, a malenky jest to start off the evening with. 
There was a doddery starry schoolmaster type veck, glasses 
on and his rot open to the cold nochy air He had books 
under his arm and a crappy umbrella and was coming 
round the corner from the Public Bibho, which not many 
lewdies used those days You never really saw many of the 
older bourgeois type out after nightfall those days, what 
with the shortage of police and we fine young malchicki- 
wicks about, and this prof type chelloveck was the only one 
walking in the whole of the street. So we goolied up to him, 
very polite, and I said* ‘Pardon me, brother ’ 

He looked a malenky bit poogly when he viddied the 
four of us hke that, coming up so quiet and polite and 
smiling, but he said: Tes? What is it?’ in a very loud 
teacher-type goloss, as if he was trying to show us he 
wasn’t poogly. I said: 

‘I see you have books under your arm, brother. It is in- 
deed a rare pleasure these days to come across somebody 
that still reads, brother.’ 

‘Oh,’ he said, all shaky. ‘Is it? Oh, I see ’ And he kept 
looking from one to the other of we four, finding him- 
self now like in the middle of a very smiling and polite 
square 

‘Yes,’ I said. ‘It would mtereSt me greatly, brother, if you 
would kindly allow me to see what books those are that 
you have under your arm. I like nothing better in this 
world than a good clean book, brother.’ 

‘Clean,’ he said. ‘Clean, eh^’ And then Pete skvatted 
the^ three books from him and handed them round real 
skorry. Bemg three, we all had one each to viddy at except 
for Km. The one I had was called Elementary Ciystal- 


S 



lography, so I opened it up and said ‘Excellent, really 
first-class,’ keeping turning the pages. Then I said in a 
very shocked type goloss. ‘But what is this heie> What is 
this filthy slovo? I blush to look at this word. You dis- 
appoint me, brother, you do really,’ 

‘But,’ he tried, ‘but, but ’ 

‘Now,’ said George, ‘here is what I should call real dirt 
There’s one slovo beginning with an f and another with a 
c.’ He had a book called The Miracle of the Snowflake. 

‘Oh,’ said poor old Dim, smotting over Pete’s shoulder 
and going too fer, like he always did, ‘it says here what he 
done to her, and there’s a picture and'all Why,’ he said, 
‘you’re nothing but a filthy-minded old skitebird.’ 

‘An old man of your age, brother,’ I said, and I started to 
rip up the book I’d got, and the others did the same with 
the ones they had. Dim and Pete doing a tug-of-war with 
The Rhomhohedral System. The starry prof type began to 
creech: ‘But those are not mine, those are the property of 
the municipality, this is sheer wantonness and vandal 
work,’ or some such slovos. And he tried to sort of wrest 
the books back off of us, which was like pathetic. ‘You 
deserve to be taught a lesson, brother,’ I said, ‘that you do.’ 
This crystal book I l^d was very tough-bound and hard 
to razrez to bits, being real starry and made in days when 
things were made to last hke, but I managed to rip the 
pages up and chuck them in handfuls of like snowflakes, 
though big, all over this creeching old veck, and then the 
others did the same with theirs, old Dun just dandng about 
like the down he was. ‘There you are,’ said Pete. ‘There’s 
the mackerel of the cornflake for you, you dirty reader of 
filth and nastmess.’ 

Tou naughty old veck, you,’ I said, and then we began 
to filly about with Mm. Pete held his rookers and Georgie 

6 



sort of hooked hrs rot wide open for him and IXm yanked 
out his false zoobies, upper and lower. He threw these down 
on the pavement and then I treated them to the old boot- 
crush, though they were hard bastards like, being made of 
some new horrorshow plastic stufE. The old veck began to 
make sort of chumbling shooms - 'wuf waf wof - so 
Georgie let go of holding his goobers apart and just let 
>iim have one in the toothless rot with his ringy fist, and 
that made the old veck start moaning a lot then, then out 
comes the blood, my brothers, real beautiful So all we did 
then was to pull his outer platties off, snipping him down 
to his vest and long underpants (very starry; Dim smecked 
his head off near), and then Pete kicks him lovely in his 
pot, and we let him go. He went sort of staggermg off, it 
not havmg been too hard of a tolchock really, going ‘Oh oh 
oh’, not knowing where or what was what really, and we 
had a snigger at him and then riflSled through his pockets, 
Dim dancing roimd with his crappy umbrella meanwhile, 
but there wasn’t mudi in them There were a few starry 
letters, some of them dating nght back to i960, with ‘My 
dearest dearest’ in them and all that chepooka, and a key- 
ring and a starry leaky pen. Old Dim gave up his umbrella 
dance and of course had to start readmg one of the letters 
out loud, hke to show the empty street he could read, ‘My 
darling one,’ he recited, in this very high type goloss, ‘I 
shall be thinking of you while you are away and hope you 
will remember to wrap up warm when you go out at mght’ 
Then he let out a very shoomny smeck- ‘Ho ho ho’-pre- 
taiding to start wiping his yahma with it. ‘AH right,’ I 
said. Xet it go, O my brothers.’ In the trousers of this starry 
veck there was only a malenky bit of cutter (money, that 
is) - not more than three goUies - so we gave all his messy 
httle coin the scatter treatment, it being hen-korm to the 


7 



amoiint of pretty polly we had on us already Then we 
smashed the umbrella and razrezzed his platues and gave 
them to the blowing winds, my brothers, and then we’d 
finished with the starry teacher t]^ veck. We hadn’t done 
much, I know, but that was only like the start of the 
evemng and I make no appy polly loggies to thee or thin e, 
for that. The knives in the milk-plus were stabbing away 
nice and horrorshow now. 

The next thing was to do the sammy act, which was one 
way to unload some of our cutter so we’d have more of an 
incentive hke for some shop-crastmg, as well as it being a 
way of buymg an alibi in advance, so we went into the 
Duke of New York on Amis Avenue and sure enough in 
the snug there were three or four old baboochkas peering 
their black and suds on SA (State Aid). Now we were the 
very good malchicks, smiling good evensong to one and all, 
though these wrinkled old hghters started to get all shook, 
their veiny old rookers all trembhng round their glasses 
and making the suds spill on the table. “Leave us be, lads,’ 
said one of them, her face all mappy with being a thou- 
sand years old, ‘we’re only poor old women.’ But we just 
made with the zoobies, flash flash flash, sat down, rang the 
bell, and waited for the boy to come. When he came, ail 
nervous and rubbing his rookers on his grazzy apron, we 
ordered us four veterans - a veteran being rum and cherry 
brandy mixed, which was popular just then, some hking a 
dash of hme m it, that being the Canadian variation Then 
I smd to the boy: 

‘Give these poor old baboodhkas over there a nourishing 
something. Large Scotchmen all round and something to 
take away.’ And I poured my pocket of deng all over the 
table, and the other three did likewise, O my brothers. So 
double fixegolds were brought in for the scared starry 

8 



lighters, and they knew not what to do or say. One of them 
got out ‘Thanks, lads,’ but you could see they thought there 
was somethmg dirty like coming. Anyway, they were each 
given a bottle of Yank General, cognac that is, to take 
away, and I gave money for them to be delivered each a 
dozen of black and suds that following morning, they to 
leave their stinking old cheenas’ addresses at the counter 
Then with the cutter that was left over we did purchase, 
my brothers, all the meat pies, pretzels, cheeso-snacks, 
cnsps and chocbars in that mesto, and those too were for 
the old sharps. Tlien we said* ‘Back in a minoota,’ and the 
old ptitsas were still saying ‘Thanks, lads,’ and ‘God bless 
you, boys,’ and we were gomg out without one cent of 
cutter in our carmans 

‘Makes you feel real dobby, that does,’ said Pete You 
could viddy that poor old Dim the dim didn’t quite pony 
all that, but he said nothmg for fear of being called gloopy 
and a domeless wonderboy Well, we went ofiE now round 
the comer to Attlee Avenue, and there was this sweets and 
cancers shop soil open. We’d left them alone near three 
months now and the whole district had been very quiet on 
the whole, so the armed mUhcents or rozz patrols weren’t 
round there much, being more north of die river these 
days We put our maskies on - new jobs these were, real 
horrorshow, wonderfully done really; they were like faces 
of historical personalities (they gave you the name when 
you bought) and I had Disraeli, Pete had Elvis Presley, 
Georgie had Henry VIII and poor old Dim had a poet ve<i 
called Peebee Shelley; they were a real like disguise, hair 
and all, and they were some very special plastic veshch so 
you could roll up when you’d done with it and hide it in 
your boot— then three of us went in, Pete keeping chasso 
without, not tihat there was anything to worry about out 


9 



there. As soon as we launched on the shop we went for 
Slouse who ran it, a big portwine jelly of a veck who 
viddied at once what was coming and made straight for 
the inside where the telephone was and perhaps his well- 
oiled pooshka, complete with six dirty rounds Dim was 
round that counter skorry as a bird, sending packets of 
snoutie flymg and cracking over a big cut-out showing a 
sharp with all her zoobies gomg flash at the customers and 
her groodies near hanging out to advertise some new brand 
of cancers. What you could viddy then was a sort of a big 
hall rolhng into the mside of the shop behind the curtain, 
this being old Dim and Slouse sort of locked in a death 
struggle Then you could slooshy panting and snoring and 
kicking behind the curtam and veshches falling over and 
swearing and then glass going smash smash smash Mother 
Slouse, the wife, was sort of froze behind the counter. We 
could tell she would creech murder given one chance, so I 
was round that counter very skorry and had a hold of her, 
and a horrorshow big lump she was too, all nuking of scent 
and with flipflop big bobbing groodies on her. I’d got my 
rooker roimd her rot to stop her belting out death and 
destruction to the four winds of heaven, but this lady 
doggie gave me a large foul bi^ bite on it and it was me 
that did the creeching, and then she opened up beautiful 
with a flip yell for the millicents. Well, then she had to be 
tolchocked proper with one of the weights for the scales, 
and then a fair tap with a crowbar they had for opening 
cases, and that brought the red out like an old friend. So 
we had her down on the floor and a rip of her platties for 
fun and a gentle bit of the boot tn stop her moaning. And, 
viddying her lying there with her groodies on show, I won- 
dered should I or not, but that was for later on in the 
evening. Then we cleaned the till, and there was flip horror- 



show takings that nochy, and we had a few packs of the 
very best top cancers apiece, then ofE we went, my brothers 

‘A real big heavy great bastard he was,’ Dim kept saying. 
I didn’t hke the look of Dun, he looked duty and untidy, 
like a veck who’d been m a fight, which he had been, of 
course, but you should never look as though you have been 
His cravat was like someone had trampled on it, his maskie 
had been pulled ofE and he had floor-dut on his htso, so we 
got him in an alleyway and tidied him up a malenky bit, 
soaking our tashtooks in spit to cheest the dirt off. The 
things we did for old Dim We were back m the Duke of 
New York very skorry, and I reckoned by my watch we 
hadn’t been more than ten imnutes away The starry old 
baboochkas were still there on the black and suds and 
Scotchmen we’d bought them, and we said: ‘Hallo there, 
guhes, what’s it going to be?’ They started on the old 
‘Very kind, lads, God bless you, boys,’ and so we rang the 
collocoll and brought a different waiter in this time and we 
ordered beers with rum in, being sore athirst, my brothers, 
and whatever the old pdtsas wanted. Then I said to the old 
baboochkas ‘We haven’t been out of here, have we? Been 
here all the time, haven’t we^’ They all caught on real 
skorry and said: 

‘That’s right, lads Not been out of our sight, you 
haven’t. God bless you, boys,’ drinking. 

Not that it mattered much, really. About half an hour 
went by before there was any agn of life among the milli- 
cents, and then it was only two very young rozzes that 
came in, very pink under their big copper’s shlemtmes. 
One said: 

‘You lot know anything about the happenings at Slouse’s 
shop this mght?’ 

‘Us>’ I said, innocent ‘Why, what happened^’ 



‘Stealing and roughing. Two hospitalizations Where’ve 
you lot been this evening?’ 

‘I don’t go for that nasty tone,’ I said ‘I don’t care much 
for these nasty insinuations A very suspiaous nature all 
this betokeneth, my httle brothers ’ 

‘They’ve been in here all mght, lads,’ the old sharps 
staited to creech out ‘God bless them, there’s no better lot 
of boys hving for kindness and generosity Been here all 
the time they have Not seen them move we haven’t.’ 

‘We’re only asking,’ said the other yoimg millicent. 
‘We’ve got our job to do hke anyone else.’ But they gave 
us the nasty warmng look before they went out As they 
were going out we handed them a bit of hp-music 
brrrrzzzzrrrr. But, myself, I couldn’t help a bit of dis- 
appointment at things as they were those days. Nothing to 
fight against really. Everything as easy as kiss-my-sharries 
Still, the night was still very young. 



When we got outside of the Duke of New 
York we viddied, by the mam bar^s long 
hghted window, a burbling old pyahnitsa 
or drunkie, howling away at the filthy songs 
of his fathers and going blerp blerp in be- 
tween as it might be a filthy old orchestra in his stinking 
rotten guts One veshch I could never stand was that. I 
could never stand to see a moodge all filthy and rolling 
and burping and drunk, whatever his age might be, but 
more especially when he was real starry like this one was 
He was sort of flattened to the wall and his platties were a 
disgrace, all creased and untidy and covered in cal and 
mud and filth and stuff. So we got hold of him and cracked 
him with a few good horrorshow tolchocks, but he still 
went on singing The song went* 

And I will go back to my darling, my darling. 
When you, my darling, are gone 

But when Dim fisted him a few times on his filthy 
drunkard’s rot he shut up singing and started to creech: 
'Go on, do me in, you bastard cowards, I don’t want to 
hve anyway, not in a stinking world like this one ^ I told 
Dim to lay off a bit then, because it used to interest me 
sometimes to slooshy what some of these starry decreps 
had to say about life and the world. I said: 'Oh. And what’s 



13 




stinking about it^’ 

He cned out ‘It’s a stinking world because it lets the young 
get on to the old like you done, and there’s no law noi order 
no more.’ He was creeching out loud and waving his rookers 
and making real horrorshow with the slovos, only the odd 
blurp blurp coming from his keeshkas, like something was 
orbiting within, or hke some very rude interrupting soit 
of a moodge making a shoom, so that this old veck kept 
sort of threatemng it with his fists, shouting ‘It’s no world 
for any old man any longer, and that means that I’m not 
one bit scared of you, my boyos, because I’m too drunk to 
feel the pain if you hit me, and if you kill me I’ll be glad 
to be dead ’ We smecked and then grinned but said no- 
thing, and then he said: ‘What sort of a world is it at all ^ 
Men on the moon and men spinning round the earth like 
It might be midges round a lamp, and there’s not no atten- 
tion paid to earthly law nor order no more. So your worst 
you may do, you fflthy cowardly hooligans ’ Then he gave 
us some lip-music - ‘Prrrrzzzzrrrr’ - like we’d done to those 
young milhcents, and then he started singing again* 

O dear dear land, I fought for thee 

And brought thee peace and victory — 

So we cracked into him lovely, grinning all over our litsos, 
but he still went on smging Then we tripped him so he 
laid down flat and heavy and a bucketload of beer-vomit 
came whooshing out. That was disgustmg so we gave him 
the boot, one go each, and then it was blood, not song nor 
vomit, that came out of Ms filthy old rot Then we went 
on our way 

It was round by the Municipal Power Plant that we 
came across Billyboy and his five droogs Now in those 


*4 



days, my brothers, the teammg tip was mostly by fours or 
fives, these being like auto-teams, four being a comfy 
number for an auto, and six being the outside limit for 
gang-size. Sometimes gangs would gang up so as to make 
like malenky armies for big mght-war, but mostly it was 
best to roam in these like small numbers Billyboy was 
something that made me want to sick just to viddy his fat 
grinning litso, and he always had this von of very stale oil 
that*s been used for frying over and over, even when he was 
dressed in his best platties, like now They viddied us just 
as we viddied them, and there was like a very quiet kind 
of watching each other now. This would be real, this would 
be proper, this would be the nozh, the oozy, the britva, not 
just fisties and boots Billyboy and his droogs stopped what 
they were doing, which was Just getting ready to perform 
something on a weepy yoimg devotchka they had there, 
not more than ten, she creeching away but with her platties 
still on, Billyboy holding her by one rooker and his 
number-one, Leo, holding the other. They'd probably just 
been doing the dirty slovo part of the act before getting 
down to a malenky bit of ultra-violence When they viddied 
us a-coming they let go of this boo-hoomg little ptitsa, 
there being plenty more where she came from, and she ran 
with her thin white legs flashing through the dark, still 
going ‘Oh oh oh*. I said, smiling very wide and droogie. 
‘Well, if it isn't fat stinking billygoat Billyboy in poison 
How art thou, thou globby bottle of cheap stinking 
chip-oil? Come and get one in the yarbles, if you 
have any yarbles, you eunuch jelly, thou ' And then we 
started 

There were four of us to six of them, like I have already 
indicated, but poor old Dim, for aU his dimness, was worth 
three of the others in sheer madness and dirty fighting. 


15 



Dim had a real horrorshow length of oozy or cham round 
his waist, twice wound round, and he unwound this and 
began to swing it beautiful m the eyes or glazzies. Pete and 
Georgie had good sharp nozhes, but I for my own part had 
a fine starry horrorshow cut-throat bntva which, at that 
time, I could flash and shine artistic So there we weie 
dratsing away in the dark, the old Luna with men on it 
just coming up, the stars stabbing away as it might be 
knives anxious to join in the dratsmg. With my bntva I 
managed to sht nght down the front of one of Billyboy’s 
droog’s platties, very very neat and not even touching the 
plott under the cloth. Then m the dratsing this droog of 
Billyboy’s suddenly found himself all opened up like a pea- 
pod, with his belly baie and his poor old yarbles showmg, 
and then he got very very razdraz, waving and screaming 
and losing his guard and letting m old Dim with his cham 
snaking whisssssshhhhhhhhh, so that old Eflm chained 
him nght in the glazzies, and this droog of Billyboy’s went 
tottering off and howling his heart out. We were doing 
very horrorshow, and soon we had Billyboy’s number-one 
down underfoot, blinded with old Dim’s dhain and crawl- 
ing and howling about like an animal, but with one fair 
boot on the gulliver he was out and out and out. 

Of the four of us Dim, as usual, came out the worst in 
point of looks, that is to say his htso was all bloodi^ and 
his platties a dirty mess, but the others of us were still 
cool and whole. It was stinking fatty Billyboy I wanted 
now, and there I was dandng about with my biitva like 
I might be a barber on board a ship on a very rough s^ 
trying to get in at him with a few fair slashes on his un- 
clean oily litso Billyboy had a nozh, a long flick-type, but 
he was a malenky bit too slow and heavy in his move- 
ments to vred anyone really bad. And, my brothers, it was 

i6 



real satisfaction to me to waltz - left two three, right two 
three -and carve left cheeky and right cheeky, so that like 
two curtains of blood seemed to pour out at the same time, 
one on dther side of his fat filthy oily snout in the winter 
starlight Down this blood poured in like red curtains, but 
you could viddy Billyboy felt not a thing, and he went 
lumbenng on hke a Mthy fatty bear, poking at me with 
his nozh. 

Then we slooshied the sirens and knew the millicents 
were coming with pooshkas pushing out of the pohce-auto- 
windows at the ready. That htde weepy devotchka had 
told them, no doubt, there being a box for calling the 
rozzes not too far behind the Muni Power Plant ‘Get you 
soon, fear not,’ I called, ‘stinking billygoat. I’ll have your 
yarbles off lovely.’ Then off they ran, slow and panting, 
except for Number One Leo out snoring on the ground, 
away north towards the river, and we went the other way 
Just round the next turning was an alley, dark and empty 
and open at both ends, and we rested there, panting fast 
then slower, then breathing like normal. It was like rest- 
ing between the feet of two terrific and very enormous 
mountains, these being the flat-blocks, and in the windows 
of all of the flats you could viddy like blue dancing light 
This would be the telly. Tonight was what they called a 
worldcast, meaning that the same programme was being 
viddied by everybody in the world that wanted to, that 
being mostly the middle-aged middle-class lewdies. There 
would be some big famous stupid comic chelloveck or 
black singer, and it was all being bounced off the special 
telly satellites in outer space, my brothers We waited 
panting, and we could slooshy the sirening millicents 
going east, so we knew we were aU right now. But poor 
old Dim kept looking up at the stars and planets and the 



Luna with his rot wide open like a kid who’d never viddied 
any such thing before, and he said' 

‘What’s on them, I wonder What would be up there on 
things hke that?’ 

I nudged him hard, saying ‘Come, gloopy bastard as 
thou art Think thou not on them Theie’ll be life like 
down here most likely, with some getting knifed and 
others doing the knifing And now, with the nochy still 
molodoy, let us be on our way, O my brothers ’ The others 
smecked at this, but poor old Dim looked at me serious, 
then up agam at the stars and the Luna. So we went on 
our way down the alley, with the worldcast bluemg on 
on either side What we needed now was an auto, so we 
turned left coming out of the alley, knowing right away 
we were in Priestley Place as soon as we viddied the big 
bronze statue of some starry poet with an apey upper lip 
and a pipe stuck in a droopy old rot. Going north we came 
to the filthy old Filmdrome, peehng and dropping to bits 
through nobody going there much except malchicks hke 
me and my droogs, and then only for a yell or a razrez 
or a bit of in-out-in-out in the dark We could viddy from 
the poster on the Filmdrome’s face, a couple of fly-dirted 
spots trained on it, that there was the usual cowboy riot, 
with the archangels on the side of the US marshal six- 
shooting at the rustlers out of hell’s fighting legions, the 
kind of hound-and-horny veshch put out by Statefilm in 
those days. The autos parked by the sinny weren’t all that 
horrorshow, crappy starry veshches most of them, but 
there was a newish Durango 95 that I thought might do. 
Georgie had one of these polydefs, as they called them, 
on his keyring, so we were soon aboard -Dim and Pete 
at the back, puflBbng away lordly at their cancers -ahd I 
turned on the ignition and started her up and she 

18 



grumbled away real horrorshow, a nice warm vibraty 
feeling grumbling all through your guttiwuts. Then I 
made with the noga, and we backed out lovely, and 
nobody viddied us take off 

We filhed round what was called the backtown for a 
bit, scaring old vecks and cheenas that were crossing the 
roads and zigzagging after cats and that Then we took 
the road west There wasn't much traffic about, so I kept 
pushing the old noga through the floorboards near, and 
the Durango 95 ate up the road like spaghetti. Soon it 
was winter trees and dark, my brothers, with a country 
dark, and at one place I ran over something big with a 
snarling toothy rot in the headlamps, then it screamed 
and squelched under and old Dim at the back near 
laughed his gulliver off- ‘Ho ho ho' -at that. Then we 
saw one young malchick with his sharp, lubbilubbing 
under a tree, so we stopped and cheered at them, then 
we bashed into them bo^ with a couple of half-hearted 
tolchocks, making them cry, and on we went What we 
were after now was the old surprise visit. That was a real 
kick and good for smecks and lashmgs of the ultra-violent 
We came at last to a sort of a village, and just outside 
this village was a small sort of a cottage on its own with 
a bit of a garden. The Luna was well up now, and we 
could viddy this cottage fine and clear as I eased up and 
put the brake on, the other three giggling like bezoomny, 
and we could viddy the name on the gate of this cottage 
veshch was HOME, a gloopy sort of a name. I got out 
of the auto, ordering my droogs to shush their giggles and 
act like serious, and I opened this malenky gate and 
walked up to the front door. I knocked nice and gentle 
and nobody came, so I knocked a bit more and this time 
I could dooshy somebody coming, then a bolt drawn, 


19 



then the door inched open an inch or so, then I could 
viddy this one glaz looking out at me and the door was 
on a cham. ‘Yes? Who is it>’ It was a sharp’s goloss, a 
youngish devotchka by her sound, so I said in a very re- 
fined manner of speech, a real gentleman’s goloss 

‘Pardon, madam, most sorry to disturb you, but my 
friend and me were out for a walk, and my friend has 
taken bad all of a sudden with a very troublesome turn, 
and he is out there on the road dead out and groaning 
Would you have the goodness to let me use your telephone 
to telephone for an ambulance?' 

‘We haven’t a telephone,’ said this devotchka ‘I’m 
sorry, but we haven’t. You’ll have to go somewhere else ’ 
From inside this malenky cottage I could slooshy the 
clack clack clacky clack clack clackity clackclack of some 
veck t3rping away, and then the typing stopped and 
there was this chelloveck’s goloss calling. “What is it, 
dear?’ 

‘Well,’ I said, ‘could you of your goodness please let 
him have a cup of water? It’s like a famt, you see. It seems 
as though he’s passed out in a sort of a fdnting fit.’ 

The devotchka sort of hesitated and then said: ‘Wait ’ 
Then she went off, and my three droogs had got out of 
the auto quiet and crept up horrorshow stealthy, putting 
their maskies on now, then I put name on, then it was 
only a matter of me putting in the old rooker and tm- 
doing the chain, me having softened up this devotchka 
with my gent’s goloss, so that she hadn’t shut the door 
like she should have done, us being strangers of the night. 
The four of us then went roaring in, old Dim playing the 
shoot as usual with his jumping up and down and sing- 
ing out dirty slovos, and it was a nice malenky cottage. 
I’ll say that. We all went smecking into the room with a 



light on, and there was this devotchka sort of cowering, a 
young pretty bit of sharp with real horrorshow groodies 
on her, and with her was this chelloveck who was her 
moodge, youngish too with horn-nmmed otchkies on 
him, and on a table was a typewriter and all papers 
scattered everywhere, but there was one htde pile of paper 
like that must have been what he’d already typed, so here 
was another mtelhgent type bookman type like that we’d 
fiUied with some hours back, but this one was a writer 
not a reader. Anyway, he said: 

‘What is this? Who are you? How dare you enter my 
house without penmssion.’ And all the time his goloss was 
trembling and his rookers too. So I said* 

‘Never fear. If fear thou hast m thy heart, O brother, 
pray banish it forthwith’ Then Georgie and Pete went 
out to find the kitchen, while old Dim waited for orders, 
standing next to me with his rot wide open. “What is this, 
then?’ I said, picking up the pile like of taping from off of 
the table, and the hom*nmmed moodge said, dithering 

‘That’s just what I want to know. What is this? What 
do you want? Get out at once before I throw you out ’ So 
poor old Dim, masked like Peebee Shelley, had a good 
loud smeck at that, roaring like some animal. 

It’s a book,’ I said. ‘It’s a book what you are writing.’ I 
made the old goloss very coarse. ‘I have always had the 
strongest admiration for them as can write books.’ Then 
I looked at its top sheet, and there was the name -A 
CLOCKWORK ORANGE -and I said; ‘That’s a fair 
gloopy title. Who ever heard of a clockwork orange?’ 
Then I read a malenky bit out loud in a sort of very high 
type preaching goloss* ‘ — ^The attempt to impose upon 
man, a creature of growth and capable of sweetness, to 
ooze jmdly at the last round the bearded lips of God, to 



attempt to impose, I say, laws and conditions appropriate 
to a mechanical creation, against this I raise my sword- 
pen — Dim made the old hp-music at that and I had to 
smeck myself. Then I started to tear up the sheets and 
scatter the bits over the floor, and this writer moodge 
went sort of bezoomny and made for me with his zoobies 
clenched and showing yellow and his nails ready for me 
like claws. So that was old Dim’s cue and he went grm- 
ning and going er er and a a a for this veck’s dithering 
rot, crack crack, first left fistie then right, so that our dear 
old droog the red -red vino on tap and the same in all 
places, like it’s put out by the same big firm -started to 
pour and spot the nice clean carpet and the bits of his 
book that I was still ripping away at, razrez razr^. All 
this time this devotchka, his loving and faithful wife, ]ust 
stood hke froze by the fireplace, and then she started let- 
ting out little malenky creeches, like in time to the like 
music of old Dim’s fisty work. Then Georgie and Pete 
came in from the kitchen, both munching away, though 
with their maskies on, you could do that with them on 
and no trouble, Georgie with like a cold leg of something 
in one rooker and half a loaf of kleb with a big dollop of 
maslo on it in the other, and Pete with a bottle of beer 
frothing its guUiver ofiE and a horrorshow rookerful of like 
plum cake. They went haw haw haw, viddymg old Dim 
dancing round and fisting the wnter veck so that the 
writer veck started to platch hke his life’s work was 
ruined, going boo hoo hoo with a very square bloody rot, 
but it was haw haw haw in a muffled eater’s way and you 
could see bits of what they were eating. I didn’t hke that, 
it bring dirty and slobbery, so I said: 

'Drop that mounch. I gave no penmssion. Grab hold of 
this veck here so he can viddy all and not get away.’ So 


23 



they put down their fatty pishcha on the table among all 
the flying paper and they clopped over to the writer veck 
whose horn-rimmed otchkies were cracked but still hang- 
ing on, with old Dim still dancing round and making 
ornaments shake on the mantelpiece (I swept them all off 
then and they couldn’t shake no more, little brothers) 
while he Allied with the author of A Clockwork Orange^ 
making his Iitso all purple and dripping away like some 
very special sort of a jmcy fruit 'All right, Dim,’ I said, 
'Now for the other veshch. Bog help us all ’ So he did the 
strong-man on the devotchka, who was still creech creech 
creeching away in very horrorshow four-m-a-bar, locking 
her rookers from the back, while I ripped away at this 
and that and the other, the others going haw haw haw 
still, and real good horrorshow groodies they were that 
then exhibited their pink glazzies, O my brothers, while 
I untrussed and got ready for the plunge. Plunging, I could 
slooshy cries of agony and this writer bleeding veck that 
Georgie and Pete held on to nearly got loose howling 
bezoomny with the filthiest of slovos that I already knew 
and others he was making up. Then after me it was right 
old Dim should have his turn, which he did m a beasty , 
snorty howly sort of a way with his Peebee Shelley maskie 
taking no notice, while I held on to her. Then there was a 
changeover. Dim and me grabbing the slobbering writer 
veck who was past struggling really, only just coming out 
with slack sort of slovos like he was in the land in a milk- 
plus bar, and Pete and Georgie had theirs. Then there was 
like quiet and we were full of like hate, so smashed what 
was left to be smashed - typewriter, lamp, chairs -and 
Dim, it was typical of old Dim, watered the fire out and 
was going to dung on the carpet, there being plenty of 
paper, but I said no 'Out out out out,’ I howled. The 


23 


c 



writer veck and and his zheena were not really there, 
bloody and torn and making noises. But they’d live 
So we got into the waiting auto and I left it to Georgie 
to take the wheel, me feeling that malenky bit shagged, 
and we went back to town, running over odd squealing 
things on the way. 


24 



We yeckated back townwards, my brothers, 
but just outside, not far from what they 
called the Industrial Canal, we viddied 
the fuel needle had hke collapsed, like our 
own ha ha ha needles had, and the auto 
was coughing kashl kashl kashl. Not to worry overmuch, 
though, because a rail station kept flashing blue -on off 
on off - just near. The point was whether to leave the auto 
to be sobiratted by the rozzes or, us feeling like in a hate 
and murder mood, to give it a fair tolchock into the starry 
waters for a nice heavy loud plesk before the death of the 
evening. This latter we decided on, so we got out and. the 
brakes off, all four tolchocked it to the edge of the filthy 
water that was hke treacle mixed with human hole pro- 
ducts, then one good horrorshow tolchock and in she 
went. We had to dash back for fear of the filth splashing 
on our platties, but splussshhhh and glolp she went, down 
and lovely, Tarewell, old droog,^ called Georgie, and Dim 
obliged with a downy great guff-^Huh huh huh huh/ 
Then we made for the station to ride the one stop to 
Center, as the middle of the town was called. We paid our 
fares laice and polite and waited gentlemanly and quiet on 
the platform, old Dim Allying with the slot machines, his 
carmans being full of small malenky coin, and ready if 
need be to distribute chocbars to the poor and starving, 



^5 




though there was none such about, and then the old 
espresso rapido came lumbering in and we climbed aboard, 
the tram looking to be near empty To pass the three- 
minute ride we fillied about with what they called the 
upholstery, doing some nice horrorshow tearmg-out of the 
seats’ guts and old Dim chaimng the okno till the glass 
cracked and sparkled in the winter air, but we weie all 
feeling that bit shagged and fagged and fashed, it having 
been an evening of some small energy expenditure, my 
brothers, only Dim, like the downy animal he was, full of 
the joys-of, but looking all dirtied over and too much von 
of sweat on him, which was one thing I had against old 
Dim. 

We got out at Center and walked slow back to the 
Korova Milkbar, all going yawwwww a malenky bit and 
exhibiting to moon and star and lamplight our back 
fillmgs, because we were still only growing malchicks and 
had school in the daytime, and when we got into the 
Korova we found it fuller than when we’d left earlier on 
But the chelloveck that had been burbling away, in the 
land, on white and synthemesc or whatever, was still on 
at it, going; TJrchins of deadcast in the way-ho-hay gliU 
platonic time weatherbom,’ It was probable that this was 
his tihtird or fourth lot that evening, for he had that pale 
inhuman look, like he’d become a thing, and like his litso 
was really a piece of chalk carved Really, if he wanted to 
spend so long in the land, he should have gone into one 
of the jaivate cubies at the back and not stayed in the big 
mesto, because here some of the malchickies would filly 
about with him a malenky bit, diough not too mudi be- 
cause diere were powerful bruiseboys hidden away in the 
did Korova who could stop any riot. Anyway, Dun 
squeezed in next to diis veck and, with his big clown’s 

26 



yawp that showed his hanging grape, he stabbed this 
veck's foot with his own large fiOlthy sabog But the veck, 
my brothers, heard nought, being now all above the body. 

It was nadsats mostly milking and coking and fillymg 
around (nadsats were what we used to call the teens), but 
there were a few of the more starry ones, vecks and 
cheenas ahke (but not of the bourgeois, never them) 
laughing and govoreeting at the bar. You could tell from 
their barberings and loose platties (big stringy sweaters 
mostly) that they’d been on rehearsal at the TV studios 
round the corner. The devotchkas among them had these 
very lively litsos and wide big rots, very red, showing a 
lot of teeth, and smecking away and not caring about the 
wicked world one whit And then the disc on the stereo 
twanged off and out (it was Jonny Zhivago, a Russky 
koshka, singing ‘Only Every Other Day’), and in the like 
interval, the short silence before the next one came on, 
one of these devotchkas - very fair and with a big smiling 
led rot and in her late thirties I’d say -suddenly came 
with a burst of singmg, only a bar and a half and as 
though she was like giving an example of something 
they’d all been govoreeting about, and it was like for a 
moment, O my brothers, some great bird had flown into 
the milkbar, and I felt all the htde malenky hairs on my 
plott standing endwise and the shivers crawling up like 
slow malenky lizards and then down again Because I 
knew what she sang. It was from an opera by Friedrich 
Gitterfenster called Das Bettzeug, and it was the bit where 
she’s sniffing it with her throat cut, and the slovos are 
‘Better like this maybe’. Anyway, I shivered. 

But old Dim, as soon as he’d slooshied this dollop of 
song like a lomtick of redhot meat plonked on your plate, 
let off one of his vulgarities, which m this case was a lip- 


^7 



trump followed by a dog-howl followed by two fingers 
pronging twice at the air followed by a downy gufEaw I 
fdt myself all of a fever and hke drowning in redhot 
blood, slooshying and viddying Dim’s vulgarity, and I 
said: ‘Bastard. Filthy drooling mannerless bastard.’ Then 
I leaned across Georgie, who was between me and horrible 
Dim, and fisted Dim skorry on the rot Dim looked very 
surprised, his rot open, wiping the krowy off of his goober 
with his rook and in turn looking surprised at the red 
flowing krovvy and at me ‘What for did you do that for?’ 
he said in Ids ignorant way. Not many viddied what I’d 
done, and those that viddied cared not. The stereo was on 
again and was playing a very sick electronic guitar veshch 
I said; 

‘For being a bastard with no manners and not the dock 
of an idea how to comport yourself publicwise, O my 
brother.’ 

Dim put on a hound-and-horny look of evil, saying- ‘I 
don’t like you should do what you done then. And I’m 
not your brother no more and wouldn’t want to be.’ He’d 
taken a big snotty tashtook from his pocket and was mop- 
ping the red flow puzzled, keeping on looking at it frown- 
ing as if he thought that blood was for other vecks and 
not for him. It was like he was singing blood to make up 
for his vulgarity when that devotchka was sin^ng- music 
But that devotchka was smecking away ha ha ha now 
with her droogs at the bar, her red rot working and her 
zoobies ashine, not having noticed Dim’s filtiby vulgarity. 
It was me really Dim had done wrong to I said- 

*16 you don’t hke this and you wouldn’t want that, then 
you know what to do, little brother.’ George said, in a 
sharp way that made me look; 

‘All right. Let’s not be starting.’ 

28 



That’s clean up to Dim/ I said ‘Dim can’t go on all 
his jeezny being as a little child/ And I looked sharp at 
Georgia. Dim said, and the red krowy was easing its flow 
now 

‘What natural right does he have to think he can give 
the orders and tolchock me whenever he likes? Yarbles 
is what I say to him, and I’d chain his glazzies out soon 
as look/ 

‘Watch that/ I said, as quiet as I could with the stereo 
bouncing all over the walls and ceiling and the in-the-land 
veck beyond Dim getting loud now with his ‘Spark nearer, 
ultoptimate’. I said ‘Do watch that, O Dim, if to continue 
to be on live thou dost wish/ 

‘Yarbles,’ said Dim, sneering, ‘great bolshy yarblockos 
to you. What you done then you had no right. I’ll meet 
you with chain or nozh or britva any time, not having 
you aiming tolchocks at me reasonless, it stands to reason 
I won’t have it ’ 

‘A nozh scrap any time you say,’ I snarled back Pete 
said: 

‘Oh now, don’t, both of you malchicks Droogs, aren’t 
we? It isn’t nght droogs should behave thiswise. See, there 
aie some loose-lipped malchicks over there smecking at 
us, leering like. We mustn’t let ourselves down/ 

‘Dim,’ I said, ‘has got to learn his place. Right?’ 

‘Wait/ said George. ‘What’s all this about place? This 
is the first I ever hear about lewdies learning their 
place/ 

Pete said: Tf the truth is known, Alex, you shouldn’t have 
given old Dim that xmcalled-for tolchock. I’ll say it once and 
no more. 1 say it with all respect, but if it had been me you’d 
given it to you’d have to answer. I say no more ’ And he 
drowned Ms litso in Ms milk-glass. 


29 



I could feel myself getting all razdraz inside, but I med 
to cover it, saying calm: ‘There has to be a leader 
Discipline there has to be. Eight?’ None of them skazatted 
a word or nodded even I got more razdraz inside, calmer 
out. ‘I,’ I said, ‘have been in charge long now. We are all 
droogs, but somebody has to be in charge. Right? Right?’ 
They all like nodded, wary like. Dim was osooshing the 
last of the krovvy off It was Dim who said now: 

‘Right, right Doobidoob A bit tired, maybe, everybody 
is. Best not to say more.’ I was surprised and just that 
malenky bit poogly to sloosh Dim govoreeting that wise 
Dim said: ‘Bedways is nghtways now, so best we go home- 
ways. Right?’ I was very surprised The other two nodded, 
going right right right I said 

‘You understand about that tolchock on the rot, Dun 
It was the music, see. I get all bezoomny when any veck 
interferes with a ptitsa singing, as it might be Like that 
then.’ 

“Best we go off homeways and get a bit of spatchka,’ 
said Dim. ‘A long night for growing malchicks. Eight?’ 
Right right nodded the other two. I said* 

‘I think it best we go home now. Dim has made 
a real horrorshow suggestion. If we don’t meet day- 
wise, O my brothers, well then - same time same place to- 
morrow?’ 

‘Oh yes,’ said Georgie. ‘I think that can be arranged ’ 

‘I might,’ said Dim, “be just that malenky bit late But 
same place and near same time tomorrow surely.’ He was 
still wiping away at his goober, thou^ no krovvy flowed 
any longer now. ‘And,’ he said, ‘it’s to be hoped there 
won’t be no more of them singmg pdtsas m here.’ Then 
he gave his old Dim guff, a downy big hohohohoho. It 
seemed like he was too dun to take much offence. 


30 



So off we went our several ways, me belching arrrrgh 
on the cold coke I’d peeted. I had my cut-throat britva 
handy in case any of Billyboy’s droogs should be around 
near the flatblock waiting, or for that matter any of the 
other bandas or gruppas or shaikas that from time to time 
were at war with one. Where I lived was with my dadda 
and mum in the flats of Mumapal Flatblock i8a, between 
Kingsley Avenue and Wilsonsway I got to the big mam 
door with no trouble, though I did pass one young 
malchick sprawling and creeching and moanmg m the 
gutter, all cut about lovely , and saw in the lamplight 
also streaks of blood here and there like signatures, my 
brothers, of the night’s Allying. And too I saw just by i8a 
a pair of devotchka’s neezhnies doubtless rudely wrenched 
off in the heat of the moment, O my brothers. And so in 
In the hallway was the good old mumapal paintmg on 
the walls -vecks and ptitsas very well developed, stern in 
the digmty of labour, at workbench and machine with 
not one stitch of platties on their weU-developed plotts 
But of course some of the malchicks living in i8a had, as 
was to be expected, embellished and decorated the said 
big painting with handy pencil and ballpomt, adding hair 
and stiff rods and dirty balloomng slovos out of the digni- 
fied rots of these nagoy (bare, that is) cheenas and vecks. 
I went to the lift, but there was no need to press the 
electric knopka to see if it was working or not, because it 
had been tolchocked real horrorshow this night, the metal 
doors all buckled, some feat of rare strength indeed, so 
I had to walk the ten fioois up. I cursed and panted climb- 
ing, being tired in plott if not so much in bram. I wanted 
music very bad this evening, that sin^ng devotdika in 
the Korova having perhaps started me off. I wanted hke 
a big feast of it before getting my passport stamped, my 


31 



brothers, at sleep’s frontier and the stripy shest lifted to 
let me through. 

I opened the door of io-8 with my own little klootch, 
and inside our malenky quarters all was quiet, the pee and 
em both bemg in sleepland, and mum had laid out on 
the table my malenky bit of supper - a couple of lomticks 
of tinned spongemeat with a shive or so of kleb and butter, 
a glass of the old cold moloko Hohoho, the old moloko, 
with no knives or synthemesc or drencrom in it. How 
wicked, my brothers, mnocent milk must always seem to 
me now Still, I drank and ate growhng, being more 
hungry than I thought at first, and I got fruit-pie from 
the larder and tore chunks off it to stuff mto my greedy 
rot. Then I tooth-cleaned and chcked, cleamng out the old 
rot with my yahzick or tongue, then I went into my own 
little room or den, easing off my platties as I did so Here 
was my bed and my stereo, pnde of my jeezny, and my 
discs in their cupboard, and banners and flags on the wall, 
these being like remembrances of my corrective school hfe 
since I was eleven, O my brothers, each one shining and 
blazoned with name or number: SOUTH 4, METRO 
CORSKOL BLUE DIVISION; THE BOYS OF ALPHA. 

The little speakers of my stereo were all arranged round 
the room, on ceiling, walls, floor, so, lying on my bed 
slooshying the music, I was like netted and meshed in flie 
orchestra. Now what I fancied first tonight was this new 
violin concerto by the American Geoffrey Plautus, played 
by Odysseus Choenlos with liie Macon (Georg^) Phil- 
harmonic, so I slid it from where it was neatly filed and 
switched on and waited. 

Then, brothers, it came Oh, bliss, bhss and heaven I 
lay all nagoy to the ceding, my guUiver on my rookers on 
the pillow, glazzies closed, rot open in bliss, slooshying 


3 ® 



the sluice of lovely sounds Oh, it was gorgeousness and 
gorgeosity made flesh The trombones crunched redgold 
under my bed, and behind my guUiver the trumpets three- 
wise silverflamed, and there by the door the timps rolhng 
through my guts and out again crunched like candy 
thunder. Oh, it was wonder of wonders And then, a bird 
of hke rarest spun heavenmetal, or hke silvery wine flow- 
mg m a spaceship, gravity all nonsense now, came the 
viohn solo above all the other strmgs, and those strings 
were like a cage of silk round my bed. Then flute and 
oboe bored, like worms of hke platinum, into the thick 
thick toffee gold and silver. I was in such bliss, my 
brothers. Pee and em in their bedroom next door had 
learnt now not to knock on the wall with complaints of 
what they called noise. I had taught them. Now they 
would take sleep-pills. Perhaps, knovrang the joy I had in 
my night music, they had already taken them. As I 
slooshied, my glazzies tight shut to shut in the bliss that 
was better than any synthemesc Bog or God, I knew such 
lovely pictures. There were vecks and ptitsas, both young 
and starry, lying on the ground screaming for mercy, and 
I was smecking all over my rot and grinding my boot in 
their litsos. And there were devotchkas ripped and creech- 
ing against walls and I plunging like a shlaga into them, 
and indeed when the music, which was one movement 
only, rose to the top of its big highest tower, then, l3dng 
there on my bed with glazzies tight shut and rookers be- 
hind my gufliver, I broke and spattered and cried aaaaaaah 
with the bliss of it. And so the lovely music glided to its 
glowmg dose 

After that I had lovdy Mozart, the Jupiter, and there 
were new pictures of different litsos to be ground and 
splashed, and it was after this that I thought I would 


33 



have just one last disc only before crossing the border, and 
I wanted something starry and strong and very firm, so 
It was J. S Bach I had, the Brandenburg Concerto just for 
middle and lower stimgs And, slooshying with different 
bliss than before, I viddied again this name on the paper 
I’d razrezzed that night, a long time ago it seemed, in 
that cottage called HOME The name was about a clock- 
work orange. Listening to the J. S. Bach, I began to pony 
better what that meant now, and I thought, slooshying 
away to the brown gorgeousness of the stairy German 
master, that I would hke to have tolchocked them both 
harder and ripped them to ribbons on their own floor 


34 



The next morning I woke up at oh eight 
oh oh hours, my brothers, and as I stili 
felt shagged and fagged and fashed and 
bashed and my glazzies were stuck together 
real horrorshow with sleepglue, I thought 
I would not go to schooL I thought how I would have a 
malenky bit longer in the bed, an hour or two say, and 
then get dressed mce and easy, perhaps even having a 
splosh about in the bath, and then brew a pot of real 
strong horrorshow chai and make toast for myself and 
slooshy the radio or read the gazetta, all on my oddy 
knocky And then in the afterlimch I might perhaps, if 
I still felt like it, itty off to the old skoUiwoll and see what 
was vareetmg in that great seat of gloopy useless learning, 
O my brothers. I beard my papapa grumblmg and tramp- 
ling and then ittymg off to the dyeworks where he 
rabbited, and then my mum called in in a very respect- 
ful goloss as she did now I was growmg up big and 
strong: 

‘It’s gone eight, son. You don’t want to be late again.’ 

So I called back: ‘A hit of a pain in my guUiver. Leave 
us be and I’ll try to sleep it off and then I’ll be right as 
dodgers for this after.’ I slooshied her ^ve a sort of a sigh 
and she said: 

‘I’ll put your breakfast in the oven then, son. I’ve got 

35 





to be ofi myself now.’ Which was trae, theie being this 
law for everybody not a child nor with child nor ill to 
go out rabbiting. My mum worked at one of the State- 
marts, as they called them, filhng up the shelves with 
tinned soup and beans and all that cal. So I slooshied her 
clank a plate in the gas-oven like and then she was put- 
ting her shoes on and then getting her coat from behind 
the door and then sighing again, then she said. ‘I’m off 
now, son.’ But I let on to be back in sleepland and then I 
did doze off real horrorshow, and I had a queer and very 
real like sneety, dreaming for some reason of my droog 
George In this sneety he’d got hke very much older and 
very sharp and hard and was govoreeting about discipline 
and obedience and how all the malchicks under his con- 
trol had to jump hard at it and throw up the old salute 
like being m the army, and there was me in line hke the 
rest saying yes sir and no sir, and then I viddied clear 
that Georgte had these stars on his pletchoes and he was 
like a general. And then he brought in old Dim with a 
whip, and Dim was a lot more starry and grey and had a 
few zoobies missing as you could see when he let out a 
smeck, viddying me, and then my droog George said, 
pointing like at me: ‘That man has filth and cal all over 
his platties,’ and it was true Then I creeched: ‘Don’t hit, 
please don’t, brothers,’ and started to run. And T was run- 
ning in like circles and Dim was after me, smecking his 
gulliver off, cracking with the old whip, and each time I 
got a real horrorshow tolchock with this whip there was 
like a very loud electric bell ringringrmging, and this bell 
was like a sort of a pain too. 

Then I woke up real skorry, my heart going bap bap 
bap, and of course there was really a bell going brrrrr, and 
It was our front-door bell. I let on that nobody was at home, 

36 



but this brrrrr still ittied on, and then I heard a goloss 
shouting through the door 'Come on then, get out of it, 
I know you're in bed/ I recogmzed the goloss right away 
It was the goloss of P. R. Deltoid (a real gloopy nazz, that 
one) what they called my Post-Corrective Adviser, an over- 
worked veck with hundreds on his books I shouted right 
right right, in a goloss of like pain, and I got out of bed 
and attired myself, O my brothers, in a very lovely over- 
gown of like silk, with designs of like great cities all over 
this over-gown. Then I put my nogas into very comfy 
woolly toofles, combed my lusaous glory, and was ready 
for P, R. Deltoid When I opened up he came shambling 
in looking shagged, a battered old shlapa on his gulliver, 
his raincoat filthy. 'Ah, Alex boy,' he said to me 1 met 
your mother, yes. She said something about a pain some- 
where. Hence not at school, yes ' 

'A rather intolerable pain in the head, brother, sir,' I 
said in my gentleman's goloss. 'I think it should clear by 
this afternoon ' 

'Or certainly by this evening, yes,' said P R. Deltoid. 
'The evening is the great time, isn't it, Alex boy? Sit,' he 
said, 'sit, sit,’ as though this was his domy and me his 
guest. And he sat in this starry rocking-chair of my dad's 
and began rocking, as if that was all he'd come for. I said: 

'A cup of the old chai, sir? Tea, I mean ' 

'No time,' he said. And he rocked, giving me the old 
glint under frowning brows, as if with all the time in the 
world. 'No time, yes,’ he said, gloopy. So I put the kettle 
on Then I said. 

'To what do I owe the extreme pleasure? Is anything 
wrong, sir?' 

'Wrong?' he said, very skorry and sly, sort of hunched 
looking at me but still rocking away. Then he caught 


37 



sight of an advert in the gazetta, which was on the table - 
a lovely smecking young ptitsa with her groodies hanging 
out to advertise, my brothers, the Glories of the Jugoslav 
Beaches Then, after sort of eating her up in two swallows, 
he said* ‘Why should you think in terms of there being 
anything wrong? Have you been doing something you 
shouldn’t, yes?’ 

‘Just a manner of speech,’ I said, ‘sir ’ 

‘Well,’ said P. R Deltoid, ‘it’s Just a manner of speech 
from me to you that you watch out, little Alex, because 
next time, as you very well know, it’s not going to be the 
corrective school any more Next time it’s going to be the 
harry place and all my work ruined. If you have no con- 
sideration for your horrible self you at least might have 
some for me, who have sweated over you. A big black 
mark, I tell you in confidence, for every one we don’t re- 
claim, a confession of failure for every one of you that 
ends up in the stripy hole ’ 

‘I’ve been doing nothing I shouldn’t, sir,’ I said. ‘The 
millicents have nothing on me, brother, sir I mean.’ 

‘Cut out this clever talk about millicents,’ said P. R. 
Deltoid very weary, but still rocking. ‘Just because the 
pohce have not picked you up lately doesn’t, as you very 
wdl know, mean you’ve not been up to some nastiness. 
There was a bit of a fi^t last mght, wasn’t there? There 
was a bit of shuffling with nozhes and bike-chains and 
the like. One of a certain fat boy’s Mends was ambulanced 
ofiE late from near the Power Plant and hospitalized, cut 
about very unpleasantly, yes. Your name was mentioned. 
The word has got through to me by the usual channels 
Certain Mends of yours were named also. There seems to 
have b^n a fair amount of assorted nastiness last mght 
Oh, nobody can prove anything about anybody, as usual. 

38 



But Fm warning you, little Alex, being a good friend to 
you as always, the one man in this sore and sick com- 
munity who wants to save you from yourself ’ 

*1 appreciate all that, sir/ I said. Very sincerely/ 

‘Yes, you do, don't you?' he sort of sneered ‘J^st watch 
It, that’s all, yes. We know more than you think, little 
Alex/ Then he said, in a goloss of great suffering, but still 
rocking away: ‘What gets into you all? We study the 
problem and we've been studying it for damn well near 
a century, yes, but we get no farther with our studies. 
You’ve got a good home here, good loving parents, you've 
got not too bad of a brain Is it some devil that crawls in- 
side you?’ 

‘Nobody's got anything on me, sir,' I said ‘I've been out 
of the rookers of the millicents for a long time now/ 
‘That's ]ust what worries me,’ sighed P. R. Deltoid, ‘A 
bit too long of a time to be healthy. You're about due now 
by my reckoning That's why Fm warning you, little Alex, 
to keep your handsome young proboscis out of the dirt, 
yes Do I make myself clear?' 

‘As an unmuddied lake, sir,’ I said. ‘Clear as an azure 
sky of deepest summer You can rely on me, sir ' And I 
gave him a nice zooby smile. 

But when he'd ookadeeted and I was making this very 
strong pot of chai, I grinned to myself over this veshch 
that P. R Deltoid and his droogs worried about. All right, 
I do bad, what with crasting and toichocks and carves 
with the britva and the old in-out-in-out, and if I get 
loveted, well, too bad for me, O my little brothers, and 
you can’t run a country with every chelloveck comporting 
himself m my manner of the night. So if I get loveted and 
it's three months in this mesto and another six in that, 
and then, as P. R. Deltoid so kindly warns, next time, in 

39 u 



spite of the great tenderness of my summers, brothers, it’s 
the great unearthly zoo itself, well, I say ‘Fair, but a pity, 
my loids, because I just cannot bear to be shut in. My 
endeavour shall be, in such future as stretches out its 
snowy and lilywhite arms to me before the nozh over- 
takes or the blood spatters its final chorus in twisted metal 
and smashed glass on the highroad, to not get loveted 
agam ’ Which is fair speechmg. But, brothers, this biting 
of their toe-nails over what is the cause of badness is 
what turns me into a fine laughing malchick. They don’t 
go into what is the cause of goodness, so why of the other 
shop? If lewdies are good that’s because they like it, and 
I wouldn’t ever interfere with their pleasures, and so of 
the other shop. And I was patronizing the other shop 
More, badness is of the self, tihe one, the you or me on our 
oddy knockies, and that self is made by old Bog or God 
and is his great pnde and radosty But the not-self c ann ot 
have the bad, meaning they of the government and the 
judges and the schools cannot allow the bad because they 
cannot allow the self. And is not our modem history, my 
brothers, the story of brave malenky selves fighting these 
big inachines? I am serious with you, brothers, over this. 
But what I do I do because I like to do. 

So now, this smihng winter morning, I dnnk this very 
strong chai with moloko and spoon after spoon after spoon 
of sugar, me havmg a sladky tooth, and I dragged out of 
the oven the breakfast my poor old mum had cooked for 
me. It was an egg fried, that and no more, but I made 
toast and ate egg and toast and jam, smacking away at it 
while I read the gazetta. The gazetta was the usual about 
ultra-violence and bank robberies and strikes and foot- 
ballers making everybody paralytic with fright by threaten- 
ing to not play next Saturday if they did not get higher 


40 



wages, naughty malchickiwicks as they weie Also there 
were more space-trips and bigger stereo TV screens and 
oflEers of free packets of soapflakes in exchange for the 
labels on soup-tins, amazing offer for one week only, which 
made me smeck. And there was a bolshy big article on 
Modern Youth (meamng me, so I gave the old bow, grin- 
ning like bezoomny) by some very clever bald chelloveck 
I read this with care, my brothers, slurping away at the 
old chai, cup after tass after chasha, crunching my 
lomticks of black toast dipped in jammiwam and eggiweg. 
This learned veck said the usual veshches, about no 
parental discipline, as he called it, and the shortage of real 
horrorshow teachers who would lambast bloody beggary 
out of their innocent poops and make them go boohoohoo 
for mercy Ail this was gloopy and made me smeck, but 
it was like nice to go on knowing one was making the 
news all the time, O my brothers. Every day there was 
something about Modern Youth, but the best veshch they 
ever had m the old gazetta was by some starry pop in a 
doggy collar who said that in his considered opinion and 
he was govoreeting as a man of Bog IT WAS THE 
DEVIL THAT WAS ABROAD and was like ferreting 
his way into like young innocent flesh, and it was the 
adult world that could take the responsibility for this with 
their wars and bombs and nonsense. So that was all right 
So he knew what he talked of, being a Godman* So we 
young innocent malchicks could take no blame. Right right 
right. 

When I’d gone erk erk a couple of razzes on my full 
innocent stomach, I started to get out day platties from 
my wardrobe, turning the radio on. There was music play- 
ing, a very nice malenky string quartet, my brothers, by 
Claudius Birdman, one that I knew well. I had to have a 


41 



smeck, though, thinking of what I’d viddied once in one 
of these hke articles on Modern Youth, about how Modem 
Youth would be better off if A lively Appreciation Of 
The Arts could be like encouraged Great Music, it said, 
and Great Poetry would like quieten Modern Youth down 
and naake Modem Youth more Civihzed. Civilized my 
syphilised yarbles. Music always sort of sharpened me up, 
O my brothers, and made me like fed hke old Bog him- 
self, ready to make with the old donner and blitzen and 
have vecks and ptitsas creechmg away in my ha ha power 
And when I’d cheested up my litso and rookers a bit and 
done dressmg (my day platties were hke student-wear the 
old blue pantalomes with sweater with A for Alex) I 
thought here at least was tune to itty off to the disc-bootick 
(and cutter too, my pockets being full of pretty poUy) to 
see about this long-promised and long-ordered stereo 
Beethoven Number Nine (the Choral Symphony, that is), 
recorded on Masterstroke by the Esh Sham Sinfonia under 
L. Muhaiwir. So out I went, brotheis. 

The day was very different from the night. The mght 
belonged to me and my droogs and all the rest of the 
nadsats, and the starry bourgeois lurked indoors drinking 
m the gloopy worldcasts, but the day was for the starry 
ones, and there always seem«i to be more rozzes or 
miUicents about during the day, too. I got the autobus 
&om the corner and rode to Center, and then I walked 
back to Taylor Place, and there was the disc-bootick I 
favoured with my inestimable custom, O my brothers. It 
had the gloopy name of MELODIA, but it was a real 
horrorshow mesto and skorry, most times, at getting the 
new recordings I walked in and the only other customers 
were two young ptitsas sucking away at ice-sticks (and this, 
mark, was dead cold vrinter) and sort of shuffling through 


42 



the new popdiscs - Johnny Bumaway, Stash Kroh, The 
Mixers, Lay Quiet Awhile With Ed And Id Molotov, and 
all the rest of that cal These two ptitsas couldn’t have 
been more than ten, and they too, like me, it seemed, 
evidently, had decided to take a mornmg o£E from the old 
skolliwoll They saw themselves, you could see, as real 
grown-up devotchkas already, what with the old hipswing 
when they saw your Faithful Narrator, brothers, and 
padded groodies and red all ploshed on their goobers I 
went up to the counter, making with the pohte zooby smile 
at old Andy behind it (always polite himself, always help- 
ful, a real horrorshow type of a veck, though bald and 
very very thin). He said: 

‘Aha, I know what you want, I think. Good news, good 
news It has arrived ’ And with hke big conductor’s rookers 
beating time he went to get it. The two young ptitsas 
started ^gglmg, as they will at that age, and I gave them 
a like cold glazzy Andy was back real skorry, waving the 
great shiny white sleeve of the Ninth, which had on it, 
brothers, the frowmng heeded like thunderbottied Etso of 
Ludwig van himself, ‘Here,’ said Andy. ‘Shall we give it 
the trial spin?’ But I wanted it back home on my 
stereo to slooshy on my oddy knocky, greedy as hell. I 
fumbled out the deng to pay and one of the little ptitsas 
said. 

‘Who you getten, bratty? What biggy, what only?’ 
These young devotchkas had their own like way of 
govoreeting. ‘The Heaven Seventeen? Luke Sterne? Goggly 
Gogol?’ And both giggled, roddng and hippy. Then an 
idea hit me and made me near fall over with the anguish 
and ecstasy of it, O my brothers, so I could not breathe for 
near ten seconds. I recovered and made vnth my new-clean 
zbobies and said: 


43 



‘What you got back home, httle sisters, to play your 
fuzzy warbles on?’ Because I could viddy the discs they 
were buying were these teeny pop veshches ‘I bet you got 
httle save tiny portable like picnic spinners ’ And they 
sort of pushed their lower lips out at that. ‘Come with 
uncle,’ I said, ‘and hear all proper Hear angel trumpets 
and devil trombones. You are invited.’ And I like bowed 
They giggled again and one said 

‘Oh, but we’re so hungiy. Oh, but we could so eat ’ The 
other said: “Yah, she can say that, can’t she just ’ So I said: 

‘Eat with tmcle. Name your place.’ 

Then they viddied themselves as real sophistoes, which 
was like pathetic, and started talkmg m big-lady golosses 
about the Ritz and the Bristol and the Hilton and II 
Ristorante Granturco. But I stopped that with ‘Follow 
uncle’, and I led them to the Pasta Parlour just round the 
comer and let them fill their innocent young litsos on 
spaghetti and sausages and cream-puffs and banana-splits 
and hot choc-sauce, till I near sicked with the sight of it, 
I, brothers, lunching but frugally off a cold ham-slice and 
a growling dollop of dbilli These two yoimg ptitsas were 
much alike, though not sisters They had the same ideas 
or lack of, and the same colour hair -a like dyed strawy. 
Well, they would grow up real today. Today I would make 
a day of it. No school this afterlunch, but education 
certain, Alex as teacher. Their names, they said, were 
Marty and Sonietta, bezoomny enough and in the heighth 
of their childish fashion, so I said: 

‘JUghty right, Marty and Sometta. Time for the big 
spin Come.’ When we were outside on the cold street they 
thought they would not go by autobus, oh no, but by taxi, 
so I ^ve them the humour, though with a real horror- 
show m-grin, and I called a taxi from the rank near 


44 



Center. The driver, a starry whiskery veck in very stained 
platties, said* 

‘No tearing up, now. No nonsense with them seats Just 
re-upholstered they are ’ I quieted his gloopy fears and off 
we spim to Municipal Flatblock i8a, these two bold httle 
ptitsas giggling and whispering So, to cut all short, we 
arrived, O my brothers, and I led the way up to lO-S, and 
they panted and smecked away the way up, and then they 
were thirsty, they said, so I unlocked die treasure-chest in 
my room and gave these ten-year-young devotchkas a real 
horrorshow Scotchman apiece, though well filled with 
sneezy pins-and-needles soda They sat on my bed (yet un- 
made) and leg-swung, smecking and peeting their high- 
balls, while I spun their like pathetic malenky discs 
through my stereo Like peetmg some sweet scented kid's 
drink, that was, in like very beautiful and lovely and costly 
gold goblets. But they went oh oh oh and said, ‘Swoony' 
and ‘Hilly’ and other weird slovos that were the heighth 
of fashion m that youth group. While I spun this cal for 
them I encouraged them to drink and have another, and 
they were nothing loath, O my brothers So by the time 
their pathetic pop-discs had been twice spun each (there 
were two: ‘Honey Nose’, sung by Ike Yard, and ‘Night 
After Day After Night’, moaned by two horrible yarble- 
less like eunuchs whose names I forget) they were get- 
ting near the pitch of like young ptitsa’s hysterics, what 
with jumping all over my bed and me in the room with 
them 

What was actually done that afternoon th»e is no need 
to describe, brothers, as you may easily guess all. Those 
two were unplattied and smecking fit to crack in no time 
at all, and they thought it the bolshiest fun to viddy old 
0ncle Alex standing there all nagoy and pan-handled, 


45 



squimng the hypodermic like some bare doctor, then 
giving myself the old jab of growhng jungle-cat secretion 
in the rooker. Then I pulled the lovely Nmth out of its 
sleeve, so that Ludwig van was now nagoy too, and I set 
the needle hissmg on to the last movement, which was 
all bhss. There it was then, the bass strings hke govoreet- 
ing away from under my bed at the rest of the orchestra, 
and then the male human goloss coming in and telling 
them all to be joyful, and then the lovely blissful tune all 
about Joy being a glorious spark hke of heaven, and then 
I felt the old tigers leap in me and then I leapt on these 
two young ptitsas This time they thought nothing fun 
and stopped creeching with high mirth, and had to submit 
to the strange and weird desires of Alexander the Large 
which, what with the Ninth and the hypo jab, were 
choodessny and zammechat and very demanding, O my 
brothers. But they were both very very drunken and could 
hardly feel very much. 

When the last movement had gone round for the second 
lime with aU the banging and creechmg about Joy Joy 
Joy Joy, then these two young ptitsas were not acting the 
big lady sophisto no more. They were like waking up to 
what was being done to their malenky persons and saymg 
that they wanted to go home and like I was a wild beast 
They looked like they had been in some big bitva, as in- 
deed they had, and were all bruised and pouty. Well, if 
they would not go to school they must stiU have their 
education. And education they had had. They were crcedh- 
ing and going ow ow ow as they put their plataes on, and 
they were like pundupunching me with Aeir teeny fists 
as I lay there dirty and nagoy and Mr shagged and fagged 
on the bed. This young Sometta was creeching: ‘Beast and 
hateful animal Filthy horror’ So I let them get their 

46 



things together and get out, which they did, talking about 
how the rozzes should be got on to me and all that cal 
Then they were going down the stairs and I dropped ofiE 
to sleep, still with the old Joy Joy Joy Joy crashing and 
howlmg away. 


47 



What happened, though, was that I woke 
up late (near seven-tiurty by my watch) 
and, as it turned out, that was not so 
clever. You can viddy that everything in 
this wicked world counts You can pony 
that one thing always leads to another. Right right right. 
My stereo was no longer on about Joy and I Embrace Ye 

0 Ye Millions, so some veck had dealt it the off, and that 
would be either pee or em, both of them now being quite 
clear to the slooshying in the living-room and, from the 
clink chnk of plates and slurp slurp of peering tea from 
cups, at their tired meal after the day’s rabbiting in factory 
the one, store the other. The poor old. The pitiable starry. 

1 put on my over-govm and looked out, in guise of loving 
only son, to say: 

‘Hi hi hi, there. A lot better after the day’s rest. Ready 
now for evening work to eim that little bit.’ For that’s 
what they said they believed I did these days. “Yum yum, 
mum. Any of that for me?’ It was like some frozen pie 
that she’d unfroze and then warmed up and it looked 
not so very appetitish, but I had to say what I said. Dad 
looked at me with a not-so-jdeased suspicious like look 
but said nothing, knowing he dared not, and mum gave 
me a tired like httle smeck, to thee fruit of my womb my 
only son sort of. I danced to the bathroom and had a real 

48 




skorry cheest all over, feeling dirty and gluey, then back 
to my den for the evening’s plataes. Then, shimng, 
combed, brushed and gorgeous, I sat to my lomtick of 
pie Papapa said* 

‘Not that I want to pry, son, but where exactly is it you 
go to work of evenings?’ 

‘Oh,’ I chewed, ‘it’s mostly odd things, helping like 
Here and there, as it nught be.’ I gave him a straight dirty 
glazzy, as to say to mind his own and I’d roind mine. ‘I 
never ask for money, do I? Not money for clothes or for 
pleasures? All right, then, why ask?’ 

My dad was hke humble mumble chumble ‘Sorry, son,’ 
he said. ‘But I get worried sometimes Sometimes I have 
dreams You can laugh if you like, but there’s a lot in 
dreams. Last night I had this dream with you m it and 
I didn’t like it one bit ’ 

‘Oh?’ He had gotten me mteressovatted now, dreaming 
of me like that I had like a feehng I had had a dream, 
too, but I could not remember proper what ‘Yes?’ I said, 
stopping chewing my gluey pie. 

‘It was vivid,’ said my dad. ‘I saw you lying on the street 
and you had been beaten by other boys. These boys were 
like the boys you used to go around with before you were 
sent to that last Corrective School ’ 

‘Oh?’ I had an in-grin at that, papapa believing I had 
real reformed or believing he believed And then I remem- 
bered my own dream, which was a dream of that morn- 
ing, of Georgie givmg his general’s orders and old Dim 
smecking around toothless as he vnelded the whip. But 
dreams go by opposites I was once told. ‘Never worry 
about thine only son and heir, O my father,’ I said ‘Fear 
not He canst taketh care of himself, verily.’ 

‘And,’ said my dad, ‘you weare like helpless m your blood 


49 



and you couldn't fight back ’ That was real opposites, so 
I had another quiet malenky grin within and then I took 
all the deng out of my caimans and tinkled it on the saucy 
table-cloth. I said' 

‘Here, dad, it’s not much. It’s what I earned last mght 
But perhaps for the odd peet of Scotchman in the snug 
somewhere for you and mum ’ 

‘Thanks, son,’ he said. ‘But we don’t go out much now. 
We daren’t go out much, the streets being what they are. 
Young hooligans and so on. StiU, thanks. I’ll bring her 
home a bottle of something tomorrow ’ And he scooped 
this ill-gotten pretty into his trouser carmans, mum being 
at the cheestmg of the dishes in the kitchen And I went 
out with loving smiles all round. 

When I got to the bottom of the stairs of the flatblock 
I was somewhat surprised. I was more than that I opened 
my rot like wide in the old stony gapes. They had come to 
meet me. They were waiting by the all scrawled-over 
municipal waU-paintiug of the nagoy dignity of labour, 
bare vecks and cheenas stem at the wheels of industry, 
like I said, with all this dirt pencilled from their rots by 
nau^ty malchicks. Dim had a big thick like stick of black 
greasepaint and was tracing filthy slovos real big over otir 
municipal painting and doing the old Dim guff - wuh huh 
huh - while he did it. But he turned round when (Jeorgie 
and Pete gave me the well hdlo, showing their shining 
droogy zoobies, and he horned out- ‘He are here, he 
have arrived, hooray,’ and did a clumsy tumitoe bit of 
danang. 

‘We got worried,’ said George. ‘There we were, await- 
ing and peering away at the old knify moloko, and you 
bad not turned up. ^ then Pete here tihought how you 
might have been like offended by some veshch or other. 


50 



so round we come to yom abode. That’s right, Pete, 
right?’ 

‘Oh, yes, nght,’ said Pete 

‘Appy polly loggies,’ I said, careful. ‘I had something 
of a pain m the gulhver so had to sleep. I was not wakened 
when I gave orders for wakening Still, here we all are, 
ready for what the old nochy offers, yes?’ I seemed to have 
picked up that yes? from P. R. Deltoid, my Post-Correc- 
tive Adviser. Very strange. 

‘Sorry about the pam,’ said Georgie, like very concerned 
‘Usmg the gulliver too much like, maybe Giving orders 
and discipline and such, perhaps. Sure the pain is gone? 
Sure you’ll not be happier going back to the bed?’ And 
they all had a bit of a malenky grin 

‘Wait,’ I said. ‘Let’s get things nice and sparkling clear 
This sarcasm, if I may call it sudi, does not become you, 
O my httle friends. Perhaps you have been having a bit 
of a quiet govoreet behind my back, making your own 
little jokes and such-like. As I am your droog and leader, 
surely I am entitled to know what goes on, eh? Now then, 
Dim, what does that great big horsy gape of a grin 
portend?’ For Dim had his rot open in a sort of bezoomny 
soundless smeck. Georgie got in very skorry with: 

‘AH right, no more picking on Dim, brother. That’s 
part of the new way ’ 

‘New way?’ I said. ‘What’s this about a new way? 
There’s been some very large talk behind my sleeping 
back and no error Let me slooshy more.’ And I sort of 
folded my rookers and leaned comfortable to listen against 
the broken banister-rail, me bemg stiU higher than them, 
droogs as they called themselves, on the third stair. 

“No offence, Ales.,’ said Pete, ‘but we wanted to have 
thmgs more democratic like. Not like you like saymg 


51 



what to do and what not all the time But no offence.’ 
Georgie said- 

‘Offence is neither here nor elsewhere. It’s a matter of 
who has ideas What ideas has he had^’ And he kept his 
veiy bold glazzies turned full on me ‘It’s all the small 
stuff, malenky veshches hke last mght We’re growing up, 
brothers ’ 

‘More,’ I said, not moving ‘Let me slooshy more.’ 

‘Well,’ said Georgie, ‘if you must have it, have it then 
We itty round, shop-crasting and the hke, commg out with 
a pitiful rookerful of cutter each And there’s Will the 
English in the Muscleman coffee mesto saying he can 
fence anything that any malchick cares to try to crast. 
The shiny stuff, the ice,’ he said, still with these like cold 
glazzies on me ‘The big big big money is available is 
what Will the English says ’ 

‘So,’ I said, very comfortable out hut real razdraz with- 
in ‘Since when have you been consorting and comporting 
with Will the Enghsh?’ 

‘Now and again,’ said George, ‘I get around all on my 
oddy knocky. Like last Sabbath for instance I can live 
my own jeezny, droo^e, right?’ 

I didn’t really care for any of this, my brothers. ‘And 
what will you do,’ I said, ‘with the big big big deng or 
money as you so highfaluting call it? Have you not every 
veshch you need? If you need an auto you pluck it from 
the trees. If you need pretty poUy you take it. Yes? Why 
this sudden shilarny for bdng the big bloated capitalist?’ 

‘Ah,’ said Georgie, ‘you think and govoreet sometimes 
like a little child ’ Dim went huh huh huh at that. ‘To- 
night,’ said Georgie, ‘we pull a manabte crast.’ 

So my dream had told truth, then. Georgie the general 
saying what we should do and what not do, Dim with the 

52 



whip as min dless gnnmng bulldog. But I played with care, 
with great care, the greatest, saying, smiling ‘Good. Real 
horrorshow. Initiative comes to Aem as wait. I have 
taught you much, httle droogie. Now teU me what you 
have in mmd, Georgieboy.’ 

‘Oh,’ said Georgie, cuniung and crafty in his grin, ‘the 
old moloko-plus first, would you not say? Something to 
sharpen us up, boy, but you espeaally, we having the start 
of you.’ 

‘You have govoreeted my thoughts for me,’ I smiled 
away. ‘I was about to suggest the dear old Korova. Good 
good good. Lead, little Georgie.’ And I made with a like 
deep bow, smiling like bezoomny but thinking all the 
time But when we got into the street I viddied that think* 
mg is for the gloopy ones and that the oomny ones use 
hke mspiration and what Bog sends. For now it was lovely 
music that came to my aid. There was an auto ittying by 
and It had its radio on, and I could just slooshy a bar or 
so of Ludwig van (it was the Violi n Concerto, last move- 
ment), and I viddied right at once what to do. I said, m 
hke a thick deep goloss* ‘Right, Georgie, now,’ and I 
whished out my cut-throat britva George said* ‘Uh^’ 
but he was skorry enough with his nozh, the blade coming 
sloosh out of the handle, and we were on to each other. 
Old Dim said: ‘Oh, no, not right that isn’t,’ and made to 
imcoil the chain round his tally, but Pete said, putting his 
rooker firm on old Dim: ‘Leave them. It’s right like that.’ 
So then Georgie and Your Humble did the old quiet cat- 
stalk, looking for openings, knowing each other’s style a 
bit too horrorshow really, Georgie now and then going 
lurch lurch with his shining nozh but not no wse connect- 
ing. And all the time lewdies passed by and viddied all 
this but minded their own, it being perhaps a common 


53 



street-sight But then I counted odin dva tree and went 
ak ak ak with the britva, though not at litso or glazzies 
but at Georgie’s nozh-holding rooker and, my httle 
brothers, he dropped. He did. He dropped his nozh with 
a tinkle tankle on the hard winter sidewalk. I had just 
ticklewickled his fingers with my britva, and there he was 
looking at the malenky drihble of krowy that was redding 
out in the lamplight. ‘Now,’ I said, and it was me that was 
starting, because Pete had given old Dim the soviet not 
to uncoil the oozy from round his tally and Dim had taken 
it, ‘now. Dim, let’s thou and me have all this now, shall 
us^’ Dim went, ‘Aaaaaaarhgh,’ like some bolshy be- 
zoomny animal, and snaked out the chain from his waist 
real horrorshow and skorry, so you had to admire. Now 
the right style for me here was to keep low like in frog- 
dancing to protect litso and glazzies, and this I did, 
brothers, so that poor old Efim was a malenky bit surprised, 
him being accustomed to the straight face-on lash lash 
lash. Now I will say that he whished me horrible on the 
back so that it stung like bezoomny, but that pain told 
me to dig m skorry once and for all and be done with old 
Efim. So I swished with the bntva at his left noga in its 
very tight tight and I slashed two inches of doth and drew 
a malenky drop of krowy to make Efim real bezoomny. 
Then while he went hauvwww hauwww hauwww like a 
doggie I tried the same style as for Georgia, banking all 
on one move - up, cross, cut - and I felt the britva go just 
deep enough in the meat of old Efim’s vmst and he 
droj^d his snaking oozy yelping hke a little child. Then 
he tried to dnnk in all the blood from his wrist and howl 
at the same time, and there w^ too much krowy to drink 
and he went bubble bubble bubble, the red like fountain- 
ing out lovely, but not for very long I said: 


54 



‘Right, my droogies, now we should know Yes, Pete?' 

‘I never said anythmg," said Pete 1 never govoreeted one 
slovo Look, old Dim’s bleeding to death/ 

‘Never,’ I said ‘One can die but once Dim died before 
he was born. That red red krowy will soon stop ’ Because 
I had not cut into the like main cables. And I myself took 
a dean tashtook from my carman to wrap round poor old 
dying Dim’s rooker, howHng and moaning as he was, and 
the krovvy stopped like I said it would, O my brothers 
So they knew now who was master and leader, sheep, 
thought I. 

It did not take long to quieten these two wounded 
soldiers down in the snug of the Duke of New York, what 
with large brandies (bought with their own cutter, me 
having given all to* my dad) and a vape with tashtooks 
dipped in the water-jug. The old ptitsas we’d been so 
horrorshow to last night were there again, going, ‘Thanks, 
lads’ and ‘God bless you, boys’ hke they couldn’t stop, 
though we had not repeated the old sammy act with them 
But Pete said ‘What’s it to be, girls?’ and bought black 
and suds for them, him seeming to have a fair amount of 
pretty polly in his carmans, so they were on louder than 
ever with their ‘God bless and keep you all, lads’ and ‘We’d 
never split on you, boys’ and ‘The best lads breathing, 
that’s what you are’. At last I said to Georgie* 

‘Now we’re back to where we were, yes^ Just like be- 
fore and all forgotten, right?’ 

‘Right right right,’ said George. But old Dim still looked 
a bit dazed and he even said* ‘I could have got that big 
bastard, see, with my oozy, only some veck got in the way/ 
as though he’d been dratsmg not with me but with some 
other malchick. I said* 

‘Well, Georgieboy, what did you have in mind^’ 


55 


B 



‘Oh/ said CJeorgie, ‘not tonight Not this nodiy, please ’ 

‘You’re a big strong chelloveck/ 1 said, ‘like us all. We’re 
not httle children, are we, GJeorgieboy? What, then, didst 
thou in thy mind have?’ 

‘I could have chained his glazzies real horrorshow/ said 
Dim, and the old baboochkas were still on with their 
‘Thanks, lads’. 

‘It was this house, see,’ said Georgie ‘The one with the 
two lamps outside. The one with the gloopy name, like.’ 

‘What gloopy name?’ 

‘The Mansion or the Manse or some such piece of gloop 
Where this very starry pdtsa hves with her cats and all 
these very starry valuable veshches ’ 

‘Such as?’ 

‘Gold and silver and hke jewels It was Will the English 
who like said ’ 

‘I viddy,’ I said. ‘I viddy horrorshow.’ I knew where he 
meant - Oldtown, just beyond Victoria Flatblock. Well, 
the real horrorshow leader knows always when like to 
give and show generous to his like unders. ‘Very good, 
George,’ I said. ‘A good thought, and one to be followed 
Let us at once itry.’ And as we were going out the old 
baboochkas said. ‘We’ll say nothing, lads, ^en here all 
the time you have, boys.’ So I said: ‘Good old girls Back 
to buy more in ten minutes/ And so I led my three droogs 
out to my doom. 



Just past the Ehike of New York going 
east was offices and then there was the 
starry beat-up bibho and then was the 
bolshy flatblock called Victoria Flathlock 
after some victory or other, and then you 
came to the like starry type houses of the town m what 
was called Oldtown. You got some of the real horrorshow 
ancient domies here, my brothers, with starry lewdies 
livmg m them, thin old harking like colonels with sticks 
and old ptitsas who were widows and deaf starry damas 
with cats who, my brothers, had felt not the touch of any 
chelloveck m the whole of their pure like Jeczmes And 
here, true, there were starry veshches that would fetch 
their share of cutter on the tourist market - like pictures 
and jewels and other starry pre-plastic cal of that type. So 
we came nice and quiet to this domy called the Manse, 
and there were globe lights outside on iron stalks, like 
guarding the front door on each side, and there was a light 
like dim on in one of the rooms on the ground level, and 
we went to a nice patch of street dark to watch through 
the window what was ittying on. This window had iron 
bars in front of it, like the house was a prison, but we 
could viddy nice and dear what was ittying on. 

What was ittying on was that this starry ptitsa, very 
grey in the voloss and with a very liny like litso, was pour- 



57 




ing the old moloko from a milk-bottle into saucers and 
then setting these saucers dovm on the floor, so you could 
tell there were plenty of mewmg kots and koshkas writhing 
about down there. And we could viddy one or two, great 
fat scoteenas, jumping up on to the table with their rots 
open going mare mare mare And you could viddy this 
old baboochka talking back to them, govoreeting in like 
scoidy language to her pussies In the room you cquld 
viddy a lot of old pictures on the walls and starry very 
elaborate clocks, also some hke vases and ornaments that 
looked starry and dorogoy Georgie whispered 'Real 
horrorshow deng to be gotten for them, brothers Will the 
Enghsh IS real anxious.’ Pete said ‘How in?’ Now it was 
up to me, and skorry, before Georgie started telhng us 
how. ‘First veshch,’ I whispered, ‘is to try the regular way, 
the front. I will go very pohte and say that one of my 
droogs has had a like funny fainting turn on the street 
Georgie can be ready to show, when she opens, thatwise. 
Then to ask for water or to phone the doc. Then in easy.’ 
Georgie said* 

‘She may not open ’ I said- 

‘We’ll try it, yes?’ And he sort of shrugged his pletchoes, 
making with a frog’s rot. So I add to Pete and old Dim: 
‘You two droogies get either side of the door. Right?’ They 
nodded in the dark right right jright ‘So,’ I said to George, 
and I made bold straight for the front door There was a 
bellpush and I pushed, and brrrrrrr brrrrrr sounded down 
the hall inside. A like sense of slooshying followed, as 
though the ptitsa and her koshkas all had their ears back 
at the, brrrrrr brrrrrr, wondering So I pushed the old 
zvonock a malenky bit more urgent. I then bent down to 
the letter-slit and called through in a refined like goloss: 
‘Help, madam, please. My friend has just had a fuimy 

58 



turn on the street Let me phone a doctor, please ’ Then 
I could viddy a hght being put on in the hall, and then I 
could hear the old baboochka’s nogas going flip flap in flip- 
flap slippers to nearer the front door, and I got the idea, 
I don’t know why, that she had a big fat pussycat under 
each arm Then she called out in a very surprising deep 
like goloss. 

'Go away. Go away or I shoot.’ Georgie heard that and 
wanted to giggle I said, with like suffering and urgency 
in my gendeman’s goloss, 

'Oh, please help, madam. My friend’s very ill.’ 

'Go away,’ she called. T know your dirty tncks, rhaking 
me open the door and then buy things I don’t want Go 
away, I tell you.’ That was real lovely innocence, that was. 
'Go away,’ she said again, 'or I’ll set my cats on to you ’ 
A malenky bit bezoomny she was, you could tell that, 
through spending her jeezny all on her oddy knocky 
Then I looked up and I viddied that there was a sash- 
window above the front door and that it would be a lot 
more skorry to just do the old pletcho chmb and get in 
that way. Else there’d be this argument all the long nochy. 
So I said* 

'Very well, madam. If you won’t help I must take my 
suffering friend elsewhere ’ And I winked my droogies all 
away quiet, only me crying out: 'All right, old friend, you 
will surely meet some good Samaritan some place other. 
This old lady perhaps cannot be blamed for being 
suspidous with so many scoundrels and rogues of the 
night about. No, indeed not.’ Then we waited again in the 
dark and I whispered: 'Right Return to door. Me stand 
on Dim’s pletchoes Open that window and me enter, 
droogies. llien to shut up that old ptttsa and open up for 
all. No trouble ’ For I was like showing who was leader 


59 



and the chelloveck with the ideas. ‘See/ I said ‘Real 
horrorshow bit of stonework over that door, a nice hold 
for my nogas.’ They viddied all that, admiring perhaps I 
thought, and said and nodded Right right right m the 
dark. 

So back tiptoe to the door. Dim was our heavy strong 
malchick and Pete and Georgie like heaved me up on to 
Dim’s bolshy manly pletchoes. AU this time, O thanks to 
worldcasts on the gloopy TV and, more, lewdies’ night-fear 
through lack of night-police, dead lay the street. Up there 
on Dim’s pletchoes I viddied that this stonework above 
the door would take my boots lovely I kneed up, brothers, 
and there I was The window, as I had expected, was 
dosed, but I outed with my britva and cracked the glass 
of the wndow smart with the bony handle thereof. All 
the time below my droogies were hard breathing. So I put 
in my rooker through the crack and made the lower half 
of the window sail up open silver-smooth and lovely. And 
I was, like getting into the bath, in. And there were my 
sheep down below, their rots open as they looked up, O 
brothers. 

I was in bumpy darkness, with beds and cupboards and 
bolshy heavy stoolies and piles of boxes and books about. 
But I strode manful towards the door of the room I was 
in, seeing a like crack of light tmder it. The door went 
squeeeeeeeeeeak and then I was on a dusty corridor with 
other doors. All this waste, brothers, meaning all these 
rooms and but one starry sharp and her pussies, but per- 
haps the kots and koshkas had like separate bedrooms, 
living on cream and fish-heads like royal queens and 
princes I could hear the like muffled goloss of this old 
ptitsa down below sa;^g' ‘Yes yes yes, that’s k/ but she 
would be govOTceting to these mewing sidlers going 

6o 



maaaaaaah for more moloko Then I saw the stairs going 
down to the hall and I thought to myself that I would 
show these fickle and worthless droogs of mine that I was 
worth the whole three of them and more. I would do all 
on my oddy knocky I would perform the old ultra-violence 
on the starry ptitsa and on her pusspots if need be, then 
I would take fair rookerfuls of what looked like real 
polf zny stuff and go waltzmg to the front door and open 
up showering gold and silver on my waiting droogs. They 
must learn all about leadership. 

So down I ittied, slow and gentle, admiring in the stair- 
well grahzny pictures of old time - devotchkas with long 
hair and high collars, the like country with trees and 
horses, the holy bearded veck all nagoy hanging on a cross 
There was a real musty von of pussies and pussy-fish and 
starry dust in this domy, different from the fiatblocks. 
And then I was downstairs and I could viddy the light in 
this front room where she had been dolmg moloko to the 
kots and koshkas More, I could viddy these great over- 
stuffed scoteenas going in and out with their tails waving 
and hke rubbing themselves on the door-bottom On a like 
big wooden chest m the dark hall I could viddy a nice 
malenky statue that shone in the hght of the room, so I 
crasted this for my own self, it being hke of a young thin 
devotchka standing on one noga with her rookers out, 
and I could see this was made of silver So I had this 
when I Ittied into the lit-up room, saying: *Hi hi hi. At 
last we meet. Our brief govoreet through the letter-hole 
was not, shall we say, satisfactory, yes? Let us admit not, 
oh verily not, you stinking starry old sharp ’ And I like 
blinked in the light at this room and the old ptitsa in it. 
It was full of kots and koshkas all crawling to and fro over 
the carpet, with bits of fur floating in the lower air, and 

6i 



these fat scoteenas were all different shapes and colours, 
black, white, tabby, ginger, tortoise-shell, and of all ages, 
too, so that there were kittens fillying about with each 
other and there were pussies full-grown and there were real 
dribbling starry ones very bad-tempered. Their mistress, 
this old ptitsa, looked at me fierce like a man and said: 

‘How ^d you get in? Keep your distance, you villainous 
young toad, or I shall be forced to strike you.’ ^ 

I had a real horrorshow smeck at that, viddymg that 
she had in her veiny rooker a crappy wood walking-stick 
which she raised at me threatening. So, making with my 
shiny zoobies, I ittied a bit nearer to her, taking my time, 
and on the way I saw on a like sideboard a lovely little 
veshch, the loveliest malenky veshch any malchick fond 
of music like myself could ever hope to viddy with his own 
two glazaes, for it was like the gulliver and pletchoes of 
Ludwig van himself, what they call a bust, a hke stone 
veshch with stone long hair and blind glazzies and the 
big fiowy cravat. I was off for that right away, saying: 
‘Well, how lovely and all for me.’ But ittying towards it 
Avith my glazzies like full on it and my greedy rooker held 
out, I did not see the milk saucers on the floor and into 
one I went and sort of lost balance. ‘Whoops,’ I said, try- 
ing to steady, but tihis old ptitsa had come up behind me 
very sly and with great skorriness for her age and then she 
went crack crack on my gulliver with her bit of a stick. 
So I found myself on my rookers and knees trying to get 
up and saymg' “Nau^ty naughty naughty.’ And then she 
was going crack crack again, saying: ‘Wretched little 
slummy bedbug, breaking into real people’s houses.’ I 
didn’t like this crack crack eegra, so I grasped hold of one 
end of her stick as it came down again and then she lost 
hex balance and was trying to steady herself against the 

6a 



table, but tben the table-doth came off with a milk-jug 
and a milk-bottle going all drunk then scattering white 
splosh in ail directions, then she was down on the floor 
grunting, going 'Blast you, boy, you shall suffer.’ Now ail 
the cats were getting spoogy and runmng and jumping in 
a like cat-panic, and some were blaming each other, hit- 
ting out cat-tolchocks with the old lapa and ptaaaaa and 
grrrrr and kraaaaark. I got up on to my nogas, and there 
was this nasty vindictive starry forella with her wattles 
ashake and grunting as she like tried to lever herself up 
from the floor, so I gave her a malenky fair kick in the 
litso, and she didn’t hke that, crying. Waaaaah,’ and you 
could viddy her veiny mottled litso going purplewurple 
where I’d landed the old noga. 

As I stepped back from the kick I must have like trod 
on the tail of one of these dratsing creeching pusspots, 
because I slooshied a gromky yauuuuuuuuw and found 
that like fur and teeth and claws had like fastened them- 
selves round my leg, and there I was cursing away and 
trying to shake it off holding this silver malenky statue in 
one rooker and trying to climb over this old ptitsa on the 
floor to reach lovely Ludwig van in frowmng like stone. 
And then I was into another saucer brimful of creamy 
moloko and near went flying again, the whole veshch really 
a very humorous one if you could imagine it sloochatting 
to some other veck and not to Your Humble Narrator, 
And then the starry ptitsa on the floor reached over all 
the dratsing yowling pusscats and grabbed at my noga, 
still going ‘Waaaaah’ at me, and, nay balance being a bit 
gone, I went really crash this time, on to sploshing 
moloko and skriking koshkas, and the old forella started 
to fist me on the litso, both of us being on the floor, creech- 
ing: ‘Thrash him, beat him, pull out his finger-nails, the 

63 



poisonous young beetle/ addressing her pusscats only, and 
then, as if like obeying the starry old ptitsa, a couple of 
koshkas got on to me and started scratching hke be- 
zoomny. So then I got real bezoomny myself, brothers, and 
hit out at them, but this baboochka said ‘Toad, don’t 
touch my kitties,’ and hke scratched my litso. So then I 
creeched ‘You filthy old soomka,’ and upped with the httle 
malenky like silver statue and cracked her a fine fair tol- 
chock on the gulhver and that shut her up real horror- 
show and lovely 

Now as I got up from the floor among all the crarking 
kots and koshkas what should I slooshy but the shoom of 
the old pohce-auto siren in the distance, and it dawned on 
me skorry that the old forella of the pusscats had been on 
the phone to the milhcents when I thought she’d been 
govoreeting to the mewlers and mowlers, her having got 
her suspicions skorry on the boil when I’d rung the old 
zvonock pretendmg for help. So now, slooshying this fear- 
some shoom of the rozz-van, I belted for the front door 
and had a rabbiting time imdoing all the locks and chams 
and bolts and other protective veshches. Then I got it 
open, and who should be on the doorstep but old Dim, 
me just being able to viddy the other two of my so-called 
droogs beltmg off ‘Away,’ I creeched to Dim. ‘The rozzes 
are coming/ Dim said. Tou stay to meet them huh huh 
huh,’ and then I viddied that he had his oozy out, and 
tiien he upped with it and it snaked whishhhhh and he 
chained me gentle and artistic like on the glazhds, me 
just closing them up in time. Then I was howling around 
trying to viddy with this howlmg great pain, and Dm 
said: T don’t like you should do what you done, old 
droogy. Not right it wasn’t to get on to me like the way 
you done, brat.’ And then I could slooshy his bolshy 

64 



lumpy boots beating o£E, him going huh huh huh into the 
darkmans, and it was only about seven seconds after that 
I slooshied the milhcent-van draw up with a filthy great 
droppmg siren-howl, like some bezoomny ammal snuflSng 
It I was howhng too and like yawing about and I banged 
my guUiver smack on the hall-wall, my glazzies being 
tight shut and the juice astream from them, very agoniz- 
ing. So there I was like groping in the hallway as the milli- 
cents arrived. I couldn’t viddy them, of course, but I could 
slooshy and damn near smell the von of the bastards, and 
soon I could feel the bastards as they got rough and did 
the old twist-arm act, carrying me out. I could also slooshy 
one millicent goloss saying from like the room Fd come 
out of with all the kots and koshkas m it 'She’s been 
nastily knocked but she’s breathing,’ and there was loud 
mewing all the time. 

'A real pleasure this is,’ I heard another millicent goloss 
say as I was tolchocked very rough and skorry into 
the auto. ^Little Alex all to our own selves.’ I creeched 
out. 

I’m blind, Bog bust and bleed you, you grahzny 
bastards ’ 

'Language, language,’ like smecked a goloss, and then I 
got a like backhand tolchock with some ringy rooker or 
other full on the rot. I said: 

“Bog murder you, you vonny stmking hratchnies Where 
are the others? Where are my stinking traitorous droogs? 
One of my cursed grahzny hratties chained me on the 
glazzies. Get them before they get away. It was all their 
idea, brothers. They like forced me to do it I’m innocent, 
Bog butcher you ’ By this time they were all having like a 
good smeck at me with the heighth of like callousness, and 
thej^d tolchocked me into the back of the auto, but I still 

65 



kept on about these so-called droogs of mine and then I 
viddied it would be no good, because they’d all be back 
now m the snug of the Duke of New York forang black 
and suds and double Scotchmen down the unprotestmg 
gorloes of those stinking starry ptitsas and they saying: 
Thanks, lads God bless you, boys Been here all the time 
you have, lads Not been out of our sight you haven’t ’ 

All the time we were siremng off to the rozz-shop, me 
being wedged between two milhcents and bemg given the 
odd thump and malenky tolchock by these smecking 
bullies Then I found I could open up my glaz-lids a 
malenky bit and viddy like through all tears a kmd of a 
streamy city going by, all the lights hke having run into 
one another. I could viddy now through smarung glazzies 
these two smecking millicents at the back with me and 
the thm-necked driver and the fat-necked bastard next to 
him, this one having a sarky like govoreet at me, saying: 
‘Well, Alex boy, we all look forward to a pleasant evening 
together, don’t we not?’ I said: 

‘How do you know my name, you stinking vonny bully? 
May Bog blast you to hell, grahzny bratchny as you are, 
you sod.’ So they all had a smeck at that and I had my 
ooko like twisted by one of these stinking milhcents at the 
back with me. The fat-necked not-driver said: 

‘Everybody knows little Alex and his droogs. Quite a 
famous young boy our Alex has become.’ 

‘It*s those others,’ I creeched. ‘Georgie and Dim and 
Pete. No droogs of mine, the bastards.' 

‘Well,’ said the fat-neck, ‘you’ve got the evening in front 
of you to tell the whole story of the daring exploits of those 
yoimg gentlemen and how they led poor little innocent 
Alex astray.’ Then there was the shoom of another like 
police siren passing this auto but going the other way. 

66 



Is that for those bastards I said. *Are they being 
picked up by you bastards?' 

'That,' said fat-neck, ‘is an ambulance. Doubtless for 
your old lady victim, you ghastly wretched scoundrel.' 

It was all their fault,' I creeched, bhnking my smart- 
ing glazzies ‘The bastards will be peetmg away in the 
Duke of New York. Pick them up, blast you, you vonny 
sods.'^ And then there was more smecking and another 
malenky tolchock, O my brothers, on my poor smarting 
rot. And then we arrived at the stinking rozz-shop and 
they helped me get out of the auto with kicks and pulls 
and they tolchocked me up the steps and I knew I was 
going to get nothing like fair play from these stinky 
grahzny bratchnies, Bog blast them 


67 



They dragged me mto this very bright-lit 
whitewashed cantora, and it had a strong 
von that was a mixture of like sick and 
lavatones and beery rots and disinfectant, 
all coming from the barry places near by. 
You could hear some of the plenmes in tibeir cells cursing 
and singing and I fanaed I could slooshy one belting out: 

‘And I wiU go back to my darling, my darUng, 
When you, my darlmg, are gone/ 

But there were the golosses of nailhcents telling them to 
shut it and you could even slooshy the zvook of like 
somebody being tolchocked real horrorshow and going 
owwwwwwwww, and it was like the goloss of a drunken 
starry ptitsa, not a man. With me in this cantora were four 
millicents^ all having a good loud peer of chai, a big pot 
of it being on the table and they sucking and belching 
away over thdr dirty bolshy mugs. Ihey didn’t ofEer me 
any. All that they gave me, my brothers, was a crappy 
starry mirror to look into, and indeed I was not your 
handsome young Narrator any longer but a real strack of 
a sight, my rot swollen and my glazzies all red and my 
nose bumped a bit also. They all had a real horrorshow 
smeck when they viddied my like dismay, and one of them 





said ^Love’s young nightmare like/ And then a top miUi- 
cent came in with hke stars on his pletchoes to show he 
was high high high, and he viddied me and said ‘Hm/ 
So then they started I said: 

‘I won’t say one single solitary slovo unless I have my 
lawyer here I know the law, you bastards/ Of course they 
all had a good gromky smeck at that and the stellar top 
millicent said 

‘Eighty right, boys, well start oiEE by showing him that 
we know the law, too, but that knowing the law isn’t every- 
thing ’ He had a like gentleman’s goloss and spoke in a 
very weary sort of a way, and he nodded with a like droogy 
smile at one very big fat bastard. This big fat bastard took 
off his tunic and you could viddy he had a real big starry 
pot on him, then he came up to me not too skorry and I 
could get the von of the milky chai he’d been peering 
when he opened his rot in a hke very tired leery grin at 
me He was not too well shaved for a rozz and you could 
viddy like patches of dried sweat on his shirt under the 
arms, and you could get this von of like earwax from him 
as he came close. Then he clenched his stinking red rooker 
and let me have it right in the belly, which was unfair, 
and all the other millicents smecked their gullivers off at 
that, except the top one and he kept on with this weary 
like bored grin. I had to lean against the whitewashed wall 
so that all the white got on to my platties, trying to drag 
the old breath back and in great agony, and then I wanted 
to sick up the gluey pie I’d had before the start of the 
evening But I couldn’t stand that sort of veshch, sicking 
all over the floor, so I held it back. Then I saw that this 
fatty bruiseboy was turning to his millicent droogs to have 
a real horrorshow smeck at what he’d done, so I raised my 
right noga and before they could creech at him to watch 

69 



out I’d lacked him smart and lovely on the shm. And he 
creeched murder, hopping aroimd. 

But after that they all had a turn, bouncing me from 
one to the other like some very weary bloody ball, O my 
brothers, and fisting me in the yarbles and the rot and the 
belly and deahng out kicks, and then at last I had to sick 
up on the floor and, like some real bezoomny veck, I even 
said; ‘Sorry, brothers, that was not the right thing at all. 
Sorry sorry sorry.’ But they handed me starry bits of 
gazetta and made me wipe it, then they made me make 
with the sawdust. And then they said, almost like dear 
old droogs, that I was to sit down and we’d all have a quiet 
like govoreet. And then P R. Deltoid came in to have a 
viddy, his office being in the same building, lookmg very 
tired and grahzny, to say ‘So it’s happened, Alex boy, 
yes? Just as I thought it would. Dear dear dear, yes.’ Then 
he turned to the miUicents to say ‘Evening, inspector 
Evening, sergeant Evening, evening, all Well, this is the 
end of the line for me, yes Dear dear, this boy does look 
messy, doesn’t he? Just look at the state of him ’ 

‘Violence makes violence,’ said the top millicent in a 
very holy type goloss. ‘He resisted his lawful arresters.’ 

‘End of the line, yes,’ said P. R. Deltoid again. He looked 
at me with very cold glazzies like I had become a thing 
and was no more a bleeding very tired battered chelloveck. 
T suppose I’ll have to be in court tomorrow.’ 

‘It wasn’t me, brother, sir,’ I said, a malenky bit weepy. 
‘Speak up for me, sir, for I’m not so bad. I was led on by 
the treachery of the others, sir.’ 

‘Sings like a linnet,’ said the top rozz, sneery. ‘Sings the 
roof off lovely, he does that.’ 

TU speak,’ said cold P. R. Deltoid. ‘ITl be there to- 
morrow, don’t worry ’ 


70 



If you’d like to give him a bash in the chops, sir/ said 
the top millicent, ‘don’t mind us. We’ll hold him down. 
He must be another great disappointment to you.’ 

P. R. Deltoid then did something I never thought any 
man like him who was supposed to turn us baddiwads into 
real horrorshow malchicks would do, especially with all 
those rozzes around He came a bit nearer and he spat 
He spat. He spat full in my litso and then wiped his wet 
spitty rot with the back of his rooker And I wiped and 
wiped and wiped my spat-on htso with my bloody tash- 
took, saying ‘Thank you, sir, thank you very much, sir, 
that was very kind of you, sir, thank you.’ And then P R 
Deltoid walked out without another slovo. 

The millicents now got down to making this long state- 
ment for me to sign, and I thought to myself, Hell and 
blast you all, if all you bastards are on the side of the 
Good then I’m glad I belong to the other shop ‘All right,’ 
I said to them, ‘you grahzny bratchmes as you are, you 
vonny sods. Take it, take the lot. I’m not going to crawl 
around on my brooko any more, you merzky gets. Where 
do you want it taken from, you cally Tonmng animals? 
From my last corrective? Horrorshow, horrorshow, here 
It is, then.’ So I gave it to them, and I had this shorthand 
milhcent, a very quiet and scared type chelloveck, no real 
rozz at all, covering page after page after page after I gave 
them the ultra-violence, the crasting, the dratsmg, the old 
in-out in-out, the lot, right up to this night’s veshch with 
the hugatty starry ptitsa with the mewing kots and 
koshkas And I made sure my so-called droogs were in it, 
right up to the shiyah When I’d got through the lot the 
shorthand millicent looked a bit faint, poor old veck The 
top rozz said to him, in a kind type goloss: 

“Right, son, you go off and get a nice cup of chai for 

71 F 



yourself and then type all that filth and rottenness out 
with a clothes-peg on your nose, three copies. Then they 
can be brought to our handsome young friend here for 
signature And you,’ he said to me, ‘can now be shown to 
your bridal suite with running water and all conveniences. 
All right,’ m this weary goloss to two of the real tough 
rozzes, ‘take him away.’ 

So I was kicked and punched and bullied off to the^ells 
and put in with about ten or twelve other plennies, a lot 
of them drunk. There were real oozhassny ammal t3rpe 
vecks among them, one with his nose all ate away and his 
rot open like a big black hole, one that was lying on the 
floor snoring away and all like slime dribblmg all the time 
out of his rot, and one that had like done all cal in his 
pantalonies Then there were two like queer ones who both 
took a fancy to me, and one of them made a jump on to 
my back, and I had a real nasty bit of dratsing with him 
and the von on him, hke of meth and cheap scent, made 
me want to sick again, only my belly was empty now, O 
my brothers. Then the other queer one started putting his 
rookers on to me, and then there was a snarhng bit of 
dratsing between these two, both of them wanting to get 
at i^y plott. The shoom became very loud, so that a couple 
of millicents came along and cracked into these two with 
like truncheons, so that both sat quiet then, looking like 
into space, and there was the old kxovvy gomg drip drip 
drip down the litso of one of them. There were bunks in 
this cdl, but all filled. I climbed up to the top one of one 
tier of bunks, there being four in a tier, and there was a 
starry drunken veck snoring away, most probably heaved 
up there to the top by the millicents. Anyway, I heaved 
him down again, him not being all that heavy, and he 
collapsed on top of a fat drunk chelloveck on the floor, and 


^2 



both woke and started creeching and punching pathetic 
at each other. So I lay down on this vonny bed, my 
brothers, and went to very tired and exhausted and hurt 
sleep But it was not really like sleep, it was like passing 
out to another better world. And in this other better 
world, O my brothers, I was m like a big field with all 
flowers and trees, and there was a hke goat with a man's 
litSQ playing away on a hke flute And then there rose like 
the sun Ludwig van himself with thundery htso and 
cravat and wild windy voloss, and then I heard the Ninth, 
last movement, with the slovos all a bit mixed-up like they 
knew themselves they had to be mixed-up, this being a 
dream. 


Boy, thou uproarious shark of heaven. 

Slaughter of Elysium, 

Hearts on fire, aroused, enraptured, 

We will tolchock you on the rot and kick 
your grahzny vonny bum 

But the time was right, as I knew when I was being woke 
up two or ten minutes or twenty hours or days or years 
later, my watch having been taken away. There was a 
millicent like miles and miles down below and he was 
proddmg at me with a long stick with a spike on the end, 
saying* 

Wake up, son. Wake up, my beauty. Wake to real 
trouble.' I said: 

‘Why? Who? Where? What is it?' And the tune of the 
Joy ode in the Ninth was singing away real lovely and 
horrorshow withm The millicent said* 

‘Come down and find out. There's some real lovely news 
for you, my son.' So 1 scrambled down, very stiff and sore 


73 



and not like real awake, and this rozz, who had a strong 
von of cheese and onions on him, pushed me out of the 
filthy snonng cell, and then along corridors, and aU the 
time the old tune Joy Thou Glorious Spark Of Heaven was 
sparking away within Then we came to a very neat like 
cantora with typewnters and flowers on the desks, and at 
the like chief desk the top millicent was situng, looking 
very serious and fixing a hke very cold glazzy on jny 
sleepy htso I said 

‘Well well well. What makes, bratty? What ^ves, this 
fine bright middle of the nochy?’ He said 

‘I'll give you just ten seconds to wipe that stupid grin 
ofE of your face Then I want you to listen ’ 

‘Well, what^’ I said, smecking. ‘Are you not satisfied 
with beating me near to death and havmg me spat upon 
and making me confess to cnmes for hours on end and 
then shoving me among bezoomnies and vonny perverts 
in that grahzny cell? Have you some new torture for me, 
you bratchny?’ 

‘It’ll be your own torture,’ he said, serious ‘I hope to 
God it’ll torture you to madness.’ 

And then, before he told me, I knew what it was. The 
old pdtsa who had all the kots and koshkas had passed on 
to a better world in one of the aty hospitals. I’d cracked 
her a bit too hard, like. Well, well, that was everything. 
I thought of all those kots and koshkas mewing for moloko 
and getting none, not any more from their starry forella 
of a mistress. That was everything. I’d done the lot, now. 
And me still only fifteen. 


74 







What’s it going to be then, eh?’ 

I take it up now, and this is the real 
weepy and like tragic part of the story be- 
ginning, my brothers and only friends, m 
Staja (State Jail, that is) Number 84F, You 
will have httle desire to slooshy all the cally and horrible 
raskazz of the shock that sent my dad beating his bruised 
and krovvy rookers against unfair like Bog in His Heaven, 
and my mum squaring her rot for owwwww owwwww 
owwwww in her mother’s grief at her only child and son 
of her bosom like letting everybody down real horrorshow. 
Then there was the starry very grim magistrate m the 
lower court govoreeting some very hard slovos against your 
Friend and Humble Narrator, after all the cally and 
grahzny slander spat forth by P. R. Deltoid and the rozzes. 
Bog blast them. Then there was being remanded in filthy 
custody among vonny perverts and prestoopnicks. Then 
there was the tnal in the higher court with judges and a 
jury, and some very very nasty slovos indeed govoreeted 
in a very like solemn way, and then Guilty and my mum 
boohoohooing when they said Fourteen Years, O my 
brothers So here I was now, two years just to the day of 
being kicked and clanged into Staja 84F, dressed in the 
hexghth of prison fashion, which was a one-piece suit of a 
very filthy like cal colour, and the number sewn on the 


77 




groody part just above the old tick-tocker and on the back 
as well, so that going and coming I was 6655321 and not 
your little droog Alex not no longer 

‘Whafs it going to be then, eh?’ 

It had not been like edifying, indeed it had not, bemg 
in this grahzny hellhole and like human zoo for two years, 
being kicked and tolchocked by brutal bully warders and 
meeting vonny leermg like criminals, some of them real 
perverts and ready to dribble all over a luscious young 
malchick like your story-teller. And there was having to 
rabbit in the workshop at making matchboxes and itty 
round and round and round the yard for like exercise, and 
in the evenings sometimes some starry prof type veck 
would give a talk on beetles or the Milky Way or the 
Glorious Wonders of the Snowflake, and I had a good 
smeck at this last one, because it reminded me of that 
time of the tolchocking and Sheer Vandalism with that 
ded coming from the public biblio on a winter’s night 
when my droogs were still not traitors and I was hke happy 
and free. Of those droogs I had slooshied but one thmg, 
and that was one day when my pee and em came to visit 
and I was told that Georgie was dead. Yes, dead, my 
brothers. Dead as a bit of dog-cal on the road. Georgie had 
led the other two into a like very rich chelloveck^s house, 
and there they had kicked and tolchocked the owner on 
the floor, and then Georgie had started to razrez the 
cushions and curtains, and then old Dim had cracked at 
some very predous ornaments, like statues and so on, and 
this rich beat-up chelloveck had raged like real bezoomny 
and gone for them all with a very heavy iron bar. His 
being all razdraz had given him like gigantic strength, and 
Dim and Pete had got out through the window but 
Georgie had tnpped on the carpet and then bought this 

78 



terrific swinging iron bar crack and splooge on the gulhver, 
and that was the end of traitorous Georgie. The starry 
murderer had got off with Self Defence, as was really right 
and proper. Georgie bemg killed, though it was more than 
than one year after me being caught by the nulhcents, it 
all seemed right and proper and hke Fate. 

‘What’s It going to be then, eh?’ 

I^was in the Wing Chapel, it being Simday morning, 
and the prison charlie was govoreeting the Word of the 
Lord. It was my rabbit to play the starry stereo, puttmg 
on solemn music before and after and in the middle too 
when hymns were sung. I was at the back of the Wing 
Chapel (there were four altogether m Staja 84F) near 
where the warders or chassos were standing with their 
rifles and their dirty bolshy blue brutal jowls, and I could 
viddy all the plennies sittmg down slooshying the Slovo 
of the Lord m their horrible cal-coloured pnson platties, 
and a sort of filthy von rose from them, not hke real un- 
washed, not grazzy, but like a special real stinkmg von 
which you only got with the criminal types, my brothers, 
a like dusty, greasy, hopeless sort of a von And I was 
thinking that perhaps I had this von too, having become 
a real plenny myself, though still very young. So it was 
very important to me, O my brothers, to get out of this 
stinking grahzny zoo as soon as I could. Amd, as you will 
viddy if you keep reading on, it was not long before I did. 

•What’s it going to be then, eh?’ said the prison charlie 
for the third raz. ‘Is it going to be in and out and in and 
out of institutions like this, though more in than out for 
most of you, or are you gomg to attend to the Divine 
Word and realize the punishments that await the un- 
repentant sinner in the next world, as well as in this? A 
lot of blasted idiots you are, most of you, selling your 


79 



birthright for a saucer of cold porridge. The thrill of 
theft, of violence, the urge to hve easy -is it worth it 
when we have undeniable proof, yes yes, incontrovertible 
evidence that hell exists? I know, I faiow, my friends, I 
have been informed in visions that there is a place, darker 
than any prison, hotter than any flame of human fire, 
where souls of unrepentant cnmmal smners hke your- 
selves - and don’t leer at me, damn you, don’t laugh - hke 
yourselves, I say, scream in endless and intolerable agony, 
their noses choked with the smell of filth, their mouths 
crammed with burmng ordure, their skin peehng and rot- 
ting, a fireball spinning in their screaming guts. Yes, yes, 
yes, I know.’ 

At this point, brothers, a plenny somewhere or other 
near the back row let out a shoom of hp-music - ‘Prrrrxp’ 
- and then the brutal chassos were on the ]ob right away, 
rushing real skorry to what they thought was the scene of 
the shoom, then hitting out nasty and delivering tolchocks 
left and right. Then they picked out one poor trembling 
plenny, very thin and malenky and starry too, and dragged 
him off, but all the time he kept creeching- Tt wasn’t me, 
it was him, see,’ but that made no difference. He was 
tolchocked real nasty and then dragged out of the Wing 
Chapel creeching his gulliver off. 

'Now,’ said the prison charlie, ‘listen to the Word of 
the Lord.’ Then he picked up the big book and flipped 
over the pages, keeping on wetting his fingers to do this 
by licking them splurge splurge. He was a bolshy great 
burly bastard with a very red htso, but he was very fond 
of myself, me being young and also now very interested 
in the big book. It had been arranged as part of my like 
further education to read in the book and even have 
music on the chapel stereo while I was reading, O my 

8o 



brothers. And that was real horrorshow They would like 
lock me in and let me slooshy holy music by J. S. Bach 
and G. F. Handel, and I would read of these starry yahoo- 
dies tolchocking each other and then peering their Hebrew 
vmo and getting on to the bed with their wives’ like hand- 
maidens, real horrorshow. That kept me going, brothers. 
I didn’t so much kopat the later part of the book, which 
is more hke all preachy govoreeting than fighting and the 
old in-ouvBut one day the charles said to me, squeezing 
me hke tight with his bolshy beefy rooker- ‘Ah, 6655321, 
think on the divine suffering. Meditate on that, my boy ’ 
And all the time he had this rich manny von of Scotch 
on him, and then he went off to his little cantora to peet 
some more. So I read all about the scourging and the 
crowning with thorns and then the cross veshch and all 
that cal, and I viddied better that there was something in 
it. While the stereo played bits of lovely Bach I closed my 
glazzies and viddied myself helping in and even taking 
charge of the tolchocking and the naihng in, being dressed 
in a hke toga that was the heighth of Roman fashion So 
being in Staja 84F was not all that wasted, and the 
Governor himself was very pleased to hear that I had 
taken to like Religion, and that was where I had my 
hopes. 

This Sunday morning the charhe read out from the 
book about chellovecks who slooshied the slovo and 
didn’t take a blind bit bemg hke a domy built upon 
sand, and then the rain came splash and the old booma- 
boom cracked the sky and that was the end of that domy. 
But I thought that only a very dim veck would build his 
domy upon sand, and a right lot of real sneering droogs 
and nasty neighbours a veck like that would have, them 
not telling him how dim he was doing that sort of build- 

81 



mg Then the diaries creeched. ‘Right, you lot Well end 
with Hymn Number 435 in the Prisoners* Hymnal/ Then 
there was a crash and plop and a whish whish whish while 
the plennies picked up and dropped and lickturned the 
pages of their grazzy malenky hymnbooks, and the bully 
fierce warders creeched ‘Stop talking there, bastards Fm 
watching you, 920537 * Of course I had the disc ready on 
the stereo, and then I let the simple music for organ only 
come belting out with a growwwwowwwwowv^vw. Then 
the plennies started to sing real horrible 

Weak tea are we, new brewed 
But stirring make all strong. 

We eat no angeFs food. 

Our times oiE trial are long. 

They sort of howled and wept these stupid slovos with the 
charhe like whipping them on with ‘Louder, damn you, 
sing up,* and the warders creeching ‘Just you wait, 
7749222*, and ‘One on the turnip coming up for you, 
filth/ Then it was all over and the charhe said* ‘May the 
Holy Trinity keep you always and make you good, amen,* 
and the shamble out began to a nice choice bit of 
Symphony No. 2 by Adrian Schweigselber, chosen by 
your Humble Narrator, O my brothers What a lot they 
were, I thought, as I stood there by the starry chapel 
stereo, viddymg them all shuffle out going marrrrre and 
baaaaaa like animals and up»your-piping with their 
grahzny fingers at me, because it looked like I was very 
special favoured. When the last one had slouched out, his 
rookers hanging like an ape and the one warder left giving 
him a fair loud tolchock on the back of the gulliver, and 
when I had turned oflE tihie stereo, the charhe came up to 


82 



me, puffing away at a cancer, still in his starry bogman’s 
platties, all lacy and white like a devotchka’s He said: 

‘Thank you as always, little 6655321. And what news 
have you got for me today?’ The idea was, I knew, that 
this Charlie was after becommg a very great holy chello- 
veck in the world of Pnson Religion, and he wanted a real 
horrorshow testimonial from the Governor, so he would 
go and govoreet quietly to the Governor now and then 
about wha> dark plots were brewing among the plennies, 
and he would get a lot of this cal from me. A lot of it 
would be all like made up, but some of it would be true, 
like for instance the time it had come through to our 
call on the waterpipes knock knock knockiknockiknock 
knockknock that big Harriman was gomg to break. He 
was going to tolchock the warder at slop-time and get out 
in the warder’s platties Then there was going to be a big 
throwing about of the horrible pishcha we got in the 
dimng-hall, and I knew about that and told. Then the 
charlie passed it on and was complimented like by the 
Governor for his Public Spirit and Keen Ear. So this time 
I said, and this was not true: 

‘Well, sir, It has come through on the pipes that a con- 
signment of cocaine has arrived by irre^ar means and 
that a cell somewhere along Tier 5 is to be the centre 
of distribution ’ I made all that up as I went along, like I 
made up so many of these stones, but the prison charlie 
was very grateful, saying: ‘Good, good, good. I shall pass 
that on to Himself,’ this being what he called, the 
Governor. Then I said. j 

‘Sir, I have done my best, have I not?’ I always used 
my very pohte gentleman’s goloss govoreeting with those 
at the top. ‘I've tried, sir, haven’t I?’ 

‘I think,’ said the charlie, ‘that on the whole you 

83 



have, 6655321. You’ve been veiy helpful and, I consider, 
shown a genuine desire to reform. You will, if you con- 
tinue in this manner, earn your remission with no trouble 
at all.’ 

“But sir,’ I said, ‘how about this new thing they’re talk- 
ing about? How about this new like treatment that gets 
you out of prison in no time at all and makes sure that 
you never get back in again?’ 

‘Oh,’ he said, very like wary, ‘Where did yoit-hear this? 
Who’s been tellmg you these things?’ 

‘These things get around, sir,’ I said. ‘Two warders talk, 
as it might be, and somebody can’t help hearing what 
they say. And then somebody picks up a scrap of news- 
paper in the workshops and the newspaper says aU about 
it. How about you putting me in for this thmg, sir, if I 
may make so bold as to make the suggestion?’ 

You could viddy him thinking about that while he 
puffed away at his cancer, wondering how much to say 
to me about what he knew about this veshch I’d men- 
tioned. Then he said; ‘I take it you’re referring to Ludo- 
vico’s Technique.’ He was still very wary 

'I don’t know what it’s called, sir,’ I said. ‘All I know is 
that it gets you out qiuckly and makes, sure that you don’t 
get in again,’ 

‘That IS so,’ he said, his eyebrows like all beetling while 
he looked down at me. ‘That is quite so, 665532 1 Of course, 
it’s only in the experimental stage at the moment. It’s very 
simple but very drastic.' 

‘But it’s being used here, isn’t it, sir?’ I said, "Ihose new 
like white buildings by the South Wall, sir. We’ve watched 
those being built, sir, when we’ve been doing our exerase.’ 

‘It’s not been used yet,’ he said, ‘not in this prison, 
6655321. Himself has grave doubts about it. I must con- 

84 



fess I share those doubts. The question is whether such a 
technique can really make a man good Goodness comes 
from within, 66553^1 Goodness is something chosen. 
When a man cannot choose he ceases to be a man * He 
would have gone on with a lot more of this cal, but we 
could slooshy the next lot of plennies marching clank 
clank down the iron stairs to come for their bit of 
Religion. He said. ‘WeT have a httle chat about this 
some otlw time Now you’d better start the voluntary.’ 
So I went over to the starry stereo and put on J S Bach’s 
Wachet Auf Choral Prelude and in these grahzny vonny 
bastard criminals and perverts came shambling like a lot 
of broke-down apes, the warders or chassos like barking at 
them and lashing them. And soon the prison charlie was 
asking them ‘What’s it going to be then, eh?’ And that’s 
where you came in 

We had four of these lomticks of like Prison Religion 
that morning, but the charles said no more to me about 
this Ludovico’s Technique, whatever it was, O my brothers 
When I’d finished my rabbit with the stereo he just 
govoreeted a few slovos of thanks and then I was privo- 
deeted back to the cell on Tier 6 which was my very vonny 
and crammed home. The chasso was not really too bad of 
a veck and he did not tolchock or kick me in when he’d 
opened up, he just said: ‘Here we are, sonny, back to the 
old waterhole ’ And there I was with my new type droogs, 
all very criminal but, Bog be praised, not given to per- 
versions of the body. There was Zophar on his bunk, a 
very thin and brown veck who went on and on and on in 
his like cancery goloss, so that nobody bothered to slooshy. 
What he was saying now like to nobody was ‘And at 
that time you couldn’t get hold of a poggy’ (whatever that 
was, brothers), ‘not if you was to hand over ten million 

85 



archibalds, so what do I do eh, I goes down to Turkey’s 
and says Fve got this sproog on that raorrow, see, and 
what can he do?’ It was all this very old-time real criminal’s 
slang he spoke Also there was Wall, who had only one 
glazzy, and he was tearing bits of his toe-nails ofE in 
honour of Sunday. Also there was Big Jew, a very fat 
sweaty veck lying flat on his bunk hke dead. In addition 
there were Jojohn and The Doctor Jojohn was very mean 
and keen and wiry and had specialized m Wke Sexual 
Assault, and The Doctor had pretended to be able to cure 
syph and gon and gleet but he had only injected water, 
also he had killed off two devotchkas instead, like he had 
promised, of getting rid of their unwanted loads for them. 
They were a terrible grahzny lot really, and I didn’t enjoy 
being with them, O my brothers, any more than you do 
now, but it won’t be for much longer. 

Now what I want you to know is that this cell was in- 
tended for only three when it was built, but there were 
six of us there, all jammed together sweaty and tight And 
that was the state of all the cells m aU the prisons in 
those days, brothers, and a dirty caliy disgrace it was, 
there not being decent room for a chelloveck to stretch 
his limbs. And you will hardly believe what I say now, 
which is that on this Sunday they brosatted in another 
plenny. Yes, we had had our horrible pishcha of dumplings 
and vonny stew and were smoking a quiet cancer each on 
our bunks when this veck was thrown into our midst He 
was a chinny starry veck and it was him who started 
creeching complaints before we even had a chance to viddy 
the position. He tried to like shake the bars, creeching: T 
demand my sodding rights, this one’s fuU-up, it’s a bleed- 
ing imposidon, that’s what it is.’ But one of the chassos 
came back to say that he had to make the best of it and 


86 



share a bunk with whoever would let him, otherwise it 
would have to be the floor ‘And/ said the warder, ‘it's 
going to get worse, not better* A right dirty crimmal world 
you lot are trying to build/ 


87 



Well, it was the lettmg-in oS^^tdiis new 
chelloveck that was really the start of my 
getting out of the old Staja, for he was 
such a nasty quarrelsome type of plenny, 
with a very dirty mind and filthy inten- 
tions, that trouble nachinatted that very same day. He was 
also very boastful and started to make with a very sneery 
litso at us all and a loud proud goloss. He made out that 
he was the only real horrorshow prestoopnick in the T/^hole 
zoo, going on that he'd done this and done the other and 
killed ten rozzes with one ciack of his rooker and all that 
cal. But nobody was very impressed, O my brothers. So 
then he started on me, me being the youngest there, try- 
ing to say that as the youngest I ought to be the one to 
zasnoot on the floor and not him But all the others 
were for me, creeching: Xeave him alone, you grahzny 
bratchny,' and then he began the old whine about how 
nobody loved him. So that same nochy I woke up to find 
this horrible plenny actually lying with me on my bunk, 
which was on the bottom of the three-tier and also very 
narrow, and he was govoreetmg dirty like love-slovos and 
stroke stroke stroking away. So then I got real bezoomny 
and lashed out, though I could not viddy all that horror- 
show, there being only this malenky little red light out-’ 
side on the landing. But I knew it was this one, the vonny 



88 




bastard, and then when the trouble really got xmdcr way 
and the hghts were turned on I could viddy his horrible 
litso with all krowy dnpping from his rot where Fd hit 
out with my clawing rooker 
What sloochatted then, of course, was that my cell- 
mates woke up and started to join in, tolchocking a bit 
wild in the near-dark, and the shoom seemed to wake up 
thejivhole tier, so that you could slooshy a lot of creech- 
ing andj^anging about with tm mugs on the wall, as 
though all the plennies in all the cells thought a big break 
was about to commence, O my brothers. So then the hghts 
came on and the chassos came along in their shirts and 
trousers and caps, waving big sticks. We could viddy each 
other’s flushed litsos and the shaking of fisty rookers, and 
there was a lot of creeching and cursing. Then I put in 
my complaint and every chasso said it was probably Your 
Humble Narrator, brothers, that started it aU anyway, me 
havmg no mark of a scratch on me but this horrible 
plenny dripping red red krovvy from the rot where Fd 
got him with my clawing rooker That made me real 
bezoomny. I said I would not sleep another nochy in that 
cell if the Prison Authorities were going to allow horrible 
vonny stinking perverted prestoopnicks to leap on my 
plott when I was in no position to defend myself, being 
asleep. “Wait till the morning,’ they said ‘Is it a private 
room with hath and television that your honour requires? 
Well, all that will be seen to in the morning. But for the 
present, little droog, get your bleeding gulhver down on 
your straw-filled podooshka and let’s have no more trouble 
from anyone. Right right right?’ Then off they went with 
stem warnings for all, then soon after the lights went out, 
and then I said I would sit up all the rest of the nochy, 
saying first to this horrible prostoopnick: ‘Go on, get on 

89 



my bunk if you wish it I fancy it no longer You have 
made it filthy and cally with your hornble vonny plott 
lying on it already’ But then the others joined in. Big 
Jew said, still sweating from the bit of a bitva we’d had 
m the dark 

‘Not having that we’re not, brotherth. Don’t give in to 
the thquirt.’ So this new one said 

‘Crash your dermott, yid,’ meanmg to shut up, bijt it 
was very insulting So then Big Jew got ready^iBi launch 
a tolchock. The Doctor said: 

‘Come on, gentlemen, we don’t want any trouble, do 
we?’ in his very high-class goloss, but this new prestoop- 
mck was really asking for it You could viddy that he 
thought he was a very big bolshy veck and it was beneath 
his dignity to be sharmg a cell with six and having to 
sleep on the floor till I made this gesture at him In his 
sneery way he tned to take off The Doctor, saying: 

‘Owwww, yew wahnt noo moor trabble, is that it, Archi- 
balls?’ So Jojohn, mean and keen and wiry, said. 

‘If we can’t have sleep let’s have some education. Our 
new friend here had better be taught a lesson.’ Although 
he like specialized in Sexual Assault he had a nice way of 
govoreetiqg, quiet and like precise. So the new plenny 
sneered: 

‘Kish and kosh and koosh, you little terror.’ So then it 
all really started, but in a queer like gentle way, vrith 
nobody raising his goloss much The new plenny creedbed 
a malenky bit at first, but then Wall fisted his rot while 
Big Jew held him up against the bars so that he could be 
viddied in the malenky red light from the landing, and 
he just went oh oh oh He was not a very strong type of 
veck, bemg very feeble in his trying to tolchock back, and 
I suppose he made up for this by bring shoomny in the 

goloss and very boastful Anyway, seeing the old krovvy 
flow red in the red hght, I felt the old joy like rising up 
in my keeshkas and I said: 

‘Leave him to me, go on, let me have him now, brothers.’ 
So Big Jew said- 

‘Yeth, yeth, boyth, that’th fair. Thlosh him then, 
Alekth.’ So they all stood around while I cracked at this 
preetoopmck in the near dark I fisted him all over, 
dancing^about with my boots on though unlaced, and 
then I topped him and he went crash crash on to the 
floor. I gave him one real horrorshow kick on the gulhver 
and he went ohhhhh, then he sort of snorted off to like 
sleep, and The Doctor said- 

‘Very well, I think that will be enough of a lesson,’ 
squinting to viddy this downed and beaten-up veck on the 
floor. ‘Let him dream perhaps about being a better boy in 
the future.’ So we all chmbed back into our bunks, bemg 
very nred now. What I dreamt of, O my brothers, was of 
being in some very big orchestra, hundreds and himdreds 
strong, and the conductor was a like mixture of Ludwig 
van and G F Handel, looking very deaf and blind and 
weary of the world I was with the wind instruments, but 
what I was playing was hke a white pinky bassoon made 
of flesh and growing out of my plott, right in the middle 
of my belly, and when I blew into it I had to smeck ha 
ha ha very loud because it like tickled, and then Ludwig 
van G. F. got very razdraz and bezoomny. Then he came 
right up to my htso and creeched loud in my ooko, and 
then I woke up like sweating. Of course, what the loud 
shoom really was was the prison buzzer going brrrrr 
brrrrr brrrrr. It was winta: morning and my glazzies were 
all cally with sleepglue, and , when I opened up they were 
very sore in the electric light that had been switched on 



all over the zoo Then I looked down and viddied this new 
prestoopnick lying on the floor, very bloody and bruisy 
and still out out out Then I remembered about last mght 
and that made me smeck a bit. 

But when I got off the bunk and moved him with my 
bare noga, there was a feel of like stiff coldness, so I went 
over to The Doctor’s bunk and shook him, him always 
bemg very slow at waking up m the morning But he 'was 
off his bunk skorry enough this time, and sa^ere the 
others, except for Wall who slept like dead meat. 'Very 
unfortunate,’ The Doctor said. ‘A heart attack, that’s what 
it must have been.’ Then he said, lookmg round at us all- 
‘You really shouldn’t have gone for him like that. It was 
most ill-advised really.’ Jojohn said 

‘Come come, doc, you weren’t all that backward your- 
self in givmg him a sly bit of fist ’ Then Big Jew turned 
on me, saying 

‘Alekth, you were too impetuouth. That latht kick wath 
a very very nathty one.’ I began to get razdraz about this 
and said: 

‘Who started it, eh? I only got in at the end, didn’t I?’ 
I pointed at Jo]ohn and said: Tt was your idea’ WaU 
snored a bit loud, so I said: ‘Wake that vonny bratchny 
up. It was him that kept on at his rot while Big Jew here 
had him up against the bars ’ The Doctor said: 

‘Nobody will deny having a gentle httle hit at the man, 
to teach him a lesson so to speak, but it’s apparent that 
you, my dear boy, with the forcefulness and, shall I say, 
heedlessness of youth, dealt him the coo de grass. It’s a 
great pity.’ 

‘Traitors,’ I said. ‘Traitors and liars,’ because I could 
viddy it was all like before, two years before, when my so- 
caUed droogs had left me to the brutal rookers of the 


93 



imllicents There was no trust anywhere in the world, O 
my brothers, the way I could see it And Jojohn went and 
woke up Wall, and Wall was only too ready to swear that 
It was Your Humble Narrator that had done the real 
dirty tolchocking and brutahty. When the chassos came 
along, and then the Chief Chasso, and then the Governor 
him self, all these cell-droogs of mine were very shoomny 
wit^ tales of what I’d done to oobivat this worthless 
pervert^whose krovvy<overed plott lay sacklike on the 
floor. 

'Hiat was a very queer day, O my brothers. The dead 
plott was carried off, and then everybody m the whole 
prison had to stay locked up till further orders, and there 
was no pishcha given out, not even a mug of hot chai. We 
just all sat there, and the warders or chassos sort of strode 
up and dovra the tier, now and then creeching ‘Shut it’ 
or ‘Close that hole’ whenever they slooshied even a 
whisper from any of the cells Then about eleven o’clock 
in the morning there was a sort of like stiffemng and 
excitement and like the von of fear spreading from out- 
side the cell, and then we could viddy the Governor and 
the Chief Chasso and some very bolshy important-looking 
chellovecks walking by real skorry, govoreetmg like be- 
zoomny. They seemed to walk right to the end of the 
tier, then they could be slooshied walking back again, more 
slow this time, and you could slooshy the Governor, a 
very sweaty fetty fair-haired veck, saying slovos like ‘But, 
sir — ’ and ‘Well, what can be done, sir?’ and so on. Then 
the whole lot stopped at our cell and the Chief Chasso 
opened up. You could viddy who was the real important 
veck light away, very tall and with blue glazzies and with 
real horrorshow platties on him, the most lovely suit, 
brothers, I had ever viddied, absolutely in the heighth of 


93 



fashion He just sort of looked right through us poor 
plenmes, saying, in a very beautiful real educated goloss* 
‘The Government cannot be concerned any longer with 
outmoded penological theories Cram cnminals together 
and see what happens. You get concentrated criminality, 
crime m the naidst of pumshment. Soon we may be neei 
ing all our prison space for pohtical ofiEenders’ I didn’t 
pony this at all, brothers, but after all he was not govojgpet- 
mg to me. Then he said ‘Common criminals hke^shis un- 
savoury crowd’ - (that meant me, brothers, as well as the 
others, who were real prestoopnicks and treacherous with 
it) - ‘can best be dealt with on a purely curative basis. Kill 
the criminal reflex, that’s all. Full implementation in a 
year’s time Punishment means nothing to them, you can 
see that. They enjoy their so-called punishment. They start 
murdermg each other.’ And he turned his stem blue 
glazzies on me. So I said, bold: 

‘With respect, sir, I object very strongly to what you said 
then. I am not a common criminal, sir, and I am not un- 
savoury. The others may be unsavoury but I am not.’ The 
Chief Chasso went all pufple and creechcd' 

‘You shut your bleeding hole, you. Don’t you know who 
this is?’ 

‘All light, all right,’ said this big veck. Then he turned 
to the Governor and said- ‘You can use him as a trail- 
blazer. He’s young, bold, vicious Brodsky will deal with 
him tomorrow and you can sit in and watch Brodsky. It 
works all right, don’t worry about that. This vicious young 
hoodlum will be transformed out of all recognition.’ 

And those hard slovos, brothers, were like the beginning 
of my freedom. 


94 



That very same evening I was dragged 
down nice and gentle by brutal tolchock- 
ing chassos to viddy the Governor in his 
holy of holies holy ofl 5 ce. The Governor 
looked very weary at me and said: 1 don't 
suppose you know who that was this morning, do you, 
6655321?’ And without waiting for me to say no he said 
That was no less a personage than the Minister of the 
Inteiior, the new Minister of the Interior and what they 
call a very new broom. Well, these new ridiculous ideas 
have come at last and orders are orders, though I may say 
to you in confidence that I do not approve. I most 
emphatically do not approve. An eye for an eye, I say. If 
someone hits you you hit back, do you not? Why then 
should not the State, very severely hit by you brutal hooli- 
gans, not hit back also? But the new view is to say no. The 
new view is that we turn the bad into the good. All of 
which seems to me grossly unjust. Hm?’ So I said, trying 
to be like respectful and accommodating: 

"Sir/ And then the Chief Chasso, who was standing all 
red and burly behind the Governor’s chair, creeched: 
"Shut your filthy hole, you scum/ 

"All right, all right/ said the like tired and fagged-out 
Governor. "You, 6655321, are to be reformed. Tomorrow 
you go to this man Brodsky. It is believed that you will be 



95 




able to leave State Custody in a little over a fortnight In 
a little over a fortnight you will be out again m the big 
free world, no longer a number. I suppose,’ and he snorted 
a bit here, ‘that prospect pleases you’’ I said nothing so 
the Chief Chasso creeched 

‘Answer, you filthy young swine, when the Governor 
asks you a question.’ So I said 

‘Oh, yes, sir Thank you very much, sir. I’ve done„my 
best here, really I have. I’m very grateful to all concerned ’ 

‘Don’t be,’ like sighed the Governor. ‘This is not a re- 
ward. This is far from being a reward Now, there is a 
foim here to be signed. It says that you are willing to 
have the residue of your sentence commuted to submission 
to what is called here, ridiculous expression. Reclamation 
Treatment. Will you sign?’ 

‘Most certamly I vidll sign,’ I said, ‘sir And very many 
thanks ’ So I was ^ven an ink-pencil and I signed my name 
mce and flowy. The Governor said 

‘Right. That’s the lot, I think.’ The Chief Chasso said: 

‘The Prison Chaplain would like a word with him, sir.’ 
So I was marched out and off down the corridor towards 
the Wing Chapel, tolchocked on the back and the gulhver 
all the way by one of the chassos, but in a very like yawny 
and bored manner. And I was marched across the Wing 
Chapel to the little cantora of the Charles and then made 
to go in. The charles was sitting at his desk, smeUmg loud 
and clear of a fine manny von of expensive cancers and 
Scotch. He said: 

‘Ah, little 6655321, be seated ’ And to the chassos. ‘Wait 
outside, eh?’ Which they did. Then he spoke in a very 
hke earnest way to me, saymg: ‘One thing I want you to 
understand, boy, is that this is nothing to do with me 
Were it expedient, I would protest about it, but it is not 

96 



expedient. There is the question of my own career, there 
IS the question of the weakness of my own voice when set 
against the shout of certain more powerful elements m the 
pohty Do I make myself clear?’ He didn’t, brothers, but 
I nodded that he did. ‘Very hard ethical questions are 
involved,’ he went on. ‘You are to be made into a good 
boy, 6655321. Never agam will you have the desire to 
commit acts of violence or to offend m any way whatsoever 
against The State’s Peace. I hope you take all that m. I 
hope you are absolutely clear m your own mind about 
that.’ I said. 

‘Oh, It will be nice to be good, sir.’ But I had a 
real horrorshow smeck at that mside, brothers. He 
said" 

‘It may not be mce to be good, httle 6655321. It may be 
horrible to be good. And when I say that to you I realize 
how self-contradictory that sounds. I know I shall have 
many sleepless nights about this. What does God want? 
Does God want goodness or the choice of goodness? Is a 
man who chooses the bad perhaps m some way better than 
a man who has the good imposed upon him? Deep and 
hard questions, little 6655321. But all I want to say to you 
now is this: if at any time in the future you look back to 
these times and remember me, the lowest and humblest of 
all God’s servitors, do not, I pray, think evil of me in your 
heart, thinking me in any way involved in what is now 
about to happen to you. And now, talking of praying, I 
realize sadly that there will be htde point m praying for 
you. You are passmg now to a region where you will be 
beyond the reach of the power of prayer. A temble ternble 
thing to consider. And yet, in a sense, in choosing to be 
deprived of the ability to make an ethical choice, you have 
in a sense really dhtosen the ^od. So I shall like to think. 


97 



So, God help us all, 6655321, I shall like to think' And 
then he began to cry. But I didn't really take much notice 
of that, brothers, only having a bit of a quiet smeck inside, 
because you could viddy that he had been peering away 
at the old whisky, and now he took a bottle from a cup- 
board m his desk and started to pour himself a real horror- 
show bolshy slog into a very greasy and grahzny glass He 
downed it and then said: ‘All may be well, who knows ^ 
God works in a mysterious way ' Then he begafi to sing 
away at a hymn in a real loud rich goloss. Then the door 
opened and the chassos came in to tolchock me back to 
my vonny cell, but the old Charles still went on singing 
this hymn. 

Well, the next morning I had to say goodbye to the 
old Staja, and I felt a malenky bit sad as you always will 
when you have to leave a place you've hke got used to But 
I didn't go very far, O my brothers. I was punched and 
kicked along to the new white building just beyond the 
yard where we used to do our bit of exercise. This was a 
very new building and it had a new cold like sizy smell 
which gave you a bit of the shivers. I stood there m the 
horrible bolshy bare hall and I got new vons, sniffing away 
there with my like very sensitive morder or sniffer These 
were like hospital vons, and the chelloveck the chassos 
handed me over to had a white coat on, as he might be a 
hospital man. He signed for me, and one of the brutal 
chassos who had brought me said. ‘You watch this one, 
sir. A right brutal bastard he has been and will be again, 
in spite of all his sucking up to the Prison Chaplain and 
reading the Bible/ But this new chelloveck had real horror- 
show blue glazzies which like smiled when he govoreeted. 
He said: 

‘Oh, we don't anticipate any trouble. We're going to be 

98 



friends, aren’t we^’ And he smiled with his glazzies and 
his fine big rot which was full of shining white zoobies 
and I sort of took to this veck right away. Anyway, he 
passed me on to a like lesser veck in a white coat, and this 
one was very nice too, and I was led off to a very nice white 
clean bedroom with curtains and a bedside lamp, and just 
the one bed in it, all for Your Humble Narrator So I had 
a real horrorshow inner smeck at that, thinking I was 
really a<^ery lucky yoimg malchickiwick. I was told to take 
off my horrible prison platties and I was given a really 
beautiful set of pyjamas, O my brothers, m plain green, 
the heighth of bedwear fashion. And I was given a nice 
%varm dressing-gown too and lovely toofles to put my bare 
nogas in, and I thought 'Well, Alex boy, httle 6655321 as 
was, you have copped it lucky and no mistake. You are 
really going to enjoy it here ’ 

After I had been given a nice chasha of real horrorshow 
coffee and some old gazettas and mags to look at while 
peeting it, this first veck m white came in, the one who had 
like signed for me, and he said 'Aha, there you are,’ a silly 
sort of a veshch to say but it didn’t sound silly, this veck 
being so like nice. ‘My name,’ he said, ‘is Dr Branom. 
I’m Dr Brodsky’s assistant. With your permission, I’ll just 
give you the usual brief overall examination/ And he took 
the old stetho out of his right carman. 'We must make 
sure you’re quite fit, mustn’t we^ Yes indeed, we must/ 
So while I lay there with my pyjama top off and he did 
this, that and the other, I said: 

'What exacdy is it, sir, that you’re going to do?’ 

‘Oh,’ said Dr Branom, his cold stetho going all down 
my back, 'it’s quite simple, really. We just show you some 
films.’ 

Tilms?’ I said, I could hardly believe my ookos, brothers, 


99 



as you may well understand ‘You mean,’ I said, ‘it will 
be just like going to the pictures?’ 

‘’They’ll be speaal films,’ said this Dr Branom. ‘Very 
speaal films. You’ll be having the first session this after- 
noon. Yes,’ he said, getting up from bending over me, ‘you 
seem to be qmte a fit young boy. A bit under-nourished, 
perhaps. 'That will be the fault of the prison food. Put 
your pyjama top back on. After every meal,’ he said, sit- 
ting on the edge of the bed, ‘we shall be givmg yqn a shot 
in tibe arm. 'That should help.’ I felt really grateful to this 
very nice Dr Branom. I said 

‘Vitamins, sir, will it be?’ 

‘Something like that,’ he said, smiling real horrorshow 
and friendly. ‘Just a jab in the arm after every meal.’ Then 
he went out. I lay on the bed thinkmg this was like real 
heaven, and I read some of the mags thejr’d given me- 
Worldsport, Sinny (this bemg a fidm mag) and Goal, Then 
I lay back on the bed and shut my glazzies and thought 
how nice it was going to be out there again, Alex with 
perhaps a mce easy job during the day, me being now too 
old for the old skoUiwoU, and then perhaps getting a new 
like gang together for the nochy, and the first rabbit would 
be to get old I&m and Pete, if they had not been got 
already by the millicents. This time I would be very care- 
ful not to get loveted. They were givmg another like 
chance, me having done murder and aU, and it would not 
be like fair to get loveted again, after going to all this 
trouble to show me films that were going to make me a 
real good malchick- I had a real horrorshow smeck at 
everybody’s like innocence, and I was smecking my gulliver 
ofiE when they brought m my lunch on a tray The vedt 
who brought it was the one who’d led me to this malenky 
bedroom when I came into the mesto, and he sdd* 


lOO 



It's nice to know somebody's happy' It was really a 
very nice appeuzing bit of pishcha they'd laid out on the 
tray - two or three lomticks of like hot roastbeef with 
mashed kartoffel and vedge, then there was also ice-cream 
and a mce hot chasha of chai. And there was even a cancer 
to smoke and a matchbox with one match m. So this 
looked like it was the life, O my brothers. Then, about 
half^an hour after while I was lying a bit sleepy on the 
bed, a woman nurse came in, a real nice young devotchka 
with real horrorshow groodies (I had not seen such for two 
years) and she had a tray and a hypodermic. I said: 

‘Ah, the old vitamins, eh?' And I clickclicked at her but 
she took no notice All she did was to slam the needle into 
my left aim, and then swishhhh in went the vitamin stufE 
Then she went out again, clack dack on her high-heeled 
nogas. Then the white-coated veck who was like a male 
nurse came in with a wheelchair. I was a malenky bit 
surprised to viddy that, I said: 

‘What giveth then, brother? I can walk, surely, to 
wherever we have to itty to ' But he said: 

‘Best I push you there.' And indeed, O my brothers, 
when I got off the bed I found myself a malenky bit weak. 
It was the under-nourishment hke Dr Branom had said, 
all that horrible prison pishcha. But the vitamins in the 
after-meal injection would put me right No doubt at all 
about that, I thought. 



Where I was wheeled to, brothers, was hke 
no sinny I had ever viddied before. True 
enough, one wall was all covered with 
silver screen, and direct opposite was a wall 
with square holes in for the projector to 
project through, and there were stereo speakers stuck all 
over the mesto But against the right-hand one of the other 
walls was a bank of all hke httle meters, and in the middle 
of the floor facmg the screen was like a dentist’s chair with 
all lengths of wire runmng from it, and I had to hke crawl 
from the wheelchair to this, being given some help by 
another hke male nurse veck in a white coat. Then I 
noticed that underneath the projection holes was hke aU 
frosted glass and I thought I viddied shadows of like people 
moving behind it and I thought I slooshied somebody 
cough kashl kashl kashl. But then all I could like notice 
was how weak I seemed to be, and I put that down to 
changing over from prison pishcha to this new rich 
pishcha and the vitamins injected into me. ‘Right,’ said 
the wheelchair-wheeling veck, ‘now I’ll leave you. The 
show will commence as soon as Dr Brodsky arrives. Hope 
you enjoy it ’ To be truthful, brothers, I did not really feel 
that I wanted to viddy any film-show this afternoon I was 
just not m the mood. I would have liked much better to 



loa 




have a nice quiet spachka on the bed, nice and quiet and 
all on my oddy knocky I felt very limp. 

What happened now was that one white-coated veck 
strapped my gulliver to a hke head-rest, singing to him- 
self all the time some vonny cally pop-song. ‘What's this 
for?’ I said And this veck rephed, interrupting his hke 
song an instant, that it was to keep my gulhver still and 
make me look at the screen. ‘But,’ I said, ‘I want to look 

•«L ' 

at the screen. IVe been brought here to viddy films and 
viddy films I shall/ And then the other white-coat veck 
(there were three altogether, one of them a devotchka who 
was like sitting at the bank of meters and twiddling with 
knobs) had a bit of a smeck at that He said. 

‘You never know. Oh, you never know. Trust us, friend 
It’s better this way.’ And then I found they were strapping 
my rookers to the chair-arms and my nogas were like stuck 
to a foot-rest. It seemed a bit bezoomny to me but I let 
them get on with what they wanted to get on with. If I 
was to be a free young malchick again in a fortnight’s time 
I would put up with much in the meantime, O my 
brothers. One veshch I did not like, though, was when they 
put like clips on the skin of my forehead, so that my top 
glaz-lids were pulled up and up and up and I could not 
shut my glazzies no matter how I tried, I tried to smeck 
and said: ‘This must be a real horrorshow film if you’re so 
keen on my viddymg it/ And one of the white-coat vecks 
said, smecking: 

Tlorrorshow is right, friend. A real show of horrors.’ 
iJien I had like a cap stuck on my gulliver and I could 
viddy all wires running away from it, and they stuck a 
like suction pad on my belly and one on the old tick- 
tocker, and I could Just about viddy wires running away 
from those. Then there w^ the shoom of a door opening 


103 


H 



and you could tell some very important cheUoveck was 
coming m by the way the white-coated imder-vecks went 
all stiff. And then I viddied this Dr Brodsky. He was a 
malenky veck, very fat, with all curly hair curlmg all over 
his gulliver, and on his spuddy nose he had very thick 
ochkies. I could ]ust viddy that he had a real horrorshow 
suit on, absolutely the heighth of fashion, and he had a 
hke very dehcate and subtle von of operating-di|atres 
coming from him. With him was Dr Branom, all-smilmg 
hke as though to ^ve me confidence. ‘Everything ready?’ 
said Dr Brodsky in a very breathy goloss. Then I could 
slooshy voices saying Right right right from like a distance, 
then nearer to, then there was a quiet hke humming shoom 
as though thmgs had been switched on. And then the 
hghts went out and there was Your Humble Narrator And 
Friend sitting alone in the dark, all on his fnghtened oddy 
knocky, not able to move nor shut his glazzies nor any- 
thing. And then, O my brothers, the film-show started off 
with some very gromky atmosphere music coming from 
the speakers, very fierce and full of discord. And then on 
the screen the picture came on, but there was no title and 
no credits. What came on was a street, as it might have 
been any street in any town, and it was a real dark nochy 
and the lamps were lit It was a very good like professional 
piece of siimy, and there were none of these flickers and 
blobs you get, say, when you viddy one of these dirty films 
in somebody’s house in a back street. All the time the 
music bumped out, very like sinister. And then you could 
viddy an old man coming down the street, very starry, 
and then there leaped out on this starry veck two mal- 
chicks dressed in the heighth of fashion, as it was at this 
time (still thin trousers but no like cravat any more, more 
of a real tie), and then they started to filly with him. You 


104 



could slooshy his screams and moans, very realistic, and 
you could even get the like heavy breathing and panting 
of the two tolchocking malchicks They made a real pud- 
ding out of this starry veck, going crack crack crack at him 
with their fisty rookcrs, tearmg his plataes ofE and then 
finishing up by bootmg his nagoy plott (this lay all krowy- 
red in the grahzny mud of the gutter) and then running 
off very skorry. Then there was the close-up guUiver of 
this Beafen-up starry veck, and the krovvy flowed beautiful 
red. It’s funny how the colours of the like real world only 
seem really real when you viddy them on the screen 
Now all the time I was watching this I was beginning 
to get very aware of a like not feeling all that well, and 
this I put down to the under-nourishment and my stomach 
not qmte ready for the nch pishcha and vitamins I was 
gettmg here But I tried to forget this, concentrating on 
the next film which came on at once, my brothers, with- 
out any break at all This time the film hke jumped right 
away on a young devotchka who was being given the old 
in-out by first one malchick then another then another 
then another, she creeching away very gromky through 
the speakers and like very pathetic and tragic music going 
on at the same time. Ttds was real, very real, though if 
you thought about it properly you couldn’t imagine 
lewdies actually agreeing to having all this done to them 
in a film, and if these films were made by the Good or the 
State you couldn’t imagme them being allowed to take 
these fi lms without like interfering with what was going 
on. So it must have been very clever what they call cutting 
or editing or some such veshch. For it was very real. And 
when it came to the sixth or seventh malchick leermg and 
smecking and then going mto it and the devotchka creech- 
ing on the sound-track like bezoomny, then I began to fed 


105 



sick I had like pains all over and felt I could sick up and 
at the same time not sick up, and I began to feel like in 
distress, O my brothers, being fixed rigid too on this chair 
When this bit of film was over I could slooshy the goloss 
of this Dr Brodsky from over by the switchboard saying' 
‘Reaction about twelve point five? Promismg, promismg ’ 
Then we shot straight into another lomtick of film, and 
this time it was of just a human htso, a very iikejpale 
human face held still and having different nasty veshches 
done to it. I was sweating a malenky bit with the pain in 
my guts and a hornble thirst and my guUiver gomg throb 
throb throb, and it seemed to me that if I could not viddy 
this bit of film I would perhaps be not so sick. But I could 
not shut my glazzies, and even if I tried to move my glaz- 
balls about I still could not get like out of the hne of fire 
of this picture So I had to go on viddying what was being 
done and hearing the most ghastly creechings coming from 
this htso. I knew it could not really be real, but that made 
no difference. I was heaving away but could not sick, 
viddying first a britva cut out an eye, then sUce down the 
cheek, then go rip tip rip all over, while red krowy shot 
on to the camera lens Then all the teeth were like 
wrenched out with a pair of pliers, and the creechmg and 
the blood were terrific. Then I slooshied this very pleased 
goloss of Dr Brodsky gomg. ‘Excellent, excellent, excellent ' 
The next lomtick of film was of an old woman who kept 
a shop being kicked about amid very gromky laughter by 
a lot of malchicks, and these malchicks broke up the shop 
and then set fire to it. You could viddy this poor starry 
ptitsa trying to crawl out of the flames, screaming and 
creechmg, but having had her leg broke by these mal- 
chicks kicking her she could not move. So then all the 
flames went roaring round her, and you could viddy her 

io6 



agonized litso like appealing through the flames and then 
disappearing m the flames, and then you could slooshy the 
most gromky and agonized and agomzing screams that 
ever came from a human goloss So this time I knew I had 
to sick up, so I creeched: 

‘I want to be sick Please let me be sick. Please bring 
somethmg for me to be sick into ’ But this Dr Brodsky 
call^ back: 

'Imagination only. You’ve nothing to worry about Next 
film coming up.’ That was perhaps meant to be a joke, for 
I heard a like smeck conung from the dark. And then I 
was forced to viddy a most nasty film about Japanese 
torture. It was the 1939-45 War, and there were soldiers 
being fixed to trees with nails and having fires lit under 
them and having their yarbles cut off, and you even 
viddied a gulliver being sliced off a soldier with a sword, 
and then with his head rolling about and the rot and the 
glazzies looking alive still, the plott of this soldier actually 
ran about, krowy like a fountain out of the neck, and 
then it dropped, and all the time there was very very loud 
laughter from the Japanese. The pains I felt now in my 
belly and the headache and the thirst were terrible, and 
they all seemed to be conung out of the screen. So I 
creeched' 

‘Stop the film! Please, please stop it! I can’t stand any 
more.’ And then the goloss of this Dr Brodsky said 

‘Stop it? Stop it, did you say? Why, we’ve hardly 
started.’ And he and the others smecked quite loud 



I DO not wish to descnbe, brothers, what 
other horrible veshches I was hke forced to 
viddy that afternoon. The like minds of 
this Dr Brodsky and Dr Branom and 
the others in white coats, and remember 
there was this devotchka twiddling with the knobs and 
watching the meters, they must have been more cally and 
filthy than any prestoopnick m the Staja itself Because I 
did not think it was possible for any veck to even think of 
making films of what I was forced to viddy, all tied to this 
chair and my glazzies made to be wide open. All I could 
do was to creech very gromky for them to turn it off, turn 
it off, and that hke part drowned the noise of dratsmg and 
Allying and also the music that went with it ail. You can 
ima^e it was like a terrible relief when I’d viddied the 
last bit of film and this Dr Brodsky said, in a very yawny 
and bored like goloss: T think that should be enough for 
Day One, don’t you, Branom?’ And there I was with the 
lights switched on, my gulliver throbbing like a bolshy big 
engine that makes pain, and my rot all dry and cally inside, 
and feeling I could like sick up every bit of pishcha I had 
ever eaten, O my brothers, since the day I was hke weaned. 
'AH right,’ said this Dr Brodsky, ‘he can be taken back to 
his bed.’ Then he hke patted me on the pletcho and said 
‘Good, good. A very promising start,’ grinning all over his 




litso, then he like waddled out, Dr Branom after him, but 
Dr Branom gave me a like very droogy and sympathetic 
type smile as though he had nothing to do with all this 
veshch hut was hke forced into it as I was. 

Anyhow, they freed my plott from the diair and they 
let go the skin above my glazzies so that I could open and 
shut them again, and I shut them, O my brothers, with 
the ^ain and throb in my gulhver, and then I was like 
carried* to the old wheelchair and taken back to my 
malenky bedroom, the under-veck who wheeled me singing 
away at some hound-and-horny popsong so that I like 
snarled* ‘Shut it, thou,’ but he only smecked and said: 
‘Never mind, friend,’ and then sang louder So I was put 
into the bed and still felt bolnoy but could not sleep, but 
soon I started to feel that soon I might start to feel that 
I might soon start feeling just a malenky bit better, and 
then I was brought some mce hot chai trith plenty of 
moloko and sakar and, peering that, I knew that that Uke 
horrible mghtmare was in the past and all over. And then 
Dr Branom came in, all nice and smiling. He said: 

‘Well, by my calculations you should be startmg to feel 
all right again. Yes?’ 

‘Sir,’ I said, like wary. I did not quite kopat what he was 
getting at govoreeting about calculations, seemg that get- 
tmg better from feeling bolnoy is hke your own affair and 
nothing to do with calculations He sat down, all nice and 
droogy, on the bed’s edge and said: 

‘Dr Brodsky is pleased with you. You had a very posi- 
tive response. Tomorrow, of course, there’ll be two sessions, 
morning and afternoon, and I should ima^ne that you’E 
be feeling a bit limp at the end of the day. But we have 
to be hard on you, you have to be cured.’ I said: 

Tou mean I have to sit through — ? You mean I have 



to look at — > Oh, no,’ I said ‘It was hornble ’ 

‘Of course it was horrible,’ smiled Dr Branom. ‘Violence 
IS a very horrible thing That’s what you’re learning now. 
Your body is learmng it ’ 

‘But,’ I said, ‘I don’t imderstand I don’t understand 
about feehng sick like I did I never used to feel sick before 
I used to feel like very the opposite. I mean, domg it or 
watching it I used to feel real horrorshow I just ^on’t 
understand why or how or what — ’ '' 

‘Life is a very wonderful thing,’ said Dr Branom in a 
like very holy goloss ‘The processes of hfe, the make-up 
of the human orgamsm, who can fully understand these 
miracles? Dr Brodsky is, of course, a remarkable man. 
What IS happemng to you now is what should happen to 
any normal healthy human organism contemplating the 
actions of the forces of evil, the workings of the principle 
of destruction You are being made sane, you are being 
made healthy.’ 

‘That I will not have,’ I said, ‘nor can understand at all. 
What you’ve been doing is to make me feel very very ill.* 

‘Do you feel ill now?’ he said, still with the old droogy 
smile on his litso. ‘Drinking tea, resting, havmg a quiet 
chat with a friend -surely you’re not feeling anything but 
well?’ 

I like listened and felt for pain and sickness in my 
gulliver and plott, in a like cautious way, but it was true, 
brothers, that I felt real horrorshow and even wanting my 
dinner, T don’t get it,’ I said Tfou must be doing some- 
thing to me to make me feel ill.’ And I sort of frowned 
about that, thinlang. 

"You felt ill this afternoon/ he said, "because you're get- 
ting better. When we’re healthy we respond to the presence 
of the hateful with fear and nausea. You’re becoming 


no 



healthy, that’s all. You’ll be healthier still this time to- 
morrow/ Then he patted me on the noga and went out, 
and I tried to puzzle the whole veshdi out as best I could. 
What it seemed to me was that the wires and other 
veshches that were fixed to my plott perhaps were making 
me feel ill, and that it was all a trick really I was still 
puzzlmg out all this and wondering whether I should 
refu§^ to be strapped down to this chair tomorrow and 
start aTfeal bit of dratsing with them all, because I had my 
nghts, when another cheUoveck came in to see me. He was 
a like smiling starry veck who said he was what he called 
the Discharge OflScer, and he carried a lot of bits of paper 
with him. He said: 

'Where will you go when you leave here?’ I hadn’t really 
thought about that sort of veshch at all, and it only now 
really began to dawn on me that I’d be a fine free malchick 
very soon, and then I viddied that would only be if I 
played it everybody’s way and did not start any dratsing 
and creechmg and refusing and so on. I said. 

'Oh, I shall go home Back to my pee and em/ 

'Your — He didn’t get nadsat-talk at all, so I said 

‘To my parents in the dear old flatblock.’ 

T see,’ he said. ‘And when did you last have a visit 
from your parents?’ 

‘A month,’ I said, ‘very near. They like suspended visit- 
ing-day for a bit because of one prestoopnick getting some 
blasting-powder smuggled in across the wires from his 
ptitsa. A real caily trick to play on the innocent, like 
punishing them as well. So it’s like near a month since I 
had a visit/ 

T see,’ said this veck* ‘And have your parents been in- 
formed of your transfer and impending release?’ That had 
a real lovely zvook that did, that slovo release, I said: 


III 



■No.’ Then I said ‘It will be a nice surpnse for them, 
that, won’t it? Me just walMng in through the door and 
saymg “Here I am, hack, a free veck again” Yes, real 
horrorshow ’ 

‘Right,’ said the Discharge OfiScer veck, ‘we’ll leave it at 
that. So long as you have somewhere to hve. Now, there’s 
the question of your havmg a job, isn’t there?’ And he 
showed me this long list of jobs I could have, but I thqjight, 
well, there would be time enough for that A mce nialenky 
holiday first. I could do a crasting j'ob soon as I got out 
and fill the old carmans with pretty poliy, but I would 
have to be very careful and I would have to do the job 
all on my oddy knocky. I did not trust so-called droogs 
any more. So I told this veck to leave it a bit and we would 
govoreet about it agam. He said right right right, then got 
ready to leave He showed himself to be a very queer sort 
of a veck, because what he did now was to like giggle and 
then say. ‘Would you like to punch me in the face before 
I go?’ I did not think I could possibly have slooshied that 
right, so I said: 

‘Eh?’ 

‘Would you,’ he giggled, ‘like to punch me in the face 
before I go?’ I frowned like at that, very puzzled, and said: 
‘Why?’ 

‘Oh,’ he said, ‘just to see how you’re getting on.’ And he 
brought his litso real near, a fat grin all over his rot. So 
I fisted up and went smack at this litso, but he puUed 
himsdf away real skorry, grinning soil, and my rooker 
just punched air. Very puzzling, this was, and I frowned 
as he left, smecking his gulliver off. And then, my brothers, 
I fdt real sick again, just like in the afternoon, just for a 
couple of minootas It then passed off skorry, and when 
they brought my dinner in I found I had a fair appetite 


m 



and was ready to crunch away at the roast chicken But 
it was funny that starry chelloveck asking for a tolchock 
in the litso And it was funny feehng sick like that 
What was even funnier was when I went to sleep that 
night, O my brothers I had a nightmare, and, as you 
might expect, it was of one of those bits of film Fd viddied 
in the afternoon. A dream or nightmare is really only like 
a film inside your gulliver, except that it is as though you 
could walk into it and be part of it. And this is what 
happened to me. It was a nightmare of one of the bits of 
film they showed me near the end of the afternoon like 
session, all of smecking maldiicks domg the ultra-violent 
on a young ptitsa who was creeching away in her red red 
krovvy, her platties all razrezzed real horrorshow I was in 
this ffllymg about, smeckmg away and being like the ring- 
leader, dressed in the heighth of nadsat fashion And then 
at the heighth of all this dratsmg and tolchocking I fdt 
like paralysed and wanting to be very sick, and all the 
other malchicks had a real gromky smeck at me. Then I 
was dratsing my way back to being awake all through my 
own krovvy, pints and quarts and gallons of it, and then 
I foimd myself in my bed in this room I wanted to be 
sick, so I got out of the bed all trembly so as to go off 
down the corridor to the old vaysay But, behold, brothers, 
the door was locked. And turning round I viddied for like 
the first raz that there were bars on the wmdow. And so, 
as I reached for the like pot in the malenky cupboard be- 
side the bed, I viddied that there would be no escaping 
from any of all this. Worse, I did not dare to go back into 
my own sleeping gulliver. I soon found I did not want to 
be sick after all, but then I was poogly of getting back 
into bed to sleep. But soon I fell smack into deep and did 
not dream any more. 


”3 



‘Stop it, stop it, stop it,’ I kept on creeching 
out ‘Turn it off, you grahzny bastards, for 
I can stand no more.’ It was the next day, 
brothers, and I had truly done my best 
morning and afternoon to play it their way 
and sit like a horrorshow smiling co-operative malchick 
in the chair of torture while they flashed nasty bits of 
ultra-violence on the screen, my glazzies clipped open to 
viddy all, my plott and rookers and nogas fixed to the 
chair so I could not get away What I was being made to 
viddy now was not really a veshch I would have thought 
to be too bad before, it being only three or four malchicks 
crasting in a shop and filhng their carmans with cutter, 
at the same time Allying about with the creeching starry 
ptitsa running the shop, tolchocking her and letting the 
red red krowy flow. But the throb and like crash crash 
crash crash in my gulliver and the wanting to sick and the 
terrible dry rasping thirstiness in my rot, all were worse 
than yesterday. ‘Oh, I’ve had enough,’ I cried. ‘It’s not fair, 
you vonny sods,’ and I tried to struggle otit of the chair but 
it was not possible, me being as good as smck to it. 

‘First<lass,’ creeched out this Dr Brodsky. ‘You’re doing 
really weU. Just one more and then we’re finished ’ 

What it was now was the starry 193^45 War again, 
and it was a very blobby and liny and crackly film you 





could viddy had been made by the Germans. It opened 
with German eagles and the Nazi flag with that like 
crooked cross that all malchicks at school love to draw, 
and then there were very haughty and nadmenny like 
German ofiBcers walking through streets that were all dust 
and bomb-holes and broken buildings. Then you were 
allowed to viddy lewdies being shot against walls, officers 
giving the orders, and also horrible nagoy plotts left lying 
m gu?t«rs, all like cages of bare ribs and white thin nogas. 
Then there were lewdies being dragged off creeching 
though not on the sound-track, my brothers, the only 
sound being music, and being tolchocked while they were 
dragged off. Then I noticed, in all my pain and sickness, 
what music it was that like crackled and boomed on the 
sound-track, and it was Ludwig van, the last movement of 
the Fifth Symphony, and I creeched like bezoomny at 
that. ‘Stop'’ I creeched. ‘Stop, you grahzny disgusting sods 
It’s a sin, that’s what it is, a filthy unforgivable sin, you 
bratchnies'’ They didn’t stop right away, because there 
was only a minute or two more to go - lew^es being beaten 
up and all krowy, then more firing squads, then the old 
Nazi flag and THE END But when the lights came on 
this Dr Brodsky and also Dr Branom were standing in 
front of me, and Dr Brodsky said: 

‘What’s all this about sin, eh?’ 

‘That,’ I said, very sick. ‘Using Ludwig van like that. 
He did no harm to anyone. Beethoven just wrote music.’ 
And then I was really sick and they had to bring a bowl 
that was in the shape of like a kidney. 

‘Music,’ smd Dr Brodsky, like musing. ‘So you’re keen 
on music. I know nothing about it myself. It’s a useful 
emotional hdghtener, that’s all I know. WeU, well. What 
do you think about that, eh, Branom?’ 



‘It can’t be helped,’ said Dr Branom. ‘Each man kills 
the thing he loves, as the poet-prisoner said. Here’s the 
punishment element, perhaps The Governor ought to be 
pleased.’ 

‘Give me a drink,’ I said, ‘for Bog’s sake ’ 

‘Loosen him,’ ordered Dr Brodsky Tetch him a carafe 
of ice-cold water.’ So then these under-vecks got to work 
and soon I was peering gallons and gallons of water and it 
was hke heaven, O my brothers. Dr Brodsky said:'- 

‘You seem a suffiaently intelligent young man. You 
seem, too, to be not without taste. You’ve just got this 
violence thing, haven’t you^ Violence and theft, theft 
being an aspect of violence’ I didn’t govoreet a single 
slovo, brothers. I was still feeling sick, though getting a 
malenky bit better now But it had been a terrible day. 
‘Now, Aen,’ said Dr Brodsky, ‘how do you think this is 
done? Tell me, what do you think we’re domg to you?’ 

‘You’re making me feel ill,’ I said. ‘I’m ill when I look 
at those filthy pervert films of yours But it’s not really the 
films that’s doing it. But I feel that if you’ll stop these 
films I’ll stop feeling ill ' 

‘Right,’ said Dr Brodsky. ‘It’s association, the oldest 
educational method in the world. And what really causes 
you to feel ill?’ 

‘These grahzny sodding veshches that come out of my 
guHivcr and my plott,’ I said, ‘that’s what it is ’ 

‘Quaint,’ said Dr Brodsky, like smiling, ‘the dialect of 
the tribe. Do you know anything of its provenance, 
Branom?’ 

‘Odd bits of old rhyming slang,’ said Dr Branom, who 
did not look quite so much like a friend any more. ‘A bit 
of ^psy talk, too. But most of the roots are Slav Propa- 
ganda. Subliminal penetration.’ 

ir6 



'All right, all right, all right," said Dr Brodsky, like 
impatient and not interested any more ‘Well," he said to 
me, ‘it isn’t the wires. It’s nothmg to do with what’s 
fastened to you. Those are just for measuring your re- 
actions What is it, then?" 

I viddied then, of course, what a bezoomny shoot I was 
not to notice that it was the hypodermic shots in the rooker 
‘Oh,’ I creeched, ‘oh, I viddy all now. A filthy cally voimy 
trick. V*n act of treachery, sod you, and you won’t do it 
again/ 

T’m glad you’ve raised your objections now,’ said Dr 
Brodsky. ‘Now we can be perfectly clear about it. We can 
get this stuflE of Ludovico’s mto your system in many 
different ways Orally, for instance But the subcutaneous 
method is the best. Don’t fight against it, please. There’s 
no point in your fighting You can’t get the better of us.’ 

‘Grahzny bratchmes," I said, hke snivelling. Then I said 
‘I don’t mind about the ultra-violence and all that cal. I 
can put up with that But it’s not fair on the music. It’s 
not fair I should feel ill when I’m slooshying lovely 
Ludwig van and G F. Handel and others. All that shows 
you’re an evil lot of bastards and I shall never forgive you, 
sods/ 

They both looked a bit hke thoughtful. Then Dr 
Brodsky said ‘Delimitation is always diiBBcult. The world 
is one, life is one. The sweetest and most heavenly of 
activities partake in some measure of violence -the act 
of love, for instance, music, for instance You must take 
your chance, boy. The choice has been all yours.’ I didn’t 
understand all these slovos, hut now I said* 

^You needn’t take it any further, sir/ I’d changed my 
tune a malenky bit in my cunning way. ‘You’ve proved to 
me that aU this dratsing and ultra-violence and killing is 


U7 



wrong wrong and tembly wrong. I’ve learned my lesson, 
sirs. I see now what I’ve never seen before I’m cured, 
praise God.’ And I raised my glazzies in a like holy way 
to the ceilmg. But both these doctors shook their gulhvers 
hke sadly and Dr Brodsky said: 

“You’re not cured yet. There’s still a lot to be done 
Only when your body reacts promptly and violently to 
violence, as to a snake, without further help from us, with- 
out medication, only then — ’ I said 

‘But, sir, sirs, I see that it’s ■wrong It’s wrong because 
it’s against hke soaety, it’s ■wrong because every veck on 
earth has the right to hve and be happy without being 
beaten and tolchocked and knifed I’ve learned a lot, 
oh really I have ’ But Dr Brodsky had a loud long 
smeck at that, showing all his white zoobies, and 
said: 

‘The heresy of an age of reason,’ or some such slovos. ‘I 
see what is right and approve, but I do what is wrong No, 
no, my boy, you must leave it all to us. But be cheerful 
about it. It will soon be all over. In less than a fortmght 
now you’ll be a free man.’ Then he patted me on the 
pletcho. 

Less than a fortnight. O my brothers and friends, it was 
like an age It was like from the beginning of the world 
to the end of it. To finish the fourteen years with re- 
mission in the Staja would have been nothing to it Every 
day it was the same. When the devotchka mth the hypo- 
dermic came round, though, four days after this govoreet- 
ing with Dr Brodsky and Dr Branom, I said ‘Oh, no you 
won’t,’ and tolchocked her on the rooker, and the S3?rmge 
went tinkle clatter on to the floor. That was like to viddy 
what they would do. What they did was to get four or five 
real bolshy white-coated bastards of under-vedcs to hold 

ri8 



me down on the bed, tolchocking me with grinny htsos 
dose to mine, and then this nurse ptitsa said ‘You wicked 
naughty little devil, you,’ while she jabbed my rooker 
with another syrmge and squirted this stuff m real brutal 
and nasty And then I was wheeled off exhausted to this 
like hell sinny as before 

Every day, my brothers, these films were like the same, 
all kidbng and tolchocking and red red krovvy dnpping 
off of*4jtsos and plotts and spattering all over the camera 
lenses It was usually grinning and smecking ma] chicks in 
the heighth of nadsat fashion, or else teeheeheeing Jap 
torturers or brutal Nazi kickers and shooters. And each 
day the feeling of wanting to die with the sickness and 
gulliver pains and aches in the zoobies and horrible 
horrible thirst grew really worse Until one morning I 
tried to defeat the bastards by crash crash crashing my 
gulliver against the wall so that I should tolchock myself 
unconscious, but all that happened was I felt sick with 
viddying that this kind of violence was hke the violence 
in the films, so I was just exhausted and was given the 
injection and was wheeled off like before 

And then there came a mormng when I woke up and 
had my breakfast off eggs and toast and jam and very hot 
milky chai, and then I thought ‘It can’t be much longer 
now. Now must be very near the end of the time. I have 
suffered to the heighths and cannot suffer any more ’ And 
I waited and waited, brothers, for this nurse ptitsa to bring 
in the syringe, but she did not come And then the white- 
coated under-veck came and said 

‘Today, old friend, we are letting you walk ’ 

‘Walk?’ I said. ‘Where?’ 

‘To the usual place,’ he said, ‘Yes, yes, look not so 
astonished You are to walk to the films, me with you 



of course. You are no longer to be earned in a wheel- 
chair ’ 

‘But,’ I said, “how about my horrible mormng injec- 
tion?’ For I was really surprised at this, brothers, they 
being so keen on pushing this Ludovico veshch into me, 
as they said ‘Don’t I get that hornble sicky stuff rammed 
into my poor suffering rooker any more?’ 

‘All over,’ like smecked this veck ‘For ever and ever 
amen You’re on your own now, boy. Walking amT all to 
the chamber of horrors. But you’re still to be strapped 
down and made to see Come on then, my little uger ’ And 
I had to put my over-gown and toofles on and walk down 
the corridor to the like sinny mesto 

Now this time, O my brothers, I was not only very sick 
but very puzzled There it was agam, all the old ultra- 
idolence and vecks with their gullivers smashed and torn 
krovvy-dnpping putsas creeching for mercy, the like 
private and individual Allying and nastiness Then there 
were the prison-camps and the Jews and the grey like 
foreign streets full of tanks and uniforms and vecks going 
down in withering rifle-fire, this being the public side of 
it And this time I could blame nothing for me feeling 
sick and thirsty and full of aches except what I was forced 
to viddy, my glazzies still bemg clipped open and my 
nogas ' and plott fixed to the chair but this set of wires 
and other veshches no longer coming out of my jflott and 
gulliver. So what could it be but the films I was viddying 
that were doing this to me? Except, of course, brothers, 
that this Ludovico stuff was like a vaccination and there 
it was cruising about in my krowy, so that I would be 
sick always for ever and ever amen whenever I viddied 
any of this ultra-violence So now I squared my rot and 
went boo hoo hoo, and the tears like blotted out what I 


120 



was foiced to viddy m like all blessed runny silvery dew- 
drops. But these white-coat bratchnies were skorry with 
their tashtooks to wipe the tears away, saying* ‘There 
there, wazzums all weepy-weepy den?’ And there it was 
again all clear before my glazzies, these Germans prodding 
like beseechmg and weeping Jews - vecks and cheenas and 
malchicks and devotchkas - into mestos where they would 
all snuff it of poison gas. Boo hoo hoo I had to go again, 
and along they came to wipe the tears off, very skorry, so 
I should not miss one solitary veshch of what they were 
showing. It was a terrible and homble day, O my brothers 
and only friends. 

I was lying on the bed all alone that nochy after my 
dinner of fat thick mutton stew and fruit-pie and ice- 
cream, and I .thought to myself ‘Hell hell hell, there 
might be a chance for me if I get out now’ I had no 
weapon, though I was allowed no britva here, and I had 
been shaved every other day by a fat bald-headed veck 
who came to my bed before breakfast, two white<oated 
bratchmes standing by to viddy I was a good non-violent 
malchick The nails on my rookers had been scissored 
and filed real short so I could not scratch But I was still 
skorry on the attack, though they had weakened me down, 
brothers, to a like shadow of what I had been in the old 
free days. So now I got off the bed and went to the locked 
door and began to fist it real horrorshow and hard, creech- 
ing at the same time. ‘Oh, help help. I’m sick. I’m dying. 
Doctor doctor doctor, qmck. Please. Oh, I’ll die, I know 
I shall Help.* My gorlo was real dry and sore before any- 
one came. Then I heard nogas coimng down the corridor 
and a like grumbling goloss, and then I recognized the 
goloss of the white-coated veck who brought my pishcha 
and like escorted me to my daily doom. He like grumbled: 


121 



‘What IS it? What goes on^ What’s your httlc nasty 
game in there’’ 

‘Oh, I’m dying,’ I like moaned ‘Oh, I have a ghastly 
pain in my side Appendicitis, it is Ooooooh.’ 

‘Appendy shitehouse,’ grumbled this veck, and then to 
my ]oy, brothers, I could slooshy the like clank of keys 
‘If you’re trying it, little fnend, my friends and me will 
beat and kick you all through the night ’ Then he ^ened 
up and brought in like the sweet air of the promise of my 
freedom. Now I was like behind the door when he pushed 
it open, and I could viddy him in the corridor light look- 
ing round for me puzzled Then I raised my two fisties to 
tolchock him on the neck nasty, and then, I swear, as I 
sort of viddied him in advance lymg moaning or out out 
out and felt the like joy nse in my guts, it was then that 
this sickness rose in me as it might be a wave and I felt 
a horrible fear as if I was really going to die. I like tottered 
over to the bed going urgh urgh urgh, and the veck, who 
was not in his white coat but an over-gown, viddied clear 
enough what I had had in my mind for he said 

‘Well, everything’s a lesson, isn’t it? Learning all the 
time, as you could say Come on, httle friend, get up from 
that bed and hit me I want you to, yes, really. A real 
good crack across the jaw. Oh, I’m dying for it, really I 
am.’ But all I could do, brothers, was to just lay there 
sobbing boo hoo hoo. ‘Scum,’ like sneered this veck now. 
‘Filth.’ And he pulled me up by like the scnifE of my 
pyjama-top, me being very weak and limp, and he raised 
and swung his right rooker so that I got a feir old tolchock 
clean on the litso. That,’ he said, ‘is for getting me out 
of my bed, you young dirt.’ And he wiped his rookers 
against each other swish swish and went out Crunch 
crunch went the key in the lock. 


122 



And what, brothers, I had to escape into sleep from then 
was die horrible and wrong feelmg that it was better to 
get the hit than give it. If that veck had stayed I might 
even have like presented the other cheek 



I COULD not believe, brothers, what I was 
told. It seemed that I had been in that 
vonny mesto for near ever and would be 
there for near ever more But it had always 
been a fortnight and now they said the 
fortmght was near up They said- 
‘Tomorrow, little friend, out out out’ And they made 
with the old thumb, hke poinnng to freedom And then 
the white-coated veck who had tolchocked me and who 
had still brought me my trays of pishcha and like escorted 
me to my everyday torture said: ‘But you still have one 
real big day in front of you. It’s to be your passing-out 
day.’ And he had a leery smeck at that 
I expected this morning that I would be ittymg as usual 
to the sirmy mesto in my pj^amas and toofles and over- 
gown. But no. This morning I was given my shirt and 
underveshches and my platties of the night and my 
horrorshow kick-boots, all lovely and washed or ironed 
or polished. And I was even given my cut-throat bntva 
that I had used in those old hapj^r days for Allying and 
dratsing. So I gave with the puzzled frown at this as I 
got dressed, but the white-coated under-veck just like 
grinned and would govoreet nothing, O my brothers. 

I was led quite kindly to ihe same old mesto, but there 
were changes there Curtains had been drawn m front of 




the sinny screen and the frosted glass under the projec- 
uon holes was no longer there, it having perhaps been 
pushed up or folded to the sides like blind or shutters 
And where there had been just the noise of coughing kashl 
kashl kashl and like shadows of lewdies was now a real 
audience, and m this audience there were litsos I knew. 
There was the Staja Governor and the holy man, the 
charli^ or Charles as he was called, and the Chief Chasso 
and this very important and well-dressed chelloveck who 
was the Minister of the Interior or Inferior. All the rest 
I did not know. Dr Brodsky and Dr Branom were there, 
though not now white-coated, instead they were dressed 
as doctors would dress who were big enough to want to 
dress in the heighth of fashion. Dr Branom just stood, but 
Dr Brodsky stood and govoreeted m a like learned manner 
to all the lewdies assembled. When he viddied me coming 
in he said, ‘Aha, At this stage, gentlemen, we introduce 
the subject himself He is, as you will perceive, fit and 
well nourished. He comes straight from a night’s sleep 
and a good breakfast, undrugged, unhypnotized Tomorrow 
we send him with confidence out into the world agam, as 
decent a lad as you would meet on a May morning, un- 
vicious, unviolent, if anything -as you will observe -in- 
clined to the kindly word and the helpful act. What a 
change is here, gentlemen, from the wretched hoodlum 
the State committed to unprofitable punishment some two 
years ago, unchanged after two years Unchanged, do I 
say? Not quite. Prison taught him the false smile, the 
rubbed hands of hypocrisy, the fawning greased obsequi- 
ous leer. Other vices it taught him, as well as confirming 
him in those he had long practised before. But, gentle- 
men, enough of words. Actions speak louder than. Action 
now. Observe, all/ 


I2J 



I was a bit dazed by all this govoreetmg and I was try- 
mg to grasp in my mind that like all this was about me. 
Then all the lights went out and then there came on two 
like spotlights shining from the projection-squares, and 
one of them was full on Your Humble and Suffering 
Nariatoi And into the other spotlight there walked a 
bolshy big chelloveck I had never viddied before He had 
a lardy like litso and a moustache and like strips 9# hair 
pasted over his near-bald gulliver. He was about thirty 
or forty or fifty, some old age like that, starry He ittied 
up to me and the spotlight ittied with him, and soon the 
two spotlights had made like one big pool. He said to me, 
very sneery 'Hello, heap of dirt Pooh, you don’t wash 
much, judging from the horrible smell ’ Then, as if he 
was like dancing, he stamped on my nogas, left, right, 
then he gave me a finger-nail flick on the nose that hurt 
like bezoomny and brought the old tears to my glazzies, 
then he twisted at my left ooko like it was a radio dial 
I could slooshy titters and a couple of real horrorshow 
hawhawhaws coming from like the audience. My nose and 
nogas and ear-hole stung and pained like bezoomny, so 
I said: 

'What do you do that to me for? Fve never done wrong 
to you, brother/ 

'Oh/ this veck said, T do this’ - flickflicked nose again - 
^and that’ - twisted smarting ear-hole - ‘and the other’ - 
stamped nasty on right noga - ‘because I don’t care for 
your horrible type. And if you want to do anything about 
it, start, start, please do.’ Now I knew that Fd have to be 
real skorry and get my cut-throat britva out before this 
horrible killing sickness whooshed up and turned the like 
joy of battle into feeling I was going to snuff it But, O 
brothers, as my rooker reached for the britva in my in- 

136 



side caiman I got this like picture in my mind's glazzy 
of this insulting chelloveck howling for mercy with the 
red red krovvy all streaming out of his rot, and hot after 
this picture the sickness and dryness and pains were rush- 
ing to overtake, and I viddied that Fd have to change the 
way I felt about this rotten veck very very skorry indeed, 
so I felt in my carmans foi cigarettes or for pretty polly, 
and, Q my brothers, there was not either of these 
veshches I said, like all howly and blubbery 

Td like to give you a cigarette, brother, but I don't 
seem to have any ’ This veck went 

‘Wah wah Boohoohoo. Cry, baby.' Then he flickflick- 
fiicked with his bolshy horny nail at my nose again, and 
I could slooshy veiy loud smecks of like mirth coming 
from the dark audience. I said, real desperate, trying to 
be nice to this insulting and hurtful veck to stop the pains 
and sickness coming up* 

'Please let me do something for you, please.' And I felt 
m my carmans but could find only my cut-throat britva, 
so I took this out and handed it to him and said* 'Please 
take this, please A little present Please have it/ But he 
said 

‘Keep your stinking bribes to yourself You can’t get 
round me that way ' And he banged at my rooker and 
my cut-throat britva fell on the floor. So I said: 

‘Please, I must do something. Shall I clean your boots? 
Look, I'll get down and lick them' And, my brothers, 
believe it or kiss my sharries, I got down on my knees 
and pushed my red yahzick out a mile and a half to lick 
his grahzny vonny boots. But all this veck did was to kick 
me not too hard on the rot. So then it seemed to me that 
it would not bring on the sickness and pain if I just 
gripped his ankles with my rookers tight round them and 


127 



brought this grahzny bratchny down to the floor So I did 
this and he got a real bolshy surpnse, coming down crack 
amid loud laughter from the vonny audience But viddy- 
ing him on the floor I could feel the whole hornble feel- 
ing coming over me, so I gave him my rooker to lift him 
up skorry and up he came Then just as he was going to 
give me a real nasty and earnest tolchock on the litso Dr 
Brodsky said 

‘All right, that will do very well' Then this horrible 
veck sort of bowed and danced off like an actor while the 
lights came up on me blinkmg and with my rot square 
for howling. Dr Brodsky said to the audience- ‘Our sub- 
ject is, you see, impelled towards the good by, para- 
doxically, being impelled towards evil. The mtention to 
act violently is accompanied by strong feelings of physical 
distress To counter these the subject has to switdh to a 
diametrically opposed attitude Any questions?’ 

‘Choice,’ rumbled a rich deep goloss. I viddied it be- 
longed to the prison charlie. ‘He has no real choice, has 
he? Self-interest, fear of physical pain, drove him to that 
grotesque act of self-abasement. Its insincerity was clearly 
to be seen He ceases to be a wrongdoer. He ceases also to 
be a creature capable of moral choice.’ 

"These arc subtleties,’ like smiled Dr Brodsky. ‘We are 
not concerned with motive, vdth the higher ethics We are 
concerned only with cutting down crime — 

‘And,’ chipped in this bolshy well-dressed Minister, 
‘with relieving the ghastly congestion in our prisons ’ 

‘Hear hear,’ said somebody. 

There was a lot of govoreetmg and arguing then and I 
just stood there, brothers, hke completely ignored by all 
these ignorant bratchnies, so I creeched out: 

‘Me, me, me How about me? Where do I come into 



all this? Am I like just some animal or dog?’ And that 
started them off govoreeting real loud and throwing 
slovos at me So I creeched louder still, creeching 'Am I 
just to be like a clockwork orange?’ I didn’t know what 
made me use those slovos, brothers, which just came like 
without asking into my gulliver And that shut all those 
vecks up for some reason for a minoota or two Then one 
very thin starry professor type chelloveck stood up, his 
neck like all cables carrying like power from his gulliver 
to his plott, and he said 

'You have no cause to grumble, boy You made your 
choice and all this is a consequence of your choice What- 
ever now ensues is what you yourself have chosen ’ And 
the prison charlie creeched out 

'Oh, if only I could believe that ’ And you could viddy 
the Governor give him a look like meaning that he would 
not climb so high in like Prison Religion as he thought he 
would Then loud arguing started again, and then I could 
slooshy the slovo Love being thrown around, the prison 
Charles himself creeching as loud as any about Perfect 
Love Casteth Out Fear and all that cal And now Dr 
Brodsky said, smiling all over his litso 

T am glad, gentlemen, this question of Love has been 
raised. Now we shall see in action a manner of Love that 
was thought to be dead with the Middle Ages.’ And then 
the lights went down and the spotlights came on again, 
one on your poor and suffering Friend and Narrator, and 
into the other there like rolled or sidled the most lovely 
young devotchka you could ever hope in all your jeezny, 
O my brothers, to viddy. That is to say, she had real 
horrorshow groodies all of which you could like viddy, 
she having on platties which came down down down off 
her pletchoes. And her nogas were like Bog in His Heaven, 


129 



and she walked like to make you groan in your keeshkas, 
and yet her litso was a sweet smiling young like innocent 
litso She came up towards me with the light like it was 
the like light of heavenly grace and all that cal coming 
with her, and the first thing that flashed into my gulliver 
was that I would like to have her right down there on the 
floor with the old in-out real savage, but skorry as a shot 
came the sickness, like a like detective that had been 
watching round a corner and now followed to m^ke his 
grahzny arrest And now the von of lovely perfume 
that came off her made me want to think of start- 
ing to like heave m my keeshkas, so I knew I had 
to think of some new like way of thinking about her 
before all the pain and thirstmess and horrible sickness 
come over me real horrorshow and proper So I creeched 
out: 

‘O most beautiful and beauteous of devotchkas, I throw 
like my heart at your feet for you to like trample all ovei 
If I had a rose I would give it to you. If it was all rainy 
and cally now on the ground you could have my platties 
to walk on so as not to cover your dainty nogas with filth 
and cal.' And as I was saying all this, O my brothers, I 
could feel the sickness like slinking back Xet me,’ I 
creeched out, Worship you and be like your helper and 
protector from the wicked like world ’ Then I thought of 
the right slovo and felt better for it, saying. "Let me be 
like your true knight,’ and down I went again on the old 
knees, bowing and like scraping. 

And then I felt real shooty and dim, it having been like 
an act again, for this devotchka smiled and bowed to the 
audience and like danced off, the lights coming up to a 
bit of applause And the glazzies of some of these starry 
vecks in the audience were like popping out at this young 



devotchka with dirty and like unholy desire, O my 
brothers 

‘He will be your true Chiistian/ Dr Brodsky was creech- 
mg out, ‘ready to turn the other cheek, ready to be cruci- 
fied rather than crucify, sick to the very heart at the 
thought even of killing a fly * And that was right, brothers, 
because when he said that I thought of killing a fly and 
felt just that tiny bit sick, but I pushed the sickness and 
pain back by thinking of the fly being fed with bits of 
sugar and looked after like a bleeding pet and all that caL 
‘Reclamation,’ he creeched. ‘Joy before the Angels of God ’ 
‘The point is,’ this Minister of the Inferior was saying 
real gromky, ‘that it works ’ 

‘Oh,’ the prison charlie said, like sighing, ‘it works all 
right, God help the lot of us ’ 







‘What’s u going to be then, eh^’ 

That, my brothers, was me asking my- 
self the next morning, standing outside this 
white building that was like tacked on to 
the old Staja, in my platties of the night 
of two years back in the grey light of dawn, with a malenky 
bit of a bag with my few personal veshches in and a bit 
of cutter kindly donated by the vonny Authorities to like 
start me off m my new life. 

The rest of the day before had been very tinng, what 
with interviews to go on tape for the telenews and photo- 
graphs being took flash flash flash and more like demon- 
strations of me folding up in the face of ultra-violence and 
all that embarrassing cal. And then I had like fallen into 
the bed and then, as it looked to me, been wakened up 
to be told to get off out, to itty off home, they did not want 
to viddy Your Humble Narrator never not no more, O my 
brothers. So there I was, very very early in the morning, 
with just this bit of pretty polly in my left carman, jingle- 
jangling it and wondering* 

‘What’s it going to be then, eh?’ 

Some breakfast some mesto, I thought, me not having 
eaten at all that morning, every veck being so anxious 
to tolchock me off out to freedom. A chasha of chai only 
I had peeted This Staja was in a very like gloomy part of 



135 


K 




the town, but there were malenky workers’ cafiEs all around 
and I soon found one of those, my brothers It was very 
cdlly and vonny, with one bulb in the ceiling with fly-dirt 
like obscuring its bit of hght, and there were early labbiters 
slurping away at chai and horrible-looking sausages and 
slices of kleb which they like wolfed, going wolf wolf wolf 
and then creeching for more They were served by a very 
cally devotchka but with very bolshy groodies on her, and 
some of the eating vecks tried to grab her, going hiw haw 
haw while she went he he he, and the sight of them near 
made me want to sick, brothers But I asked for some toast 
and jam and chai very pohtely and with my gentleman’s 
goloss, then I sat in a dark comer to eat and peet 
While I was doing this, a malenky little dwarf of a veck 
ittied in, selling the morning’s gazettas, a twisted and 
grahzny prestoopnick type with thick glasses on with steel 
rims, his platties like the colour of very starry decaying 
currant pudding I kupetted a gazetta, my idea being to 
get ready for plunging back into normal jeezny again by 
viddymg what was ittying on in the world This gazetta I 
had seemed to be like a Government gazetta, for the only 
news that was on the front page was about the need for 
every veck to make sure he put the Government back m 
again on the next General Election, which seemed to be 
about two or three weeks off. There were very boastful 
dovos about what the Government had done, brothers, in 
the last year or so, what with increased exports and a real 
horrorshow foreign policy and improved social services and 
all that cal. But what the Government was really most 
boastful about was the way in which they reckoned the 
streets had been made safer for all peace-loving night- 
walking lewdies in the last six months, what with better 
pay for the police and the police getting like tougher with 

136 



young hooligans and perveits and burglars and all that cal 
Which mteressovatted Your Humble Narrator some deal 
And on the second page of the gazetta there was a blurry 
like photograph of somebody who looked very familial, 
and it turned out to be none other than me me me. I 
looked very gloomy and like scared, but that was really 
with the flashbulbs going pop pop all the time What it 
said imderneath my picture was that here was the first 
graduate from the new State Institute for Reclamation of 
Criminal Types, cured of his criminal instincts in a fort- 
night only, now a good law-fearing citizen and all that cal 
Then I viddied there was a very boastful article about this 
Ludovico’s Technique and how clever the Government was 
and all that cal. Then there was another picture of some 
veck I thought I knew, and it was this Minister of the 
Inferior or Interior It seemed that he had been doing a 
bit of boasting, looking forward to a nice crime-free era 
in which there would be no more fear of cowardly attacks 
from young hooligans and perverts and burglars and all 
that cal. So I went arghhhhhh and threw this gazetta on 
the floor, so that it covered up stains of spilled chai and 
horrible spat gobs from the cally animals that used this 
caff. 

‘What’s it going to be then, eh^’ 

What it was going to be now, brothers, was homeways 
and a nice surprise for dadada and mum, their only son 
and heir back in the family bosom Then I could lay back 
on the bed in my own malenky den and slooshy some 
lovely music, and at the same time I could think over 
what to do now with my jeezny The Discharge Officer 
had given me a long list day before of jobs I could try 
for, and he had telephoned to different vecks about me, 
but I had no intention, my brothers, of going off to rabbit 


137 



right away A malenky bit of a rest first, yes, and a quiet 
think on the bed to the sound of lovely music 

And so the autobus to Center, and then the autobus to 
Kingsley Avenue, the flats of Flatblock i8a being just 
near. You will believe me, my brothers, when I say that 
my heart was going clopclopclop with the like excitement 
All was very quiet, it suU being early winter mormng, and 
when I ittied into the vestibule of the flatblock there was 
no veck about, only the nagoy vecks and cheenas'of the 
Dignity of Labour What surprised me, brothers, was the 
way that had been cleaned up, there being no longer any 
dirty ballooning slovos from the rots of the Dignified 
Labourers, not any dirty parts of the body added to their 
naked plotts by dirty-minded penolhng malchicks. And 
what also surprised me was that the lift was working It 
came purring down when I pressed the electric knopka, 
and when I got in I was surprised again to viddy aU was 
clean inside the like cage. 

So up I went to the tenth floor, and there I saw io-8 as 
it had been before, and my rooker trembled and shook as 
I took out of my carman the httle klootch I had for open- 
ing up. But I very firmly fitted the klootch in the lock and 
turned, then opened up then went in, and there I met 
three pairs of surprised and almost frightened glazzies 
looking at me, and it was pee and em having their break- 
fest, but it was also another veck that I had never viddied 
in my jeezny before, a bolshy thick veck in his shirt and 
braces, quite at home, brothers, slurping away at the milky 
chai and munchmunching at his eggiweg and toast. And 
it was this stranger veck who spoke first, saying. 

‘Who are you, friend? Where did you get hold of a key? 
Out, before I push your face in. Get out there and knock. 
Explain your business, quick.’ 

138 



My dad and mum sat like petrified, and I could viddy 
they had not yet read the gazetta, then I remembered 
that the gazetta did not arrive till papapa had gone off to 
his work. But then mum said ‘Oh, you’ve broken out 
You’ve escaped Whatever shall we do? We shall have the 
police here, oh oh oh Oh, you bad and wicked boy, dis- 
gracing us all like this ’ And, believe it or kiss my sharries, 
she .sj^ted to go boo hoo So I started to try and explain, 
they could ring up the Staja if they wanted, and tdl the 
time this stranger veck sat there like frowning and looking 
as if he could push my htso in with his hairy bolshy beefy 
fist So I said 

‘How about you answering a few, brother^ What are you 
doing here and for how long’ I didn’t like the tone of 
what you said just then Watch it. Come on, speak up’ 
He was a working-man type veck, very ugly, about thirty 
or forty, and he sat now with his rot open at me, not 
govoreeting one single slovo. Then my dad said 

‘This IS all a bit bewildering, son You should have let 
us know you were coming We thought it would be at 
least another five or six years before they let you out Not,’ 
he said, and he said it very like gloomy, ‘that we’re not 
very pleased to see you again and a free man, too.’ 

“Who is this?’ I said ‘MTiy can’t he speak up? What’s 
going on in here’’ 

‘This is Joe,’ said my mum ‘He lives here now. The 
lodger, that’s what he is Oh, dear dear dear,’ she went 

‘You,’ said this Joe. ‘I’ve heard all about you, boy I 
know what you’ve done, breaking the hearts of your poor 
grieving parents So you’re back, eh? Back to make life a 
misery for them once more, is that it’ Over my dead 
corpse you will, because they’ve let me be more like a son 
to them than like a lodger ’ I could nearly have smecked 


139 



loud at that if the old razdraz within me hadn’t started 
to wake up the feeling of wanting to sick, because this 
veck looked about the same age as my pee and em, and 
there he was like trying to put a son’s protecting rooker 
round my crying mum, O my brothers 

‘So,’ I said, and I near felt like collapsing m all tears my- 
self ‘So that’s It, then Well, I give you five large mmootas 
to clear all your horrible cally veshches out of my room ’ 
And I made for this room, this veck being a maltiSky bit 
too slow to stop me When I opened the door my heart 
cracked to the carpet, because I viddied it was no longer 
like my room at all, brothers All my flags had gone off the 
walls and this veck had put up pictures of boxers, also like 
a team sitting smug with folded rookers and a silver hke 
shield m front. And then I viddied what else was missing 
My stereo and my disc-cupboard were no longer there, nor 
was my locked treasure-chest that contained bottles and 
drugs and two shining dean syringes ‘There’s been some 
filthy vonny work going on here,’ I creeched. ‘What have 
you done with my own personal veshches, you horrible 
bastard?’ This was to this Joe, but it was my dad that 
answered, saying: 

‘That was ail took away, son, by the police. This new 
regulation, see, about compensation for the victims.’ 

I found it very hard not to be very ill, but my gulliver 
was aching shocking and my rot was so dry that I had 
to take a skorry swig from the milk-bottle on the table, so 
that this Joe sjud: ‘Filthy piggish manners.’ I said: 

‘But she died. That one died.’ 

‘It was the cats, son,’ said my dad like sorrowful, ‘that 
were left with nobody to look after them nil the wUl was 
read, so they had to have somebody in to feed them So 
the police sold your things, clothes and all, to help with 


140 



the looking after of them That’s the law, son But you 
were never much of a one for following the law ’ 

I had to sit down then, and this Joe said 'Ask per- 
mission befoie you sit, you mannerless young swine,’ so 
I cracked back skorry with a 'Shut your dirty big fat hole, 
you,’ feeling sick Then I tned to he all reasonable and 
smihng for my health’s sake like, so I said: ‘Well, that’s 
■my,4wm, there’s no denying that This is my home also. 
What suggestions have you, my pee and em, to make?’ 
But they just looked very glum, my mum shaking a bit, 
her litso all lines and wet with hke tears, and then my 
dad said: 

‘All this needs thinking about, son We can’t very well 
just kick Joe out, not just like that, can we? I mean, Joe’s 
here doing a job, a contract it is, two years, and we made 
hke an arrangement, didn’t we, Joe? I mean, son, think- 
ing you were going to stay in prison a long time and that 
room going begging’ He was a bit ashamed, you could 
viddy that from his litso So I just smiled and like nodded, 
saymg 

‘I viddy all. You got used to a bit of peace and you got 
used to a bit of extra pretty polly That’s the way it goes. 
And your son has just been nothing but a terrible 
nuisance.’ And then, my brothers, believe me or kiss my 
sharries, I started to hke cry, feeling very like sorry for 
myself. So my dad said 

‘Well, you see, son, Joe’s paid next month’s rent already. 
I mean, ■whatever we do in the future we can’t say to Joe 
to get out, can we, Joe?’ This Joe said- 

Tt’s you two I've got to think of, who’ve been like a 
fetfaer and mother to me. Would it be right or fair to go 
off and leave you to the tender meraes of this young 
monster who has been like no real son at all? He’s weep- 



xng now, but that’s his craft and artfulness' Let him go 
off and find a room somewhere Let him learn the error of 
his ways and that a bad boy like he’s been doesn’t deserve 
such a good mum and dad as what he’s had.’ 

‘All right,’ I said, standing up m all like tears still ‘I 
know how things are now. Nobody wants or loves me I’ve 
sufEered and suffered and suffered and everybody wants 
me to go on suffenng I know.’ 

‘You’ve made others suffer,’ said this Joe ‘It’s onl^ right 
you should suffer proper I’ve been told everything that 
you’ve done, sitting here at night round the family table, 
and pretty shockmg it was to listen to Made me real sick 
a lot of it did.’ 

‘I wish,’ I said, ‘I was back in the prison. Dear old Staja 
as It was. I’m ittymg off now,’ I said. ‘You won’t ever 
viddy me no more I’ll make my own way, thank you very 
much. Let it lie heavy on your consciences.’ My dad said 

‘Don’t take it like that, son,’ and my mum just went 
boo hoo hoo, her htso all screwed up real ugly, and this 
Joe put his rooker round her again, patting her and going 
there there there like bezoomny. And so I just sort of 
staggered'to the door and went out, leaving them to their 
horrible guilt, O my brothers. 


142 



Ittying down the street m a like aimless 
soit of a way, brothers, in these night plat- 
ties which lewdies like stared at as I went 
by, cold too, it being a bastard cold winter 
day, all I felt I wanted was to be away 
from all this and not to have to think any more about 
any sort of veshch at all So I got the autobus to Center, 
then I walked back to Taylor Place, and there was the 
disc-bootick MELODIA I had used to favour with my in- 
esumable custom, O my brothers, and it looked much the 
same sort of mesto as it always had, and walking in I 
expected to viddy old Andy there, that bald and very very 
thin helpful like veck from whom I had kupetted discs in 
the old days But there was no Andy there now, brothers, 
only a scream and a creech of nadsat (teenage, that is) mal- 
chicks and ptitsas slooshying some new horrible popsong 
and dancmg to it as well, and the veck behind the counter 
not much more than a nadsat himself, clicking his 
rooker-bones and smecking like bezoomny. So I went 
up and waited till he hke deigned to notice me, then I 
said: 

Td like to hear a disc of the Mozart Number Forty.’ I 
don’t know why that should have come into my gulliver, 
but it did. The counter-veck said. 

“Forty what, friend >’ 



143 




I said ‘Symphony Symphony Number Forty inG Minor ’ 

‘Ooooh,’ went one of the dancing nadsats, a malchick 
with his hair all ovei his glazzies, ‘seemfunnah. Don’t it 
seem funny? He wants a seemfunnah.’ 

I could feel myself growing all razdraz withm, but I 
had to watch that, so I like smiled at the veck who had 
taken over Andy’s place and at all the dancing and creech- 
mg nadsats. Tlus counter-veck said ‘You go intojhaf 
listen-booth over there, friend, and I’ll pipe soiflrthing 
through.’ 

So I went over to the malenky box where you could 
slooshy the discs you wanted to buy, and then this veck 
put a disc on for me, but it wasn’t the Mozart Forty, it 
was the Mozart ‘Prague’ - he seemingly having just picked 
up any Mozart he could find on the shelf - and Aat should 
have started making me real razdraz and I had to watch 
that for fear of the pain and sickness, but what I’d for- 
gotten was something I shouldn’t have forgotten and now 
made me want to snuff it. It was that these doctor brat- 
chnies had so fixed things that any music that was like for 
the emotions would make me sick just hke viddying or 
wanting to do violence. It was because all those violence 
films had music with them And I remembered especially 
that horrible Nazi film with the Beethoven Fi^, last 
movement. And now here was lovely Mozart made 
homble. I dashed out of the box like bezoonmy to get 
away from the sickness and pain that were coming on, 
and I dashed out of the shop with these nadsats smecking 
after me and the counter-veck creeching: ‘Eh eh eh!’ But 
I took no notice and went staggering almost like blind 
across the road and roimd the comer to the Korova MSlk- 
bar. I knew what I wanted. 

The mesto was near empty, it being still morning. It 


144 



looked strange too, having been painted with all red moo- 
ing cows, and behmd the counter was no veck I knew But 
when I said. ‘Milk plus, large,’ the veck with a hke lean 
htso very newly shaved knew what I wanted I took the 
large moloko plus to one of the httle cubies that were all 
round this mesto, there being hke curtams to shut them 
off from the main mesto, and there I sat down m the plushy 
ishi^r^and sipped and sipped When Fd finished the whole 
lot I oegan to feel that thmgs were happening. I had my 
glazzies like fixed on a malenky bit of silver paper from 
a cancer packet that was on the floor, the sweeping-up of 
this mesto not being all that horrorshow, brothers This 
scrap of silver began to grow and grow and grow and it 
was so like bright and fiery that I had to squint my glazzies 
at It It got so big that it became not only this whole cubic 
I was lolling in but like the whole Korova, the whole street, 
the whole city. Then it was the whole world, then it was 
the whole everything, brothers, and it was like a sea wash- 
ing over every veshch that had ever been made or thought 
of even I could sort of slooshy myself making special sort 
of shooms and govoreetmg slovos like ‘Dear dead idlewilds, 
rot not in variform guises’ and all that cal Then I could 
like feel the vision beating up in all this silver, and then 
there were colours like nobody had ever viddied before, 
and then I could viddy hke a group of statues a long long 
long way ofE that was like being pushed nearer and nearer 
and nearer, all lit up by very bright hght from below and 
above alike, O my brothers. This group of statues was of 
God or Bog and all His Holy Angels and Saints, all very 
bright like bronze, with beards and bolshy great wings 
that waved about in a kind of wmd, so that they could not 
really be of stone or bronze, really, and the eyes or glazzies 
like moved and were alive These bolshy big figures came 


145 



nearer and nearer and nearer till they were like going to 
crush me down, and I could slooshy my goloss going 
‘Eeeeee’ And I felt I had got rid of everything - platues, 
body, biain, name, the lot -and felt real horrorshow, like 
in heaven Then there was the shoom of like crumbling 
and crumpling, and Bog and the Angels and Saints sort 
of shook their gullivers at me, as though to govoreet that 
there wasn’t quite time now but I must try again,„p«Etr 
then everything like leered and smecked and collapSed and 
the big warm light giew like cold, and then there I was 
as I was before, the empty glass on the table and wanting 
to cry and feeling like death was the only answer to every- 
thing. 

And that was it, that was what I viddied qmte clear was 
the thing to do, but how to do it I did not properly know, 
never having thought of that before, O my brothers. In 
my httle hag of personal veshches I had my cut-throat 
britva, but I at once felt very sick as I thought of myself 
going swishhhh at myself and all my own red red krovvy 
flowing. What I wanted was not something violent but 
something that would make me like just go off gentle to 
sleep and that be the end of Your Humble Narrator, no 
more trouble to anybody any more Perhaps, I thought, if 
I ittied off to the Public Biblio round the corner I might 
find some book on the best way of snuffing it with no pain 
I thought of myself dead and how sorry everybody was 
going to be, pee and em and that cally vonny Joe who was 
a like usurper, and also Dr Brodsky and Dr Branom and 
that Inferior Interior hfinister and every veck else. And 
the boastful vonny Government too. So out I scatted into 
the winter, and it was afternoon now, near two o’clock, as 
I could viddy from the bolshy Center timepiece, so that 
me being in the land with the old moloko plus must have 

146 



took like longer than I thought I walked down Margha- 
mta Boulevard and then turned into Boothby Avenue, 
then round the corner again, and there was the Pubhc 
Biblio 

It was a starry cally sort of a mesto that I could not le- 
member going into since I was a very very malenky mal- 
chick, no more than about six years old, and there were 
fsa^rts to it - one part to borrow books and one part to 
read in^full of gazettas and mags and hke the von of very 
starry old men with their plotts stmking of like old age 
and poverty These were standing at the gazetta stands all 
round the room, snuflflmg and belching and govoreetmg to 
themselves and turmng over the pages to read the news 
very sadly, or else they were sitting at the tables looking 
at the mags or pretending to, some of them asleep and 
one or two of them snonng real gromky I couldn’t h ke 
remember what it was I wanted at fibrst, then I remembered 
with a bit of shock that I had ittied here to find out how 
to snuff it without pain, so I goolied over to the shelf full 
of reference veshches There were a lot of books, but there 
was none with a title, brothers, that would really do. There 
was a medical hook that I took down, but when I opened 
it it was full of drawings and photographs of horrible 
wounds and diseases, and that made me want to sick just 
a bit. So I put that back and then took down the big book 
or Bible, as it was called, thinking that might ^ve me like 
comfort as it had done in the old Staja days (not so old 
really, but it seemed a very very long time ago), and I 
staggered over to a chair to read m it But all I found was 
about smiting seventy times seven and a lot of Jews cursing 
and tolchn rldn g each other, and that made me want to 
sick, too So then I near cried, so that a very starry ragged 
moodge oppoate me said: 


147 



‘What IS It, son? What’s the trouble^’ 

‘I want to snufE it,’ I said. ‘I’ve had it, that’s what it is 
Life’s become too much for me.’ 

A starry reading veck next to me said ‘Shhhh,’ without 
looking up from some bezoomny mag he had full of draw- 
ings of like bolshy geometrical veshches. That rang a bell 
somehow This other moodge said 
‘You’re too young for that, son. Why, you’ve got 
thmg m front of you.’ 

‘Yes,’ I said, bitter. ‘Like a pair of false groodies ’ This 
mag-reading veck said ‘Shhhh’ agam, looking up this 
time, and something clicked for both of us I viddied who 
It was He said, real gromky 

‘I never forget a shape, by God I never forget the shape 
of anything. By God, you young swine. I’ve got you now.’ 
Crystallography, that was it That was what he’d been 
taking away from the Biblio that time. False teeth cnmched 
up real horrorshow. Flatties tom off. His books razrezzed, 
aU about Crystallography. I thought I had best get out of 
here real skorry, brothers But this starry old moodge was 
on his feet, creeching hke bezoomny to all the starry old 
coughers at the gazettas round the walls and to them 
dozing over mags at the tables 'We have him,’ he 
creeched. *1116 poisonous young swine who ruined the 
books on Crystallography, rare books, books not to be 
obtamed ever again, anywhere ’ This had a terrible mad 
dioom about it, as though this old veck was really off his 
gulliver ‘A prize specimen of the cowardly brutal young,’ 
he creeched. ‘Here in our midst and at our mercy. He and 
his friends beat me and kicked me and thumped me. They 
stripped me and tore out my teeth. They laughed at my 
blood and my moans. They kicked me off home, dazed and 
naked.’ All this wasn’t quite tme, as you know, brothers. 



He had some platties on, he hadn’t been completely nagoy 

I creeched back ‘That was over two years ago I’ve been 
punished since then I’ve learned my lesson See over theie - 
my picture’s in the papers ’ 

‘Pumshment, eh?’ said one starry like ex-soldier type. 
‘You lot should be exterminated Like so many noisome 
pests Punishment, indeed ’ 

-4^11 right, all right,’ I said. ‘Everybody’s entitled to his 
opinion? Forgive me, all I must go now’ And I started to 
itty out of this mesto of bezoomny old men, Aspinn, that 
was It. You could snuflE it on a hundred aspirin. Aspinn 
from the old drugstore But the crystallography veck 
creeched' 

‘Don’t let him go. We’ll teach him all about punish- 
ment, the murderous young pig Get him ’ And, believe 
It, brothers, or do the other veshch, two or three starry 
dodderers, about ninety years old apiece, grabbed me with 
their trembly old lookers, and I was like made sick by the 
von of old age and disease which came from these near- 
dead moodges. The crystal veck was on to me now, start- 
ing to deal me malenky weak tolchocks on my litso, and I 
tried to get away and itty out, but these starry rookers that 
held me were stronger than I had thought. Then other 
starry vecks came hobbling from the gazettas to have a go 
at Your Humble Narrator. They were creeching veshchcs 
like: ‘Edll him, stamp on him, murder him, kick his teeth 
in,’ and all that cal, and I could viddy what it was clear 
enough. It was old age having a go at youth, that’s what 
it was. But some of them were saying' “Poor old Jack, near 
killed poor old Jack he did, this is the young swine’ and 
so on, as though it had all happened yesterday. Which to 
them I suppose it had. There was now like a sea of vonny 
runny dirty old men trying to get at me with their like 


149 



feeble rookers and horny old claws, creeching and panting 
on to me, but our crystal droog was there in front, dealing 
out tolchock after tolchock And I daren’t do a solitary 
single veshch, O my brothers, it being better to be hit at 
like that than to want to sick and feel that homble pain, 
but of course the fact that there was violence going on 
made me feel that the sickness was peeping round the 
comer to viddy whether to come out into the ooen 
roar away 

Then an attendant veck came along, a youngish veck, 
and he creeched ‘What goes on here? Stop it at once This 
is a leading-room ’ But nobody took any notice So the 
attendant veck said ‘Right, I shall phone the pohce ’ So 
I creeched, and I never thought I would ever do that in 
all my jeezny 

‘Yes yes yes, do that, protect me from these old mad- 
men/ I noticed that the attendant veck was not too anxious 
to join in the dratsing and rescue me from the rage and 
madness of these starry vecks’ claws, he just scatted o£E to 
his like office or wherever the telephone was Now these old 
men were panting a lot now, and I felt I could just flick 
at them and they would all fall over, but I just let myself 
be held, very patient, by these starry rookers, my glazzies 
closed, and feel the feeble tolchocks on my litso, also 
slooshy the panting breathy old golosses creeching: ‘Young 
swine, young murderer, hooligan, thug, kill him/ Then I 
got such a real painful tolchock on the nose that I said to 
myself to hell to hell, and I opened my glazzies up and 
started to struggle to get free, which was not hard, brothers, 
and I tore, off creeching to the sort of hallway outside the 
reading-room. But these starry avengers still came after 
me, panting like dying, with thdr animal daws all 
trembling to get at your friend and Humble Narrator. 



Then I was tripped up and was on the floor and was being 
kicked at, then I slooshied golosses of young vecks creech- 
ing ‘All right, all nght, stop it now,’ and I knew the police 
had arrived 



I WAS like dazed, O my brothers, and could 
not viddy very clear, but I was sure I had 
met these millicents some mesto before. 
The one who had hold of me, going 
There there there,’ just by the front door 
of the Public Bibho, him I did not know at all, but it 
seemed to me he was hke very young to be a rozz But the 
other two had backs that I was sure I had viddied before 
They were lashing into these starry old vecks with great 
bolshy glee and joy, swishing away with malenky whips, 
creeching: There, you naughty boys That should teach 
you to stop noting and breaking the State’s Peace, you 
wicked villains, you’ So they drove these panting and 
wheezing and near dying starry avengers back into the 
reading-room, then they turned round, smecking with the 
fun they’d had, to viddy me The older one of the two 
said: 

‘Well well well well well well well If it isn’t little Alex. 
Very long time no viddy, droog. How goes>’ I was like 
dazed, the uniform and the shlem or helmet making it 
hard to viddy who this was, though litso and goloss were 
very familiar. Then I looked at the other one, and about 
him, with his grinning bezoorany litso, there was no doubt 
Then, all numb and growing number, I looked back at the 
well well welling one This one was then fatty old Billyboy, 





my old enemy The other was, of course, Dim, who had 
used to be my droog and also the enemy of stmking fatty 
goaty Billyboy, but was now a milhcent with uniform and 
shlem and whip to keep order I said 
‘Oh no.’ 

‘Surprise, eh^’ And old Dim came out with the old guff 
I remembered so horrorshow ‘Huh huh huh ’ 

‘It’s impossible,’ I said. ‘It can’t be so I don’t believe it ’ 
‘Evidence of the old glazzies,’ grinned Billyboy ‘Nothing 
up our sleeves. No magic, droog A Job for two who are 
now of job-age. The poUce.’ 

‘You’re too young,’ I said ‘Much too young 'They don’t 
make rozzes of malchicks of your age ’ 

‘Was young,’ went old millicent Dim I could not get 
over it, lirothers, I really could not ‘That’s what we was, 
young droogie And you it was that was always the 
youngest And here now we are ’ 

‘I still can’t bcheve it,’ I said Then Billyboy, rozz Billy- 
boy that I couldn’t get over, said to this young millicent 
that was like holding on to me and that I did not know: 

‘More good would be done, I think, Rex, if we doled out 
a bit of the old summary. Boys will be boys, as always was. 
No need to go through the old station routine. This one 
here has been up to his old tricks, as we can well remem- 
ber though you, of course, can’t. He has been attaddng 
the aged and defenceless, and they have properly been 
retaliating. But we must have our say in the State’s name.’ 

‘What is all this?’ I said, not able hardly to bdieve my 
ookos. ‘It was them that went for me, brothers You’re not 
on thdr side and can’t be You can’t be. Dim. It was a 
veck we fiUied witib once in the old days trying to get his 
own malenky bit of revenge after all this long time.’ 
Tiong time is right,’ said Dim. ‘I don’t remember them 


153 



days too horrorshow Don’t call nae Dim no more, either. 
Officer call me.’ 

‘Enough IS remembeied, thou^,’ Billyboy kept noddmg. 
He was not so fatty as he had been. ‘Naughty little mal- 
chicks handy with cut-throat bntvas - these must be kept 
under.’ And they took me in a real strong grip and hke 
walked me out of the Bibho There was a millicent patrol- 
car waiting outside, and this veck they called Rex waS* 
the driver They like tolchocked me into the bacE of this 
auto, and I couldn’t help feeling it was all really like a joke, 
and that Dim anyway would pull his shlem off his gulliver 
and go haw haw haw But he didn’t I said, trying to fight 
the strack inside me- 

‘And old Pete, what happened to old Pete? It was sad 
about Georgie,’ I said ‘I slooshied all about that.’ 

‘Pete, oh yes, Pete,’ said Efim ‘I seem to remember hke 
the name’ I could viddy we were driving out of town 
I said' 

‘Where are we supposed to be going?’ 

Billyboy turned round from the front to say. ‘It’s light 
still. A little drive into the country, all winter-bare but 
lonely and lovely. It is not right, not always, for lewdies 
in the town to viddy too much of our summary pumsh- 
ment. Streets must be kept clean in more than one way ’ 
And he turned to the front again. 

‘Come,’ I said. ‘I just don’t get this at ail. The old days 
are dead and gone days. For what I did in the past I have 
been punished. I have been cured.’ 

‘That was read out to us,’ said Dim. ‘The Super read all 
that out to us. He said it was a very good way.’ 

•Read to you,’ I said, a malenky bit nasty. Tou still too 
dim to read for yotusdf, O brother?’ 

‘Ah, no,’ said Efim, very like gentle and like regretful. 


154 



‘Not to speak like that Not no more, droogie ’ And he 
launched a bolshy tolchock right on my cluve, so that all 
red red nose-krovvy started to drip drip drip 
‘There was never any trust,’ I said, bitter, wiping oflE the 
krovvy with my rooker 1 was always on my oddy knocky ’ 
‘This will do,’ said Billyboy. We were now in the country 
and it was all bare trees and a few odd distant like twitters, 
and in the distance there was some like farm machine 
making a whirring shoom It was getting all dusk now, this 
being the heighth of winter There were no lewdies about, 
nor no animals. There was just the four. ‘Get out, Alex 
boy,’ said Dim, ‘Just a malenky bit of summary ’ 

All through what they did this driver veck just sat at 
the wheel of the auto, smoking a cancer, reading a malenky 
bit of a book. He had the light on in the auto to viddy 
by He took no notice of what Billyboy and"^Dim did to 
your Humble Narrator I will not go into what they did, 
but It was all like panting and thudding against this like 
background of whirring farm engines and the twittwit- 
twittering m the baie or nagoy branches You could viddy 
a bit of smoky breath in the auto light, this driver turn- 
ing the pages over quite calm. And they were on to me 
all the time, O my brothers. Then Billyboy or Dim, I 
couldn’t say which one, said ‘About enough, droogie, I 
should think, shouldn’t you?’ Then they gave me one 
final tolchock on the htso each and I fell over and just 
laid there on the grass It was cold but I was not feeling 
the cold. Then they dusted their rookers and put back on 
their shlems and tunics which they had taken off, and then 
they got back into the auto ‘Be viddying you some more 
sometime, Alex,’ said Billyboy, and Dim just gave one of 
his old downy guffs. The driver finished the page he was 
reading and put his book away, then he started the auto 



and they were off townwards, my ex-droog and ex-enemy 
waving But I just laid there, fagged and shagged 
After a bit I was hurtmg bad, and then the rain started, 
all icy I could viddy no lewdies in sight, nor no hghts of 
houses. Where was I to go, who had no home and not 
much cutter in my carmans? I cried for myself boo hoo 
hoo Then I got up and began walking 



Home, home, home, it was home I was 
wanting, and it was HOME I came to, 
brothers. I walked through the dark and 
followed not the town way but the way 
where the shoom of a like farm machme 
had been commg from. This brought me to a sort of 
village I felt I had viddied before, but was perhaps be- 
cause all villages look the same, in the dark especially 
Here were houses and there was a like drinking mesto, 
and right at the end of the village there was a malenky 
cottage on its oddy knocky, and I could viddy its name 
shining white on the gate HOME, it said I was all drip- 
ping wet with this icy rain, so that my platties were no 
longer in the heighth of fashion but real miserable and 
like pathetic, and my luscious glory was a wet tangled 
cally mess all spread over my gulliver, and I was sure there 
were cuts and bruises all over my litso, and a couple of 
my zoobies sort of joggled loose when I touched them 
with my tongue or yahzick And I was sore all over my 
plott and very thirsty, so that I kept opening my rot to 
the cold rain, and my stomach growled grrrrr all the time 
with not having had any pishcha since morning and then 
not very much, O my brothers. 

HOME, it said, and perhaps here wotild be some veck 
to help. I opened the gate and sort of slithered down the 





*57 




path, the lain hke turning to ice, and then I knocked 
gentle and pathetic on the door. No veck came, so I 
knocked a malenky bit longer and louder, and then I 
heard the shoom of nogas coming to the door. Then the 
door opened and a male goloss said ‘Yes, what is it^’ 

‘Oh,’ I said, ‘please help I’ve been beaten up by the 
police and ]ust left to die on the road Oh, please give me 
a drink of something and a sit by the fire, please, sir,’ 

The door opened full then, and I could viddy likfe warm 
light and a fire going crackle crackle within ‘Come in,’ 
said this veck, ‘whoever you are. God help you, you poor 
victim, come in and let’s have a look at you ’ So I like 
staggered in, and it was no big act I was putang on, 
brothers, I really felt done and finished. This kind veck 
put his rookers round my pletchoes and pulled me into 
this room where the fire was, and of course I knew nght 
away now where it was and why HOME on the gate looked 
so familiar. I looked at this veck and he looked at me in a 
kind sort of way, and I remembered him well now Of 
course he would not remember me, for in those carefree 
days I and my so-called droogs did all our bolshy dratsing 
and fillymg and crasting m maskies which were real horror- 
show disguises. He was a shortish veck in middle age, 
thirty, forty, fifty, and he had ochkies on. ‘Sit down by the 
fire,’ he said, ‘and I’ll get you some whisky and warm 
water. Dear dear dear, somebody has been beating you 
up.’ And he gave a like tender look at my gulliver and 
litso. 

‘The police,’ I said. ‘The horrible ghastly police.’ 

‘Another victim,’ he said, like sighing. ‘A victim of the 
modern age I’ll go and get you that whisky and then I 
must dean up your wounds a little.’ And off he went. I 
had a look round this malenky comfortable room. It was 



nearly all books now and a fire and a couple of chairs, and 
you could viddy somehow that there wasn’t a woman livmg 
there On the table was a typewriter and a lot of like 
tumbled papers, and I remembered that this veck was a 
writer veck. A Clockwork Orange, that had been it. It was 
funny that that stuck in my mind. I must not let on, 
though, for I needed help and kindness now Those 
horrible grahzny bratchnies in that terrible white mesto 
had dohe that to me, makmg me need help and kindness 
now and forcing me to want to give help and kindness 
myself, if anybody would take it 
‘Here we are, then,’ said this veck returning He gave 
me this hot stimulating glassful to peet, and it made me 
feel better, and then he cleaned up these cuts on my litso 
Then he said* “You have a nice hot bath. I’ll draw it for 
you, and then you can tell me all about it over a nice hot 
supper which I’ll get ready while you’re having the bath ’ 
O my brothers, I could have wept at his kindness, and I 
think he must have viddied the old tears in my glazzies, 
for he said ‘There there there,’ patting me on the pletcho 
Anyway, I went up and had this hot bath, and he 
brought in pyjamas and an over-gown for me to put on, 
all warmed by the fire, also a very worn pair of toofles. 
And now, brothers, though I was aching and full of pains 
all over, I felt I would soon feel a lot better I ittied down- 
stairs and viddied that in the kitchen he had set the table 
with knives and forks and a fine big loaf of kleb, also a 
bottle of PjRIMA SAUCE, and soon he served out a nice 
fry of eggiwegs and lomticks of ham and bursting sausages 
and big bolshy mugs of hot sweet milky chai. It was mce 
sitting there in the warm, eating, and I found I was Tery 
hungry, so that after the fry I had to eat lomdck after lom- 
tick of kleb and butter spread with strawberry jam out of 


*59 



a bolshy great pot. ‘A lot better,’ I said ‘How can I ever 
repay?’ 

‘I think I know who you are,’ he said ‘If you are who 
I think you are, then you’ve come, my friend, to the nght 
place Wasn’t that your picture m the papers this morn- 
ing? Are you the poor victim of this hornble new 
technique? If so, then you have been sent here by Provi- 
dence Tortured in prison, then thrown out to be tortured 
by the police. My heart goes out to you, poor poOr boy ’ 
Brothers, I could not get a slovo in, though I had my rot 
wide open to answer his questions ‘You are not the first 
to come here in distress,’ he said ‘The police are fond of 
bringing their victims to the outskirts of this village. But 
it is providential that you, who are also another kind of 
victim, should come here Perhaps, then, you have heard 
of me?’ 

I had to be very careful, brothers. I said: ‘I have heard 
of A Clockwork Orange. I have not read it, but I have 
heard of it ’ 

‘Ah,’ he said, and his litso shone like the sun in its 
flaming morning glory. ‘Now tell me about yourself.’ 

‘Little enough to teU, sir,’ I said, all humble. ‘There was 
a foolish and boyish prank, my soealled friends persuad- 
ing or rather foremg me to break into the house of an 
old ptitsa - lady, I mean. There was no real harm meant 
Unfortunately the lady strmned her good old heart in 
trying to throw me out, though I was quite leady to go of 
my own accord, and then she died. I was accused of being 
the cause of her death. So I was sent to prison, sir,’ 

‘Yes yes yes, go on.’ 

‘Then I was picked out by the Minister of the Inferior 
or Interior to have this Ludovico’s veshch tried out on me.’ 

‘Tell me all about it,’ he said, leaning forward eager, 

ido 



his pullover elbows with all strawberry jam on them from 
the plate I’d pushed to one side So I told him all about it 
I told him the lot, all, my brothers He was very eager 
to hear all, his glazzies like shining and his goobers apart, 
while the grease on the plates grew harder harder harder 
When I had finished he got up from the table, nodding a 
lot and going hm hm hm, picking up the plates and other 
veshches from the table and taking them to the sink for 
washing up. I said. 

‘I will do that, sir, and gladly ’ 

‘Rest, rest, poor lad,’ he said, turning the tap on so that 
all steam came burping out. ‘You’ve sinned, I suppose, but 
your punishment has been out of all proportion. They 
have turned you into something other than a human being 
You have no power of choice any longer You are com- 
mitted to socially acceptable acts, a little machine capable 
only of good. And I see that clearly -that business about 
the marginal conditionings Music and the sexual act, 
literature and art, all must be a source now not of pleasure 
but of pain ’ 

‘That’s right, sir,’ I said, smoking one of this kind man’s 
cork-tipped cancers. 

‘They always bite off too much,’ he said, drying a plate 
like absent-mindedly ‘But the essential intention is the 
real sin A man who cannot choose ceases to be a man.’ 

‘That’s what the Charles said, sir,’ I said. ‘The prison 
chaplain, I mean.’ 

‘Did he, did he? Of course he did He’d have to, 
wouldn’t he, bang a Christian? Well, now then,’ he said, 
still mping the same plate he’d been wiping ten minutes 
ago, ‘we shall have a few people in to see you tomorrow I 
think you can be used, poor boy I think that you can 
help dislodge this overbearing (^vemment. To turn a 

i6i 



decent young man into a piece of clockwork should not, 
surely, be seen as any triumph for any government, save 
one that boasts of its repressiveness.’ He was still wiping 
this same plate. I said. 

‘Sir, you’re still wiping that same plate I agree with you, 
sir, about boasting. This Government seems to be very 
boastful.’ 

‘Oh,’ he said, hke viddymg this plate for the first time 
and then putting it down ‘I’m still not too handy,’ he said, 
‘with domestic chores. My wife used to do them all and 
leave me to my writing ’ 

‘Your wife, sir>’ I said. ‘Has she gone and left you?’ I 
really wanted to know about his wife, remembering very 
well 

‘Yes, left me,’ he said, in a hke loud and bitter goloss. 
‘She died, you see She was brutally raped and beaten The 
shock was very great It was in this house,’ his rookers 
were trembling, holding a vidping-up cloth, ‘in that room 
next door. I have had to steel myself to continue to live 
here, but she would have wished me to stay where her 
fragrant memory still lingers. Yes yes yes Poor little girl ’ 
I viddied all clearly, my brothers, what had happened 
that far-off nochy, and viddying myself on that job, I 
began to feel I wanted to sick and the pain started up in 
my gulliver. This veck viddied this, because my litso felt 
it was all drained of red red krovvy, very pale, and he 
would be able to viddy this, ‘You go to bed now,’ he said 
kindly. ‘I’ve got the spare room ready. Poor poor boy, you 
must have had a terrible time. A victim of the modem 
age, just as she was. Poor poor poor ^rl.’ 



I HAD a real horrorshow mght’s sleep, 
brotliers, with no dreams at all, and the 
morning was very clear and hke frosty, and 
there was the very pleasant like von of 
breakfast frymg away down below It took 
me some little time to remember where I was, as it always 
does, but It soon came back to me and then I felt like 
warmed and protected. But, as I laid there m the bed, 
waiting to be called down to breakfast, it struck me that I 
ought to get to know the name of this kind protecting and 
like motherly veck, so I had a pad round in my nagoy nogas 
looking for A Clockwork Orange, which would be bound 
to have his eemya in, he being the author. There was 
nothing in my bedroom except a bed and a chair and a 
light, so I ittied next door to this veck’s own room, and 
there I viddied his wife on the wall, a bolshy blown-up 
photo, so I felt a malenky bit sick remembering But there 
were two or three shelves of books there too, and there 
was, as I thought there must be, a copy of A Clockwork 
Orange, and on the back of the book, like on the spine, 
was the author’s eemya -F Alexander Good Bog, I 
thought, he is another Alex. Then I leafed through, stand- 
ing in my pyjamas and bare nogas but not feelmg one 
malenky bit cold, the cottage being warm all through, and 
I could not viddy what the book was about. It seemed 





written m a very bezoomny like style, full of Ah and Oh 
and that cal, but what seemed to come out of it was that 
all lewdies nowadays were being turned into machines and 
that they were really -you and me and him and kiss-my- 
sharries - more hke a natural growth like a frurt. F. Alex- 
ander seemed to think that we all like grow on what he 
called the world-tree in the world-orchard that like Bog 
or God planted, and we were there because Bog or God 
had need of us to quench his thirsty love, or soifte such 
cal I didn’t like the shoom of this at all, O my brothers, 
and wondered how bezoomny this F Alexander really 
was, perhaps driven bezoomny by his wife’s snuffing it. 
But then he called me down in a hke sane veck’s goloss, 
full of joy and love and all that cal, so down Your Humble 
Narrator went 

‘You’ve slept long,’ he said, ladling out boiled eggs and 
pulling black toast from under the grill ‘It’s nearly ten 
already I’ve been up hours, working.’ 

‘Writing another book, sir?’ I said 

‘No no, not that now,’ he said, and we sat down nice 
and droogy to the old crack crack crack of eggs and 
crackle crunch crimch of this black toast, very milky chai 
standing by in bolshy great morning mugs. ‘No, I’ve been 
on the phone to various people.’ 

‘I thought you didn’t have a phone,’ I said, spooning 
egg in and not watching out what I was saying. 

‘Why?’ he said, very alert like some skorry animal with 
an egg-spoon in its rooker. ‘Why shouldn’t you think I 
have a phone?’ 

‘Nothing,’ I said, ‘nothing, nothing.’ And I wondered, 
brothers, how much he remembered of the earlier part of 
that distant nochy, me coming to the door with ^e old 
tale and saying to phone the doctor and she sajnng no 

164 



phone He took a very close smot at me but then went 
back to being like kind and cheerful and spooning up the 
old eggiweg Munching away, he said 
‘Yes, I’ve rung up various people who will be interested 
in your case. You can be a very potent weapon, you see, in 
ensunng that this present evil and wicked Government is 
not returned in the forthcoming election. The Govern- 
ment’s big boast, you see, is the way it has dealt with 
crime these last months ’ He looked at me very close again 
over his steaming egg, and I wondered again if he was 
viddying what part I had so far played in his jeezny 
But he said: ‘Recruiting brutal young roughs for the police 
Proposing debilitating and will-sapping techmques of con- 
ditioning ’ All these long slovos, brothers, and a like mad 
or bezoomny look in his glazzies ‘We’ve seen it all before,’ 
he said, ‘in other countncs. The thin end of the wedge 
Before we know where we are we shall have the full 
apparatus of totalitarianism ’ ‘Dear dear dear,’ I thought, 
egging away and toast-crunching. I said 
‘Where do I come into all this, sir?’ 

‘You,’ he said, still with this bezoomny look, ‘are a hving 
wdtness to these diabolical proposals. The people, the 
common people must know, must see.’ He got up from 
his breakfast and started to walk up and down the Idtchen, 
from the sink to the like larder, saying very gromky 
‘Would they like their sons to become what you, poor 
victim, have become? Will not the Government itself now 
decide what is and what is not crime and pump out the 
life and guts and will of whoever sees fit to displease the 
Government?’ He became quieter but did not go back to 
his egg. Tve written an article,’ he said, ‘this mommg, 
while you were sleeping That will be out in a dky or so, 
together with your unhappy picture. You shall sign it. 



poor boy, a record of what they have done to you ’ I said 
‘And what do you get out of all this, sir? I mean, besides 
the pretty polly you’ll get for the article, as you call it? I 
mean, why are you so hot and strong against this Govern- 
ment, if I may make like so bold as to ask?’ 

He gripped the edge of the table and said, gritting his 
zoobies, which were very cally and all stained with cancer- 
smoke ‘Some of us have to fight. There are great tradi- 
tions of liberty to defend. I am no partisan man Where I 
see the infamy I seek to erase it Party names mean 
nothing. The tradition of hberty means all. The common 
people will let it go, oh yes They will sell liberty 
for a quieter life That is why they must be prodded, 
prodded — ’ And here, brothers, he picked up a fork and 
stuck it two or three razzes into the wall, so that it all got 
bent. Then he threw it on the floor Very kindly he said 
‘Eat well, poor boy, poor victim of the modern world,’ 
and I could viddy quite clear he was going off his gulhver. 
‘Eat, eat. Eat my egg as well.’ But I said- 
‘And what do I get out of this? Do I get cured of the 
way I am? Do I find myself able to slooshy the old Choral 
Symphony without being sick once more? Can I live like 
a normal jeezny again? What, sir, happens to me?’ 

He looked at me, brothers, as if he hadn’t thought of 
that before and, anyway, it didn’t matter compared with 
Liberty and all that cal, and he had a look of surprise at 
me saying what I said, as though I was being like selfish 
in wanting something for myself Then he said: ‘Oh, as I 
say, you’re a living witness, poor boy. Eat up ail your 
breakfast and then come and see what I’ve written, for 
it’s going into The Weekly Trumpet under your name, 
you unfortunate victim.’ 

Well, brothers, what he had written was a very lopg 

i66 



and very weepy piece of writing, and as I read it I felt 
very sorry for the poor malchick who was govoreeting 
about his sufferings and how the Government had sapped 
his will and how it was up to all lewdies to not let such a 
rotten and evil Government rule them again, and then of 
course I realized that the poor suffering malchick was none 
other than Y.H N. ‘Very good,’ I said. ‘Real horrorshow. 
Written well thou hast, O sir ’ And then he looked at me 
very naj;row and said 

‘What?’ It was like he had not slooshied me before 

‘Oh, that,’ I said, ‘is what we call nadsat talk. All the 
teens use that, sir ’ So then he ittied off to the kitchen to 
wash up the dishes, and I was left in these borrowed night 
platties and toofles, waiting to have done to me what was 
going to be done to me, because I had no plans for myself, 
O my brothers 

While the great F Alexander was in the kitchen a 
dingalingaling came at the door. ‘Ah,’ he creeched, coming 
out wiping his rookers, ‘it will be these people. I’ll go ’ So 
he went and let them in, a kind of rumbling hahaha of 
talk and hallo and filthy weather and how are things in 
the hallway, then they itned into the room with the fire 
and the books and the article about how I had suffered, 
viddying me and going Aaaaah as they did it. There were 
three lewdies, and F. Alex gave me their eemyas. Z. Dolin 
was a very wheezy smoky kind of a veck, coughing kashl 
kashl kashl with the end of a cancer in his rot, spilling 
ash all down his platties and then brushing it away with 
like very impatient rookers He was a malenky round veck, 
fat, with big thick-framed ochkies on. Then there was 
Something Something Rubinstein, a very tall and polite 
chelloveck with a real gentleman’s goloss, very starry with 
a like eggy beard. And lastly there was D B da Silva who 

167 


M 



was like skorry in his movements and had this strong von 
of scent coming from him. They all had a real horror- 
show look at me and seemed like overjoyed with what 
they viddied Z Dolin said 

‘All right, all right, eh^ What, a superb device he can 
be, this boy If anything, of course, he could for preference 
look even iller and more zombyish than he does Any- 
thing for the cause No doubt we can think of something.’ 

I did not like that crack about zombyish, brothers, and 
so I said: ‘What goes on, brames? What dost thou in mind 
for thy httle droog have?’ And then F Alexander 
swooshed in with. 

‘Strange, strange, that manner of voice pricks me We’ve 
come into contact before, I’m sure we have’ And he 
brooded, like frowmng I would have to watch this, O my 
brothers. D. B da Silva said 

‘Public meetings, mainly To exhibit you at pubhc 
meetings will be a tremendous help And, of course, the 
newspaper angle is all tied up. A ruined life is the 
approach. We must inflame all hearts.’ He showed his 
thirty-odd zoobies, very white against his dark-coloured 
htso, he looking a malenky bit like some foreigner. I 
said: 

‘Nobody will tell me what I get out of all this Tortured 
in jail, thrown out of my home by my own patents and 
their filthy overbearing lodger, beaten by old men and 
near-killed by the millicents - what is to laecome of me?’ 
The Rubinstem veck came in with: 

Tou will see, boy, that the Party will not be ungrateful. 
Oh, no. At the end of it all there wiE be some very accept- 
able little surprise for you. Just you wait and see.’ 

‘There’s only one veshch I require,’ I creeched out, ‘and 
that’s to be normal and healthy as I was in the starry days, 

i68 



having my malenky bit of fun with real droogs and not 
those who just call themselves that and are really more 
like traitors. Can you do that, eh? Can any veck restore 
me to what I was? That's what I want and that’s what I 
want to know ’ 

Kashi kashl kashl, coughed this Z Dolin ‘A martyr to 
the cause of Liberty/ he said Ton have your part to play 
and don’t forget it. Meanwhile, we shall look after you ’ 
And he*began to stroke my left rooker as if I was like an 
idiot, grinning in a bezoonmy way I creeched- 

*Stop treating me like a thing that’s like got to be just 
used I’m not an idiot you can impose on, you stupid 
bratchmes. Ordinary prestoopnicks are stupid, but I’m not 
ordinary and nor am I dim Do you slooshy?’ 

'Dim,’ said F Alexander, like musing. 'Dim. That was 
a name somewhere. Dim’ 

'Eh^’ I said 'What’s Dim got to do with it? What do 
you know about Dim?’ And then I said 'Oh, Bog help 
us ’ I didn’t like the like look in F Alexander’s glazzies 
I made for the door, wanting to go upstairs and get my 
platties and then itty off 

'I could almost believe,’ said F Alexandei, showing his 
stained zoobies, his glazzies mad 'But such things are 
impossible. For, by Christ, if he were I’d tear him. I’d 
split him, by God, yes yes, so I would ’ 

'There/ said D B da Silva, stroking his chest like he 
was a doggie to calm him down. 'It’s all in the past It was 
other people altogether We must help this poor victim. 
That’s what we must do now, remembering the Future 
and our Cause ’ 

'I’ll just get my platues,’ I said, at the stair-foot, 'that 
is to say dothes, and then 111 be ittying off all on my oddy 
knocky, I moan, my gratitude for all, but I have my own 

169 



jeezny to live ' Because, bi others, I wanted to get out of 
here real skorry But Z. Dolin said. 

‘Ah, no. We have you, fnend, and we keep you. You 
come with us Everything will be all right, you’ll see ’ And 
he came up to me like to grab hold of my rooker again 
Then, brothers, I thought of fight, but thinking of fight 
made me like want to collapse and sick, so I just stood 
And then I saw this like madness in F, Alexander’s 
glazzies and said • 

‘Whatever you say. I am m your rookers But let’s get 
it started and all over, brothers ’ Because what I wanted 
now was to get out of this mesto called HOME I was 
beginmng not to like the like look of the glazzies of F 
Alexander one malenky bit 

‘Good,’ said this Rubinstein ‘Get dressed and let’s get 
started.’ 

‘Dim dim dim,’ F Alexander kept saying in a hke low 
mutter ‘What or who was this Dim?’ I ittied upstairs real 
skorry and dressed in near two seconds flat. Then I was 
out with these three and into an auto, Rubinstein one 
side of me and Z. Dolin coughing kashl kashl kashl the 
other side, D B da Silva doing the driving, into the town 
and to a flatblack not really all that distant from what 
had used to be my own flatblock or home. ‘Come, boy, 
out,’ said Z. Dolin, coughing to make the cancer-end in 
his rot glow red like some malenky furnace. ‘This is where 
you shall be installed.’ So we ittied m, and there was hke 
another of these Dignity of Labour vcshches on the wall 
of the vestibule, and we upped in the lift, brothers, and 
then went into a flat like all the flats of all the flatblocks 
of the town. Very very malenky, with two bedrooms and 
one live-eat-work-room, the table of this all covered with 
books and papers and ink and bottles and all that cal. 

170 



‘Here is your new home,’ said D B. da Silva ‘Settle here, 
boy Food is in the food-cupboard Pyjamas are in a 
drawer Rest, rest, perturbed spirit’ 

‘Eh?’ I said, not quite ponying that. 

‘All right,’ said Rubinstein, with his starry goloss ‘We 
are now leaving you Work has to be done. We’ll be with 
you later Occupy yourself as best you can ’ 

‘One thing,' coughed Z Dohn kashl kashl kashl ‘You 
saw wh3t stirred in the tortured memory of our friend F 
Alexander. Was it, by any chance — ? That is to say, did 
you — ? I think you know what I mean We won’t let it go 
any further’ 

‘I’ve paid,’ I said ‘Bog knows I’ve paid for what I did 
I’ve paid not only like for myself hut for those hratchnies 
too that called themselves ray droogs’ I felt violent so 
then I felt a bit sick ‘I’ll lay down a hit,’ I said ‘I’ve been 
through terrible terrible times.’ 

‘You have,’ said D. B. da Silva, showing all his thirty 
zoobies. ‘You do that ’ 

So they left me, brothers They ittied off about their 
business, which I took to be about politics and all that cal, 
and I was on the bed, all on my oddy knocky with every- 
thing very very quiet I just laid there with my sabo^ 
kicked off my nogas and my tie loose, like all bewildered 
and not knowing what sort of a jeezny I was going to live 
now. And all sorts of like pictures kept like passmg 
through my gulliver, of the different chellovecks I’d met 
at school and in the Staja, and the different veshches that 
had happened to me, and how there was not one v«:k you 
could trust in the whole bolshy world. And then I like 
dozed off, brothers. 

When I woke up I could slooshy music coming out of 
the wall, real gromky, and it was that that had dragged 



me out of my bit of like sleep It was a symphony that I 
knew real horrorshow but had not slooshied for many a 
year, namely the Symphony Number Three of the Danish 
veck Otto Skadelig, a very gromky and violent piece, 
especially in the first movement, which was what was play- 
ing now I slooshied for two seconds in like interest and 
]oy, but then it all came over me, the start of the pain and 
the sickness, and I began to groan deep down in my 
keeshkas And then there I was, me who had loved music 
so much, crawling ofE the bed and going oh oh oh to my- 
self, and then bang bang banging on the wall creechmg* 
‘Stop, stop It, turn it off I’ But it went on and it seemed to 
be like louder So I crashed at the wall till my knuckles 
were all red red krowy and torn skm, creechmg and 
creechmg, but the music did not stop. Then I thought I 
had to get away from it, so I lurched out of the malenky 
bedroom and ittied skorry to the front door of the flat, 
but this had been locked from the outside and I could 
not get out. And all the time the music got more and more 
gromky, like it was all a deliberate torture, O my brothers. 
So I stuck my little fingers real deep in my ookos, but 
the trombones and kettledrums blasted through gromky 
enough. So I creeched again for them to stop and went 
hammer hammer hammer on the wall, but it made not 
one malenky bit of difference. ‘Oh, what am I to do?’ I 
boohooed to myself. ‘Oh, Bog in Heaven help me ’ I was 
like wandering all over the fiat in pain and sickness, try- 
ing to shut out the music and like groaning deep out of 
my guts, and then on top of the pile of books and papers 
and all that cal that was on the table in the living-room 
I viddied what I had to do and what I had wanted to do 
until those old men m the Public Bibho and then' Dim 
and BBlyboy disguised as rozzes stopped me, and that was 


17a 



to do myself in, to snuff it, to blast off foi ever out of this 
wicked and cruel world What I viddied was the* slovo 
DEATH on the cover of a like pamphlet, even though it 
was only DEATH TO THE GOVERNMENT And like 
It was Fate there was another like malenky booklet which 
had an open window on the cover, and it said ‘Open the 
window to fresh air, fresh ideas, a new way of living ’ And 
so I knew that was hke tellmg me to iBnish it all off by 
jumping; out One moment of pain, perhaps, and then 
sleep for ever and ever and ever. 

The music was still pouring in all brass and drums and 
the violins miles up through the wall. The window in the 
room where I had laid down was open I ittied to it and 
viddied a fair drop to the autos and buses and walking 
chellovecks below I creeched out to the world’ ‘Goodbye, 
goodbye, may Bog forgive you for a ruined life ' Then I 
got on to the sill, the music blasting away to my left, and 
I shut my glazzies and felt the cold wind on my litso, then 
I jumped 



I JUMPED, O my brothers, and I feK on the 
sidewalk hard, hut I did not snufE it, oh no 
If I had snuffed it I would not be here to 
write what I written have. It seems that 
the jump was not from a big enough 
heighth to kill But I cracked my back and my wrists 
and nogas and felt very bolshy pam before I passed out, 
brothers, with astonished and surprised litsos of chello- 
vecks in the streets looking at me from above And just 
before I passed out I viddied clear that not one chello- 
veck in the whole hornd world was for me and that that 
music through the wall had all been hke arranged by 
those who were supposed to be my hke new droogs and 
that it was some veshch like this that they wanted for 
their horrible selfish and boastful politics All that was in 
like a million millionth part of one minoota before I threw 
over the world and the sky and the litsos of the staring 
chellovecks that were above me. 

Where I was when I came back to jeezny after a long 
black black gap of it might have been a million years was 
a hosjntal, all white and with this von of hospitals you 
^t, all like sour and smug and clean. These antiseptic 
veshches you get in hospitals should have a real horror- 
show von of like fiTing onions or of flowers. I came very 
slow back to knowing who I was and I was all bound up 



174 




in white and I could not feel anything in my plott, pain 
nor sensation nor any veshch at all. All round my guUiver 
was a bandage and there were bits of stuff hke stuck to 
my litso, and my rookcrs were all in bandages and like 
bits of stick were hke fixed to my fingers like on it might 
be flowers to make them grow straight, and my poor old 
nogas were all straightened out too, and it was all 
bandages and wire cages and into my right rooker, near 
the plftcho, was red red krowy dripping from a jar up- 
side down But I could not feel anything, O my brothers 
There was a nurse simng by my bed and she was reading 
some book that was all like very dim print and you could 
viddy It was a story because of a lot of inverted commas, 
and she was like breathing hard uh uh uh over it, so it 
must have been a story about the old in-out in-out She 
was a real horrorshow devotchka, this nurse, with a very 
red rot and like long lashes over her glazzies, and under 
her hke very stiff umform you could viddy she had very 
horrorshow groodies So I said to her “What gives, O my 
little sister? Come thou and have a nice lay-down with 
your malenky droog in this bed.’ But the slovos didn’t 
come out horrorshow at all, it being as though my rot 
was all stiffened up, and I could feel with my yahzick that 
some of my zoobies were no longer there But this nurse 
like jumped and dropped her book on the floor and 
said 

‘Oh, you’ve recovered consciousness.’ 

That was like a big rotful for a malenky ptitsa hke her, 
and I tried to say so, but the slovos came out only like er 
cr er. She ittied off and left me on my oddy knocky, and I 
could viddy now that I was in a malenky room of my own, 
not in one of these long wards like I had been m as a 
very little malchick, full of coughing dymg starry vecks 


J75 



all round to make you want to get well and fit again 
It had been like diphtheria I had had then, O my 
brothers. 

It was like now as though I could not hold to being 
consaous all that long, because I was like asleep again 
almost right away, very skorry, but in a minoota or two 
I was sure that this nurse ptitsa had come back and had 
brought chellovecks in white coats with her and they were 
viddying me very frowning and going hm hm hm at Your 
Humble Narrator. And with them I was sure there was 
the old Charles from the Staja govoreeting" ‘Oh my son, 
my son,’ breathing a like very stale von of whisky on to 
me and then saymg- “But I would not stay, oh no. I could 
not in no wise subscribe to what those bratchmes are 
going to do to other poor prestoopmcks. So I got out and 
am preaching sermons now about it all, my little beloved 
son in J.C ’ 

I woke up again later on and who should I viddy there 
round the bed but the three from whose flat I had jumped 
out, namely D. B. da Silva and Something Something 
Rubinstdin and Z. Dolin. ‘Friend,’ one of these vecks was 
saying, hut I could not viddy or slooshy horrorshow 
which one, ‘Mend, little Mend,’ this goloss was saying, 
‘the people are on fire with indignanon You have killed 
those horrible boastful villains’ chances of re-election. 
They will go and will go for ever and ever You have 
served Liberty well.’ I tried to say* 

‘If I had died it would have been even better for you 
political bratchmes, would it not, pretending and treacher- 
ous droogs as you arc.’ But all that came out was er er 
er. Then one of these three seemed to hold out a lot of 
bits cut from gazettas and what I could viddy was a 
horrible picture of me all krowy on a stretcher being 

176 



carried off and I seemed to like remember a kind of a pop- 
ping of lights which must have been photographer vecks. 
Out of one glazz I could read like headlines which were 
sort of trembling in the rooker of the chelloveck that held 
them, like BOY VICTIM OF CRIMINAL REFORM 
SCHEME and GOVERNMENT AS MURDERER and 
then there was like a picture of a veck that looked faimliar 
to me and it said OUT OUT OUT, and that would be 
the Minister of the Inferior or Interior Then the nurse 
ptitsa said ’ 

Tou shouldn’t be exciting him like that. You shouldn’t 
be doing anything that will make him upset. Now come 
on, let’s have you out ’ I tried to say: 

*Out out out/ but it was er er er again Anyway, these 
three political vecks went And I went, too, only back to 
the land, back to all blackness lit up by like odd dreams 
which I didn’t know whether they were dreams or not, 
O my brothers. Like for instance I had this idea of my 
whole plott or body being like emptied of as it might be 
dirty water and then filled up again with clean And then 
there were really lovely and horrorshow dreams of being 
in some veck’s auto that had been crasted by me and driv^ 
ing up and down the world all on my oddy knocky run- 
ning lewdies down and hearing them creech they were 
dying, and in me no pain and no sickness* And also there 
were dreams of doing the old m-out in-out with devotchkas, 
forcing like them down on the ground and making them 
have it and everybody standing roxmd clapping their 
rookers and cheering like bezoomny. And then I woke up 
again and it was my pee and em come to viddy their ill 
son, my em boohooing real horrorshow. I could govoreet 
a lot better now and could say: 

*Well well well well well, what gives? What makes you 



think you are like welcome?’ My papapa said, in a like 
ashamed way: 

‘You were m the papers, son It said they had done 
great wrong to you It said how the Government drove 
you to try and do yourself in. And it was our fault too, 
in a way, son Your home’s your home, when all’s said 
and done, son ’ And my mum kept on going boohoohoo 
and looking ugly as kiss-my-sharries So I said 
‘And how beeth thy new son Joe? Well and heallSiy and 
prosperous, I trust and pray’ My mum said* 

‘Oh, Alex Alex Owwwwwwww ’ My papapa said 
‘A very awkward thing, son. He got into a bit of trouble 
with the police and was done by the pohce ’ 

‘Really?’ I said. ‘Really? Such a good sort of chelloveck 
and all Amazed proper I am, honest ’ 

‘Minding his own business he was,' said my pee ‘And 
the police told him to move on. Waiting at a corner he 
was, son, to see a ^rl he was going to meet. And they 
told him to move on and he said he had rights like every- 
body else, and then they sort of fell on top of him and 
hit him about cruel.’ 

‘Terrible,’ I said. ‘Really terrible And where is the poor 
boy now?’ 

‘Owwwww,’ boohooed my mum. ‘Gone back owww- 
wwwme.’ 

‘Yes,’ said dad ‘He’s gone back to his own home town 
to get better. They’ve had to ^ve his job here to some- 
body else.’ 

‘So now,’ I said, ‘you’re willing for me to move back in 
again and things be like they were before.’ 

Tes, son,’ said my papapa ‘Please, son ’ 

‘I’ll consider it,’ I said Til thmk about it real careful ' 
‘Owwwww,’ went my mum 

178 



"Ah, shut it,’ I said, "or Til give you something proper 
to yowl and creech about. Kick your zoobies in I will ’ 
And, O my brothers, saying that made me feel a malenky 
bit better, as if all like fresh red red krovvy was flowing 
all through my plott That was something I had to think 
about It was like as though to get better I had had to get 
worse 

"That’s no way to speak to your mother, son,’ said my 
papapgp, "After all, she brought you into the world ’ 

"Yes,’ I said, "and a right grahzny vonny world too.’ I 
shut my glazzies tight m like pain and said’ "Go away 
now. I’ll think about coming back. But things will have 
to be very different.’ 

‘Yes, son,’ said my pee "Anything you say.’ 

‘You’ll have to make up your mind,* I said, "who’s to 
be boss ’ 

"Owwwwww,* my mum went on 

‘Very good, son,’ said my papapa ‘Things will be as 
you like Only get well,’ 

When they had gone I laid and thought a bit about 
different veshches, hke all different pictures passing 
through my gulliver, and when the nurse ptitsa came 
back in and like straightened the sheets on the bed I said 
to her. 

"How long is it I’ve been in here?’ 

"A week or so,’ she said 

"And what have they been domg to me?’ 

‘Well,’ she said, "you were aU broken up and bruised 
and had sustained severe concussion and had lost a lot of 
blood. They’ve had to put all that right, haven’t they?’ 

"But/ I said, "has anyone been doing anything with my 
gulliver^ What I mean is, have they been playing around 
with inside like my brain?’ 


?79 



‘Whatever they’ve done,’ she said, ‘it’ll all be for the 
best ’ 

But a couple of days later a couple of like doctor vecks 
came in, both youngish vecks with these very sladky 
smiles, and they had hke a picture book with them. One 
of them said ‘We want you to have a look at these and 
to tell us what you think about them. All right^’ 

‘What giveth, O httle droo^es?’ I said. ‘What new 
bezoomny idea dost thou in mind have?’ So thiy both 
had a like embarrassed smeck at that and then they sat 
down either side of the bed and opened up this book On 
the first page there was like a photograph of a bird-nest 
full of eggs. 

‘Yes?’ one of these doctor vecks said 

‘A bird-nest,’ I said, ‘full of like eggs Very very mce.’ 

‘And what would you like to do about it?’ the other one 
said. 

‘Oh,* I said, ‘smash them. Kck up the lot and like throw 
them against a wall or a chff or something and then viddy 
them aH smash up real horrorshow ’ 

‘Good good,’ they both said, and then the page was 
turned. It was like a picture of one of these bolshy great 
birds called peacocks with all its tail spread out in all 
colours in a very boastful way. ‘Yes?’ said one of these 
vecks. 

‘I would Uke,’ I said, ‘to pull out hke all those feathers 
in its tail and slooshy it creech blue murder For being so 
like boastful ’ 

‘Good,’ they both said, ‘good good good ’ And they went 
on turning the pages. There were like pictures of real 
horrorshow devotchkas, and I said I would like to give 
them the old in-out in-out with lots of ultra-violence. 
There were like pictures of chellovecks being given the 

tSo 



boot straight in the litso and all red red krovvy every- 
where and I said I would like to be in on that. And there 
was a picture of the old nagoy droog of the prison charhe’s 
carrying his cross up a hill, and I said I would hke to have 
the old hammer and nails Good good good I said- 
‘What IS all this?’ 

‘Deep hypnopaedia,’ or some such slovo, said one of 
these two vecks. ‘You seem to be cured.’ 

‘Cured?’ I said. ‘Me tied down to this bed like this and 
you say cured? Eliss my sharries is what I say ’ 

‘Wait,’ the other said ‘It won’t be long now ’ 

So I waited and, O my brothers, I got a lot better, 
munchmg away at eggiwegs and lomticks of toast and 
peeting bolshy great mugs of milky chai, and then one 
day they said I was going to have a very very very special 
visitor. 

‘Who?’ I said, while they straightened the bed and 
combed my luscious glory for me, me having the bandage 
ofE now from my gulliver and the hair growing again. 

‘You’ll see, you’ll see,’ they said. And I viddied all right. 
At two-thirty of the afternoon there were like all photo- 
graphers and men from gazettas with notebooks and 
pencils and all that cal. And, brothers, they near 
trumpeted a bolshy fanfare for this great and important 
veck who was coming to viddy Your Humble Narrator. 
And in he came, and of course it was none other than the 
Minister of the Interior or Inferior, dressed in the heighth 
of fashion and with this very upper-class haw haw haw 
goloss. Flash flash bang went the cameras when he put out 
his rooker to me to shake it. I said: 

‘Well well well well well. What ^veth then, old 
droo^e?’ Nobody seemed to quite pony that, but some- 
body said in a like harsh goloss. 



‘Be more respectful, boy, in addressing the Mimster ’ 
‘Yarbles,’ I said, like snarling like a doggie ‘Bolshy 
great yarblockos to thee and thine * 

‘All right, all right,’ said the Interior Inferior one very 
skorry ‘He speaks to me as a fnend, don’t you, son?’ 

‘I am everyone’s friend,’ I said ‘Except to my enemies.’ 
‘And who are your enemies?’ said the Minister, while 
all the gazetta vecks went scribble scribble scribble. ‘Tell 
us that, my boy ’ 

‘All who do me wrong,’ I said, ‘are my enemies ’ 

‘Well,’ said the Int Inf Min, sitting down by my bed ‘I 
and the Government of which I am a member want you 
to regard us as friends. Yes, friends We have put you 
right, yes? You are gettmg the best of treatment. We never 
wished you harm, but there are some who did and do. And 
I think you know who those are ’ 

‘All who do me wrong,’ I said, ‘are my enemies.’ 

‘Yes yes yes,* he said. ‘There are certain men who 
wanted to use you, yes, use you for pohtical ends. They 
would have been glad, yes, glad for you to be dead, for 
they thought they could then blame it all on the Govern- 
ment. I think you know who those men are ’ 

T did not,’ I said, ‘like the look of them.’ 

‘There is a man,’ said the Intinfmin, ‘called F 
Alexander, a writer of subversive literature, who has been 
howling for your blood He has been mad with desire to 
stick a kmfe in you. But you’re safe from him now We 
put him away’ 

‘He was supposed to be like a droogie,’ I said ‘Like a 
mother to me was what he was.’ 

‘He found out that you had done wrong to him. At 
least,’ said the Min very very skorry, ‘he believed you had 
done wrong. He formed this idea in his mind that you had been responsible for the death of someone near and 
dear to him ’ 

‘What you mean/ I said, ‘is that he was told/ 

‘He had this idea,’ said the Min ‘He was a menace. We 
put him away for his own protection. And also,’ he said, 
‘for yours ’ 

‘Kind,’ I said ‘Most kind of thou ’ 

‘When you leave here,’ said the Min, ‘you will have no 
worries AVe shall see to everything A good job on a good 
salary. Because you are helpmg us ’ 

‘Am I?’ I said 

‘We always help our friends, don’t we?’ And then he 
took my rooker and some veck creeched ‘Smile 1’ and I 
smiled hke bezoomny without thinking, and then flash 
flash crack flash bang there were pictures being taken of 
me and the Intinfmin all droogy together. ‘Good boy/ said 
this great chelloveck ‘Good good boy. And now, see, a 
present ’ 

What was brought in now, brothers, was a big shiny 
box, and I viddied clear what sort of a veshch it was. It 
was a stereo. It was put down next to the bed and opened 
up and some veck plugged its lead into the wall-socket. 
'Wbat shall it be?’ asked a veck with ochkies on his 
nose, and he had in his rookers lovely shiny sleeves 
full of music ‘Mozart? Beethoven? Schoenberg? Carl 
Orff?’ 

‘The Ninth,’ I said ‘The glorious Ninth.’ 

And the Ninth it was, O my brothers- Everybody began 
to leave nice and quiet while I laid there with my glazzies 
closed, sloQshying the lovely music The Min said. ‘Good 
good boy,’ patting me on the pletcho, then he ittied off. 
Only one veck was left, saying ‘Sign here, please.* I opened 
my glazzies up to sign, not knowing what I was signing 

and not, O my brothers, caring either Then I was left 
alone with the glorious Ninth of Ludwig van 
Oh, it was gorgeosity and yumyumyum When it came 
to the Scherzo I could viddy myself very clear running 
and running on like very light and mysterious nogas, 
carving the whole litso of the creeching world with my 
cut-throat britva And there was the slow movement and 
the lovely last singing movement still to come, I was cured 
all light 


“What’s it going to be then, eh?’ 

There was me, Your Humble Narrator, 
and my three droogs, that is Len, Rick, 
and Bully, Bully being called Bully be- 
cause of his bolshy big neck and very 
gromky goloss which was just hke some bolshy great bull 
bellowing auuuuuuuuh We were sitting m the Korova 
Milkbar making up our rassoodocks what to do with the 
evening, a flip dark chill winter bastard though dry. All 
round were chellovecks well away on milk plus vellocet 
and synthemesc and drencrom and other veshches which 
take you far far far away from this wicked and real world 
into the land to viddy Bog And All His Holy Angels And 
Saints m your left sabog with Ughts bursting and spurting 
all over your mozg What we were peering was the old 
moloko with knives in it, as we used to say, to sharpen 
you up and make you ready for a bit of dirty twenty-to- 
one, but Fve told you all that before 
We were dressed in the heighth of fashion, which in 
those days was these very wide trousers and a very loose 
black shiny leather like jerkin over an open-necked shirt 
with a like scarf tucked in. At this ume too it was the 
heighth of fashion to use the old britva on the gullivcr, 
so that most of the gulliver was like bald and there was 
hair only on the sides But it was always the same on the 


old nogas -real horrorshow bolshy big boots for kicking 
litsos in 

‘What’s It going to be then, eh?’ 

I was like the oldest of we four, and they all looked up 
to me as their leader, but I got the idea sometimes that 
Bully had the thought in his guUiver that he would like 
to take over, this being because of his bigness and the 
gromky goloss that bellowed out of him when he was on 
the warpath. But all the ideas came from Your Humble, 
O my brothers, and also there was this veshch that I had 
been famous and had had my picture and articles and all 
that cal in the gazettas. Also I had by far the best job of 
all we four, being in the National Gramodisc Archives 
on the music side with a real horrorshow carman full of 
pretty poUy at the week’s end and a lot of nice free discs 
for my own malenky self on the side 

This evening in the Korova there was a fair number of 
vecks and ptitsas and devotchkas and malchicks smecking 
and peeting away, and cutting through their govoreeting 
and the burbhng of the in-the-landers with their ‘Gorgor 
fallatuke and the worm sprays in filltip slaughterballs’ and 
all that cal you could slooshy a popdisc on the stereo, this 
being Ned Achimota singing ‘That Day, Yeah, That Day’ 
At the counter were three devotchkas dressed in the 
heighth of nadsat fashion, that is to say long uncombed 
hair dyed white and false groodies sticking out a metre or 
more and very very tight short skirts with all like frothy 
white underneath, and Bully kept saying ‘Hey, get in 
there we could, three of us Old I,en is not like interested 
Leave old Len alone with his God.' And Len kept saying 
TTarbles yarbles. Where is the spint of all for one and 
one for all, eh boy?’ Suddenly I felt both very very tired 
and also full of tingly energy, and I said* 

‘Out out out out out ’ 

‘Where to^’ said Rick, who had a litso like a frog’s 
‘Oh, ]ust to viddy what’s doing in the great outside,’ I 
said But somehow, my brothers, I felt very bored and a 
bit hopeless, and I had been feeling that a lot these days. 
So I turned to the chelloveck nearest me on the big 
plush seat that ran nght round the whole mesto, a chello- 
veck, that is, who was burbhng away under the influence, 
and I fisted him real skorry ack ack ack in the belly. But 
he felt it not, brothers, only burbling away with his ‘Cart 
cart virtue, where in toptails heth the poppoppicoms?’ So 
we scatted out into the big winter nochy 
We walked down Marghanita Boulevard and there were 
no miUicents patrolling that way, so when we met a starry 
veck coming away from a news-kiosk where he had been 
kupetnng a gazetta I said to Bully ‘All nght, Bully boy, 
thou canst if thou like wishest.’ More and more these days 
I had been just giving the orders and standing back to 
viddy them being carried out. So Bully cracked into him 
er er er, and the other two tripped him and kicked at him, 
smecking away, while he was down and then let him crawl 
off to where he lived, like whimpenng to himself. Bully 
said; 

‘How about a mce yummy glass of something to keep out 
the cold, O Alex^’ For we were not too far from the Duke 
of New York The other two nodded yes yes yes but all 
looked at me to viddy whether that was all ri^t. I nodded 
too and so off we ittied. Inside the snug there were these 
starry ptitsas or sharps or baboochkas you will remember 
from the be^nning and they aU started on their ‘Evening, 
lads, God bless you, boys, best lads living, that’s what you 
are,’ waiting for us to say: ‘What’s it going to be, girls?’ 
Bully rang the coUocoll and a waiter came in rubbing his 


rookers on his grazzy apron ‘Cutter on the table, droogies,’ 
said Bully, pulling out his own rattling and chinking 
mound of deng ‘Scotchmen for us and the same for the 
old bahoochkas, eh?’ And then I said 

‘Ah, to hell Let them buy their own ’ I didn’t know 
what It was, but these last days I had become hke mean 
There had come into my guUiver a like desire to keep all 
my pretty polly to myself, to like hoard it all up for some 
reason Bully said: *’ 

‘What ^ves, biatty? What’s coming over old Alex?’ 

‘Ah, to hell,’ I said. ‘I don’t know I don’t know What 
it is IS I don’t hke just throwing away my hard-earned 
pretty polly, that’s what it is ’ 

‘Earned?’ said Rick ‘Earned? It doesn’t have to be 
earned, as well thou knowest, old droogie Took, that’s all, 
just took, like ’ And he smecked real gromky and I 
viddied one or two of his zoobies weren’t all that horror- 
show. 

‘Ah,’ I said, Tvc got some thinking to do ’ But viddy- 
ing these baboochkas looking all eager hke for some free 
ale, I hke shrugged my pletchoes and pulled out my 
own cutter from my trouser carman, notes and coin all 
mixed together, and plonked it tinkle crackle on the 
table. 

‘Scotchmen all round, right,’ said the waiter. But for 
some reason I said: 

‘No, boy, for me make it one small beer, right’ Len 
said’ 

‘This I do not much go for,’ and he began to put his 
rooker on my gulliver, like kiddmg I must have fever, 
but I hke snarled doggy*wise for him to give over skorry. 
‘All right, all right, droog,’ he said. ‘As thou like sayest.’ 
But Bully was having a smot with his rot open at some- 


thing that had come out of my carman with the pretty 
polly I’d put on the table. He said 
‘Well well well And we never knew ’ 

‘Give me that/ I snarled and grabbed it skorry I 
couldn't explain how it had got there, brothers, but it 
was a photograph I had scissored out of the old gazetta 
and it was of a baby. It was of a baby gurgling goo goo 
goo with all like moloko dnbbhng from its rot and look- 
ing upland like smecking at everybody, and it was all 
nagoy and its flesh was like in all folds with being a very 
fat baby. There was then like a bit of haw haw haw 
struggling to get hold of this bit of paper from me, so I 
had to snarl again at them and I grabbed the photo and 
tore It up into tiny teeny pieces and let it fall like a bit of 
snow on to the floor The whisky came in then and the 
starry baboochkas said. ‘Good health, lads, God bless you, 
boys, the best lads living, that's what you are,' and all 
that cal And one of them who was all lines and wrinkles 
and no zoobies in her shrunken old rot said ‘Don't tear 
up money, son If you don't need it give it them as 
does,' which was very bold and forward of her But Rick 
said: 

‘Money that was not, O baboochka It was a picture of 
a dear little itsy witsy bitsy bit of a baby.' I said. 

I'm getting just that bit tired, that I am. It's you who's 
the babies, you lot. Scoffing and grinning and all you can 
do is smeck and give people bolshy cowardly tolchocks 
when they can't give them back.' Bully said 
‘Well now, we always thought it was you who was the 
king of that and also the teacher Not well, that’s the 
trouble with thou, old droogie.' 

I viddied this sloppy glass of beer I had on the table m 
front of me and felt like all vomity within, so I went 


‘Aaaaah’ and poured all the frothy vonny cal all over the 
floor One of the starry putsas said 

‘Waste not want not/ I said 

‘Look, droogies Listen, Tonight I am somehow just not 
in the mood I know not why or how it is, but there it is 
You three go your own ways this night wise, leaving me 
out Tomorrow we shall meet same place same time, me 
hoping to be hke a lot better ’ 

‘Oh/ said Bully, ‘right sorry I am ' But you could viddy 
a hke gleam in his glazzies, because now he would be 
taking over for this nochy Power power, everybody hke 
wants power. ‘We can postpone till tomorrow,’ said Bully, 
‘what we in mind had. Namely, that bit of shop-crasting 
in Gagarin Street Flip horrorshow takings there, droog, 
for the having’ 

‘No/ I said ‘You postpone nothing. You just carry on 
in your own hke style Now,’ I said, ‘I itty off.’ And I got 
up from my chair 

‘Where to, then?’ asked Rick. 

‘That know I not,’ I said ‘Just to be on hke my own 
and sort things out ’ You could viddy the old baboochkas 
were real puzzled at me going out hke that and like all 
morose and not the bright and smecking malchickiwick 
you will remember But I said ‘Ah, to hell, to hell,’ and 
scatted out all on my oddy knocky into the street. 

It was dark and there was a wind sharp as a nozh get- 
ting up, and there were very very few lewdies about. There 
were these patrol cars with brutal rozzes inside them like 
cruising about, and now and then on the corner you would 
viddy a couple of very young millicents stamping against, 
the bitchy cold and letting out steam breath on the winter 
air, O my brothers I suppose really a lot of the old ultra- 
violence and crasting was dying out now, the rozzes being 



so brutal with who they caught, though it had become 
like a fight between naughty nadsats and the rozzes who 
could be more skorry with the nozh and the britva and 
the stick and even the gun. But what was the matter with 
me these days was that I didn’t like care much It was like 
something soft getting into me and I could not pony why 
What I wanted these days I did not know Even the music 
I liked to slooshy in my own malenky den was what I 
would have smecked at before, brothers I was slooshying 
more like malenky romantic songs, what they call Lteder, 
just a goloss and a piano, very qmet and like yeamy, 
different from when it had been all bolshy orchestras and 
me lying on the bed between the violins and the trom- 
bones and kettledrums There was something happemng 
inside me, and I wondered if it was like some disease 
or if It was what they had done to me that time 
upsetting my gulliver and perhaps going to make me 
real bezoomny 

So thinking hke this with my gulliver bent and my 
rookers stuck in my trouser carmans I walked the town, 
brothers, and at last I began to feel very tired and also in 
great need of a nice bolshy chasha of milky chai. Think- 
ing about tMs chai, I got a sudden like picture of me sit- 
ting before a bolshy fire in an armchair peering away at 
this chai, and what was funny and very very strange was 
that I seemed to have turned into a very starry chelloveck, 
about seventy years old, because I could viddy my own 
voloss, which was very grey, and I also had whiskers, and 
these were very grey too. I could nddy myself as an old 
man, sitting by a fire, and then the like picture vanished 
But it was very like strange. 

I came to one of these tea-and-coffiee mestos, brothers, 
and I could viddy through the long long window that it 


was full of very dull lewdies, like ordinary, who had these 
very patient and expressionless htsos and would do no 
harm to no one, all situng there and govoreetmg like 
quietly and peeting away at their nice harmless chai and 
coffee I ittied inside and went up to the counter and 
bought me a nice hot chai with plenty of moloko, then I 
Ittied to one of these tables and sat down to peet it There 
was a like young couple at this table, peeting and smoking 
filter-tip cancers, and govoreetmg and smeckmg very 
quietly between themselves, but I took no notice of them 
and just went on peeting away and like dreaming and 
wondering what it was in me that was like changing and 
what was going to happen to me. But I viddied that the 
devotchka at this table who was with this chelloveck was 
real horrorshow, not the sort you would want to hke throw 
down and give the old in-out in-out to, but with a horror- 
show plott and litso and a smiling rot and very very fair 
volpss and all that cal And then the veck with her, who 
had a hat on his gulliver and had his litso like turned 
away from me, swivelled round to viddy the bolshy big 
clock they had on the wall in this mesto, and then I 
viddied who he was and then he viddied who I was. It 
was Pete, one of my three droogs from those days when 
It was Georgie and Dim and him and me. It was Pete like 
looking a lot older though he could not now be more than 
nineteen and a fait, and he had a bit of a moustache and 
an ordinary day-suit and this hat on I said: 

‘Well well well, droo^e, what gives? Very veiy long 
time no viddy/ He said" 

It's little Alex, isn't it?' 

‘None other/ I said. *A long long long time since those 
dead and gone good days* And now poor Georgie, they 
told me, is underground and old Dim is a brutal milUcent, 



and here is thou and here is I, and what news hast thou, 
old droogie?’ 

‘He talks funny, doesn’t he^’ said this devotchka, like gigglmg 

‘This,’ said Pete to the devotchka, ‘is an old fnend 
His name is Alex May I,’ he said to me, ‘introduce my wife?’ 

My rot fell wide open then. ‘Wife?’ I like gaped. ‘Wife wife wife? AH no, that cannot be Too young art thou to be married, old droog Impossible impossible ’ 

This devotchka who was like Pete’s wife (impossible impossible) giggled again and said to Pete ‘Did you used 
to talk like that too?’ 

‘Well,’ said Pete, and he hke smiled ‘I’m nearly twenty. 
Old enough to be hitched, and it’s been two months 
already You were very young and very forward, re- 
member.’ 

‘Well,’ I like gaped still ‘Over this get can I not, old 
droogie. Pete married. Well well well ’ 

‘We have a small flat,’ said Pete ‘I am earning very 
small money at State Marine Insurance, but things wiU 
get better, that I know And Georgina here — 

‘What again is that name^’ I said, rot still open like 
bezoomny. Pete’s wife (wife, brothers) like giggled again 

‘Georgina,’ said Pete. ‘Georgina works too Typing, you 
know We manage, we manage ’ I could not, brothers, take 
my glazzies off him, really He was like grown up now, 
with a grown-up goloss and all. Tfou must,’ said Pete, 
‘come and see us sometime. You still,’ he said, ‘look very 
young, despite all your terrible experiences. Yes yes yes, 
we’ve read aU about them. But, of course, you tne very 
young still.’ 

‘Eighteen,’ I said, ‘just gone.’ 

‘Eighteen, eh?’ said Pete ‘As old as that Well well well 
Now,’ he said, ‘we have to be going ’ And he like gave this 
Georgina of his a like loving look and pressed one of her 
rookers between his and she gave him one of these looks 
back, O my brothers ‘Yes,’ said Pete, turmng back to me, 
‘we’re ofE to a little party at Greg’s ’ 

‘Greg?’ I said 

‘Oh, of course,’ said Pete, ‘you wouldn’t know Greg, 
would you? Greg is after your time While you were away 
Greg came into the picture He runs little parties, you 
know. Mostly wme-cup and word-games But very mce, 
very pleasant, you know Harmless, if you see what I mean ’ 
‘Yes,’ I said ‘Harmless Yes yes, I viddy that real horror- 
show ’ And this Georgina devotchka giggled again at my 
slovos. And then these two ittied off to their vonny word- 
games at this Greg’s, whoever he was I was left all on my 
oddy knocky with my milky chai, which was gettmg cold 
now, hke thinking and wondering 
Perhaps that was it, I kept thinking Perhaps I was get- 
ting too old for the sort of jeezny I had been leading, 
brothers. I was eighteen now, just gone. Eighteen was not 
a young age. At eighteen old Wolfgang Amadeus had 
written concertos and symphonies and operas and 
oratorios and all that cal, no, not cal, heavenly music. 
And then there was old Felix M with his Midsummer 
Ntghfs Dream Overture. And there were others And 
there was this hke French poet set by old Benjy Britt, who 
had done all his best poetry by the age of fifteen. O my 
brothers Arthur, his first name. Eighteen was not all that 
young an age, then. But what was I gomg to do? 

Walking the dark chill bastards of wmter streets after 
ittying off from this chm and coffee m®to, I kept viddy- 
ing like visions, like these cartoons in the g^ettas. There 

was Your Humble Narrator Alex coming home from 
work to a good hot plate of dinner, and there was this 
putsa all welcoming and greeting like loving But I could 
not viddy her all that horrorshow, brothers, I could not 
think who it might be But I had this sudden very strong 
idea that if I walked into the room next to this room where 
the fire was burning away and my hot dinner laid on the 
table, there I should find what I really wanted, and now 
it all tied up, that picture scissored out of the gazetta and 
meeting old Pete like that For in that other room in a 
cot was laying gurghng goo goo goo my son Yes yes yes, 
brothers, my son And now I felt this bolshy big hollow 
inside my plott, feeling very surprised too at myself I 
knew what was happening, O my brothers. I was like 
growing up 

Yes yes yes, there it was Youth must go, ah yes. But 
youth IS only being in a way like it might be an ammal 
No, It is not just like being an animal so much as being 
like one of these malenky toys you viddy being sold in 
the streets, hke little chellovecks made out of tin and with 
a spring inside and then a winding handle on the outside 
and you wind it up grrr grrr grrr and off it itties, like walk- 
ing, O my brothers But it itties in a straight hne and 
bangs straight into things bang bang and it cannot help 
what It is doing Being young is like being like one of these 
malenky machines. 

My son, my son. When I had my son I would explain 
all that to him when he was starry enough to like under- 
stand But then I knew he would not understand or would 
not want to understand at all and would do all the veshches 
I had done, yes perhaps even killing some poor starry 
forella surrounded with mewing kots and koshkas, and t 
would not he able to really stop him. And nor would he 



be able to stop his own son, brothers. And so it would itty 
on to like the end of the world, round and round and 
round, hke some bolshy gigantic like chelloveck, like old 
Bog Himself (by courtesy of Korova Milkbar) turning and 
turning and turning a vonny grahzny orange in his 
gigantic rookers 

But first of all, brothers, there was this veshch of find- 
ing some devotchka or other who would be a mother to 
this son I would have to start on that tomorrow/* I kept 
thinking. That was something like new to do. That was 
somethmg I would have to get started on, a new like 
chapter beginning 

That’s what it’s going to be then, brothers, as I come to 
the like end of this tale You have been everywhere with 
your little droog Alex, suffering with him, and you have 
viddied some of the most grahzny bratchnies old Bog ever 
made, all on to your old droog Alex And all it was was 
that I was young But now as I end this story, brothers, I 
am not young, not no longer, oh no Alex like groweth up, 
oh yes. 

But where I itty now, O my brothers, is all on my oddy 
knocky, where you cannot go Tomorrow is all like sweet 
flowers and the turning vonny earth and the stars and the 
old Luna up there and your old droog Alex all on his 
oddy knocky seeking like a mate And all that cal A 
terrible grahzny voxmy world, really, O my brothers. And 
so farewell from your little droog And to ail others in 
this story profound shooms of lip-music brrrrrr. And they 
can kiss my shames. But you, O my brothers, remember 
sometimes thy little Alex that was. Amen. And all that cal 
